The Council of the International Monetary Fund has approved 250 billion as a general distribution of special rights by the International Monetary Fund, of which EUR 18 billion will be for countries with low income, and the International Monetary Fund will be called upon to give in Pittsburgh on other measures for the countries with low income. 
We prohibit it as a food addition, can we continue to exist or should we gradually eliminate it as hazardous waste as hazardous waste ? 
The EU and the citizens of the citizens of the European Union are aiming to implement the Charter of Fundamental Rights of Fundamental Rights. 
The group believes that media pluralism is not only a Italian problem, but is not only an Italian problem. 
In accordance with this assessment and, due to the trend in recent years, the agreed quantity of catches has been reduced. 
The European Union must intervene in the work of the UN Human Rights Commission, because it is currently fully paralysed and partial and no longer enjoy universal trust. 
It was not very clear to me, it was not very clear, but not very clearly, but not very clearly. 
This households, businesses and the public sector will have significant comparable economic benefits, because they will have lower energy salaries. 
He was answered, he asked the Interepide of Tehran ', ', and he was saying that he was the ' Interior. 
It is for the unemployed people who are now looking for new work now on a new job. 
I mention, which I mention, almost no investigation and has been investigated and, as a result, not made sufficient change in a great deal of change. 
It includes measures - from the provision of micro-credits and funding for SMEs, to measures for energy efficiency and specific technical assistance to the supervision of the financial sector and financial regulation and financial regulation. 
However, I would like to draw particular attention to the fact that in some countries corruption in the distribution of EU funds is directly linked to the discrediting of policies carried out in these countries. 
It is a matter of establishing the blame, but in this case, basic errors have been made, starting with the conscience and unexposed accusations of a police, recently employed, who caused social warning and very serious, at least, has an economic crisis. 
The fact that European consumers will have much greater benefits than the maximum possible level of regulatory harmonisation is possible. 
In fact, it is the three sectoral insurance supervisory authorities to have the same structure in place in the Commission 's same structure. 
This agreement should be concluded between sovereign national states, taking account of their nations through the democratic process through the democratic process. 
There will be no need to ask the people of Britain or to any other side of the European Union ; however, it will still happen ; it is all going to happen. 
It is clear to use in the use of indirect applicants for biomass research, unless they need to be used exclusively in experiments concerning animal endangers or digitisabilisation of the presidential assentences. 
Serbia has thus shown its commitment to its economic integration with the European Union and has positive results so far in this regard. 
The international markets are extremely sensitive to any measure taken by the European Union, such as the rescue measures adopted in recent days, in recent days. 
This must be decisive to move on the road to greater economic cohesion, stronger cohesion in the fiscal area, in economic and social policies of the Member States. 
We should increase the control of this issue in question, increase the control of this issue, in the matter, of increasing the control of this matter. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of granting discharge for 2007 for the European Commission, but I did so with some reservations. 
A single integrated market means that EU energy policy is not capable of providing effective solutions to problems relating to cuts oil and natural gas reserves in Europe, increasing the prices of raw domestic oil prices and natural gas, increasing global demand for global energy and global warming. 
I would like to congratulate all the four rapporteurs from the Committee on Constitutional Affairs and the Committee on Petitions on their joint work in providing this remarkable report, as well as on how the negotiations with the Council and the Commission have negotiated this good result. 
We are trying to eliminate some inconsistencies and sometimes even consistent and sometimes even controversial measures, even controversial measures. 
I would like to share with you the response to the Italian of the United Nations, and to stress that our concern is now to protect the interests of our citizens and of our people 's people 's interests. 
The European Council stated in its conclusions, obviously we can not apply the priority to guaranteeing the safety of nuclear power plants only within our borders. 
The EIB was extremely important to have been the EIB 's EIB 's own contribution to the EIB 's very important importance, and it was extremely important to the EIB. 
It is the EU to take a decisive stance on the situation in Kyrgyzstan, because it is a strategic country. 
We all know - that means that we will remember that we will remind the Member States of the European Union, which govern a large majority of the European funds, to do so in accordance with good practice ; because we also know that most errors of the mistakes made in the use of European funds have been made by the Member States and their level of responsibility. 
What is the case, how does the Committee on Industry, Research and Energy ( ITRE ) be to name both states, Ukraine and Russia, as responsibility for the problems of natural gas supplies for the EU, but our recommendations are only making Russia solving just Russia ? 
We have listened to you and we listened to you. 
The case of the first communication, making an evaluation of the situation and taking appropriate action, and we are taking on the table, as yet from the first communication, by assessing the situation and taking appropriate action. 
It is : what would you say if, after one or two years, you consider, that you have been meeting by the representatives of the Lukashenko Government here in this House, not on the ground, but in the case of a Vice-President of the Committee on Civil Liberties, Justice and Home Affairs ( LIBE ), which is responsible for civil liberties and human rights ? 
However, it is important that, in the meantime, the climate debate has become an interim debate in another debate, however, in the meantime, that the climate debate has become an important debate. 
Community aid to decommission of blocking blocks 4 to the Kozloduy Platform : Cameroon programme ( 
I am able to see that the EIB and the EBRD have reached an agreement on cooperation in the countries where joint work is done in which the joint work is done. 
You know, and as you have just said, as the President-in-Office of the Council said, the Council has made decisions - in the way that is decided - in unanimously - on these issues in these matters. 
In the first half of this year, the price of oil fuel prices of gas suppliers came to up with up to 40 % of gas suppliers this year, is falling by 40 %. 
My constituents like and say to the Vivings, I do not receive good services in my constituency and I would like to travel abroad to another Member State of the European Union to receive better healthcare ', they are not sure in terms of their legal situation. 
With regard to nuclear energy, we are in a close contact with the International Atomic Energy Agency in Vienna and carefully monitoring, we appreciate and analyse the safety situation in Japan in Japan. 
The budgetary problems are being hit with economic problems, the budgetary problems are being hit by economic problems, and economic problems are being put into question. 
I explain to him why people in the United Kingdom are so deliberate in the UK are so eater. 
We can not, on the other hand, accept this, but, on the other hand, the Eastern Partnership seems to be a response to Russia 's policy policy in its neighbouring countries in its neighbouring countries. 
Lastly, I very much welcome the fact that we agreed that we do not want the industry of the American request a model by a turmoil of billion per year, which ultimately only five will they only win the lawyers and consumers have nothing to do. 
There is some plan - an anti-European plan - in connection with the production of modern, more environmentally-friendly blood, and that we must face up to those who want to withdraw an agenda for the very important information on these extremely important products. 
This must be implemented, measures must be applied to limit the impact of price volatility and speculation. 
I therefore expect to start the procedure for 2011 for 2011, and I therefore expect to start to start the procedure for 2011 for 2011. 
I expect this, and I hope that they will do so, and I hope they will do so. 
Israel 's investigations of the objectives and charges used during the operation of LIBE have been carried out by the Communications of war or military police, thereby seriously compromising the independence of the fingerships and, on the part of Hamas, there is still no adequate explanation of the stages in the southern part of Israel. 
It is being seen that this Parliament will today reflect the decision taken by the committees and those of us who have made up of the report that was adopted by the vast majority of majority. 
I really believe, based on the experience of the revolving debate in this Chamber, that we should not only discuss the economic crisis, the financial crisis, as well as what is now being called for a war on money '. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I can say at the beginning that I believe that we really need to call them to be able to call on them not the Millennium Development Goals, but ' to the hypocritical development ' hypocritical challenges. 
on behalf of the ECR Group. - Madam President, I will take the floor, first of all, to congratulate the Commission on its initiative for Brazil to be recognised as a regional power, which sets out its relations with the European Union to strategic levels to strategic levels. 
In part, it is due to the numerous and decisive amendments tabled by the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ), which made it less ideological, more pragmatic and capable of making it more effective to the presence of the critical monstrations established in the 200 years of the Afghan authorities for the Afghan territories, and to identify positive aspects and development lines, in order to make the presence of the international community more effective use of the transition of the transition of the sovereignty of the Authority authorities. 
The work of the rapporteurs was simplified, particularly the idea that the seven group of experts from seven different countries will start the procedure initiated. 
Cohesion is a major concern for the EU to open the balance in relations between richer and poorer regions and the poorer regions. 
This basis is not a basis, I am not sure that we should limit whether we should limit this in a single separate project. 
( RO ) Mr President, I believe that the respect for the independence of the judiciary - a fundamental standard shared by the European Union and Brazil - must be brought to an end to all other considerations. 
Another other problem both in Campania and in Lithuania, which is caused by the complete absence of cooperation between citizens and the authorities. 
I am all about talking about reality to me all to talk about reality of reality. 
We must not stop with our blind calls for our times, and we must not stop calling for our untimes. 
It must be aimed at promoting better public awareness of the diseases relating to the old arrest and the completion of the World Day Day, 21 September, with information campaigns on the prevention of such diseases and the treatment of basin the basins. 
The Council is intending to take measures in this regard in the Council to take measures in this regard ? 
We must reward the Union for the Mediterranean ( SAR ) and its projects that can contribute to the economic modernisation of the Mediterranean countries. 
It has been a key issue, and I am pleased that I can once again point out that the aid is being put in the car industry by the European Investment Bank, in order to ensure that the crisis situation does not weaken the capacity of innovation industry. 
The European programme for European programme means support efforts to digitise the cultural heritage of the Member States ' cultural heritage of the Member States. 
EUR 000 of you have enabled us to finance a number of important actions to promote governance in order to promote taxation management in tax matters. 
: EU EU EU EU EU EU EU EU EU EU EU EU urban policy on EU immigration policy, Immigratory policy of EU EU immigration policy, 
They are also prepared to take their representatives to take appropriate measures to address the problem, too, and they are ready to take appropriate measures to address them. 
NGOs report that blogs and political issues raised are held in prison prison. 
It contributes to preventing the problem of market infringement, which would be caused by a sudden increase in imports of textile products to the EU market if the authorised quotas were not respected. 
euros for euro visa is too much for most of the Belarusian citizens ' people, too much for the majority of the Belarusian citizens. 
It is that spectrum spectrum is a blind resource that is not dependent on borders. 
This is what we are in our lesson to be a lesson that is a lesson to us. 
I would also like to say a few words about Pakistan, for Pakistan, for Pakistan, for Pakistan, for Pakistan, and I would also like to say a few words. 
At the same time, consolidating the transatlantic strategic partnership must offer a new opportunity to develop cooperation with the third major participant of the northern Political Islamist, namely Russia. 
We do not present it with a light of hand in hand. 
We are not currently moving for this rapid progress as everyone would like, but we are moving swiftly enough to say that the machinery is in the face and that it is better to keep this logic of progress than to the logic of bloc. 
I am sure that everyone has already seen the truth already all the truth. 
Political terms, this is not just a moral music game, nor must we approach the problem of only a sense of feeling of a sense of feeling for your own. 
systematic solution is often being made up of detail or even lobbyist interests, but even of lobbyists, a systematic solution is often being made up of detail or even lobbyists interests. 
There is an opportunity to develop in terms of providing jobs, particularly for women, for women, in particular, for women, in particular. 
My voice to those local communities, who first suffer from the consequences and join the fight against environmental movements, while calling for an immediate ban on the use of cyanides in the extract of cyanide in the European Union. 
Proposals put forward proposals that have been put forward, proposals that proposals put forward. 
It is unreasonable to be unreasonable, it is unreasonable to have a sense of misunderstanding. 
I would like to emphasise this aspect, which is what I would like to highlight. 
I know how you are trying to introduce the common asylum system by 2012, because this seems to me too late late later. 
I have said two years in this Chamber that I fear the Treaty of Lisbon to fail to share the fate of the fish in the share of Honduras, the Srebrenica and the sea, which, after the long fight, arrived at port as almost cold. 
on behalf of the PPE Group. - Mr President, honourable Members, during the negotiations on accession to the European Union under pressure under certain political forces, Bulgaria agreed to close to 4 of its nuclear blocks in the Kozloduy Platform and fulfils this commitment in the preconditions for time. 
There may be a valuable contribution to EU policies due to its experience in the field of renewable energy sources, particularly in terms of the use of geopower, environmental protection and climate change protection measures. 
There is a credibility and liquidity with credibility and liquidity, with credibility and liquidity. 
It is being imported from fish imports, but I say that this should not be at all costs at all costs. 
Social protection, which is to be taken, must also be accountable to the conditions of women 's lives as seasonal agricultural workers, particularly as regards the need for adequate housing, health insurance and adequate conditions. 
It is surprising that you support the Presidency of your very much your very strong position that you are in favour of your very strong position that you are in favour of your very saying position. 
Moreover, the Gulf Cooperation Council recently announced that it is no longer recognised that the Mayotte Gaddafi regime is no longer recognised for the legitimate regime. 
in writing. - ( EL ) The restructuring of the mental health system, which is proposed, serves to the interests of capital, capital, capital restructuring and the Commercialisation of health, not the interests of patients. 
A network of immigration offices is another step towards a centralised measure controlled by the European Union, which serves the spread of immigrants and refugees. 
The crisis has deteriorated even more poverty and, even more poverty has deteriorated, and the crisis has deteriorated even more poverty and, more poverty, has deteriorated. 
The same trading mark is being proposed in the European Union, but with a different composition of the product for the various countries of the European Union, for the various countries. 
The people have been threatened with a huge coalition, the political classification, the big companies, the majority of capitalist passes and the Commission of the European Union that if they vote 'no ', it will be isolated by the European Union and that the withdrawal of capital and investment and, if 'yes ', there will be jobs, investment and recovers. 
In line with the gender, it is a good example of budget budget - the methodology proposed and supported by the European Parliament itself, even though it is not yet a north. 
There is also also the case for nuclear energy, as is also about nuclear energy. 
It was before me before me that it was many interests of the disabled groups who wanted to see their position as a review of the various stakeholders. 
It means that there will be still further talks about there will be further talks, and there will be further talks about there will be further talks. 
There will be a benefit of the time made between the submission of application and the ability to place on the market, which will mean savings of administrative expenditure and the opportunity to achieve the market earlier, increasing profits from sales. 
It will also show how the European Union will specifically participate in these plans and explain how the costs between Member States will be allocated, and also efforts aimed at achieving these objectives. 
As it is what we have so paradoxically paradoxically, we have given our role to drivers if we can not present the funds and measures and measures, we will not succeed in reaching an agreement and the main responsibility will fall on Europeans. 
These subjects are present in the report and this is what I hope we have managed to achieve a comprehensive report and that we have succeeded in achieving a comprehensive report. 
Bangales is in prison and there is no reason to believe that there is no reason to believe that a free short-term exemption will be released soon. 
All EU trade agreements should be included in a social clause that is legally binding, legally binding. 
............................................................................................................................................................ ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? 
We want this agreement to make it possible to introduce a regulated, transparent and environmentally friendly trade in timber, which will benefit local populations in the countries concerned, not to groups whose legality is questioning, the European Union must make the rights of local and correct population respect for these people to fully and consultations. 
( IT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, it is still a demand how the Council can be so seriously approaching the issue in question. 
A person who has been working for many years as journalist and has deep knowledge of this profession, this is particularly important to me. 
You think you think you have a mandate for this, you are a honourable honour and a homophobia, you think you have a mandate for this, you are honourable and a homophole. 
It is simply widespread, but also unusually to consider them only as goods or services as goods or services as a matter of normally. 
We actually proposed to Japan our experience in the field of nuclear energy, because of the extremely severe and worrying situation affecting not only Japan, but also the whole international public, but also international public. 
Ladies and gentlemen, citizens often complain that Europe has no person in place in place, and there is no person of Europe. 
Let us pay more attention to environmental, or to be precise, to environmental education, by integrating in education programmes and presenting a new discipline as a new discipline. 
Fortunately, the Estonian Government did not have to hold a referendum to decide on accession, because we know that, in some extent, that the citizens are concerned about it. 
Despite the refusal to agree with this philosophy and our attempts to prevent it, our true force is, even though we have to use force even in our peaceful missions. 
I tell me to tell you how I see Europe of the future of the future of Europe of the future, I see Europe of the future of the future. 
This, Mr President, Mr President, no statements, even if they are to deprive the Chair of the groups, will not change the private and honour of Parliament 's legal obligations, which are a law. 
It is very pleased that the fact that the number of people travelling to the European Union is increasing by the European Union is increasing by the fact that the number of people travelling to the European Union is increasing. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
There are extremely important issues relating to the ratings sector as the absence of competition, the oligopolistic structure and the absence of accountability and transparency, particularly in the rating of sovereign debt ratings. 
Bosnia Herzegovina, in fact, is a Solana in the wake of a decline in which the various ethnic groups must choose between the various ethnic groups together or fight against internal conflicts throughout the territory. 
However, claims can not be true at the same time, however, at the same time, but can not be true at the same time. 
It is to remember that the real regional market is a significant basis for successful implementation of the interim Economic Partnership Agreement and that regional integration and cooperation are essential for the public and economic development of the Pacific States. 
We support measures for the management and protection of European forests, we do not support the creation of a new European forestry policy to be created which would transfer the powers of the European Union 's powers in this area. 
( PL ) Ladies and gentlemen, the 2010 budget is a difficult compromise for 2010, and it is a difficult compromise for 2010. 
The chair of the Commission is simply a document, and the progress reports do not comply with their name. 
However, measures that are being put too far from the proposed measures, however, are going too far too far too far too far, and too much. 
At a time when we should promote public transport as an effective and favourable opportunity for the environment, the new rules for passengers will give them the relevant rights they deserve. 
The situation is changing, the situation is changing, the situation is changing. 
It can lead to a Europe with an increasingly different growth and development rate, it is going into it, to disseming the idea of a single European Union and to disappointing the European Union and to the disappointing of our citizens. 
We are aware of the patient 's awareness of what this means that this means that this means that this means it means. 
It is the European Union to start to accept the opinions of European citizens and listening to the people 's votes right to accept the opinions of European citizens and listen to the people 's voice. 
2007, the decision was made to include this treaty in the EU 's legal framework for the EU legal framework. 
Let us try not to make them the same questions similar to the same issues as we are trying to make them the same. 
It shows that we have been doing - the euro can not work ' - it is not a matter of operation '. 
At the same time, we have also stated from the international tribunal tribute that we are in principle open to third countries such as Russia in particular, where necessary ; Russia is, of course, full member of the Black Sea Synergy where regional issues are concerned. 
Credit rating agencies are expected to provide information about the quality of credit quality of credit, and information is expected to provide information about the quality of credit. 
Therefore, research in this area is extremely important and must be focused, and we must focus, first and foremost, on providing funding, coordinated work and coordinated activities. 
The convention has ratified by 26 Member States and the Community Member States and the convention is ratified by 26 Member States and by the Community. 
It has recently been revised and I think that this is something good, with the end of the sanctions that were part of the European Union 's position and in which no sense and with renewing political dialogue has become possible to do something that was not possible for the Hague : to talk to the authorities for their views. 
As the next meeting of the Committee on parliamentary cooperation - Russia will take place this week in Strasbourg, I hope that I will raise this issue to my fellow Members from the Russian State of the Federation and the Council of the Federation, and I would like to encourage my fellow Members here to do the same. 
( PL ) Mr President, I would like to talk about the security of the supply of raw materials for production, which farmers and traders in the European Union need, as well as the producers of feed and animals for animals. 
There are additional negotiations with the Council so that we can reach final agreement before the summer, in order to ensure a solid basis for the euro. 
We agree that they are necessary and we all agree that it is necessary to find the legal basis for us all to find the legal basis. 
This way will be prepared for the success of a successful EU-US Summit in Washington, probably probably in June. 
Ukraine is the key to a democratic, responsible and consistent with the law of Russia, and a strong European and strong European Ukraine is the key to a democratic, responsible and consideration of Russia. 
We have been said, in October 2008, we began the negotiations in the French Presidency in October 2008. 
There are three explanations of vote on the Framework Agreement on the EU-Commission relations between the European Parliament and the Commission. 
We certainly have a common interest in achieving this objective and we must not forget this during the debate on the future of cohesion policy after 2014. 
( ES ) Mr President, I voted for Amendments 30 and 31, because, as the overall distribution of total catches ( OEC ) and the definition of the CFCA must take into account the characteristics and objectives of the various photovoltaic targets - small and industrial factories - so that the fishing opportunities can be maintained so that fishing opportunities that have been made up so far. 
because the Structural Funds and cohesion policy did not meet the common agricultural policy of the common agricultural policy not meet the common agricultural policy, because they did not meet the Structural Funds and the Cohesion Policy not meet ? 
It should also be expressed in the spread of new information technologies, so that the Internet, in particular, will become a contribution that is as broad as possible to access. 
It must be made clear that human rights do not mean that we must ignore the concept, let us say, yes, subsidiarity or withdraw the different values of the Member States. 
It is interdependence on food supply security, and it is interdependence that the security of food supply is provided with food supply is security. 
Our specific recommendations are being made, along with the Commission 's comments on the aforementioned issues, will be claimed in a successful project. 
It gives us a situation of reflection, a material for reflection, a situation gives us a cause for reflection, and a concern for reflection, to be given to us. 
We should improve the functioning of food supply chain, it should be possible, in future, to avoid such high levels of food prices and limit the instability of consumer prices and price volatility. 
Amendment denying the concept of the preservation of the status of church or other organisations based on religious or personal beliefs, and at the same time Article 3 and the recital in accordance with the wording proposed by amendments and 29 of the aforementioned report, limits, in my opinion, the scope of the Member States ' competences in terms of access to educational institutions based on religious institutions or belief. 
We do not know where and how the European security network will be established, which is in itself unquestionable. 
The parliaments of the Member States, including, including, of course, Hungary, have approved it and have approved it. 
It has also been proposed in the report by Mr Barnier, but we have not yet reached a conclusion so far. 
It is that they are linked to the mass presence of immigrants who are imported into Europe a fundamental concept of religion, Islamic, but if the price is paid by women in these communities, tomorrow, it can be affected by our women and the heart of the West. 
This, as I said in my introduction, we must help the poorest parts of the world to obtain clean drinking water as I said in their open words, we must help the poorest parts of the world to get access to clean drinking water. 
This is a question of logistics, in this context, simply a question of logistics. 
They will be able to invite the Commission to present new initiatives in the areas of policies in the areas of policies and initiatives in the areas of policies. 
We are your partners in the resolution of these matters, and we are in the resolution of these matters. 
It is also true that the scandalous continuation of tax havens for tax havens, too, is also about the scandalous extension of tax havens. 
The European Parliament plays a crucial role in the introduction and promotion of European policies for young people in the Member States, in particular, playing a critical role in the European Parliament, in the promotion of and promoting the promotion of European policies for youth policies for young people in the Member States. 
It is easy to compare superfluous phs for deregulation, but in the real world, there are always people who want to keep up the regulations that are asking for the regulations. 
The functions of deposits will be significantly strengthened, along with risk management, with risk management, by the risk management of the risks. 
I am convinced that this is the convention that was recently reached in the history of the United Nations, but, above all, I am proud of being proud of the disabled people and the organisations of disabled people with disabilities played a full part in dealing with their consideration and acceptance. 
We call on this process to be clear and simple to be understood to us as representatives of the individual voters who ultimately compile the European Union. 
Reducing the use of a best in Europe must be welcomed without any reserve. 
It is a dispute that, where more than 15 years, Europe was of different opinion by the Latin American countries, banana producers and the United States, which have condemned preferential treatment provided by Europe by the African, Caribbean and Pacific Group of the African ( ACP ) countries. 
additional legislative changes to the protection of journalists, the protection of human rights defenders and politicians from criminal persecution and condemnation on account of opinions against violence. 
Mr President, a few days ago, the annual anniversary of the first reading of 1 May as the International employment employment International employment International Day was noted in the first reading of 1 May as a International employment employment president. 
Today, one good speech has made : free solidarity, and not a strong solidarity, but without solidarity, there is no strong European Union, effective European Union '. ' 
It must be done at the same time with the even greater opening of the market and allowing Member States to use stringent and effective implementation measures to be used to implement strict and effective measures. 
There is a standard of 19th century in place, there is a standard of living in 19 century. 
policies are absolutely necessary, as they are an expression of justice and ensuring that the European Union consists consistent with its values and uphold its citizens ' attitude to these values. 
Seven per cent of Europe 's inhabitants expect to be developed a European policy in this area. 
However, we are faced with significant problems such as increasing unemployment and increasing debt and budgetary deficit and increasing debt and budgetary deficit. 
Parliament has consistently called for the creation of a true common common common European diplomacy, diplomacy. 
I must mention that this ambitious long-term goal will require Georgia to make a demand and support efforts aimed at implementing reforms. 
I have been saying for a long time that, as far as the protection of human rights and minority rights in Europe is concerned, it is very worried that the Council of Europe has an act in place system for the protection of human rights and minority, while the real political burden in Europe is the Union. 
in writing. - The Committee on Petitions in 2006 ( vote ) ( vote ) 
It is not a personal issue, but not a personal issue, but a personal issue is not a personal issue. 
I am speaking on the name, I am concerned that urgent trade preferences will seem to be the prize for the Pakistani Government to lack its action in this regard. 
I answer several specific issues raised in the debate on a few specific issues, which have been raised in the debate. 
It is estimated that everything has been lost, but in its desperate desire to keep its dream wish to retain each other 's system after the rest of democracy. 
I believe that we can not talk about the EU budget today, without opening the debate on both own resources and the Community regime, or without mentioning certain expenditure pesticides. 
However, EUR million will be cut by the budget line for the European Regional Development Fund ( the EDF ) budget ). 
It is almost illegal fishing and we should in no way make them join the EU. 
I voted in favour of the new composition of the Commission 's new draft new College of Commissioners in favour of the new composition of the new College of Commissioners. 
We would, of course, all wish to see the immediate practical practice of sending an intervention mission to intervention mission. 
However, a spirit of cooperation, political dialogue and joint efforts to achieve concrete objectives, will provide enormous help to build trust, which is necessary to achieve viable solutions. 
I think that, in the fight against climate change, almost all has been called on to date, renewable energy sources, which are clearly very important. 
On the way in exercising the mandate ', they are a positive ' exercise ', and on how the mandate is exercised. 
In relation to the hysteria that has been held after the earthquake in Japan and the problems relating to the Fukushima nuclear power plant in Fukushima, the citizens of some Member States decided to abandon from nuclear energy in relatively short time, even though there is still no signs of general problem. 
On the other hand, apart from the imposition of a complete embargo on armed armed armed, the Commission is willing to examine the possibility of supporting reform in the area of security in order to reform the army and transform it into professional professional professional professional professional training so that stability can be recovered in Guinea. 
The problems, but we can not do your actions, Mr Dalli, but we can not do your job, but we can not do your job, Mr Dalli, and you can not do so. 
The European Union thus shows a certain solidarity of solidarity, thus the European Union shows a certain way of showing solidarity. 
in writing. - ( DE ) Energy efficiency is an area of great potential for the future, where the European Union already has some experience of experience. 
I am of the opinion that it is essential that we continue to pay particular attention to the regions mentioned in Objective 2 by supporting economic and social transformation of these areas, disclosing their full potential and encouraging the coordination of all their means and opportunities to support growth and employment. 
The Union has declared its intentions through legislation which is already mandatory : legislation that has been made by the European Commission, which has been given the support of the European Council and Parliament and - unilaterally and unconditional - the European Union has already set out a 20 % reduction in greenhouse gases by 2020. 
It is regrettable that the European Commission has late this proposal before the European Parliament and we can not have a clear debate here, although the regulation on the CAP deserves Amendment of one amendment. 
We are sending a message from Brussels and Strasbourg that we are not only concerned or extremely much about the recovery of the financial system, but we are fully aware of the need to develop our social policies, particularly those that support the most in the most in the European Union. 
Mr President, the 10th anniversary of the euro is indeed a matter for celebration. 
There are ministers and Prime Ministers of sovereign and Prime Ministers of sovereign states, held by the Ministers and Prime Ministers of Sunday, of sovereign states. 
I support the efforts by the rapporteur to find a balance here in finding a balance in the efforts of the rapporteur to find a balance in here and here. 
There are no longer thousands of refugees already in the home and do not know where to go, and they do not know where to go. 
I call on you to consider, for example, the date, to put back on the table a few days - because if you will be the ones from this vote, you will actually take the UK the opportunity to oppose or support measures. 
The EU is in its open borders and free trade and free trade, and its open borders and free trade trade. 
It is crucial that the forthcoming common elections, which are due to 7 March 1010, can be made into the next major step towards consolidating democracy in Iraq in Iraq. 
As human rights are particularly important for the European Union, as I all agree, we must set ourselves to help. 
It will be Tony Blair with his empire Quio Christmas Christmas ? 
It is a question of visas from third countries that require visas for visas, it is essential to examine any individual case in individual cases. 
However, the need for the European Commission to take concrete action to respond positively to these problems, in order to respond positively to the European Commission to the European Commission to take concrete action to respond positively to these problems. 
Once again, thank all the parliamentary groups for their support, tone and constructive behaviour groups, for all the parliamentary groups, for their support, tone and constructive behaviour. 
Capitalism can not evolve into democratic and responsible capitalism, which we are enjoying today in Europe and West. 
It is a decent day is a fantasy day. 
UN resolution, which is based on the declaring of an immediate cease-fire and the opening of negotiations. 
The simple recommendation to the Icelandic people is to wait for the final exit of the negotiations before taking some position. 
It is also my last debate as President of this parliamentary term and I would like to thank everyone in this parliamentary term and I would like to thank everyone. 
It is to know how the expenditure of new technologies will be taken and who will take them into account it and who will take them into account. 
I would like to ask you to think new ideas, but to take the package presented last week by the President of the Commission and Olli Rehn and to put him up with his four main areas of discussion with the Council and before your fellow Members. 
It will create opportunities not only for consumers, but also for our small and medium-sized enterprises ( SMEs ), for which it will now be easier to take advantage of the benefits of the scale of the internal market. 
The European Commission is very positive and improved through the relevant changes made by Parliament, namely : namely : : 
Everyone talks of refugees, who talk of refugees, talk of refugees, talk of refugees, about refugees. 
The language groups do not encourage the learning of languages ; it is encouraged by informal collection of people speaking different languages in school, work and play and play a play. 
The circumstances of the circumstances that make the lives of the EU 's ordinary citizen are the frequent introduction of amendments in legislation. 
Tymoshenko has lost the elections precisely because the ordinary people have been brought to a loser show of corruption and the evidence of public property on the part of certain officials. 
It is more difficult to support equal and high employment rates and to maintain stable public finances and to maintain stable public finances. 
European Union ideas gradually transformed into a policy whose main principles have become the liquidity of poverty and the promotion of human rights, fundamental freedoms, the decent working conditions and good governance. 
This regulation sets out enhanced cooperation between certain Member States ( Austria, Austria, Belgium, France, Hungary, Italy, Latvia, Latvia, Luxembourg, Malta, Malta, Portugal, Portugal, Romania, Slovenia and Spain ). 
I am pleased to say that the Spanish Presidency has only received support and recognition from the Commission, the Council and the European Parliament for its constructive attitude and I am pleased that no criticism of the attitude has been made today made of the fundamental institutions ' attitude to the Commission. 
It is a matter of no longer being classification as mental disease ; and the second which is particularly important here is that there is no credible research to demonstrate that the child 's question of homosexuality can affect their sexual orientation. 
I voted in favour of Parliament resolution because I believe that, although the draft budget in your draft budget to amend the Council does not fully meet the real need for a sustainable, coherent and effective budget of the European Parliament, Parliament aimed at providing the Union with the budget that can be fully implemented by the beginning of the financial year was achieved. 
We should eliminate poverty and hunger from the world without the aid of the market without the world without the aid of the market without the aid of the world, without the market, without the aid of the market. 
In this context, we consider it vital for cooperation with the countries of North Africa to develop renewable energy renewable energy sources to develop renewable energy with the countries in North Africa. 
I would like to stress that the international economic and financial crisis has also led to a social crisis of the global level, and this is only a deepening need for stringent rules to ensure that there is more effective supervision of the global economy, and that its development will not be at the same time to the detriment of our societies. 
Cameroon is that Cameroon is the leading African exporter of European exporter, makes the necessary regulation of goods from goods through the partnership agreement we are voting on today. 
It is a logical thing, when we say that export must be authorised and approved in advance. 
This incidence has a psychological explanation of this incident. 
An agreement against counterfeiting ( ACTA ) is precisely such an event, so you are hence in keeping your promise and your own Treaty ! 
A parliamentary resolution was carefully overlooked to avoid any opportunity to escalate the escalation of violence in Thailand and to leave the opportunity for dialogue, but that does not mean that we will not without calling for democracy without calling for democracy. 
Orbán, we need European economic governance, we need European economic governance, we need European economic governance. 
I would like to emphasise one more question : we are focused on the euro area, but we also have to do ' in the European Union and we must do the necessary and that is not facing problems. 
The number of people who can not meet the major vitality of living standards can not be satisfactorily satisfied with basic liquidity. 
The socialist government must take this into account, but nothing has been done so far, but nothing has been done so far. 
I would like to call on the Bureau to consider the opportunity to send a clear letter to the Council with the message that such behaviour is unacceptable. 
The effectiveness of this measure must be assessed, as well as its impact in the possible mix of fraud to another Member State or other types of supply or fraud. 
I support fiscal balance throughout the whole economic cycle in the whole economic cycle of economic cycle. 
It is not different in Libya and Egypt, according to the communications of the workers in this area, in foreign journalists, in this area, also in Libya and Egypt, in the opinion of the reports of the workers in this area, in foreign journalists. 
We can see such an approach from the Member States and the Commission to see such a approach from the Member States and the Commission as well. 
This is largely due to the excellent work of Commissioner Rehn 's excellent work. 
Parliament and the Commission acted together to propose a set of initiatives in response to the crisis 's response to the crisis. 
We need to support this in mind the implementation of the objectives of the European strategy for the Republic of Moldova 2007-2013, in order to achieve the desired results on both sides. 
We have learnt from the failure of the Lisbon Agenda - another reluctance that no one can understand ! 
It is a very good result for Parliament and for Europe and for Europe and for Europe, and for Europe, for Parliament and for Europe. 
I will be my proposal to the European Council so that it can - and I am very keen to do so - Parliament has full involvement and fully committed to this strategy. 
Germany has been done by Germany, Germany was done by Germany, by Germany, by Germany. 
Finally, I am pleased to note with the quality of the annual report on the activities of the Committee of the Regions, particularly the part in this clear part of the follow-up taken following previous decisions by Parliament and the European Parliament and the Court of Auditors on discharge, which underlines how important and appropriate solutions are. 
It is also essential that Madagascar does not conclude agreements on natural resources before there is a government with a mandate given by the people, too, to have a government before it has a mandate. 
We can expect, particularly in adverse economic conditions, that the problems will be regulated on the basis of a moral values system. 
We do not think that we are unstrong to these tragedies of tragedy, we believe that we are intolerable to these tragedies. 
The forthcoming package on victims ' rights will, in particular, focus on the protection of particularly vulnerable victims, and women, but also children, but also children. 
The recognition of certification figures represents a huge benefit to the EU, given that this will establish mutual recognition of certification in all areas of telecoms for all Member States. 
We also focus on the expenditure in the budget, we must also focus more on the people who really benefit from Union policy, not only the sums in the annual budget. 
Some four years in Campania and I met a group meeting, homosexuals and transgender in a pigs whose own allowed to take place. 
By taking this time, the only court that Moldova expects, in the best case, is that of Belarus, it is in the best case. 
What is even more serious, Mr President, is that the Council in the history of employment in Europe - today 10 000 Europeans will lose their jobs and will be the same as tomorrow and the century - has not taken any serious initiative and has not had any job summit on employment issues. 
Ladies and gentlemen, we have taken into account the internal political situation in the Czech Republic in the Czech Republic, we have taken into account, in the Czech Republic, the internal political situation in the Czech Republic. 
We are to remember what happened in 2005 when the Stability and Growth Pact was divorceand what happened in 2005. 
We know what the result will be - it will be a two-state approach, and we also have a road map, but whether we do not need new ways to pass our message both to the Israelis and the Palestinians in the region ? 
This is against it against it, and we voted against it, against it, that we voted against it. 
It also has a positive and where improvements have been made where improvements have been made, and where improvements are made. 
This is necessary to introduce new systems to ensure that this is never happening and that there are resources for exceptional cases to stabilise the failures in the system. 
( PL ) Yesterday in Luxembourg, Poland, a official in a constituency in a constituency of the European Parliament was killed in their workplace. 
Here is here in the European Parliament, this week, to participate in four work visits organised by the Bureau to promote parliamentary democracy. 
It is necessary to say that the conclusion of an agreement with India at this stage has not only a huge economic value, but it is also essential for strategic strategic importance. 
However, I would like to ask me, if you were to draw your attention to you, to draw your attention to your authorisation, if you allow me, to draw your attention to your attention to the table. 
It is broad support from social platforms and by civil society and civil society, and is very much supported by social platforms and civil society. 
It is totally unfounded, a argument that can probably be missed out by the Belgian Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe, which can probably be missed out of the Belgian Group. 
Approximately estimates, million people in Europe suffer from undegenerative disease, such as Alzheimer 's disease, are suffering from neurodegenerative diseases. 
There is something that the Commission must be aware of what the Commission must do to give itself a bit to be aware of. 
We are relating to our decision-making process and the implementation of the last global decision-making process, particularly in the United States, in particular. 
minutes of the previous sitting : see Minutes 
The report points out in the legislative process affecting 000 industrial companies in Europe, the legislative process concerns 000 industrial sector in Europe. 
It is to block ' negotiations on the protocol to access generic resources and sharing the benefits. 
Would you help your country of interest in your country, would it help your country ? 
The legislative package of many months has already been reached and % has already been reached with the Council and an agreement has already been reached with the legislative package of many months and has already been reached in agreement with the Council with the Council. 
EU inspectors must also monitor and control ships which have been attacked in Indian portfolios, with a destination of the European Union, with which I would like to say that the monitoring and monitoring must be carried out on the Indian ports. 
The people of the media, the publishers of newspapers come and tell us that they have questions, we should be discussing these issues seriously. 
I ask the following question : if 50 years of unreciprocal trade relations did not encourage any, even less developed, how could this be achieved by synergies of the markets opening ? 
It will stimulate the economy and create jobs, and will also contribute to achieving the Barcelona objectives. 
We have also retained the sense of prostitution for prostitution, too, and we have also maintained. 
In this framework, the dialogue between the European Parliament and the national parliaments will highlight the forward-looking goal, our common responsibility and solidarity, which we must show at European and national level so that we can take the right decisions and implement the right policies that are already required to understand in the long term, particularly for our fellow Members, in the national parliaments, which have to pay the political prices in their political countries. 
This is not yet done, I can assure you that it will be in June. 
It confirms that the TFTP has been used to identify and detention of persons who have subsequently been condemned to terrorism within our Member States. 
It is also financial protection for women in the case of unemployment or maternity protection for women, or maternity protection, in the case of unemployment or maternity protection, too. 
Also, the innovative way the European Parliament considers this initiative to be initiative in which the European Parliament is considering this initiative. 
Turkey 's accession process continues to be committed to Turkey 's accession process, as it gives a strong boost to political and economic reforms, to political and economic reforms. 
I believe that the fight against poverty should be conducted by stimulating the economy and the market, not by subsidies that must always be financed by taxes that, as we know, are aiming at taxpayers and the economy and the economy and are an obstacle to economic competitiveness. 
( RO ) Madam President, the directive sets out the legal framework for responsible management of spent nuclear fuel and radioactive waste, which is absolutely binding from the point of view of the regulations. 
The two opposition of the Chinese regime, which says that the Dalai Lama is a man who has been elected to violence ; the Dalai Lama and the Tibetan Government in exile demanding independence for the Tibetan State, which is contrary to China 's territorial unity. 
An effective supervisory system, which will create conditions for providing stable finances to the economy and to ensure economic growth and lasting employment and lasting employment. 
All of these conclusions lack specific operations for operational operations, all in the conclusions are lacking in concrete operations. 
It is time that, with the so-called ISA, projects in developing countries, are now being financed, particularly in the scope of the general definition of development aid measures for development aid. 
The provision of citizens a platform to express and offer ideas to European legislation and offer ideas to European legislation. 
European Union general budget for the 2010 financial year 2010 - Section III - Commission ( Commission ) on the draft general budget of the European Union budget for the financial year 2010, Section III - Commission ( 
The current rules on the import of animals, meat and meat products to remain in force with measures adopted under the new regulatory framework. 
Russia is, in the meantime, a friend, irrespective of what is doing, including the most severe visits such as the murder of journalists, and America is a partner, in the enemy of the enemy - a couragement that really helped release Europe from the nations and which was not obliged to give these victims, but it on their own will. 
The Austrian railways travel on this route five times on a daily agenda five times on a daily agenda. 
Fiscal economic governance from Brussels, which sets out the European standard, is certainly not the right way to do. 
You will vote for the original report, not for the amendment of the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ) Group ( Christian Democrats ), to vote for the original report, rather than to amend the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ). 
I was not pleased when we talked about postponing the vote on postponing the vote. 
It is linked to ensuring that the commitments we are taking on will be respected and the third concern about the right to property and vulnerability of people, for example, who live in the could, built on foreign ownership. 
We are determined when we are providing more powers to Eurojust and when we must protect the data to our citizens, or when we have to draft rules on asylum measures. 
It was a failure state that was a failure to fail to fail to have been a country that was under the failure. 
This week, where in the newspaper letter led by the denomination of the journalist Mauritania, was centralised by a punishment, or probably under the punishment, of Prime Minister, perhaps, in the case of the death penalty. 
We therefore stress this very clearly in the EU 2020 strategy and concern the issue of diversity in many precise ways, with instruments such as social and economic cohesion policies, as policies for social and social cohesion policies. 
It is less acceptable to say that the closure of Guantánamo and the resulting consequences are extremely problematic to the US Government 's government. 
The itis is is is is is : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is. : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : 
We can wait for the United States on all these issues all of these issues to be made on all of these issues. 
In order to provide comprehensive information, the Commission can also consider the issue of the existence of existing alternative products for substances which are known as being infringed by the functions of the crucial system. 
We should do this unambiguously in the Rules of Procedure ' Rules of Procedure, which was unambiguously stated in our Rules of Procedure. 
The European Parliament 's values are important for the European Parliament in its excellent relations with Thailand, and its excellent relations with Thailand, are important values for the European Parliament. 
I am convinced that the ceiling of direct payments is undoubtedly against discrimination against large farms, large farms, farms, and I am sure that the ceiling of direct payments is undoubtedly against discrimination against large farms of farms. 
It is not only a satisfactory protection level, but it is equal to ignoring existing fraud practices, because they require a response that European legislation can not propose. 
on behalf of the GUEGroup. - Mr President, on behalf of my group, I ask for this package to be put forward on the agenda of the current session. 
No one, I recognise that you are rights and the question of employment policy, in particular, must be a priority, in particular. 
EPAs are in the process of preparation of preparation and preparation of EPAs. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I am concerned about the use of criminal law against people from the same Polish, agree to keep secret sexual relations between themselves. 
To sum up, I would point out that the destruction of most of the homes is due to the poor implementation of the Coastal Looosis Act by the Socialist Government of Mr Zapatero, whose actions based on arable arable arable are only one area of Spain. 
The European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ) does not want such Europe wish to do not wish to see that Europe wish. 
An effort and ideas that are in themselves abstract in themselves can now be included in a system and applied to meet specific needs. 
However, unlike Turkey, cultural, homotherhood and geographical belongs to Europe, in contrast to Turkey, but to cultural, homosexuals and geographical belongs. 
These are therefore a concrete measures to promote their future social and economic development, and there are concrete measures to promote their future social and social development, and economic development. 
The economic crisis is has seen in racism and xenophobia, as well as in the number of crimes caused by them. 
It also marks significant progress in the northern embassies route route route. 
It also concerns the main idea of European cooperation - the free movement of movement - the free movement of movement - the free movement of movement, and concerns the main idea of European cooperation - the free movement of movement. 
It is also calling for a change in the behaviour of mobile phones, such as promoting the use of sheeep ', restricting the use of mobile phones by children and young people, training to safer techniques, the traceability of some marketing campaigns and the promotion of the operators ' operators ' operators to benefit cooperatives and the promotion of cooperative companies. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, in my speech to us here, you said that it is extremely important that the strengthening of the single market is strengthened and that the strengthening of the single market is the blind for the crisis in Europe. 
They are among the promises that are being exposed again and again, but they do not lead to adequate, tangible assistance. 
At the end of the year, when the question of the cohesion of the Union, the Committee on Budgets is clearly recommended to put an end to the uncertainty on the 2011 budget. 
It is the Commission to take things in its hands and not just to make statements - as you and Mrs Kroes have done - but to make their services truly receive business plans and to examine whether it has not been provided undue aid. 
Europeans from the third world mean that Europe will be replaced by the third world, Europe will be replaced by the third world. 
It is precisely after the border between the Question and Industry, after it was opened in Gross, in Gross. 
Vocational training is a long-term process, and we therefore need to know what needs we will have in 10 years and not only at the moment, so that we can help the next generation to be able to help the next generation. 
The report contains some good proposals, he can not fulfil the specific objectives, and can not fulfil the specific objectives. 
It is right to present a person 's obligation to locate and finance travel abroad to obtain appropriate treatment. 
It is defining as a development aid instrument, this mechanism is not deprived of contradiction and particularly among some of its objectives and the results that are achieved in practice. 
Compliance is provided with opportunities provides opportunities to enable opportunities to be made. 
A high political summit in economic, social and financial terms was reduced to medical technical meetings. 
I therefore voted in this way in the way that I voted in favour of this. 
In this connection, I can, for example, mention the European Arrest Warrant, for example, the European Arrest Warrant, for example. 
A truth of the trap in terms of human rights violations, tension and conflicts based on religious belonging or belief require many people and efforts, as well as the sincere attempts to dialogue and tolerance. 
It will be a wonderful vice for 1 July, Mr Vondra, to be a wonderful viceto 1 July, Mr Vondra. 
It was a way of dealing with the Mugabe regime to take fair and free elections to take place in a fair and free elections. 
The results have shown by the GSP+, which has shown, the results of the GSP+, shown, show results ? 
Thank you, Mr President, I think I think it is my opinion that, on the question of modernising social policy and aid for the countries of Central and Eastern Europe, there are very freight, but very little real action is very real, but real action. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this resolution today again expressly expressly expressly expressly expressly expressly expressly expressly of the positive opinion already given in the Committee on Employment and Social Affairs. 
( LT ) Madam President, I really agree with all the ideas mentioned today on the creation of a crisis mechanism and the additional measures I believe that the European Council and Parliament will also discuss in future. 
We do not forget it, too, when it comes to our Eastern neighbour Ukraine, too, and when it comes to our Eastern neighbour of Ukraine. 
I would like to ask the Commission whether and when it will present a proposal and when I will present a proposal to the Commission as a proposal as such. 
However, it is only proposing to the peoples of the world to recognise their rights in terms of the ecosystem and the establishment of a judicial authority. 
The multiannual programmes and strategies introduced as part of politics, the individual regions, and the poorest regions, have the opportunity to sustainable economic growth, increase competitiveness and job creation. 
It is an important instrument for enhancing regional integration in this area, which, for its part, is important preparations if these countries wish to integrate into the European market and join the Union of the third phase. 
It is that, when the citizens ' initiative is implemented, we will ensure that this is exactly the same when the citizens ' initiative is implemented, we will ensure that this is exactly the case. 
The representatives of religious minorities from the electoral register, as happened in Pakistan in 2007, this kind of practice is certainly in practice. 
The United Nations through the United Nations : only a month ago, the General Assembly adopted a resolution condemning the situation. 
We do not use the ICT means losing the leading role that Europe plays in industry, in which we are strong and lose capacity for innovation in areas that are of strategic importance to our Union. 
Mr President, I am not a member of the Committee on Industry, Research and Energy ( ITRE ) ; I should be, I should like to be, and I hope to be not a member of the Committee on Industry, and I hope that it will be not a member. 
However, I really would like to applaud it in principle, by continuing to read it, for example, that European immigrants are encouraged to continue to use their mother tongue here that the European Parliament even calls for the mother tongue languages of foreign minorities, or minorities to be included in schools and Member States not only to promote the use of Roma languages, but also in particular to promote the use of the main languages. 
accusations are an insult of the principles of friendship international relations, as well as to ordinary human well-being. 
The proceedings will take place on Wednesday on Wednesday on Wednesday, on Wednesday, on Wednesday, on Wednesday. 
It is being seen that the conclusions of practical implementation of the EU strategy for the Baltic Sea region will enable the future role of macro-regions in the European cohesion policy to be assessed more precisely and adequately adequately and adequately. 
However, they can nevertheless be a source of support to all those who are fighting for a different type of relations with the countries of the South and especially with the countries of South Africa in subAfrica, from subAfrica. 
It has led to the bankruptcy of many businesses and trade structures and trade structures, and trade structures, to many businesses and trade structures. 
At the start of the operation, the operation has died over the Palestinians, which around 30 % of which around 30 % are women and children. 
In order to create a blacklist of unfair commercial practices so that it covers not only the trade treaties between traders and consumers, but also those between traders themselves, is commendable. 
This is a necessary change in the attitude as a whole and the public to be more aware of corruption, which is unfortunately still part of the daily life in the country in general. 
It is at least to critical studies of the circumstances that have led to the ban, at least to the critical point, to be critical of the circumstances that have led to the ban. 
It is important for Member States to support the organisation of international exposure and thereby organising international exposure, as such events provide the European Union 's citizens with access to innovation. 
I therefore support this reason the candidate of Mr Barroso, but this support is not a carte blanche, but that support is not a carte blanket. 
It is, above all, particularly the human dimension, because it should not be allowed to sacrifice in any case to sacrifice human lives. 
It is about understanding that is understood. 
( PL ) Madam President, the issues of genocide in the Chamber, the murder of four people, to use their organs in transplantation and rape of reading women have been raised in this Chamber many times. 
We want more to deceive us, we do not want to deceive us, we do not want more to deny us any longer to deny us back on the ground. 
However, it is difficult to believe that, today, young people only a step in a step in Slovenia can not describe Europe or put their future in the EU. 
The communication is set out for the 10period, while the Commission 's budget provides only short-term financial support for the objectives of the objectives of the Commission 's budget. 
This is already a factual fact, there is no sense of continuing discussions on it at least on the table. 
Then we will have a very small occasion for hope that it is taking a change in a change to a people who, for decades, suffered at the time of socialist dictatorship, was under a time of social dictatorship. 
I agree, however, that the European Union must strongly impose the implementation of the plan of six points of view of the ceasefire negotiated by President Sarkozy. 
In the context of the current economic crisis, it is extremely important that social policy is hand in hand with economic policy, it is in hand with economic policy, to go hand in hand with economic policy. 
The protection of the species - and I would like to highlight this - is not a matter of some well-prepared institution for a few small embryos, without which we will simply have to deal with. 
On the other hand, the Presidency must also focus on the objections and reservations and reservations raised by Spain and Italy, too, the Presidency must pay attention to the objections and reserves. 
I am convinced that, after the vote, we will support the compromise that has been achieved between the European institutions and I am pleased that the vote in the vote, will support the compromise reached between the European institutions. 
It is your position on the question of the question, and is your position on the question of the question ? 
I note that Article 8 of the World Health Organisation ( WHO ) Convention on the Control of Tobacco, which has so far been ratified by 26 Member States and by the Community, obliges the parties to ensure effective protection of tobacco products in the workplace and in closed public transport and public transport. 
As regards the overcoming crisis crisis crisis, we clearly indicated in May the need for a solid framework for crisis management in the euro area and the Commission has recently been going to submit proposals for a permanent mechanism to address crisis crisis crisis resolution. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of the resolution on Roma inclusion based on the opinion that specific policies for this European minority are needed for this European minority, which must be implemented quickly. 
We are becoming aware that, usually in poor areas, health is usually at risk of danger. 
We are against the Union for the Mediterranean, and we are against the Union for the Mediterranean, against the Mediterranean, against the Union. 
The assurance in four areas of assurance in four areas of four areas of assurance in four areas. 
I will allow me to be less reserved than usual, Commissioner, to be less reserved than usual, Commissioner. 
A strong and powerful EU with competence for the common foreign and security policy, I do not believe that we will make the US and Japan, China and India and India take the necessary measures. 
You should be shameful, you should be shameful, and you should be shameful. 
Red and the legislative flow of security measures will not contribute to security, but will create inconvenient benefits for passengers for passengers. 
Caldern and Belarus today, this is already done in response to the demand from Central Europe today, in response to the demand of Central Europe. 
Mr President, although we are paying attention to violence against women and the violation of their rights for several decades, it was not possible to stop this despicable form of criminal activity in criminal activity. 
I therefore propose that the EU in cooperation with the Member States and regions introduce a consistent sustainable plan for regeneration and development, which takes into account geographical, the environment, biodiversity and coastal activities. 
I would also like to thank the Council and the President of the Court of Auditors, in particular, for attended here, although it is strange to emphasise this particularly, but it is strange to emphasise this. 
The speakers highlight how serious and dangerous it is the level of energy dependence on the European Union 's energy dependence is to highlight the extent of the European Union 's energy dependence. 
We do not have a democratic power, nor a legal basis for us to develop a social Europe, a social Europe, social Europe, nor is we have a democratic legal basis for us. 
( ES ) Mr President, although the crisis price for not to be in the developing countries, they are those who are seriously and deeply affected by the huge wave of the crisis. 
in writing. - ( PT ) The renewal of the negotiations in September between Mercosur and the EU is a very important process for the EU. 
Of course, this is not a package for economic recovery, it is not a package for economic recovery, but it is not a package for economic recovery. 
They have a clear and simple response to a clear and simple response. 
As we are not a united state, there is no direct election for the President of the European Union President of the European Union, and not a unitary state of office. 
It is that an agreement can be reached on capital requirements, but not on the regulation on hedge funds, but not on the regulation on hedge funds. 
There are currently 143 nuclear reactors, and there are currently 143 nuclear reactors, with the responsibility of 30 % of energy mix of energy mix, which is responsible for 30 % of energy mix. 
Information campaigns on consumer rights through the use of educational materials using education materials would also be a good idea. 
It means that Member States do not recognise their citizens ' duties, in other words, quick, effective and high quality healthcare. 
In the more complex Union with 27 Member States, no one is asked whether this should happen. 
If we look at what is going on, and how it will continue in the future, it is clear that the ones who should be seen. 
It is particularly important that the directive is applied to digital products, as well as - partly - to passenger transport - and to be applied to passengers ' transport. 
reasonable proposals aim to protect the most vulnerable members of our societies, aimed at protecting the most vulnerable members of our societies. 
It is being seen that this can be presented to the Council in a completely reasonable period of time, and it can be presented to the Council, in a completely reasonable time, to be presented to the Council. 
It is that we did not receive a concrete response, nor to the hearings, or a concrete response was given to some concrete response. 
It is to take immediate measures and coordinate the provision of humanitarian aid to the inhabitants of Haiti, more than one million of those who are still living in names of times that presumed to be temporary. 
A programme will improve the situation of the construction industry in Northern and South Ireland, which will help to maintain jobs and to fulfil our obligations in connection with climate change and, as mentioned earlier during this debate, to address energy poverty. 
This regulation is simply extending the period of time and extension. 
SE, on behalf of the Romanian people, the Romanian people, on behalf of the Romanian people, have been in the Romanian people. 
It is very degrading and very serious, which, in fact, prevents companies from preventing companies by repressing them with bureaucratic unresources, which are simply aimed at making companies aware of a number of common operators the principle whose implementation is not always so easy. 
I hope that the revision of the legislation on the collection and processing of electronic waste equipment will enable the quantitative quantity of the explosive material materials, because, apart from environmental benefits, will also bring economic benefits. 
Also, a variety of times of fishing are being introduced, during which fishing is banned that corresponds to clinics of slaughter. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
It is particularly important, given the support that the support obtained during the crisis is has been given to the support that the support that the crisis has obtained during the crisis. 
It is essential to support entrepreneurship and to facilitate bureaucratic and fiscal difficulties for small and medium-sized enterprises and to ease the bureaucratic and fiscal difficulties of business. 
On the one hand, it must be considered by its international obligations and to ensure universal rights of the Tibetan community, but, on the other hand, can not ignore the opinion of its enormous neighbour. 
It is regrettable, unfortunately, that the profile of the Revolution since 2005, which has been gained in a real change in the political dynamic of the Malaysia, and which seems to pretend to pretend, together with the events in Ukraine and Georgia during this time, the more provocative geopolitical future of the region as a whole. 
There are other technologies that are also less dangerous, such as, for example, the production of nuclear technology, for example, and other technologies, which are not less dangerous, for example, such as the production of nuclear technologies. 
( EL ) Mr President, my question concerns the principle and the reason for the question of my fellow Member is concerned, and the question of my fellow Member 's question. 
This, if the Commission received complaining from economic operators, the provision is being properly implemented by certain national tax administrations or brought about results, it in its capacity as the representative of Community legislation will take responsibility and take the necessary measures. 
The focus is on the most important areas in the EU 2020 strategy, which define the direction of the development of Europe 2020 strategy, which define the direction of the development of Europe. 
We will take into consideration criteria such as employment as we are setting out the ceilings for support for agricultural income incomes. 
Madam President, in recent years, we have seen a unconfused campaign for oppression of religion. 
We are faced with the problem of moving to the pays ' system, which is another important principle that we must seek to distinguish. 
Not only will this report bring tangible benefits to the EU, but it will show that by working together at EU level, people can benefit from the benefits of individual, where they are able to live and live independently of their funds. 
14 EU external representation has only one ambassador of a new Member State of a new Member State, and there is only one in the EU 's external representatives. 
It is to say that it is really important to amend the legislation in force and to be updated and updated. 
The size of the possible credits of the EIB 's possible credit from the EIB is to be made available to the extent of possible credits by the EIB. 
We need to remind you of the terrible acts that have been carried out recently, which have been carried out recently and recently done. 
We will have discussions with China with China and we will have a discussion with China with China ? 
The support for the inclusion of Bulgaria and Romania in the Schengen area in the Schengen area is designed to include Bulgaria and Romania in the Schengen area. 
Restricting on the media, including the Internet, is unacceptable and I urge the Egyptian authorities to restore all communication networks without delay without delay. 
It is good enough to have good partners in what show reasonable flexibility and the same objective as the rapporteurs of Parliament, in particular, to achieve an agreement as soon as possible, by maintaining the quality of our work and ensuring that, one year after the Treaty of Lisbon, we have the most regulation on the citizens ' most citizens provision for the Treaty. 
The independence of the mandate of the mandate of the Member is the responsibility of Parliament ; independence can not be threatened by the independence of Parliament. 
Parliament rejects the appropriations introduced by the Council to the Structural and Cohesion Fund cuts that have been introduced by the Council, and the budgetary cuts of the Structural Funds and Cohesion Funds, reject the budget cuts that the budget cuts introduced by the Council. 
The supervision of banking institutions is also very important and I hope that you can make progress on this next week and at this next week 's time, too. 
A pending list of the reach of 4 200 victims, 18 of which died in March this year : this is a true plant in a true plant. 
It is only being said that treatment will not be less than Alzheimer 's disease, but it is not about being less than disease. 
There should be intervention in the economy, all strategic services in the public sector should be privatised and measures should be taken towards deregulating the market. 
A number of clear political measures to combat gender violence, including measures to combat human trafficking, which I consider particularly important in the light of the alarming increase in human trafficking in human beings and in the EU, particularly in particular, of women and children and children. 
We do not provide the Union with new weapons to combat the growing trend that affects our children in an increasingly early age age age ? 
The rapporteur 's proposal, which enables Member States to make a free choice and enables them to release micro-entities from the obligation to provide annual accounts, they, they are, and it is denied them from the scope of the current directive 's scope. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, this morning, the Council answered the remaining questions by the Spanish Presidency, the Council this morning, which are responsible for the issues remaining issues that remain through the Spanish Presidency. 
The Presidency is trying to move things again with its road map, but yet the situation is still difficult for Member States, yet it is still difficult for Member States. 
I repeat them, Commissioner Barnier and, of course, I welcome what you have expressed and your determination to ensure that this regulatory framework is effective and implemented, and has, above all, that it does not violate competition at international level. 
It is important that the dimension of the Black Sea security involves decisive action to strengthen democratic order, good governance and the construction of state capabilities. 
SL ) I would like to express my agreement with the main objectives of our strategy, namely, to prevent the climate from being sicked by more than two degrees of the twenty degrees of them, among other things, among the same. 
It is trying to establish differences between European workers and workers from third countries, this proposal is increasing the segregation of workers ' immigrants, increasing differences in treatment and making the living conditions even worse by vulnerable and the vulnerability and the volatility of their working conditions. 
As for the times, we hope that the official communication will be drawn up during the Spring European Council, but I think it would be even better to have the official conclusions of the Council in June. 
This issue can be returned at first reading the 2011 budget, which will take place in separable subjects. 
Also, it is also consideration that the chapters on investment often attached to the liberalisation of capital and the rejection of measures for control of capital and supervision of capital. 
They are inappropriate or at all non-existing or inappropriate. 
It is that the Commission and the local government authorities will, above all, play a crucial role in the control and management of EU funds. 
We must ensure that the regulation does not create unnecessary obstacles to the implementation of the citizens ' citizens ' citizens ' initiative, but that it makes it clear and uncomplicated. 
This GDP may be misleading in the sense that the reconstruction measures are due to some events, such as disaster and natural disasters, are considered as beneficial, rather than spending as expenditure as expenditure. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, in relation to the rejection of our Group of the Interim Agreement on the PFTP, we welcome the decision of the Spanish Presidency and the United States to resume the negotiations to adopt fundamental guarantees for data protection for all EU citizens. 
We have committed ourselves to human rights in this country in this country. 
( DE ) Madam President, Commissioner, I am not a ' in agriculture ; in other words, I do not believe that advertising slogan for the showers and happy sessions, because I am quite different to me. 
commercial banks have been slowed in a terrible problem because they buy a bad debt because they buy a bad debt because they buy a bad debt. 
It is showing him the indicators that measure these factors, which are more important, should be given greater importance to it. 
The course of the consistent work carried out by the consistent work carried out jointly with the Council and the Commission is the joint time that the Council and the Commission have done. 
However, in my country, I also find my colleagues in my party communist parties simply because we oppose this government simply because we oppose the current government. 
It also requires our civil rights and freedoms to never violate. 
It is difficult in our days to imagine our sentence of the Hitlerth of Palestine, the memory of Sixo is proud of the central pleasure in his city of Groups. 
We also need to address the problem of market volatility, but on this point I would urge prudence to be prudential. 
Democracy in the field of foreign relations ( debate ) 
( GA ) I would therefore like to conclude with a say to my language, which states that the good half-hearted work has been done. 
It is also the fact, for example, that the contribution of my country - Italy - is now becoming increasingly small - % of GDP is currently becoming less - % of GDP. 
We can talk about traditional and people in historical historical development, but we can not say much about their existence in developed regions. 
It is important that the Treaty enters into force and I can ensure that we do everything we can to ensure that this happens as soon as possible. 
The conference has clearly shown in real figures gathered by economic experts that enlargement was perhaps the most successful project in the modern history of the EU and that these five years have clearly shown that this was beneficial both for old and for the new Member States. 
Otherwise, party conferences would not have been so broad on the media, but would not have been so widein the media. 
Also, adding sugar in the wine wine wine in wine wine, it is also the addition to the additional chapters. 
It is a question of the transatlantic career, for which I am sometimes talking about, sometimes. 
in writing. - ( PT ) discharge for the European Foundation for the 2009 budget and I welcome her initiative to grant discharge to the annual report on the Internal Audit Report. 
On the other hand, in such circumstances, competition rules must be applied flexibly when necessary, without compromise with the principles, based on which policies have been established in this area. 
Egypt is a message of the whole Arab world for the whole Arab world for Egypt to be a message of a message for the whole Arab world. 
The shelter of meat arrived in the EU is carried out by the official veterinary services of Member States of border inspectors ' border inspectors. 
Firstly, it is focused on the substance of the problems that many small businesses have in an economy where there are many difficult conditions for them at the moment. 
prisoners adopted under this scheme can receive access to measures for recruitment in EU Member States under the applicable national law. 
Culture of the protection of the rules of the CFP will not be established until we receive equal equality and equal treatment at the centre of inspections and the next production policy against our fishermen. 
Mr President, it is good to hear that there is a need for diversity and multilingualism, but I would like to highlight a situation in my end in the United Kingdom. 
We know how to cooperate with other countries like Thailand as Thailand, we know how to cooperate with other countries such as Thailand. 
This is closed, this debate is closed, concluding, this debate is a debate that is closed by the debate, and this debate is closed. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I must say that I fully understand the situation of the people in Pakistan, but I would also like to say that this decision is tragic for Europe, particularly for some countries that are already having serious difficulties, such as, Portugal, Spain and Greece, for example. 
A economic recovery plan provides for the EU budget for 2010, with EUR 24 billion, available to finance strategic projects relating to energy, transport, the development of broadband networks in rural areas and to support rural communities. 
My colleagues in the European Parliament believe that you have given the dignity of Parliament, both beyond and beyond. 
Once again, we must look very carefully at this. 
As you are going to see, this will be denied, it will denounce it. 
I hope that we will maintain that we will keep on the table. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, Commissioner, in recent 50 years the European project, the European project created so much efforts has never been threatened, as the European public is today, a huge sense of feeling of power is very much. 
I am afraid that, before Mrs Ashton, her activity and her service should put diplomatic and political pressure on the authorities of Pakistan, who must finally start to fight against religious extremism. 
It is the goal of 20 % to become binding binding binding and binding binding to become binding. 
It is a mistake and I would like to be very clear on this issue, and I would like to be very clear on this issue. 
Ladies and gentlemen, the bottoms are high and therefore we are obliged to send out signals not only to the markets, but also to Europeans : assure that we are confident in our common ability to innovation and entrepreneurship and also make sure that Europe 's ability to return to competitiveness, but there is growth there. 
Secondly, if not the Chinese occupation of Tibet, which is also the reason why Beijing pressure on the government of Nepal, it will be still one of the first World War to mention, without remembering the murder of Frankov Francorder 's murder. 
on behalf of the S & D Group. - ( DE ) Mr President, I would like to support the proposal on behalf of the S & D Group. 
I well know that it is not a time today to be a time for this today, today, today, today is not an appropriate moment for this. 
Another party was banned and one other party was banned by bans on the table. 
Romania 's application of the policy allows for cohesion with other EU Member States, especially since all the eight regions in my country can benefit from the Structural Funds. 
I do not accept a full analysis, but I agree that this is an opportunity to look at the future, but part of this is to look forward not only to Parliament 's involvement, but also to all the ACP parliaments. 
In addition to all of this, the drafting of compensation programmes is similar to the Member States ' lower programme is all of this, in addition to the preparation of the compensation programmes. 
The process is renewed, I hope that the perpetrators will be opened and fraudulent because there is a risk of greater bloody jurisdictions, and this will be perceived as a permission to carry out more acts than this type of offence. 
I would like to make it very clear that the Commission will continue to support cooperation and links with Georgia in many different areas, which will enable the country to progress and move forward to the European Union. 
That is also the annual losses of the economy that are only estimated to Africa, which are estimated at more than 50 billion, and USD 50 billion, and USD billion. 
Let us therefore not, those of you who will follow my advice, vote against the first part in this fifth vote and then we will have an additional vote for the oral amendment I support. 
It was not carried out with banks, but with the European Union and with our desire to be united in the euro area and in Europe. 
These agreements, leave them back to them, in particular today ! ! ! today ! ! ! today ! ! today ! ' : 
We recently visited Ivorian, and heard that millions of Armenians and Greek Christians were elected in the century. 
We are sending our best wishes to our desire, and we are sending our best wishes to our best wishes. 
What is more than what is, of course, of course, essential is essential is essential. 
These reasons did not support Amendment 6 6 6 6 6 ( 6 ) Amendment 6 ) in these reasons, and I did not support Amendment 6. 
At the same time, it is regrettable that the name of Hungary was not among the President Van Rompuy mentioned, because, unfortunately, Hungary is not involved in the Euro Plus Pact. 
I would like, Commissioner, to focus particular attention on the situation of women 's immigrants ' immigrants ' position. 
It is our task of maintaining the system operating and guaranteeing the citizens of the EU citizens the same social standards that have had before the crisis. 
The objectives with which we can fully identify, we hear commendable intentions, but we have no say about how these objectives will be achieved, in particular, in particular. 
We must therefore ensure that, in future, this percentage will become a lower list in view of the long-term interests of agriculture and public health, we must ensure that in future, this percentage will become a lower standard of long-term interest in agriculture and public health. 
I will mention three final comments which I will make a final comment on three final comments. 
The decision by the High Court, which once again imposed a ban on the Basel National Risk Party to apply for the elections. 
There must be improvement in collective rights of employees, as we intend, this should not be done in a kind of companies but by means of a more general initiative which also takes into account the various traditions in the Member States. 
I would like to mention some specific points of the many points contained in the many points contained in the report, which contain the report, I would like to mention. 
I voted in favour of this resolution as I advocate the idea of the Organisation for Security and Cooperation in Europe ( OSCE ) to make greater efforts to mitigate the actions caused by human beings in terms of global warming. 
With regard to the report on transitional technical measures, I would like to remind, as some of the speakers have done, for the amendments I have supported and two other colleagues, aimed at removing discrimination without scientific justifications, and I stress that there is no scientific justification for discrimination against certain Portuguese fishing vessels that use traditional networks. 
We have also been in the potential effect of this measure in the affected areas affected by the floods in the floods of the floods in the areas affected by the floods of the floods in the areas of flooding, too, in the potential effect of this measure in the potential of this measure in the potential of this measure in the areas affected by flooding. 
Madam President, first of all, I would like to congratulate the rapporteurs on the good work done on these reports, which I give to the Chamber, first of all, on the good work that I have done on these reports. 
The public debt that is rapidly increasing will be a burden on future generations and a obstacle to economic recovery and growth. 
That is that this is the current situation, which is the current situation. 
Would the Commission provide financial assistance to these countries and economic assistance, which will enable them to fully fulfil the costs caused by the involvement of illegal immigrants in criminal proceedings ? 
We are moving in the right direction, as we are trying to help small and medium-sized enterprises to take advantage of a Community project. 
It is an important approach, and I expect to hear how we will deal with other areas of real tension, such as Capital, for which the ambassador of Afghanistan has said to us, really threaten everything that people are trying to do in the region. 
CCCCBarroso and Mr Barroso and Mr Barroso......... Barroso and Mr Barroso.............................. Barroso and Barroso....................................... Barroso and Barroso..................... ? Barroso and Barroso..................... ? Barroso and Barroso......... ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso and ? Barroso............... ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso ? Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso ? Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso Barroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso and Barroso and Barroso and Barroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso CBarroso 
agreements by the Council : see Minutes 
I believe that it is right now that it is now time for the European institutions to take the European institutions more seriously into account the problem of the problem. 
There is not there either no one, but there is not there is either, but there is not there is either. 
agreements in the area of fisheries between the EU and third countries should be transferred from a widediscussion in the countries concerned, in which they can participate in the public, civil society organisations and national parliaments, thereby promoting greater democratic democracy and transparency ; 
We believe it is acceptable to take into consideration other indicators that could overcome these shortcomings, so that indicators of measuring social progress can be made as full as possible, reliable and close to reality. 
However, Nepal is not a self-sufficiency state, however, but a state is not a fantastic state. 
We need better coordination, we need better coordination, we need better coordination of coordination. 
It is a safeguard clause that I believe is sufficient to prevent problems that may occur so that this is quite clear or you are or against the proposal. 
We are currently holding negotiations with Commissioner Hahn on how regional programmes can be oriented more towards energy targets in the current financial period - he issued its confidential support for this idea - and how we can use the forthcoming funding programmes to give greater priority to the issue of energy and buildings in the next financial period. 
The legal procedure will adopt the text after the usual legal and linguistic definition, and then the directive can be published in the Official Journal of the European Union at the very short time. 
' is ', not... ? ', are they not the same, or is it the case, not the stability ? ' ? ' 
You know you, there is good progress in the negotiations, there is good progress in the negotiations. 
Her repression and technical skills, which has revealed during the extremely desire process of selection, promise an intelligent and active mandate in the supervisory authority under its leadership. 
The results of the referendums in Denmark on Maastricht, in Ireland, in Nigeria, in Ireland for Nice, in France and the Netherlands for Constitution and the Netherlands for the Constitution and now again in Ireland for Lisbon. 
What we are saying is yes, let the Treaty be revised, but without a Convention, so that this is possible to start this approval. 
They are more dangerous because we do not notice when they are being overlooked by the spotlight of one child in this other. 
It is extremely serious, as we saw at the coast of Libya, and we must make us think about the limited effectiveness of our policies. 
It is not only in the social sector that is not only in the case of consumers in the social sector that is concerned with consumers, but about the consumer vision, but it is not only in the social sector that is not only in the case that it is in the social sector that it is in the case that it is not only in the case of consumers, but it is not only in the case that it is in the social sector that we are not only in the case of the sector. 
The aim of competition policy is to guarantee consumers the freedom of choice and access to products of lower and more affordable prices for products and more affordable prices. 
A country that wants to become a Member State of the European Union must commit to this principle and to a party to the European Convention for the Protection of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, not least in terms of sexual orientation. 
The problem in Slovenia concerns checks, because, once internal European borders have already been abolished, it is difficult to check whether the offices of the channels are stopping in advance to the preliminary points of stopping. 
I would like to congratulate the shadow rapporteurs and the shadow rapporteurs and the shadow rapporteurs, as well as the Danish of the seats of the seats of the sincere. 
I should particularly thank my fellow Members from the various committees who are responsible for creating this report, in particular, for the creation of this report. 
The European Parliament should, first and foremost, be achieved in a balanced representation in the shortest possible time as soon as possible. 
European production will protect European production from counterfeit products imported from the countries of the East, which have difficult holiday production. 
However, we must not declare too early because the threat to penalties is not enough, we must, at the very least, ensure the necessary legal instruments for control. 
As the negotiations were blocked for more than a century, they were resumed in October 2009, they were recovered in October 2009. 
You have not seen, but we have so far made very little progress to now, but we have so far made very little progress to us so far, but we have not made much progress to do so. 
The Lithuanian Constitutional Court on the issuance of the issuing of the Polish fascinatic fanatics with Lithuania transfers is one example of this. 
A specific context is characterised by combined with a combined combined with three important cycles of cycle. 
It is simply unacceptable and requires action on the part of all sectors and countries concerned, on the part of all the parties concerned, and it is simply unacceptable and requires action on the part of all sectors and countries concerned. 
When the Tibetan resistance is in the process of democratisation, it is extremely regrettable that Nepal, a country where many Tibetans live so many Tibetans, has hindered the normal democratic transformation of democratic elections. 
Some countries are required to written agreement from the potential donor, while others seem to be in the case that if there is no objections, a donor can be taken authority. 
A company is in its initial phase of existence and by the end of 2009, and has not yet fully implemented its internal control systems and financial accountability systems. 
It is well understood that the importance of collecting data and statistics, but I will be sure that he will listen to the concerns you have raised. 
It will enable reduced CO2 emissions to be cut, and to improve energy efficiency in the quickest and cheapest way and cheap way. 
However, they can lead to undesirable spread of vaccination vaccinations in unvaccinated animals. 
To change this troika, to say so : SMEs are very important to get back to the ball out. 
Finally, I find it very important that the European Union not only talks with one voice, but also that changes the behaviour showed in Copenhagen and treated other countries like partners and with sympathy and, to a significant extent, contribution to the success of Cancún. 
There will be as specific as possible : there are several review and control mechanism and the idea of a mechanism for a EU FTP mechanism, too, a discussion is presented. 
On the other hand, the European Parliament also proposed a list of requirements on its own ambitions in the procedures relating to own resources, and you have had the opportunity to be aware of the European Commission statement that shows that, in fact, the right to initiative, will actually continue with the agenda and the new budget procedure will be introduced, as well as the forthcoming financial perspectives. 
A decision of the College was right and Parliament was in detail immediately informed of this and after all after that time, and it was quite rightly now, in fact, right and that Parliament was in a thorough manner. 
I promise you, on behalf of Vice-President Kallas, that we will improve communication with Parliament on these matters with Parliament on these issues. 
In contrast, Spain 's foreign policy is giving a good example, by means of a constructive, desirable number of people are detained because of their conviction, there were exempted. 
We can make progress by painful contributing to the country and market and market, through painful restraint, to the country and market. 
In the markets, incentives for mergers and demand for profit and competitiveness in the agriindustry have led to the independence of multinational companies, to higher consumer prices and higher profits for capital prices for capital. 
It is now the case at the moment, in the case at the moment, at the moment, at the moment, at the moment, at the moment, at the moment. 
on behalf of the PPE-DE Group. - ( EL ) Mr President, I welcome this debate and thank the Council and the Commission for the information that they have presented to us. 
I must say this is that the attractors of restructuring state debt seems to ignore the devastating consequences for financial stability in the country itself and in the euro area as a whole, as well as the consequences and the long-lasting effect on growth and employment. 
It is, above all, that we live in a unjustifiable capitalism in a unjustifiable capitalism. 
This is the Italian voters wished to wish to withdraw the Communists from the parliamentary arrest and they are no longer sitting in this Chamber. 
The Spanish Presidency and the Spanish Presidency know that the rotating Presidency has taken the rotating Presidency at an extremely important time for the Union and the UN on the protection and promotion of human rights in the world. 
It means that the European Court of Justice in Luxembourg will have the competence to interpret and conform to two potential competitive documents - the Charter of the EU and the Council Convention. 
There was this attitude to vote on the second reading in the vote at second reading, at second reading, on the vote in the vote on the second reading at second reading. 
You remember this discussion, such a discussion was held in Britain, too. 
I have been successful for this at national and European level for more than 50 years, for more than 50 years, for over 50 years, and for more than 50 years. 
All the means to strengthen civil society and to help those who oppose the oppression of the oppression in Burma should use of all means of strengthening civil society and to help those who oppose the oppression of the oppression in Burma. 
We have the time to do so in this Chamber, we have enough time to do so in this Chamber in this Chamber. 
We remember that Turkey 's democratic development is not as important as the EU itself, as Turkey 's citizens themselves themselves are all. 
All other types of threats increase all other types of threats, all other types of threats, increases all other types of threats, all other types of threats, all other types of threats, in other words. 
It says that as part of this Commission package, the task of reviewing budgets should be given to the Commission 's budget before the national parliaments are approved. 
Perhaps most important for the Committee on Foreign Affairs and it has also been mentioned by the Commissioner is the requirement for the respect for human rights, including fundamental standards of the right to work, not to separate from trade preferences. 
( DE ) Mr President, the subject of the Lisbon Strategy was the competitiveness of the Lisbon Strategy, and this represented a very unilateral economic strategy that, of course, has, been partly failed. 
Let us not turn the enlargement of the EU into a telephone victim for something that it has no fault of which it has no fault of. 
However, this fund must inevitably be financed by the consumer, which means that passengers will have to pay even more for the tickets. 
This, Commissioner, the trade trade trade trade trade with Mercosur countries should not become a one-off one single street. 
It has been said by a former head of government, who has confused his own country of government, who has done its own country 's own side. 
My concern is that there is no proper evaluation of the impact of the Commission and there is no clear indications of what this report will mean about agriculture. 
It calls for safer, more effective transport, more effective transport, which is contaminating less efficiently, is calling for a safer, more effective transport, which is polluting less. 
( ES ) Madam President, Commissioner, President-in-Office of the Council, Spain has just experienced a painful situation where the shipwoods shippers and their entire team were subject to blackmail, uniformity and the number of risks. 
MEPs have criticised the fact that we were working on the basis of a mandate of 1999 mandate. 
The buildings used by buildings represents a third of general energy used in the European Union, which is one third of the common energy used in the European Union. 
The days that the Council, the Spanish Presidency, the Commission - particularly the Commissioner, of the Commissioner Kallas, on whom I thank his willingness and confidentiality during this period - and Eurocontrol worked to prepare a much more precise and more appropriate response to the acquisition of the acquired crisis that began to have very serious consequences for the whole of the European Union and not. 
We are committed to ensuring good cooperation between the institutions as good as in the past, in the context of the new institutional framework. 
The harmonisation structures have drawn up harmonised European standards based on the basic requirements : the compliance of childcare toys is evaluated and guaranteed by the marketing levels, which guarantees a high level of safety in terms of international standards. 
The outcome of the vote entirely of the vote, the outcome of the vote, is entirely the result of the vote in the vote, of the vote, of the vote, of the vote. 
We have provided enough, is enough ', and it is enough '. 
The introduction of a proper investigation system, which many require, and the persecution of the responsible for the terrible beautiful beauty in recent months - I should say it in recent years - is necessary to take every initiative to support interethnic and interdialogue, on the one hand, and on the other part, to form a new declaration. 
Not only do they help to stabilise farmers ' incomes, but also compensate for the costs required to comply with the everrequirements that agriculture is imposed. 
It is absolutely important that the Member State is nor is it the nationality or the great nationality or the size of the company 's portfolio. 
Are the conclusions that we have learnt from the financial crisis and the consequent economic crisis and the consequent economic crisis that we have taken away from ? 
In my opinion and on behalf of the Committee on Petitions, I appeal for closer cooperation between all the institutions involved so that citizens are aware of what they are to be protected. 
I of the President of the President of the President of the President of the President of the President of the President of the President of the Chapof the Chapof the Council 
It is that such requirements must be made in relation to a country that is quite openly violating the commitments it has made, namely, the observance of human rights and international law. 
Those of their politicians, like their politicians, want to be able to travel freely freely, as well as their politicians, can travel freely. 
The strategies inspired by this fact, the statistics indicate that young people are unproportionate by unemployment are unemployment. 
It is being said that the new President of the United States, as he said yourself in his election speech in Berlin in July 2008, will give a great deal of value to these relations. 
It is that this is a compromise between institutions that compromise between institutions that are complying with their promises, which are complying with their promises. 
The EU in Burma, in Burma, has taken official diplomatic course and several meetings with the arrest mission and ambassador in Brussels to express our strong concern. 
I also thank you today and thank you for your speech today, and also for your speech today, for your speech today, and I also thank you for your speech. 
Black Sea EU Black Sea ( debate ) 
I agree with the Commissioner Reding initiative on the governing board, I do not support the initiative of the insurance to be provided, in particular, to penalise women in particular. 
This, Mr President, are remaining some issues relating to the package of measures relating to the package of measures relating to measures, Mr President, to the package of measures. 
I am in the rapporteur that the Agency should submit a comparative set between the operations carried out during the year for the discharge of the year and operations carried out within the previous financial year, in order to enable the European Parliament to assess the results of two years of the Agency 's work. 
We simply take measures to resolve the problems faced by 12 million citizens directly employed in this sector. 
The Danube is a joint project where all partners must fulfil their commitments to ensure that it is operating and achieve the objectives adopted. 
Unfortunately, however, we know that in some cases there are not yet, there are, and we still need to use animals, particularly with inhumane covers. 
It is a failure to make the European Parliament committed to rapid introduction of such instruments to the rapid introduction of this instrument quickly. 
Honourable Members have indeed raised this as a particular issue as a particular issue, as a particular issue, in the honourable Members. 
In a crisis of an extraordinary scale that has been launched for quite a time and has a risk of continuing a long time ago and having a risk of continuing a long time ago. 
Radio, Austria, is particularly affected by its geographical proximity, with Eastern European countries. 
I abstained from abstaining in this resolution as regards this resolution as regards this resolution as regards this resolution. 
It is for your cooperation to reach the small Abassador Abassador 's returning to his mother than her mother, to his cooperative. 
It is good to say that we do not want to start discussions in the start of the discussion on the table, that we do not want to say that we are talking about. 
Barcelona, as women from PSE, have shown during the campaign in 2007, that they were useful for the whole society and for children and children. 
It will be more stringent to create a regulation and more immediate supervision of itself, and it will not prevent any possible crises alone, in itself, prevent any possible crises. 
The international commitments made by Russia can also be considered contradictory in a number of relations in a number of relations. 
It is being seen that, given this objective, we will take advantage of the next few weeks to ensure that the first Treaty of Lisbon is a success, not a failure, but not a failure. 
On this day, on the part of the United Nations in 1999 and the adoption of the resolution today are valuable instruments which remind national governments of their obligations arising from international treaties in terms of the elimination of all forms of discrimination against women. 
It is important that we as politicians take responsibility for the attitude to religious minorities in our countries and encourage open, friendly approach to all religions and all the religions. 
It is known that neurodegenerative diseases represent one of the main reasons for incidence in people in the age of the age and that the number of people affected by these diseases is expected to increase significantly. 
We certainly have a very good proposal before us, with a very good proposal, in itself, a very good proposal. 
I am more concerned about the fact that the Commission did not carry out a study on economic impact on employment, so that we can take a consideration and responsible and responsible decision on the new requirements for what is otherwise a very welcome reduction in emissions from its enthunts. 
It is now in their detriment to their detriment now to their detriment, now in their detriment. 
The creation of its mixed grant has consistently adhered to the rights of national minorities and considers unacceptable violations of minorities ' rights violations. 
The Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union is aimed at measures adopted as part of the internal market, which are not directly provided in any treaty and are not necessarily similar to those who should be adopted in the provision of the MFF to third countries. 
We are only welcome to this in mind the fact that the Commissioner for Fisheries and maritime affairs, Mrs Damanaki and the Commissioner for Trade, Mr De Gucht, are once again together with the Commission 's places. 
The European Union has given guidelines on how the European Union really comes into a period of competitiveness, solidarity and good governance, to enter a period of competitiveness, solidarity and good governance. 
I welcome the requirement for the drivers and the individuals working in the autonomous, to move forward to training in connection with physical disabilities. 
Many of you for this information, for this information, for this information is very much about you, for this information. 
Mr President, early at the start of the Paris and Rome Treaty, the European project has set out the objective of supranational nationalism over the objective of freedom or democracy, which is right, it exports its ideology. 
Parliament, the Council and Commission recognised that the initiative for fair trade helps to promote sustainable development and introduce more justice in trade, which is one of the objectives of the new Treaty of Lisbon, of the EU 's new Treaty. 
It is essential that the stakeholders within the European Union engage in collective efforts against cancer in cancer are involved in the European Union 's interests. 
We must maintain the current size of the EU agricultural budget by 2020 to provide incentives for farmers to provide us with safe food products, protect the environment, create new jobs and guarantee the competitiveness of the EU agricultural sector. 
It must be coherent between the Commissioner for Agriculture and me and, in the case that we do not agree, the question concerns the College of Commissioners. 
It is being seen that protecting the rights of individuals and the legal persons is aimed at legitimate intervention in fundamental rights and freedoms. 
Clear cooperation with the Presidency and Member States continue to examine the ways in which we can make a best contribution to resolving the crisis and contributing to the crisis. 
It is also that the issue of what happened in the Middle East after the planned withdrawal of the American forces from Iraq, which is an undisputable subject to the United States. 
It is that, in order to have success with Desertec Gucht, ownership must be common, otherwise it is impossible to achieve a successful result. 
The result of war and armed conflicts, ethnic tension, human rights violations and the inability to avoid its own religion, natural disasters and lack of adequate economic and democratic structures. 
A country must agree with the appropriate financial participation of financial participation in the appropriate financial involvement of the country must be agreed to the appropriate financial participation in the appropriate part. 
The implementation of the new method can have a negative impact on achieving an important objective of the CAP reform - support that is targeted at a fair, balanced, balanced, balanced and transparent basis. 
It is recognised that this was not the best solution that this was not the best solution to be the best solution. 
It will help good cooperation between Member States and will continually monitor complaints made in connection with the exchange of information or cooperation. 
Restrictions on administration are unconditional necessary for the administration are unconditional necessary. 
I wish you every success in this important exercise, Commissioner, and I wish you every success in this important exercise, Commissioner. 
The Member States must make progress on this subject, otherwise, in the case of a time, we can hear : Hai Hai, contrary to SWIFT ! 
Strengtheorets can, to some extent, play a positive role in playing a positive role in playing a positive role. 
We must be honest, we must recognise our historic responsibility for climate change and that our population 's emissions are still higher in times than those of China or India, for example. 
Some of these cases are only some of the cases of some of them, just some of them, in some cases, some of them are only some of the cases. 
However, proportional and guarantee to innocent passengers - the large majority - the importance that they deserve. 
It is essential to make it clear that a future citizen of the Union has fundamental right to travel in the European Union. 
The oppression and threats from the outside and beyond are instruments of recent past era have graded. 
149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 
That is what we need in the Committee on Budgets, we also agreed that if we fail to improve the implementation of the programme so that funding is made up of the objective, we will need to rethink how much resources should be allocated to the Marco Polo Programme and whether part of the money should not be reoriented to other programmes where the funding can be used more successfully. 
This happens, we will be appallingly going to raise hands, but we will forget it next day, but we will forget it next day. 
If they express their opinion before the end of the ratification procedure, all of these will be done under the Treaty of Lisbon and will have its own Commissioner. 
After all, in the interview of the Southern Castro Caucasus, the Castro Caucasus, the letter set out Lukashenko as a whole of the Belarusian Prize and as a dictator suffering from the Monday ', on which the Kremlin could have some influence. 
payment to a basin that would subsidise Northern Ireland to a less extent than it is now to destroy industry, which is without this, of the brink of survival. 
This action will, of course, initially returning to the trust of the European Union 's affected trust to the European Union 's affected trust in the European Union 's concerns. 
There is therefore a place in Article 9, and therefore we must find a place in all these documents and legislation, so that a single and indivisible model in general. 
As regards the overall subject that you are talking about, for which I would like to tell you that this crisis has made it more than five million Europeans unemployed without job. 
President cut off the speaker ) the speaker of the speaker ) 
I am convinced that, as a result of the creation of the European Observatory, last November, this desire will be taken in the near future. 
The issues concerned about investment in the networks of the next generation by ensuring that telecoms operators receive fair return to investment, while considering the possible risk possible. 
( FR ) Madam President, first of all, I would like to pay tremendous due to the huge amount of work carried out by the rapporteurs, I would like to pay tribute to the huge amount of work carried out by the rapporteurs. 
There is coherence : we must ask ourselves if our system of fiscal regulations is complete if our system of fiscal regulations is complete. 
I look forward to the European Commission to presenting us with the impact assessment provided in the agreement and I will follow the negotiations on the final agreement on the final close partnership agreement. 
I believe that this is a very important step that will make Europe and the European Union more humane and more open to the needs of politicians, not to the consumers or, in other words, to those who use different modes of transport. 
authorities are fully responsible for the effective investigation of the facts and for the fair trial of those responsible for the behaviour of people in the fairness of the fairness of the people 's responsible trial. 
The supply of research and development in Europe represents an unsignificant percentage of public supply in public supply in public supply in generally, in general. 
Conful awareness of the procedures for access to treatment for abroad must be comprehensive to be able to access treatment under a border. 
I am of the opinion that the effects of the use of a zone that has not been left in their natural state of use should be included. 
Today, it costs how much today it is today how much it is worth today how much it is worth today, how much it is. 
The criticisms made by the European Court of Auditors in the last 10 years, the Commission has addressed the audits - and this is reflected in the media - with the call to change their method of working in such a way that the figure in the EU spending on expenditure is better. 
We are not deceiving ourselves, we are not deceiving. 
We believe that, on the Council, we must put pressure on and find it regrettable that it has been blocking for several years now for the explanation of origin. 
The credits of EUR 100 million promised by the Commission must be accelerated, and EUR 100 million has to be stepped up by the Commission, must be accelerated. 
It also requires that we be fair, as well as the involvement of other industrialised countries, so that this is not just a European project, but also a European project. 
It is a country that, in my own country, 20 % of young people are unemployed, and the emigration that has been stood to the so-called brain ', which covers, among other things, the members of my own family. 
Member States pass their stability and cohesion programmes, as well as their programmes for national reforms, we will have a truly relevant approach at the same time. 
There are problems there are problems, there are problems, there are problems, and there are problems, too. 
between businesses - to support research programmes, for example - may risk restrictive trading in practice that is aimed at eliminating competition. 
Europe is ready to show that it is ready to protect its citizens in tragic situations in tragic situations. 
To the common asylum area and the integrated policy for the management of refugees ' management of refugees, which we need. 
Waste is, maybe, basin, basin, basin, a basin, living, good stabilised stabilisers of the planet and other chemicals and plans that become dangerous in the era. 
The Council gives the Member States that have not yet joined the Paris Convention to do so, while respecting the exclusive competences of the European Union that have been set out in the Treaty of Lisbon. 
opportunities have been missed and opportunities have been lost. 
While Europe wants to be a pioneer in the health requirements, hygiene, the environment, especially social standards, and particularly by imposing its producers a highly restrictive system of beef - and, more specifically, the split production of beef - is still not fully merged by hygiene and health standards. 
in writing. - ( DA ) The Third Members of the Danish Liberal Party voted today in favour of the report on the EU agricultural policy after 2013. 
These are all good times and thank them for their work so far and thank them for their work so far. 
The Council many Member States have also expressed their concerns in relation to the proposal, too, on the proposal, of the Council, and also of many Member States have expressed their concerns in relation to the proposal. 
This rules must be applied to the functioning of the single market, cross-border trade, not to issues that are internal to national economy. 
Russia depend on one another, as the Commissioner has confirmed and has also confirmed, Mrs Ferrero, Mrs Ferrero. 
I say that, on two occasions, I say that, on two occasions, those with Anglo Bank and the Uighur Credit Credit Record ( BBBBS ), we are working on an option of liquidity. 
The funding, increasing the current limit for giving a person and a year and a year to promote funding, by increasing the current border for giving the limit to a person and a year. 
Madam President, I have great concerns about the dairy farming economy in the UK. 
A majority of responsibility for delaying in the use of funds in the use of funds in the use of funds is used in the use of funds. 
As the agreement is signed and you have the interpretation and verification of the legal authority, then it will be submitted to the Council for signatures and to Parliament for ratification. 
Exports of exports which will be affected include pharmaceutical products, ICT, medical products, dairy products and other food products and other products. 
A temporary measure and in awaiting the Commission 's legislative initiative will be monitored in coordinating the CESR by the College made up of representatives of the competent authorities of the Member States, such as the legal force of decisions, will be guaranteed by the competency of the state in which the agency is registered. 
Should it be said that stability is necessary, both for the implementation of political contacts between governments and citizens, and for the effective functioning of trade flows and commercial businesses. 
It can not be the end of history, but it can not be the end of history, not be the end of history. 
It is a high developed partner with similar views of our views, which has strategic ties that cover not only trade and investment, but is very much going on. 
This, the rapporteur examines fundamental rules for the internal market, aimed at supporting sustainable transport in Europe, the rapporteur is looking at fundamental rules aimed at supporting sustainable transport in Europe. 
Only one way we save the European Union and it is to introduce yet more so, as to transparency in the Swedish model and in the model of the US law on freedom of information to the US information. 
We are not closing the door and before our eastern partners, and before our eastern partners, to our Eastern partners. 
Some new proposals from this budget will be redistributed after 2013 to meet the objectives of the Europe 2020 strategy objectives. 
The UN experts highlight that a number of armed groups in force in the country are partly supported by a well-organised network which is partly based in the European Union. 
The Union must take a serious look at the crisis of fish stocks, which must be seriously paid to the crisis of fish stocks, must be taken into consideration. 
farmers are turning their time and their efforts to compete with each other, rather than competing with the strong small small sector for the trade of small, I know who will win and who will lose out of this. 
The internal market system used for services has proven to be particularly useful in the same way as a particularly useful system for the internal market. 
The speaker agreed to answer a blue card question under Rule 149 ( 8 ) ). 
It is that this medicine has caused the death of 000 000 and severe devastating diseases of thousands of others. 
in writing. - I should also like to support this recommendation and the agreement in question should serve as an example to other negotiations that are currently being held on the table. 
However, no aid can not replace the commitment and commitment of the government itself and actions of the government itself ; however, it can not replace the commitment and actions of the government itself. 
As has been said, the situation as the whole is very serious both in financial and in economic terms, as has been said, is very seriously both in the financial and economic terms. 
It is a denouncement that Greece, Spain and Portugal, have granted authoritarian rule, decided to join us and is not happy that, following the collapse of Communism, all the central and Eastern European countries have chosen the European Union, rather than an another option. 
To return to the next step of this procedure, let me say that I believe that the tomorrow vote towards a vital signal to all the parties involved in this process and, above all, for the Council, as regards the legislative procedure. 
Will they no longer be able to define their own foreign policy, its own foreign policy, and can they define their own foreign policy ? 
I have just said, I believe that the lack of consistency and solidarity on the part of the Council for the largest reference ' to the achievement of a common asylum and immigration policy. 
The support of human rights on the Internet and the balance that must be achieved between privacy and security are particularly important, but these are also not issues that must be resolved at EU level. 
Mr President, once all of these are all asking for energy security, why why is it not then a fact that it is not then a reality ? 
Secondly, measures to simplify accounting rules, particularly in the agencies cofinanced and financed by themselves. 
I am sure that they are in line with the criteria of the EGF, that they are in line with the criteria of the EGF, and I am sure they are in line with the criteria of the EGF. 
part of the work will be carried out in the summer and by the end of 2009, we will have to deal with this list of list. 
It is to improve competition on the markets of medicines and energy markets to improve competition in the markets of medicines and energy markets. 
We have also learnt some others, perhaps not so positive things : unlike the prices of car prices, the costs of the moratorium have actually increased over the past years. 
We should ask why this is happening because it was certainly possible to submit proposals on other issues. 
The reports of information agencies for years have been declared for the year of the bank to denounce their victims and separated their masse, which subsequently selling for EUR 10 000 per line per line on cosmetic companies. 
Otherwise, the countries which have not regulated this area of business may harm competition to others, could harm to others. 
It is not a request for the Socialists or the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ), but our common desire, but our common desire. 
I would like to thank you once again for the priority you have given the taxation of savings and your support to the Commission 's efforts to promote good governance in this tax field. 
The common agricultural policy for the common agricultural policy no longer uses the largest part of Community money, which is the majority of Community money, no longer used by the Community 's money. 
The European Union is now going on, the European Union is creating a impression of a strong technically technically responsible structure dealing with economy and money. 
We will continue to support the implementation of the recommendations of the observation mission of the 2008 election observation mission for the monitoring of the 2008 elections. 
It is insisting on a uncompromising interpretation of the principles agreed by the G20 to ensure that the design of money payment is strict limited to the money of the bonus, is strictly limited. 
It is still extremely big, still very large, still very much, is still very large. 
It is essential that we, in the European Union, take action, the SSGA action. 
There are a rich set of elements covering the broad area of energy efficiency in a rather inadequate way, even though it contains routes that could make it difficult to achieve the successful achievement of the objectives set. 
I therefore believe that it is time to start thinking about a international convention on the management of the region 's governance Convention on the Management of the region. 
It should be done on the basis of equal terms. 
Turkey has not fulfilled them by the end of this year, VVVD, to see that the accession negotiations must be frozen. 
The success of the negotiations and compromises reached in the new framework agreement - the five Interinstitutional Agreement between Parliament and the Commission - the key interinstitutional agreement between Parliament and the Commission. 
Do you clarify this matter in Parliament 's question of Parliament 's question ? 
We do not forget the important contribution of the creative sector not only to the development of information and communication technologies, but also to economic and social innovation, too. 
On the one hand, the other amendments will need to be able to carry out additional negotiations in the context of the trialogue in the context of trialogue. 
In particular, in particular, as regards the text tests of communications, in particular, as regards the text of communications. 
I am shocked by the reference to the EIB 's external actions, which are required for more financial and human resources and to be human resources. 
but at the beginning of the second question, it was not quite clear, but at the beginning of the second question, it was not quite clear. 
I feel that we in this House believe that we in this House believe that we are the top goal of overall democracy. 
Portugal is particularly crucial in crucial times in Portugal. 
Unfortunately, very often, many events that have occurred for a short time, are causing us to go out of political demands here in Parliament, which I sometimes find for suspicious suspicions. 
Among the next sitting : see Minutes 
This report calls on the EU Member States to develop mechanisms to combat poverty, which has a woman in particular, I therefore voted in favour of the text. 
The precedent has already called on the UN Security Council to investigate the criminal offence against humanity in Burma, as made in Rwanda, Bosnia and Darfur. 
Ladies and gentlemen, often, women are sent to the choice of professional and private life, particularly on maternity issues, which ultimately prevents them from feel fully felt in their physical and mental health. 
The analysis must remain the guarantee of our security, the guarantee of our security, European countries must restore their political and military commitments. 
It is that any legislation at European level concerning this issue, a new basis will create a new basis for creating a new basis. 
However, in terms of what we can do, we must be careful, even when we talk about penalties, because history shows that the economic and trade sanctions often make the register stronger, not less weak and that they actually do not actually make the people less, but also the poorest. 
The answer is to say, how do you propose that this be done ? 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this report on the proposal for a new regulation on this issue because I agree with the objectives of the changes aimed at implementing objectives. 
I am absolutely convinced that we must continue to make a direction for the European Union 's involvement in the direction of greater involvement. 
President Vice Syria, more visit to Syria, Liberal and Turkey, Liberal and Turkey, visited, and again, Syria, Liberal and Turkey. 
I am encouraged to examine the possibility of coordinating a strategy with measures on international adoption, taking into consideration the international conventions, but it must be stressed that by taking into account the interests of the child if there is a chance, it must be given the advantage of adoptions in the country of child origin. 
Unfortunately, a large proportion of goods is produced in countries where there is no form of controls on products on products, which are not any form of controls on products. 
We need high standards of our food producers, and there is a high standards for our food producers. 
Unfortunately, the European Police College, or CEPOL, has become known here in the European Parliament, due to the suspicions in illegal and corrupt action of its former leadership. 
The relief of national contributions in the Union budget has been failed as a result of the ungeneration of the opposition in the person of Member States, which were afraid of the response to public opinion. 
Parliament : see Minutes 
It is also about developing strategic cooperation between the EU and Turkey, which is a matter of immediate importance, with the negotiation process whose dynamism is being delayed for objective reasons, is also a matter of concern. 
I believe that, in my opinion, Chile Change has adopted the worst blackmails of totalitarian socialism since last century. 
The authoritarian regimes, as history shows, are not paid out, is not paid out to the authoritarian regimes, as history shows, for history. 
Other European countries are also being applied in other European countries, too, and other European countries are also being applied. 
It is essential that the 27 governments fulfil the political will of the treaty because, in their internal tendency, the European institutions are actually installated communities. 
A agriculture in one of the areas in Bulgaria may produce the whole quota, for example, for domestic households granted to Bulgaria by the European Commission by the European Commission. 
Equal opportunities, opportunities are available. 
This can we agree to everyone, whether we can agree, or not, to all, to all, to do so ? 
In the euro area, the role and practices of credit rating agencies are also having negative effects on the stability of the euro area, and on the stability of the euro area. 
Finally, the Committee on Regional Development believes that the ENP must be aimed at a balanced strategy between the elephant and the South, with specific approaches both areas and for both areas. 
This is why we must encourage dialogue between universities and businesses, adapt to the needs of the labour market and highlight positions and practical experience that will enable them to find more easing work. 
The Irish have given their approval to the open Treaty of Lisbon, but at least they were given the right to choice. 
( FR ) Mr President, Mr Van Rompuy, Mr Barroso, Mr Barroso, Mr Barroso, I would like to share two things I would like to share. 
This is what is right from the moment of your match could actually be eliminated by providing broad access to vaccines and preferable programmes. 
This must be possible to make decisions directly relating to the institutions, if European law is not applied in correct terms of European law. 
An agreement on counterfeiting ( ASEI ) ( ETEC ) ( motions for resolutions tabled ) : see Minutes 
It is, but it is, that is. 
However, this can be adopted as a first step towards improving the current situation in connection with the social protection of self-employed workers and assisting spouses. 
The procedural rules on the parliamentary privileges and immunity are not applicable to the collapse of its immunity is in accordance with Parliament 's rules in the area of institutional and legal issues. 
That is why we have a section of labelling in the reform of our common fisheries policy reform of our common fisheries policy. 
agreement was finally reached, a consensus was reached in the Council, which was not easy to have been agreed, in the Council, which was not all easy. 
The conditions of this agreement, the IOpel meeting, of the Antwerp meeting in Antwerp, have been given guarantees that car will be produced there from the new SUV model. 
I should like to speak : let us replace the current stimulus policy and sanctions policy in terms of the regime with a policy of sanctions for the regime for the regime and incentives for society and incentives for society. 
We can do everything we can to do for them, but nothing can be done without them and in this Chamber, Mr President, we already have a few excellent Roma colleagues. 
Based on the opinion of the Consultative Working Party of the Legal Service of the European Parliament, the Council and the Commission, in the proposal for a directive of the European Parliament and of the Council on rescue devices of agricultural or forestry tractors, it concludes that the proposal in question is in question to the ordinary codification of the existing texts without substance. 
The serious consequences of the liberalisation of world trade, the resolution undermines the continuation of the opening of markets between the European Union and China, focused efforts on the WTO and stresses that the new EU-China partnership and cooperation agreement should aim to establish free and fair trade '. 
I would like to emphasise this, I would like to emphasise the importance of including another priority, the one for the European citizen. 
The amendment I am talking about is to ensure that the way in which areas of natural conditions are distinguished, based on uniform environmental areas, not on local administrative areas or NLEX at the present time. 
It was different geographical points and represented a huge number of ideological ideologies and culture, but it was united around the objective of fighting for the recognition of equality of women 's rights and justice, for the participation of social and political life, to share responsibilities for the rights of sexual and reproductive health. 
In this situation, does the EU support strategic relations with a country that is so unstable, particularly given our damages of trade and aid in trade and aid ? 
All of the main line : while we are strictly meeting our recovery plan to get out of the economic and financial crisis, we must also think about the future, too. 
A great deal of feeling to the people of the highest officials of the highest officials, Herman Van Rompuy and Baroness Ashton. 
on behalf of the Commission. - ( FR ) Madam President, as I speak for the first time before the new Parliament, I would like to congratulate you on your election for Vice-President. 
The fact that all the Member States of the European Union must take stricter measures to take place, measures must be taken by all the European Union Member States, as a matter of principle, to take stricter measures. 
The various problems in the transposition of the directive, I would like to emphasise the fact that in the legislation in the legislation of some Member States, Member States do not provide concrete discrimination on grounds of gender, on the basis of gender law. 
in writing. - ( PT ) All countries which still remember their involvement in war wars know the devastating effects of the cancellation of the canic eblow. 
It is a role as the European Parliament to ensure a strong and decisive response by the democratic countries to the actions of the Chinese authorities, such as the previous time before the campaign for the '. 
The Union and the Union as a whole have a full contribution to what they are also to be thanks to your two thanks to your two and to your two of you. 
The highest posts in the European Union ( President of the European Parliament and the President of the European Parliament and the President of the European Commission ) are elected to the highest positions in the European Parliament and the President of the European Parliament ). 
We note the progress in our actions to harmonise the global construction market harmonisation of the world construction market, in our actions to harmonise the world construction market, in our actions. 
We have left the anniversary of the Monti Prize to the Memorandum Prize. 
We believe that more efforts should be made in this area, more effort should be made in this area. 
There is a right to freedom of religion, conscience and thought, to freedom of religion, to conscience and to a judge. 
We deny that this is the case that it is the case. 
A call for the end of the occupation of Western Sahara from Morocco or the occupation of the Palestinian Sahara occupation by Israel. 
It is essential if we want to change the train constructions of the global financial system constructive, if we want to change the global financial system structures, we want to change the global financial system 's tracks. 
It will also provide more authorities thanks to better cooperation and cross-border exchange between the various countries and that it is in a position between Member States in a new, fundamental manner. 
It is important as an instrument against forgetting, forget, against forestation, as an instrument against foreseigns, is important as an instrument. 
In order to ensure that the derogation in question, which should contribute to the creation of jobs and prosperity, will indeed be beneficial to local populations and will not harm European filter, filtermed and canning industry, it is important to anticipate its impact as quickly as possible, as is necessary. 
The solution helps to eliminate barriers to the free movement of those travelling within the European space of the European area. 
At the start of the crisis, we have shown our determination to take the necessary measures to preserve financial stability and to promote the recovery of sustainable growth. 
We have achieved everything, but a large majority of things are driven thanks to good cooperation between the Commission and the Council, the Council, was very active and between Parliament and between the groups in Parliament. 
It has chosen the way to democracy and, therefore, the European Union and other countries must also demand, if necessary, to help ensure that the international commitments made are respected and respected and human rights and freedoms are respected. 
This report is based on unaccurate data based on unaccurate data, based on unaccurate data, based on unaccurate data. 
We are therefore decisive today, therefore, defending our right to control, because in future, the Commission should build its plans on the basis of what it has laid down, rather than based on its own data. 
This has significant delays in the implementation of the delays in implementing the delays in implementing the delays in implementing the programmes for demonstration. 
The current proposals to send out a clear message to the Council for not to agree with the pressure exercised on Members, as well as with the visible intention of overlapping the new procedures for the European Parliament to include the legislative debates in legislative debates. 
On the minimum number of Member States, we should make a clearer impact on the more explicit development of the procedure provided for in the Treaty, on the minimum number of Member States, we should make a clearer impact on the procedure. 
This agriculture must be central in the debate in Copenhagen and I hope that the Members of the Council and the Commission will not forget that and will be our speakers in Copenhagen in December in December. 
The situation in which they are in the wake of the neoliberal policy supported by the European Union could be felt to vote against the land, which the bureaucracy unrestraint to them. 
The directive provided to the European Commission for implementation measures, which actually stated that the adoption of the provision is permitted without the consent of this event without Parliament 's consent to this acquisition or of my true parliament in Uganda. 
I would also like to produce and sell the market more energy efficient covers before, too, and sold on the market, more energy efficient covers before us. 
11 years of economic and monetary union ( CFSP ) we did not wish to see and recognise that competitiveness divides and that the significant inequalities and imbalances between the economies of the euro area are incompatible both with viability and stability of the euro area. 
We can do this in the General Progress Regulation, in the General Professor Procedures and we will also be able to do so with the specific regulation on car. 
There is trust between Member States, the Schengen area countries, which are in fact the cornerstone of the Schengen Cooperation. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Mr President, the purchase and the supporter of the car is considered to be one of the most important costs of households. 
As regards the Commission will take on the policy of Turkey conducted by Turkey conducted in relation to the policy carried out by Turkey ? 
It is not compatible with the international standards of human rights as a whole, nor does it rather with women 's rights. 
A peaceful agreement signed in 2005, concluded in 2005, completed by this war, completed in this war. 
There is new protection standards that the report establishes a fair balance between the protection of investors ' rights and the right of public authorities to regulate. 
The economic crisis has been painful of us, it is painful painful, and it is painful, of course. 
The Prime Minister of Kosovo, Mr Tajani, for trade in human authorities, also shows that war crimes can not be dealt with unilaterally. 
Regular exercises can be grounded in four points : health : health, social, economic and political benefits, economic benefits. 
In addition, consumption is expected to increase by 2030, and an increase in an increase in an increase in imports will almost fully cover an increase in imports of imports. 
This regulation is particularly aimed at the existing problems with the liquidity of the five affected countries - Romania, Hungary and the three Baltic States - and is aimed at, as has already been said, to speed up the use of funds as a result of increased flexibility. 
A region, particularly the Danube Delta 's Day, includes several special protection areas and territories with a special regime of protection within Natura 2000, which represents the only one of its roll-call ecosystem. 
documents : see Minutes 
A different aspect has already become different to the various aspects of the various aspects of different aspects, already in question. 
We will start a long time to start the discussion on the energy strategy discussion on the energy strategy in the discussion on the energy strategy, and we will start a discussion on the energy strategy. 
We must define the European Union 's political priorities for 21 century 21 century century, and we must define the European Union 's political priorities. 
I would like to mention all of you that when you speak with a very rapid rate, the interpreters are difficult to maintain contact with you with you. 
The creation of the Special Committee on the financial, economic and social crisis, was to define the factors that have led to the crisis, indicating what the EU has not noticed, and the crisis was expected to prepare future measures and to avoid such situations, to avoid the economy and to the final crisis scenarios that still exist in some Member States. 
They are to show a surprise result of those who pay their payers. 
At the same time, we are contributing to these programmes being drawn up on the basis of the evaluation of the need to apply them and put in place timely, ensuring that the funds are used effectively under programmes that are implemented according to the objective of promoting Community products. 
It is time for courage, for courage, for courage. 
I have often been asked, Commissioner Tajani, who should be responsible to ensure that something really happens in the case of doing. 
However, I would like to make it clear that the Commission will not be able to negotiate with all the countries that the Member States have identified as an objective of investment protection. 
I would now like to say a few words now to apply to the new rules to implement the new rules. 
It is an organisation that is extremely courageous to defend human rights in Belarus, which is extremely courageous to defend human rights in Belarus. 
Unfortunately, openness in the Arctic research is increasingly limited by countries that have access to the NorthAtlantic Scientific New Atlantic. 
We count on you to ensure that not only the voice of the large countries are heard, but also to protect the whole of the European Union and the whole international market. 
It also gave responsibility to the answers given to the Commissioner, the commitments made and repeated during the various meetings of evaluation organised for February and June 2011. 
It must be condemned to its crimes in the EU 's territory of crimes. 
It has become clear that the biggest enlargement will have to continue and include a number of other countries in the region since 2007. 
I would simply like to ask the Commission : now that we have a revised plan to simplify the formalities, as has been announced, I hope that Parliament will have a greater role in the debate and planning of these new initiatives. 
Let us not delude ourselves not to delude ourselves that ordinary Great people do not have the fault of what happened in Greece. 
Unfortunately, in these circumstances, the Commission must demand that it be made equal treatment to all and to focus on what our borders, to some cases in other Member States, where, in fact, much greater harm is being given to natural resources. 
Parliament resolutions taken as a result of Parliament 's resolutions : see Minutes 
The asylum legislation are the Dublin Regulation to establish criteria and mechanisms for the definition of the Member State competent to examine the international protection application of minimum standards in the directive on the adoption of asylum seekers, the Directive concerning the acceptance of asylum seekers, the Directive, which concerns the minimum standards for when a third country should be defined as a necessity for international or protection standards on minimum standards for the Member States in international procedures and the protection procedures for the Member States. 
30 % of the energy consumed by the EU is a nuclear source ; there are countries where domestic production is 80 %, for example, as France, and countries without nuclear central central and Portugal and Austria. 
The decisive result of the Irish referendum, we all hope that we will all be very soon following the ratification by the Czechs on the part of the Czechs. 
My fellow Members, and I wanted to make sure that we have been assured that the resolution confirms this in principle and in the context of the EU 's interaction with the countries of the region. 
It is that the ideas of Europe 's elites in the Left, which are clearly a proposal will be adopted. 
It is significant and significant enough enough and very much enough to have sufficient significance of it. 
It is a good balance between security and citizens ' rights is a good balance between security and citizens ' rights. 
Supply must be provided without conditions or limits, or assistance must be provided without conditions or limits. 
We are open to everything that is needed to do with the face of the crisis, which will affect particularly the social issues of social issues. 
It can also be achieved by providing better access to broadband Internet services for farmers, by providing better access to broadband services. 
It is only right that this is fair, because we must have fair production to build confidence among the citizens in our judicial system, and this is crucial - to ensure mutual trust of judges and prosecutors in the systems of neighbouring countries, which can not be achieved unless we have a comparable level of rights. 
I have experienced a disaster as a result of the land of the past few years in the last few years, and the result of the land has been in the last few years. 
It shows that Europe is still lacking in its self-respect in the eyes of Russia 's authoritarian ideology, in Europe, still lack of self-respect for Russia 's authoritarian ideology. 
In terms of trade, the Group of the high level of examining ways of integrating economic relations, considering all the issues of interest both sides. 
The proposal enshrined in our resolution to extend cooperation between EU Member States in tax matters of taxation. 
rapporteur in shadow, on behalf of the ECR Group, of the ECR Group, I stressed this report, while the report was at the stage of committee, the importance of promoting the SOLVIT network among the European Union 's citizens, particularly the possibility of citizens and, in particular, businesses, to stay their rights. 
I therefore believe that it is right and necessary to make a joint commitment to achieve better results in the area of health care and to achieve the objectives of health care agreed at international level. 
I say that I am strange to say that I am pleased that the Council so much rejects our proposal for EUR 150 million over the period - bad and costly costly approach in these difficult times ! 
These cases are amended, and the legal foundations relating to them, which are quite rightly demanding their review. 
First of all, it is about mentioning the European Social Charter of Fundamental Rights that is mentioned to you, first and foremost, to mention the European Social Charter. 
As regards the monitoring of external borders, joint operation of Frontex could be organised. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, Amendment 1 of the regulation on housing proposes to extend the use of the European Regional Development Fund for all Member States, and not just for those who joined in 2004. 
It is now enough to bring this memory volcano to an end, so that we can work without the weak financial accountability and the intrusive of society to become a cause of volcanic eruption. 
The blackmail of Greece, with which the Hungarian Presidency is firmly borne, prevented by the EU and the Council to act. 
It also provides good money for industry, because their trafficking is increasing constantly increasing in its traffic is also increasing. 
I would like to stress that the high quality of law must be a priority of Parliament 's high quality. 
It is perhaps somewhat surprising that we have such major ideological differences about whether it is really sensible to take loans and spend so much money, as is actually seen in many countries in the last few years. 
The Union must have a more transparent and effective way of financing its policy, and I am ready - I hope that Parliament 's support - will be able to fight with the Member States while restructuring the Union budget. 
A financial and financial crisis has led to an increase in global deficit, which, in turn, increases the importance of the resources allocated to the public budget. 
It was necessary to improve this directive, and we needed to improve this directive, that we need to improve this directive ? 
On the basis of all these practical reasons, we call on you, Commissioner, to conclude this debate this evening, to go further in the proposals and promises, not by making the promises, but by making promises, but by engaging the action plan - your action plan - so that our fellow citizens will be more close to 7 June. 
The location of both countries will be more involved in increasing the control of airports and land borders, compared with sea ports. 
However, we are asking the following question : what will we do if we delete these immigrants in Europe ? 
So, it proof that we can reach an agreement, and that this new Treaty of Lisbon can be successful. 
! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! 
In this connection, I must say that your refusal to the Council, and that of allowing the European Parliament to participate in the creation of macroeconomic indicators by delegated acts, does not seem to me to be the right approach to the Council. 
At the same time, the system is based on the preferable that air traffic will continue to increase, but I am voting for this report, as the positive parties will have more than the negative ones. 
I will vote in favour of this joint resolution, precisely for this reason, because it is critical of the protection of democracy at all and because it is not formulated in order to reduce the useful useful situation, in my opinion, the regime of Hude Chile. 
Therefore, in my opinion, the Commission must analyse the creation of an effective monitoring system, strengthen the methods of tests and tighten up the minimum binding safety rules within the European Union. 
Parliament must regularly receive information on the current state of the current state of the application of these systems. 
These expenditure are quite important, that these costs are very important, very important, too. 
You are in your traceber bling blind, so that we do not withstand frozen. 
The Treaty of Lisbon is also corrected in the form of the Multiannual Financial Framework and the new interinstitutional agreement. 
Therefore, innovative and professional policy measures, such as promoting the use of environmental vehicles or the development of programmes to plan role in planning role, play an increasingly important role in promoting the use of environmental vehicles. 
A challenge facing small and medium-sized enterprises is currently facing, it is to provide itself with capital and finance and finance. 
This sense, bearing in mind the financial and economic crisis, as well as the financial crisis, is below this crisis, in mind, both the financial and economic crisis, and the economic crisis. 
Responsibility in Hungary ( debate ) 
Our climate and energy package must be combined with realistic funding and we expect the March Summit - after six weeks - our 27 leaders of states and governments to show an extremist and not to confuse the back to us, the EU citizens and communities in the world, which are the most poor and vulnerable in climate change. 
In the European Union itself, there is currently a deterrent of the food production process, which could significantly improve the situation and really be a real measure to combat hunger. 
Therefore, all actors must take responsibility and ensure that illegal timber is not selling into the EU in illegal timber. 
Thus, the number of catches, which entered Gaza, has increased since the start of military operations. 
A Italian company offering a telephone, murdered and Internet services, coincided not to conclude contracts with Romanian citizens. 
It must not be a factor of neglecting, as it directly concerns the stability of Eastern Europe and the security of Europe 's borders. 
It is true if we say that the creation of the SOLVIT system in 2002 was one of those events in the history of Europe as a unitary continent which did not draw attention, but with the time limit for the time to unexpected results. 
It may be something as a European Union of the firm currency in a major European currency in which national economies which do not meet the convergence criteria would be excluded from the euro area. 
The item is one-minute speeches on matters of political importance, with political importance, with the importance of political importance. 
It is to consider the salling possible measures that we will have to take over the coming days and years. 
We should raise our flag on the global carbon budget in the global carbon budget. 
It is to point out as an example of Robert Schuman, who was from Elvency, who was able to become a founding founder of the European Union 50 years ago. 
No one of the Mexican Army ' ' ' ', has no room for a Mexican army '. 
It will be a problem that will plunge again within the period of a year of reach some year within the framework of around one year. 
I am with all the parliaments who have highlighted the problem of the conditions in the prison conditions in Europe, in the prison conditions of prison in Europe. 
Europe can dictate the circumstances in these countries, that Europe can dictate the circumstances in these countries. 
Parliament has ignored the legitimacy of a national parliament, which has repeatedly voted on a law without criticism of criticism without criticism. 
Question information is the Commission receiving the treatment of passengers and what guarantees can it give the airlines to their duties in accordance with the legislation in accordance with the legislation, and what guarantees can it be given to the airlines ? 
It is that the motion for a resolution is a very balanced text because it has been addressed all the points mentioned, and I therefore voted for it. 
It is certainly a sign of a timely and the last crisis in the dairy sector, which is harmful to so many agricultural producers in the European Union, is certainly a sign of a serious volume of voices that could affect our agricultural markets in agricultural markets. 
As we are talking about the situation in countries outside the EU and about the freedom of the Christians, I would like to remind the House that we must first of all put in place our own home. 
However, the Commission must present an impact assessment of the agreement by 2020, and of the aid programme, with possible recommendations for the continuation and provision of additional financial assistance. 
In other words, Portugal is currently being hindered to conclude international agreements to speed up judicial cooperation, including on issues concerning divorce and destruction, as it is considered that the Community partly has exclusive competence in these areas. 
governance far beyond the introduction of order and the victims who are going hand in hand with this, is far beyond the introduction of order and the victims who are going hand in hand. 
It is also a means of opting, Mr Barroso, to hear one invitation from you, I expect to hear a sentence from you, and I expect to hear a sentence from you. 
It is the Europeans of Bulgaria and Romania who are going to continue to feel excluded and discriminated against against by Europeans by Bulgaria and Romania, and will continue to feel excluded and discriminated against. 
Finally, we propose our full support for the process of a democratic transition process for the democratic transition process. 
So, to new meetings in September, and we hope that the Commission will take a serious stand in the opinion of Parliament seriously. 
The fact is that the Commission will also submit a proposal on the issue of its own resources in spring 2011 in the spring of 2011. 
Climate in danger of destroying the places of the occupation of this type of nature, and there is also the increase in trade with parts of polar images of corporal meat. 
Lastly, I would like to stress that older women are still victims of various forms of discrimination in terms of gender and age discrimination. 
I remind you that, for nuclear energy, the figure is 7, the figure is 7, is 7. 
Mr President, I am obliged to be obliged to give you the floor to give me the floor to you. 
At the same time, we must not forget a few very important things in assessing our response to the strategy, at the same time, we must not forget a few very important things when we judge our response to the strategy. 
The Union would always have been difficult without significant steps to economic union and I think that, because of this final requirement, the United Kingdom will never come to join the euro area. 
However, we are taking many promises on the international arena to reduce CO2 emissions - more precise % by 2050 ; we also promised in Nagoya to eliminate the adverse environmental subsidies by 2020 ; in the WTO negotiations, we have also focused on how to eliminate distortions that are due to the subsidies for fisheries. 
It is being seen that the text before us recognises the efforts of the detainees that are concluded which are concluded by such agreements with the European Union. 
Whether I ask a few questions, because in these emotional times, we need three mentions and clear information and clearer information. 
It highlights some of the problems relating to nuclear energy and the decommissioning of nuclear reactors, and I therefore voted for it in favour of it. 
From this perspective, the Eastern Partnership programme is vital, as it can guarantee distinction, but it is still clearly establishing links with these countries. 
A number of policy areas such as budgetary policy, the policy of justice, internal affairs, but the most important thing I am thinking of is foreign policy. 
The proposal for a regulation, namely because guaranteeing clear and reliable information by using the CE mark on the products of construction products is a reversed step towards a free, competitive market that can provide protection for small and medium-sized enterprises. 
It is in our strategic partnership agreement in 1997 and therefore there are already already results that give us the opportunity to judge whether it is doing well - as we want to see it as well as we are doing so well. 
This proposal is well balanced and calls for the development of a broad range of instruments aimed at determining people from breaches of rules covering issues such as individual responsibility, transparency and accountability of companies, the right to protection and fair trial, and I am pleased that the proposal does not go as far as the US level where the fines have resulted in excessive damage and loss of jobs. 
I voted in favour of the joint motion for a resolution on the recent earthquake in Haiti in Haiti, in favour of the joint motion for a resolution on the recent earthquake in Haiti. 
I would add that, under ', I mean that it will also pay its part in its part. 
A radical change in immigration policy is needed so that people are artificially shed by economic emigrance can remain at home, with the time that the conditions of international aid is new definitive to enable these countries to become political and economic stable. 
It is time to revise our view from Ireland to the Czech Republic to the Czech Republic to the Czech Republic, it is time to revise our view of Ireland to the Czech Republic. 
Mr President, Mrs Malmström, Baroness Ashton, ladies and gentlemen, I am a member of the delegation for relations with the Palestinian Legislative Council, in other words - the Palestinian Parliament - the Palestinian Parliament, the Palestinian Parliament. 
The two reports will take place at a lunch today on the two reports, today, today, on March, on the table. 
( PT ) Mr President, it is unacceptable that it is inevitable that in the current serious economic crisis in the euro area - the result of the neoliberal policy and the lack of solidarity and economic cohesion, not to support the European Union 's current policy in terms of its financial resources to change this policy. 
I think that we need to ask the Commission to carry out an impact assessment of the impact assessment in the Commission, and we must ask the Commission to carry out an impact assessment. 
The Council has a sufficient flexibility to be adopted in order to be able to take the legislation at the start of the next season in which bluetongue can develop its disease in its disease. 
This resolution confirms the need to release the amount of extra, more than that has already been paid to Kyrgyzstan, particularly in order to respond to the urgent call of the United Nations, which is aimed at collecting USD million to the aid required for urgently. 
It is important topics that the marketing of pesticides in the market, research in this area, as well as all steps taken to reduce the impact of pesticides on health and the environment, while at the same time maintaining their efficiency. 
Anti-Counterfeiting Agreement ( vote ) 
It must negotiate on this agreement and manage the process of integration properly and the European Union must start by defining and recognising its own interests. 
We support the Chinese in resolving their problems in resolving their problems in resolving their problems in resolving their problems in resolving their problems, in order to resolve their problems. 
You could be able to say it publicly to him in the public and publicly speaking to him. 
Promotion of the interinstitutional care of the community services of the community and work in close cooperation with the Member States, and particularly with the management authorities of the European Social Fund and the European Regional Development Fund and the European Regional Development Fund and NGOs in this area. 
I hope that, once all the 26 Parliament has taken their decision, the people of the executive power will not stand up for the democratic process by deniing signatures to sign their signatures. 
Parliament 's importance of the importance of the new Treaty of Lisbon, this is also a necessary step and is needed, and it is also a necessary step. 
July 2007 was open to public consultation under the European Charter of Energy Rights ' rights '. 
It would be a disaster for millions of people, a failure to represent a failure to represent in the efforts of the international community and opportunities for joint actions in the field of humanitarian aid. 
80 % of the primary energy used in the European Union is produced by fossil fuels. 
The ' of economic governance is attack on Member States which are in the most vulnerable position of economic and social terms, and in fact it would be a denouncement of these countries of economic dependence and the rest of the Member States. 
I am with concerns expressed by some of you about the introduction of mandatory rules ' or a gradual response to combating infringements of copyright and Internet piracy. 
We are of the fact that, in the programme of the triumph Presidency, it is very much stressed, on the one hand, on the traceability of the objectives of Beijing and, on the other hand, the intention of a comprehensive approach to prevent and combating poverty, affecting women and children. 
What I am trying to say is the following : the overlapping of competences is one thing, and cooperation is something else, particularly the cooperation needed to improve things in Europe. 
It is something that we must take care of to spread throughout the European Union. 
The Conference of Presidents of the Conference of Presidents of Justice of 17 September 2009 on the use of a special committee to prepare a structural analysis and to draft proposals for the appropriate measures to keep sustainable, unfailed to address crises of financial markets deserves support. 
Their island is fighting with a choru epidemic who had chosen 10 months after the earthquake and international observers question the legitimate legality of the presidential and parliamentary elections. 
Otherwise, how will we maintain the competitiveness in the EU if we eliminate one of the best tools for its promotion, and what decision we will find if we harmonise taxes without the agreement of all Member States ? 
I would like to draw your attention to the fact that some Member States, including the Czech Republic, delay in the transposition of the directives into their national legislation. 
It is absolutely essential to keep the Treaty of Lisbon, as she said in Article 5 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union ( TFEU ), that Member States are obliged - not better or desirable - to coordinate their economic policies and employment policies, and can coordinate their social policies and social policies. 
It is vital that in the reconciliation process, reconciliation process is crucial. 
However, too, too much the rapid abolition of the Community preferences system may and will have serious consequences for some countries of Africa, the Caribbean and Pacific ( ACP ), which are still exported bananas. 
As you know, this is not mandatory under the directive, as you know, it is not mandatory, under the directive, and it is not mandatory. 
We could also have allocated more resources to the dairy sector, as the representatives of the Group of the Progressive Alliance of Socialists and Democrats have proposed, but it is good that at least part of the funds in this draft budget were earmarked for this purpose. 
These elections will be more democratic than previous one, that these elections will be more democratic than previous elections. 
15 years, it will reach %, and it will reach %, to %, to %, to reach it. 
Once again, the right to water is protected by widespread sections and religious movements and liberal liberals. 
in writing. - in favour of the recommendation on the recommendation on the energy performance of buildings because it encourages the goal of achieving a approximately zero energy consumption for buildings. 
Indeed, we believe that in the near future, this approach will result in certain specific measures in specific measures. 
corruption must not be paid by the innocent who live with the GNI, who are threatened by tuberculosis and malaria, and malaria must not be paid by innocent people who live with the GNSS, who are threatened by tuberculosis and malaria. 
Also, the call for the extension of access to funding, because in the current economic conditions, access to funding is decisive for survival, not to talk about the promotion of small businesses. 
We are financial stability, we are financial stability, we are financial stability, and we are in the case that we have financial stability. 
in writing. - The ECR Group, Amendment which I did not support was rejected was rejected, was rejected by the Group of the European Conservative and Reform Group. 
( PT ) The neoliberal Lisbon Strategy is one of the main instruments of the European Union to promote financial deregulation, privatisation of public services, liberalisation of markets and global trade, deregulating labour relations and the violation of workers ' rights. 
There has had to be done in this regard, it took a few years and it was very successful and it was very successful for a very successful one. 
We highlight our common intention of opposition to protectionism at national and international level to oppose protectionism against protectionism. 
The Volcanic five does not recognise any political and physical borders, this disaster once again, reminds us of the time of the time force for the winter of nature. 
The implementation of the system, the recommendations of experts and concerns expressed legitimate by the institutions and by organisations can help us resolve certain problems. 
We must continue to defend the rights of the users of the Internet and, above all, to define them better, better and better defined them. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, Madam President, Madam President, Madam President, the President, Mr President, is on the table. 
It is the ambition of Estonia to accept the single currency in spite of the crisis that has left its press and on it and on it. 
In this context, we must also not ignore the fact that the system that must enable the social security schemes in the European Union to recover the spread of one another is not working, and that in the years, debts are ranked to EUR million. 
The conclusion of fisheries agreements is also in line with the EU 's overall objective of maintaining and maintaining the conservation of the fishing activities of its ships. 
I believe that we must stay vigilant and prepared for any emergency situation that can happen in Europe. 
Today, we have a public recognition of a tuberculosis which was a war, and which is why the conscience has not given a calm, recognises that he had killed 10 Cypriots. 
What Europe needs today is to be united and take clear action, not further division, but not further division. 
It is itself an example of success, in spite of its success, regardless of the racial predictions. 
There can only be changes to the European Union 's help, both in terms of the finances and of expertise, and they must be available to everyone, in view of the safety of patients ' safety. 
We will thus, too, affect food security in the regional dimension of the regional dimension, in the regional dimension, and we will also concern food security in the regional dimension of the regional dimension. 
However, we must ensure that these proposals are more than more than a political reputation and take action to implement them as quickly as possible. 
We are trying to agree with the need to be able to be able to be able to have an urgent and rights of MEPs to fulfil our duties and vote in favour. 
It is completely unclear when science should be found when measures should be reported when measures for control of diseases should be reported and when political action should be taken. 
Unfortunately, in the field of external relations that is currently taking over the country, which is not the Presidency 's presidency, can not form a programme for Foreign Affairs, a common defence or security programme, and therefore, my fellow Members, do not have another choice, but also to support Mrs Ashton 's work, which is starting with very difficulties. 
I would call on both the Commission and the Council to ensure that the Transatlantic Economic Council will receive all the necessary support, because it is not granted automatically. 
( PL ) Madam President, the two most recent joining the European Union has led to a significant exacerbation of regional disputes within the Community. 
The entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon, the European Parliament has made a significant contribution to the efforts to conclude these agreements and therefore must be given full and regular information to all the events relating to PNR data data. 
I note : in paragraph 12, where there is talk of the mediation from Macedonia, the text should read as a mediator from the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia '. 
Mr President, Baroness Ashton, ladies and gentlemen, yes, we need a common foreign policy, the CFP, but let us not use it to achieve a world without nuclear weapons without nuclear weapons. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the subject of the quality of agricultural production is crucial in terms of providing information to buying purchases and consumer for the characteristics of products and in terms of safeguarding guarantees that the purchase of products from the European Union is the high quality of the high quality, inheirred by the various regional traditions within the Union. 
I would like to agree with a broad agreement and I would like to thank the President of the CEPOL, the Belgian Presidency, which has had direct and substantial contribution, particularly through the active involvement of the Minister in the key trialogues, and also the Commissioner Barnier, whose work has been particularly useful. 
The proper disposal of waste electrical and electronic equipment ( EACH ) is extremely important. 
The crisis and the debt crisis has also revealed the gaps in the functioning and control of the financial sector in the functioning and control of the financial sector. 
They are also of crucial importance to financing initiatives aimed at preparing Europe for the post-crisis situation, such as activities in building capacity in new areas and new technologies for Europeans. 
However, providing approval to the provision of the provisional provisions, our priority must be the immediate proposal and the subsequent approval of the regulation, including the multiannual framework of the European Union and the Financial Regulation. 
Europe 's main towards climate policy and its objectives in Copenhagen are key to Europe 's climate policy and its objectives in Copenhagen. 
Indeed, the war has been done shortly, it is essential that Sri Lanka now focus on the following conflict disarmament, demonstration and integration. 
I supported the report on the European strategy for youth as I think it will be vital to incorporating young people into employment in full work over the coming years. 
It is actually a law that is only a matter of the use of these languages as an opportunity and a view of this option in a negative way, not as a positive right, failing to consider it as a right that can also be necessary for everyday life. 
During the current economic crisis, it is essential to use EU funding to preserve the EU 's agenda of humanitarian aid to those most in the European Union ' most in the European Union '. 
It is said that something will not happen in the future in health services in the area of health services. 
It was ot, but his services and lawyers have said that something like this can not be achieved. 
The proposal provides for savings from scale to the financial, human and technical resources, for the financial, human and technical resources, for the financial, human and technical resources. 
Cooperation between the Commission and civil society is increasing, covering a wideround of political dialogue from the governance of projects, both within the European Union and in the countries - partners, partners, partners, partners, between the Commission and civil society, are increasing, by covering a broad round of political dialogue from the governance of projects to the governance of projects, both within the European Union and in the countries. 
We must avoid any direct, unregulated roads in our attempts to reach our targets for renewable energy. 
There is now significant progress in the technical preparation of the proposal for the CCCCCCCCCCCCCCCCCCCTB proposproposal. 
The 2008 missile year as a European Year of Intercultural Dialogue, and I think that this dialogue has just begun. 
However, an instrument has come out because you have made some efforts partly in the face of the opposition by the German Government and your partners - the Christian Union in Germany - to ensure that this happens. 
However, it is not enough - and we need a culture of nuclear safety, a nuclear safety culture, but a need for nuclear safety, but a measure is not sufficient - but a need for a culture of nuclear safety culture. 
There is a question I would like to mention is the accessibility and sharing of the benefits and sharing. 
I would like to call on the Commissioner Fand Mr Oettinger to submit information to the European Parliament on the progress of the negotiations and results of this group 's negotiations and results. 
We should be MEPs and we have instead become in our advisers and we have instead become the council. 
It will create a more fairer system of pays ' pays ' with the guarantees provided to provide for a transparent market and prevent discrimination against discrimination. 
What happened with Hungary, because it was necessary to do, was the country 's provision of additional aid to the country of 20 billion, which did not happen with other economies, which has happened with other economies. 
We are, in my opinion, on the first day, of which I believe is important, in my opinion, in the first day. 
In connection with tuna, we have a scandal of abolishing origin rules without taking into account the Papua New Guinea agreements and Fijing, which is the service of our major competitors, Thailand and the Fishs. 
It is devoted to prevention and the correction of macroeconomic imbalances and advising macroeconomic imbalances and recommends strengthening supervision of supervision. 
The businesses are even more serious because they receive less than 20 % of the Europrice, while their production costs at least at least 40 % of the euro value at the level. 
Against the background of the situation in the whole region, the document and work on it should be assessed positively. 
The Europe 2020 strategy must be effective in pursuing a broad European employment initiative, which, for example, will strengthen the schemes for activation, particularly at the low ratifications, through individual councils, intensification or retraining, or improving skills of workers, growing employment and grants to operate self-employed workers and businesses. 
There is, the Tribunal will not be able to continue its work without a very long time on the table. 
This is because we are not talking about the benefits of moving towards a world after carbon - the millions of jobs in green energy, better isolated homes, improved public transport. 
The principle that the European Parliament should also have a common air traffic air traffic system to ensure that cheaper journey is cheaper. 
In fact, this will even deteriorate environmental protection standards, even worse, environmental protection standards, even worse. 
I am with the rapporteur that the members of the Committee of the Regions must declare their financial interests by showing corresponding information on the professional activities exercised by declaring declaring. 
The length of maternity leave until 20 weeks in receiving the full amount of pay is unfavourable friend. 
next sittings : see Minutes 
A year ago, a year ago, a responsibility for your political group was blocked, among other things. 
After all, the exmate ideas are turning the ones to the social change of social change, the social change is being raised. 
I would also mention the timetable of timetable, too, the timetable of timetable, to mention the timetable of timetable. 
It is essential to improve the systems of health in the countries of subAfrica in subAfrica and throughout the world, to work in a coherent manner with the rest of the international community. 
They are those in Portugal, as the Portuguese Communist Party, who, in rejecting this Treaty, have asked for a referendum and widenational discussion on its very serious repercussions for Portugal, Europe, the world and for peace in general. 
We are faced with the challenge of making the European economy the world 's most competitive economy in the world and I believe it is unacceptable to create a burden that will lead to the withdrawal of capital from Europe. 
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I am voting for the motion for a resolution on the situation in the African Roma situation in the African people of Africa. 
There can be no shortage of workers being cut off to workers being cut and there can be no shortage of their workers. 
Finally, we must also remember the necessary support for the development of civil society as the guarantee of democracy, which must not only be kept to the procedures, but also to be genuinely inclusive. 
in writing. - ( PL ) Until now, during the various legislative periods, there are a quarter of resolutions to the European Parliament on climate change. 
We are now talking about the taxation of a financial sector tax in the financial sector, we are talking about now about the taxation of the financial sector. 
It is undoubtedly your friends in this House that they will call when I conclude, for a more social Europe and greater protection, to be more social Europe and to strengthen protection. 
The basis for the work of the network identified by the network is very useful for the Commission 's work is based on the work of the Commission 's work. 
However, I would clearly stress that the Treaty of Lisbon came into force and this enhances the role of the European Parliament. 
At the same meeting of the Council, ministers agreed that employment is an important factor in avoiding social exclusion is an important factor in avoiding social exclusion. 
The Hungarian Prime Minister, Mr Ferrero, Mr Dalli Dalli Darfur, rather understands the failure to wastage and I set out the idea of European solidarity for European solidarity. 
We have a duty to prevent the allocation of funds or State aid in one Member State, which has the result of job losses in other EU regions. 
I would remind the honourable Members that, in almost all the trade and cooperation agreements that we have concluded since 1995, it is included in a human rights clause and that there is no such clause in the agreements with already 134 countries that I feel that there is already in my opinion. 
The outline measures that we believe are urgently needed in our reports on energy by 2020, and energy infrastructure, which we believe is urgently needed in our reports on energy by 2020. 
More than a year and a half a year and a half, and a half a half, is now going on. 
We can see what the result is what the result is what the result is. 
We are also to protect our high moral justifications and prevent our public devices and lifestyle, only if we leave away with the values of democracy and legal order. 
We must ignore the fact that a significant proportion of the resources aimed at those countries as public development aid is ultimately returned to countries in the form of intra-service purchases and services. 
It may be denied that Italy has shown willingness and commitment to Italy shows willingness and commitment to commitment. 
I abstained on this report because it calls for the European Social Fund to be reformed and strengthened, but it sets it in the service of the EU 2020 strategy. 
In January 2009, the Commission adopted a proposal for a new regulation on the names of textile fibres and the associated labelling of textile products. 
As regards the last question, I must ask you to show patience, because I can not give you an answer to you, as I can not give you an answer. 
I would like to draw attention to the need to support the interparliamentary dialogue at regional level as an important element in the European integration process as an important element in the European integration process. 
There is such events that rarely need to be made to analyse the causes and to find solutions to prevent their repetition of their revolution. 
As the collection of waste at every two weeks is a direct consequence of the EU directive on waste defeat, which was supported in this Chamber by the British Labour Party and by the Conservatives. 
It is one level one level is one level at the level of level, at a level, a level is one. 
It is only at first reading, this is an important result that, after a lot of work has been made in the last months, with my fellow Members from other national delegations and other political groups, this is possible. 
............................................................................................................................................................ ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? 
On the other hand, very important terms of the issue relating to overall production are related to problems, the problems relating to overall production are related to the very much important point, and the problems relating to overall production. 
The stabilisation and association process in Serbia and of supporting a prevailing progovernment is undoubtedly unquestionable. 
I am going to focus on two or three or three points of view. 
journalists are applying a system of self-censorship that they require them to take the position of the government 's government position in place. 
The adoption of this report will be a significant step forward towards a significant step forward towards a new partnership agreement between the European Union and Russia, that the adoption of the report will be given to a significant step towards a new partnership agreement between the European Union and Russia. 
( RO ) The microfinance mechanism for employment and social inclusion helps and should support the implementation of simplified procedures so that people affected by the crisis can benefit from it in the most effective way it is possible. 
There is, first of all, among our priorities, our priorities are first of all in the minds of our priorities. 
( LT ) Mr President, this discussion is very important, but very delayed, in my opinion, that is very important, but very delayed, I believe, that this discussion is very important, but very delayed. 
We are eliminating the problems caused by the poor, and we say nothing about the rich causes of rich rich ? 
On the contrary to the motion for a resolution by RCCC7-tabled, a vote in Parliament today, for the same reason why Greens did not support the Commission : because of the lack of ambition of ambition. 
( CS ) Madam President, sometimes, the Austrian is voting against the nuclear plant in the Southern Pandorya Pandorkoza only to be released by a volcano tsunami where it created a unique Europe for a structure - a nuclear power plant model built on a nuclear scale. 
Finally, I would like to say that, too, and Ecolabel are exclusive initiatives, and the Ecolabel is exclusive. 
With the UN, the EU must act more decisively and more quickly in these cases to prevent violations from international law with such serious consequences. 
People need elementary things such as food, water and medical, and them also need technical assistance. 
Should you go to your coast, Mr Barroso, and the brains are working in only % of the time, there is no doubt that you will no doubt at some time disaster at the very moment. 
Croatia encourages efforts to resolve all unresolved bilateral issues and particularly border disputes, particularly border disputes. 
There is such a open dialogue with the shared interest that we have towards developing our relations, our shared interest in world peace and stability. 
It can be prudence, not provocative, but not provocative, but not provokes. 
We must therefore seek to go to a breakthrough, therefore, to go to a breakthrough, and we must seek to go against. 
In addition, it calls on the Commission to speed up the approval of the import of genetically modified food imports, which I disagree with at all. 
As Mr Barnier has said, confidence is most important, most importantly, the most important thing, as Mr Barnier has said, is the most important thing that he has said. 
Heads of State or Government agreed with this need and the fact that it requires a limited amendment to the Treaty of Lisbon. 
It must reflect the realities of the current cooperation with Russia, and we must reflect on the realities of the current cooperation with Russia, with Russia, and we must reflect. 
( ET ) Mr President, I, too, voted in favour of this report as it introduces the same and binding requirements for the quality and standards of human authorities used in transplantations in all Member States, and thus ensures the protection of donors and recipients, while promoting cooperation between Member States. 
However, an argument relates to the situation of the people of Afghanistan, however, to the people of Afghanistan 's people 's people 's situation. 
Parliament 's involvement requires the involvement of Parliament. 
I would like the Commissioner to tell us what she thinks that it would be appropriate in future on this issue. 
You also have to ensure information, and debate and discussion, and discussion, and discussion. 
It is highlighted in the Charter of Fundamental Rights of the European Union, of the European Union, of Fundamental Rights, of the European Union 's Charter of Fundamental Rights. 
There are more than 200 000 camps in Latvia who can not even receive a major education of the Latvian language. 
future Member States will have to ensure the precise valence of the statistics submitted to achieve quality results in order to achieve quality results. 
It is important that violence against women is finally taken against women not only a crime in terms of women or of social unity of the family, but also be aware of the accentuated costs that are taken by society in general, as is increasingly often the case. 
: European Creating the European authority for assessing creditor assessment of the creditor of the creditor 's ability to assess creditors ' creditor of creditworthiness for assessing creditors ' credits. 
I wanted to announce this to know when you come to the relevant place in the voting place, I wanted to declare this in order to know when you come to the appropriate place. 
products are reached on the market of these countries, and they should be subject to market laws in these markets. 
I propose in this case that you follow the clear message of the European Parliament since April 2009 : we need a clear and convincing message that the EU really is concerned about the lives of unarmed members of the Iranian opposition, and will not more in order to tolerate their freedoms and dignity. 
He, the Conservative Party, pretends to be Eurosceptics, whatever to mean that while the other half of the Liberal Democratic Party, are unreservedly Europhile europages. 
on behalf of the Greens/EFD Group. - I welcome the fact that the Union is seriously investing in improving housing for the most disadvantaged communities, but we must not stop now that we are dealing with so well now that we can deal with. 
programmes that are available on the Internet should be doubled to consumers and in a facilitated way to direct interests to the documents that are selected. 
It is that democracy in Ukraine continues to be the ongoing process of consolidating the process of consolidation in Ukraine. 
On the other hand, the group also mented the allocation of portfolios and pointed out one important point as a justice dedicated to the issues of freedom, and as the Chair of the Committee on Civil Liberties, Justice and Home Affairs, and the relation to the gradual Generalised HRC in the Grand Industry, which is dealing with the question of justice and internal affairs in the Grand Intergovernmental Development and Fundamental Rights, and the fundamental rights of the other issues and the security of the other. 
on behalf of the GUEGroup. - ( EL ) Mr President, the current economic crisis is is a crisis in overall production and the surplus capital of capital. 
It is important that banks start to stimulate as quickly as possible the economy and small and medium-sized enterprises, as quickly as possible, the banks are starting to stimulate as possible, the economy and small and medium-sized enterprises as quickly as possible, as possible, the banks are starting to stimulate as possible. 
From this point of view, it is not enough to say that the problem is the problem of the car industry and that we have so many meetings and discussions so much has been held. 
I take advantage of the time left to us, left by some fellow Members who have come to delay and are now taking their places to show their soil to those services, thanks to which our Vassiliou has not been open. 
We do it for 50 % of our population, for 50 % of our citizens, and we will achieve success and we will achieve success. 
The crisis and the reduction in budgetary and human resources have led to some countries to the closure of many schools, particularly in rural areas, and in reducing budgetary and human resources. 
We are told that more producers must be forced to abandon and that money to be recovered - this is said in the text - will be used for producers who have exceeded their quotas. 
Also, it will reduce the damage to the environment, too, to reduce environmental damage. 
There is a need for stricter capital requirements for financial institutions in quantitative and qualitative terms. 
These are both aspects that we in the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ) believe to be correct. 
The discussions between the two parties which have been carried out with suspicion, intrusion and contradictions, and the intervention of the European Presidency and the Commission seems to have found some solution. 
For its own area, called Macedonia, I oppose the use of the Iberley Republic of Macedonia, by demanding that instead use the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, or FYROM. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I very pleased to welcome the opportunity to welcome the excellent reports of the three rapporteurs and indeed to thank all the Members of this House - not only by the Committee on the Internal Market and Consumer Protection, but also by many other committees, which have been presented here, which joined here in this major way. 
EC and the United United United Nations Area on certain aspects of aircraft services ( 
For over EUR 80 million, and affected around thousands of farmers who lost their renders and have remained without means continuing production over the coming months. 
It is one of the weakest links in the Commission and has not yet shown that it is really aware of the external affairs that it is really aware of the missed relationship in the Commission and so far that it is really unaware of the foreign affairs. 
Annanoevents in Alexander are reminded of the fact that the European Parliament called on the government of Egypt to guarantee cornerstones and members of other religious communities and minorities the opportunity to exercise all human rights and fundamental freedoms - including the right to freely choose and mixed religion - and to prevent discrimination against such groups. 
( FR ) Madam President, too little late, not inadequately coordinated, a lack of solidarity, a reduction in solidarity - these are real responses proposed by the European Union recovery plan and the Commission proposals at this stage. 
The meaning of the preamble to the German constitution, which talks about action on behalf of those who have not been allowed to participate in real policy. 
Thank you and thank you for being brief and for being brief in short time, for being very short of time. 
I would also like to thank you, Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, for the constructive and necessary support you have given to the SEPA project, which you have once again expressed for the SEPA project, and which is in line with the European Commission 's commitments. 
The autumn of 2008, my family and I live in London for reasons relating to the scientific work, and I was a direct witness to the sudden devaluation of the British Listrike by 30 % in the course of several weeks. 
Lisbon strengthens the role of social partners and promotes social dialogue between trade unions and representatives of employers ' organisations at European level. 
The Special Working Party of the FAO experts believes that the proposal for the Atlantic bluefin tuna to be included in Appendix I to the Convention on CITES, and also stated that its list will at least ensure the reduction in the recent unsustainable streams in the Eastern Atlantic and Mediterranean Sea. 
I agree with him on how the country of origin should be worked to indicate it as to how the country of origin should be dealt with. 
It is another step forward to put forward to the European Council, the Commission and the Member States to take action in terms of the intolerable households. 
minutes of the previous sitting : see Minutes 
I would like to remind you that we do not have general legislative powers on each question. 
It is not only a technical procedure, not only is it is not only a technical procedure. 
( DA ) Mr President, for some reason, I read the communication from the Commission on the Arctic, my head of a close picture is being shaped in the minister of a blanket, so I have been shaped. 
The Czech Republic has drawn up for its sixperiod of partof the European Council to Parliament, which is different from the current role in taking this role to play. 
It is not easy to achieve a result that, in future, cross-border health care will help cross-border healthcare, taking into account, firstly, differences in social security systems in the Member States ' social security systems, secondly, the different level of economic development of Member States, and thirdly, the different level of health services provided in each Member State. 
We also need to question the effectiveness of the measures implemented and establish how they could really be improved in order to enable social integration and achieving full European citizenship for Roma. 
At a time when private insurance companies do not offer compensation for forest business, it is imperative, given that there is a lack of activity in this regard by the private sector, to consider the construction of public collective structure to be given to the security of burdeners and fires. 
We will look at experience and the lessons to be learnt from the nuclear accident and we will need to hold the stress test, and I hope that we will do this at European level - because borders are irrelevant when such incidents occur. 
We must therefore make the necessary media reflection of the situation in Libya not to alleviate the seriousness of the humanitarian crisis in Cd'Ivoire in Cd'Ivoire. 
I welcome the motion for a resolution on international adoption, which we voted for today, for which we voted today. 
There is my voice, as well as the Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe, of the Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe, and I have my voice. 
A country which recently experienced and a totalitarian regime and freedom of speech guaranteed by a democratic regime could not be sympathetic on the basis of this woman, fighting for human rights, and I am sure that this issue will be taken into consideration. 
Most of whom I am afraid, are not made within the EU, show that if children receive support and what they need, this helps them later in life : it is reduced crime is improving health and limits unemployment, which we all have benefits. 
The resolution adopted today by a very large majority ( votes in favour of 80 votes against and abstentions ), the French delegation of the Democratic Move repeats and its wish to carry out an impact assessment and practical presence of the proposals by the European Commission on the creation of taxes on financial transactions. 
Mr President, how is the Taliban in the same category with Olympics, and Al Cameroon in the original list of the Taliban ? 
They share themselves, the principle of solidarity, which is undoubtedly very important, is clearly very important. 
The exploitation of workers are unchanged in the blackmail industry in these countries, and the associated deforestation represents a huge threat to the livelihood of the rare population. 
( EL ) Madam President, the current economic crisis has highlighted our firm position on the need for regulation, not by deregulation of mergers, and the creation of multinational and other companies, the need to change in anti-grassroots legislation and the need to eliminate monopoly and cartel organisations which have been designed, among other things, definitive market definitions, prices decided, designed by the decision and which are solely governed by profits that are solely governed by the profits. 
It is important for us to understand that the incomes of farmers depend on direct payments, even though they are in themselves not in themselves providing them with a decent standard of living. 
Commissioner, I would like to welcome you on the nuclear package you have just tabled and which concerns new nuclear power plants, and the proposal in the future in the standards of the International Atomic Energy Agency ( EMSA ) standards to become binding. 
I just add one more thing in conclusion, Mr President : I naturally call on Mr Reinfeldt to achieve consensus within the Council, as well as the procoalition within Parliament within the framework of the European Union, to reflect on the nomination and the distribution of individual roles. 
The disabled people are accompanied - something that we often need to travel to ensure only long distances are guaranteed. 
It is a matter of this regulation and its implementation and its implementation. 
In North Africa, once again, the importance of the common immigration policy has highlighted the need to integrate under the relevant funds, as well as European solidarity. 
The Commission communication entitled ' - the measurement of progress in a world of change ' is proposed various indicators of complementarity of GDP. 
We voted against Mr Barroso, because he did not share our view of the importance of good working conditions, equality and transition to a sustainable society. 
I would like to say that the Union must show flexibility to the request of India to protect non-Indian geographical indications so that India can subsequently provide protection for European geographical indications. 
The sitting was opened at a.m and at a.m. ) 
We must open the door to social dumping, but include a sustainable approach in trade agreements, but we must incorporate a sustainable approach to trade agreements. 
We also want the Court of Justice to enable Parliament and the Committee on Budgetary Control to do their job as productive as possible. 
Women are concerned at a different stage of their lives, from child to the rare age of age, of child to the rare age. 
You, too, know you, of you. 
( FR ) Madam President, yes, yes, we have a duty to be apphanned by the Afghan Permanent Wall, where we have fallen because of the policy that we have been under George Bush. 
There will be common principles of principle of principle of principle of principle of principle for all institutions, for all institutions, for all institutions. 
They are also better and more effective and more effective monitoring and monitoring systems that serve as examples of good practice as examples of good practice. 
It believes that the role played by the IMF in the fight against the effects of the crisis is very important, in the fight against the effects of the crisis, is very important. 
There are significant improvements, but there are also significant gaps, but there are also significant gaps, but there are also significant gaps. 
A major step towards better multigovernance meets Parliament 's repeated requests to strengthen the participation of regional and local authorities in the development of policies, always respecting the various constitutional provisions of the parties. 
However, also clear shortcomings in terms of funding, however, in terms of funding, funding for funding. 
Europe must be a leader, both in terms of rules and of the construction of storage facilities, both in terms of the rules and of the construction of storage facilities. 
Many money, ladies and gentlemen, but we have not been discussing this issue seriously, but we have not been discussing this issue seriously. 
However, that, today, too often, Czech is the message that Israel is now too often a democratic state that Israel is a democratic state. 
It is noted that prices are being increased slowly, but they are lower, but they are lower quickly, but they are lower. 
agreements can not contain elements such as judicial protection of non-discriminatory basis, correction and ban on data extraction and profiling. 
I believe that it is worth Parliament sending a clear message to the citizens who will be monitoring us tomorrow, while voting on the parliamentary report prepared by the three committees together. 
It is important, of course, that we must be aware of this, but we must be absolutely aware of this Parliament has declared not once again what the European Union is going on, unless the institutional reform is put in place, allowing the 27 countries to act more effectively. 
It is also to seek to find a balance between the requirements for growth and development and the awareness of the need for responsible implementation measures for austerity savings. 
Finally, I ask all of us to remember the transposition of the package 's package as a matter of concern for the transposition of the package. 
Iceland began in July 2010 in July 2010, in July 2010, in July 2010, in July 2010. 
A broad consensus broadly consensus broadly consensus with a broad consensus of consensus is a broad consensus. 
Europe, we are paying around USD 400 billion to USD USD 400 billion, and we are paying for Europe, around USD 400 to USD. 
Finally, we must not discover our attention from tackling the economic crisis with the economic crisis. 
This report describes this picture very clearly in this picture of course very clearly, very clearly, of course. 
We must have better research and development, as well as innovation, we must also consider cohesion policy as an integral part of these objectives and we must set them in a broader context. 
All cases, I would like to express my support for the directive that is aimed at resolving the issue of the employment of illegal immigrants. 
Not only has a great deal of knowledge of the European economy and the decision-making of decisions in the EU, which is valuable at this time, but also a very great deal of experience in global economic governance - for example, through its successful handicap with the G20 Presidency. 
I am it really considered to me as a representative of the UK group and whether you feel that you are all in the case a representative of the European Union ? 
We know that profixes and early diagnosis are essential for the effective fight against cancer, so that the overwhelming majority of efforts are focused in this area. 
It is for you to do this for you for this. 
Explanation of vote on the vote, which was made under Article 170 of the Rules of Procedure ( Rules of Procedure ) 
Research has opened that unemployed tickets were discarded in the Mediterranean in the region around Nepal. 
This does not help then, then, then we must be determined and should be distributed the number of Greens at the time. 
Let us continue to continue ahead with you further ahead of you further forward. 
In view of the change in fishing capacity, I would like to highlight the importance of modernising the equipment for vocational dignity and the safety of fishermen in a sector where the loss of human lives is not rare. 
Action Action Action Action Action Action Action Action debate ( debate ) debate Stockholm Action debate ( debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate Stockholm debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate debate 
Then they will then pass on the money to passengers ' passengers ' money ? 
It is often a very often meeting in Parliament with so many political parties and political groups, yet we have unanimous support for what we propose. 
It is not always worthy, but it also applies to all the parliaments throughout the world, but also to all the parliaments all over the world. 
I assure Parliament that we will continue to raise the problems of other forums, including at the highest level, in the highest level, that we will continue to raise. 
In this way, we will deserve the wish of despite the persistence of the successive perpetrators of the founding fathers of a founder Europe, thanks to whose efforts are here today. 
In this context, they are very welcome to the French initiative to formally return to the military structures of NATO and the efforts of the French Presidency of the European Union for the so-called cohesion between the EU and NATO, in response to the new challenges of security '. 
Montenegro would probably have had to wait for longer for this status if he was not dealt with at the same time in the context of Albania 's country. 
It is that the guilty of the countries are two when it comes to the mass humanitarian crisis in Gaza. 
This House does not want to be kept on the stick of a cautious of one Member State, I propose that you vote against the amendments and in favour of the original text. 
We already know even more so, for Fukushima, including the fact that the disaster was systematically allergic, and that the dissemination of the active zone has happened much earlier than the Japanese recognised. 
Your attention to your attention, for your attention, for your attention. 
Such safety, closed only within Europe, is not only one of Europe, but is not who knows how much great achievement is. 
We therefore call on the Member States to use our funds to use our funds to use our funds. 
These were suspended the technical meetings of the Partnership and Cooperation Agreement, the Committee on Development and the Committee on Development and the submissions. 
You, Commissioner, have indicated that one of the main problems is access to capital and you mentioned the European Investment Bank. 
I agree with the rapporteur that the existing five document must be replaced by a free document containing the main information on the investor. 
Now, we are trying to see a new approach now to a new approach now to a new approach, now trying to take a new approach. 
As claiming will only be permitted for transitional food to be allowed for transitional food, it is crucial. 
All the actions aimed at achieving fair and lasting peace and a lasting peace. 
I think it is necessary for Europe to think in the spirit of the Marshall Refugee Refugee Plan, which has done its work very well after the Second World War. 
There are proposals that we naturally support, which we naturally support, which we naturally support. 
Some two weeks have had a dispute debate on how small and medium-sized enterprises are supporting the functioning of the whole European economy. 
With regard to the gross domestic product, the transport sector produces 10 % of the wealth of the European Union and provides more than 10 million jobs, but on the other hand it is responsible for 25 % of all CO2 emissions. 
There is a law that is potentially threatened with the freedom of the media in Hungary, which is currently in force, which is in force at the moment. 
However, I would like to thank the Commission, who has worked on this directive with many energy, which has been a very constructive opposition from the Member States and which is trying to construct Parliament to find a way in the right times in the areas of public procurement legislation. 
Of course, the second regular meeting will be the second regular meeting during the Swedish Presidency, and also the last time chaired by the rotating principle. 
This is very strict and, in many cases, a lasting counterproductive legislation is also very strict in many cases, and in many cases, a lasting counterproductive area. 
There is no impact on the EU budget and is unquestionable and is unquestionable in the unquestionable way that the EU budget is in fact. 
Europe, as I see, as Commissioner Cameroon or the Dutch Government - or at least as the view of the party supported by the government in the Dutch Chamber, is making it a buckle of the Members - Europe of the growing budget shorter reduction, a Europe of the growing deployment of the participation by the development and the Europe of the nation of nationalisation. 
This sense, the intellectual property rights of intellectual property must not be taken as a barrier, but in fact as a driving force for creative activities, particularly in the context of the development of online services. 
It has clearly stated that it will pave the way for cooperation with the Agency for the Credit Agency ( Frontex ) and for many regulations on immigration, for example, within the framework of readmission agreements and security agreements with Afghanistan. 
We should not write into ideological manipulations, but come into the substance of the indications mentioned in the European Pact on immigration and asylum, which is based on the values of integration and solidarity and solidarity. 
It proposes, which it proposes, includes a financial transaction tax, includes a financial transaction tax, which includes a financial transaction tax. 
It is a good solution for all the efforts made, both for Ireland and Europe, for all the efforts it has made. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
We can not adequately conclude acceptable agreements, we can not conclude acceptable agreements, in an appropriate mandate, acceptable mandate. 
I also hope that the new rules will not increase the costs for small and medium-sized producers of feed courages of courage. 
The European Parliament and the Council are aimed at providing a guarantee from the European Union ( EU ) of the European Investment Bank for losses under loans and guarantees for projects carried out outside the EU. 
This report for this report for this report, for this report, is a report on this report. 
I would like to remind you that in 2007, more than 10 % of the workers in the European Union were self-employed people in the self-employed. 
The best good of your country and you, personally, and you personally, and you personally, personally, and your side, and you personally, for your country and to be very good. 
A real energy efficiency policy must also mean an opportunity to sell electricity at a lower cost of the railways, metres and three shameholders, as was the case in France before European directives on the single energy market directives to ban this. 
We will not constantly require more and more budget resources, but we will be able to use the budget to create modern policies for the future for the future. 
( IT ) Mr President, I am grateful to the Commissioner for the answer to the soil 's office, but I would like to ask him a further question, I would like to ask him to put a further question. 
Council at first reading : see Minutes 
Similarly, the Treaty of Lisbon can not be used to this end, nor can it pursue such objectives under the pretext of managing the crisis. 
We are on a huge crime, and particularly on terrorism, as is well known, I am very well aware of the many honourable honourable random. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
It is a measure I have also announced for which I have also been calling for for for for for a rather years to be very many years. 
The International Women 's Day, too, we must say that these debates on Thursday afternoon deserve at least such a visit, as we now have in plenary. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, it is good that we are once again having this debate ; we have had this debate recently recently, we had such a debate recently. 
something we can be absolutely sure is that if we do not try, we will not achieve anything but do not achieve. 
For example, it proposed that, in the right to reduce the maximum working week of 60 hours or 65 hours, and prohibit the right to an exception to signing a contract or limit to a year the validity of the consent to workers for the right to exception. 
It is for some of our leaders of our Member States, for all those who will meet history for their absence of political courage, the missed opportunities, the lack of vision of vision. 
I was in Vondkoza when this small, Small Model, Europe 's model was destroyed and hundreds of thousands of people have remained undestroyed and thousands of people have left without their lives and thousands of thousands of lives have lost their lives. 
They are trying to present any opposition to immigration against immigration against crime immigration against crime against crime, they are trying to present. 
The Spanish Presidency and the Council position is that the mandate for negotiations with the European Council, which will take time and is technical in nature, will be adopted before the end of the first half of 2010. 

We must be sure that the current decision of the Constitutional Court will indeed strengthen the position of the President and weaken Parliament 's position. 
The Burma Government has changed its strategy on this issue, which often leads to very difficult situations, particularly on children themselves, who have a negative impact on the children themselves, who are no longer in the disadvantaged situation for other reasons. 
The countries that joined the European Union in 2007 have adopted only some of the provisions on the Schengen area and then apply them with this limited scope. 
I would like to mention the above statement in view of this, alongside corruption and of this problem, to devote additional attention to the action plan. 
These are those people who are asking questions that are asking questions that are asking for them. 
One aspect that the Committee on Regional Development wishes to highlight the need for transparency and awareness of the results achieved in the 2009-2011 period and by providing appropriate instruments for coordinating the actions financed through the EAFRD and the Structural Funds to build the broadband infrastructure for broadband Internet. 
These reasons, I support the motion for a resolution on the situation in Tunisia in Tunisia. 
The Commission aims to support the Member States in their efforts to deal with cancer by providing a framework for sharing and cooperative use of information, capacity and expertise in the area of prevention and control of corporations. 
concerns enshrined in the Treaty of Lisbon was how to bring Europe closer to its citizens to its citizens. 
Cautilles is undoubtedly undoubtedly also in the interests of the EU, but we must not leave responsibility for this plan of Turkey, otherwise new dependence and even pressure in the accession process. 
It is undermining it is undermined. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the funds provided to development cooperation must actually serve to serve the development objectives, so that we can help the poor countries to echo the blow the blow of the financial and economic crisis, for which they should not be accused of. 
It is that some European countries are lagging behind in the area of the teaching of foreign languages, I close to the students at a time when more and more jobs are in international terms. 
The Heads of State or Government who will be meeting this evening in the G20 preparations to include the question of the dairy crisis in the dairy sector, so that appropriate measures can be taken to respond to livestock farmers. 
We can achieve this through agreements between the euro area countries, we must not only consider it but also work to achieve a solution in the coming weeks and a few months and a few months to come. 
It is possible to maintain agreement in this Chamber, tomorrow 's vote should be postponed. 
We are following progress in this area in this area in the area, we are following progress in this area. 
I share Parliament 's concerns about the recent signals of the more compromise attitude to the government of Vietnam Government to human rights to Parliament. 
Cofinancing training crossing cooperative training are crossing. 
So far, it is precisely better informed or better motivated patients that have benefited from the benefits of cross-border healthcare, this opportunity is already open and for all others. 
I would like to say that I am very pleased that during the debate in this House, it has been confirmed once again that Parliament, the Commission and the Council are in the opinion that, when it comes to protecting our common values and values and, as I said in my speech, when it comes to a decisive position against any kind of terrorism. 
It is imperative that the Council and the European Parliament work in closer cooperation, and that is what its part requires willingness to act as partners and the European Parliament to work in closer cooperation, and that is what they are in their part requires for willingness to act as partners. 
It is also true that the Southern citizens, so that everyone who can acquire themselves with a Serbian passport will be able to travel visa visas. 
The Commission is defining a year of the budgetary authority of the budgetary authority, in the Commission, a year of the budgetary authority is definitively definitive than the budgetary authority. 
After all, these are the cases affecting the Western Balkan countries, which they must ultimately take responsibility themselves. 
' is to be interpreted wider, more widespread ' must be interpreted. 
These laws are adopted, it is not acceptable that some countries should be forced to fulfil them and others are actually granted themselves. 
However, we are concerned at some aspects, not least, of the leading principles of the European Research Area, because it must focus on cooperation between true research networks and cooperation, reviewing all trends to focus on scientific and human resources in the more developed countries and on the reduction of the current differences in national research systems. 
The piracy was the collection of the fishing tanks in Somalia waters, leading to the collection of a fishing club fishing cluster. 
It is a fundamental respect for the stability and growth pact and reliable data that we need to make a fundamental respect for the Stability and Growth Pact and we need reliable and correct data on which we can take a decision. 
Supporting that industry receives during the fall must be aimed at adapting to environmental challenges. 
This process for us, the Roma, and I believe the whole European Union is a lot more about something more than mutual trust. 
I will go back and say : should we think about environmental issues ' issues ? 
This day, the fight against women in the fight against the recognition and exercise of their rights, makes the worsening of the deterioration in terms of unemployment and the number of unstable jobs, as well as low wage and discrimination in terms of pay and maternity pay and maternity workers. 
No moment, the French Government has invited the families or staff to return to the leave, nor mobilising the army or other rescue services. 
It is being said that this decision will not affect the number of sentences that have been made made in the number of sentences which have been made up of this decision will not affect the number of sentences that have been made in place. 
I also have the rapporteur to be able to strengthen the control mechanism, responsibility for the indications of cosmetics should be given an independent organisation to ensure an independent judgment. 
I understand why many of you do not have interest in talking about Europe as a whole as a whole to speak about a whole Europe as a whole as a whole. 
It was the position we began, which we began, by which we began, the position that we began, was the position that we began. 
In this case, we have not managed to find a consistent European approach, at least as regards the control of security, stress tests, stress tests, stress tests. 
We also remember that there are also significant accessions in Mercosur in agricultural, such as the production of wine, for example,,,, tolerance and vegetables and geographical indications. 
As energy security is a crucial factor for the Member States of the European Union, Ukraine plays an important role, and therefore it should be encouraged to resolve its energy problems by improving its relations with Russia through bilateral agreements, through bilateral agreements. 
It means that, for the maintaining and management of our office in Brussels, the Maltese delegation in the European Parliament receives the same resources as Members of the parliament in Malta for the same work there. 
The need to look seriously at the issue of copyright, because copyright is very hope and an opportunity to develop a creative market and this aspect on the market should be regulated jointly. 
This discussion on this item is about the agenda concludes. 
Member of the Commission. - Madam President, I am well aware that I did not answer any individual question, but I remain fully available to Parliament to give the whole information requested by Members, particularly those who asked me this evening, and when receiving it. 
There is something that is something that is something that we have said to us : one Member has said to us that the ECB is not lifted with them, as they must, as must be done. 
President cut off the speaker ) the speaker of the speaker ) 
The next referendum, the Irish said 'yes ', it will be more, because they realise that Europe has been secured, especially at a time of crisis, particularly during the time of crisis. 
A comment on the saying mechanism for which the President of the Council 's position is speaking about. 
I would be pleased if we are working on concrete projects in this direction. 
The European Union can achieve its targets for 2020, and it will undoubtedly be essential to increase the target of targeted investment in low-carbon technologies. 
This is why it is the European Commission, which is the Community institution and should indeed the method of Monney and Schuman, that must take a leading role in this area. 
It is a guarantee of success, because the Innovation Union is, first and foremost, a strategy for the economic development of the European Union 's economic development, of the European Union 's economic development. 
Scientificant practices can be used to train best practices and it is desirable to make use of the existing networks available to each other in order to make relations between each other in the various rural areas. 
Recent enlargement of the east has inevitably become much more complex. 
As for the introduction of a system of own resources, I still have a huge volume of banking for the unilateral introduction of a tax on financial transactions without a thorough impact study without thorough impact studies. 
The violent and unjustifiable response to the Moroccan Government, which is bloody in a peaceful and democratic protest of demonstration. 
We are faced with the fourth funding for saving - the second funding for Greece - unless, of course, you are saying to us today that and that is not necessary. 
I am reminded of them in the future, I am reminding them for the future in the future, in the future, to remember them. 
At the same time, the Council has draw attention to that, on the one hand, Iceland has also been active and constructive in the negotiations on accession, the EPAs will be the main treaty of the European Union 's fundamental treaty and the other part of the other two years. 
It must be part of the Commission in terms of the administration and the budget, as well as the formal part of the Commission, as the only body of its role as the structure of the Commission, under the structure of the Commission. 
( HU ) The opportunity for the European citizens ' initiative can encourage the development of public debates on European issues leading to a true European public sphere of European public affairs. 
November, we in the European Parliament urged the Member States of the EU and the EU to take the last account of the situation of women at a time of war and in armed conflict. 
A majority of the population is suffering from the missile of medical care and the North River Republic of the Republic of China rejects all forms of cooperation with the United Nations authorities, which does not allow the people in North Korea to have any access to international humanitarian aid. 
A few points that are not a comprehensive list are the absolute minimum of ministerial to ensure that the Doha Round is really encouraging development. 
Madam President, Mrs Malmström, asylum policy is a very relevant issue, as has been clearly clearly made by the recent cases in Lampedusa and Greece in Greece. 
It is also the same thing that this report is balanced and I would like to stress it once again, because it is not the party party party programme. 
It gives guidance to men and women for a better future for us and for our children, because only as we work together can we ensure equality between women and men, not only before the law, but also in the daily lives, in economic and social life. 
For example, I know it is extremely difficult to find a General in a given airlines, for example, that it is extremely difficult to find a Basel in a particular. 
For science and research, it is one of the EU 's biggest funds and research to science and research is one of the EU 's largest funds. 
The possible explanations of the opening of such many new cases each year is precisely the high level of progress that has been made as a result of the emergence of new prevention programmes, most of which EU funding. 
A riskbudget policy risk using budgetary deficits, using budgetary deficits to stimulate the economy. 
We should support you to support you to support you, and support you to support you. 
It is not only about the improvements as a result of the adoption of the new stagnation of the new effort, but also of the EIB 's activities. 
In a month, the price of small price is risen by 4 % in France, with 8 % in Germany, with 8 % in Germany and even more than in the United Kingdom. 
accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting accounting 
The television of young woman 's television that it was raped from the troops of Gaddafi, had been raped from the public troops. 
On the one hand, we have heard from the Council that, if the European Arrest Warrant is implemented precisely and effective, it is not used to the many abuses of the many infringements, as has happened, its advantages are much more than the shortcomings. 
Atlantic five petrols are no longer used by derogations, by eliminating the applicable delegations in terms of coastal fishing carried out on the back, except to one case. 
Parliament wanted this in the 2011 budget to have some reservations for 2011. 
argument was used as an explanation of other religious murders in Turkey and other religious murders. 
It is very good, but I am very disappointed that no one of them is in solar gases of them is not surplus in the gae. 
The differences in contract law also exist for cross-border transactions such as tax matters, intellectual property or the existence of electronic payment methods. 
It is the interests of all citizens, Commissioner, that the situation after a nuclear accident is managed by the Commission, given that this is quite clearly beyond the interests of the individual national governments ' interests. 
Let us not be concerned about the value of the euro, the fall in the common currency : the fall in the common currency is good for the economy of the euro area. 
There is further research and preserving flow from new medicines and vaccines, capable of dealing with new complications and restrictive homes of the various parks. 
paragraph 1, this is also unambiguously and paragraph 1, where we call for a strong and sustainable CAP with a budget, combined with ambitious objectives, it will also be inevitable. 
More cooperation is useful when they expand the opportunities for participating in them without them being at risk of the others. 
The Commission, I am proud that during the response to the crisis, the Commission, represented by the Crist Georgieva, which is here with us, first sent a delegation to the high events in Japan following the terrible events there. 
You understand that we perhaps should not have comment on the current work in the Commission 's work. 
The situation requires the strengthening of the mechanisms through which the crisis can be effective and effectively overcome. 
A hypocritical approach must not receive a majority in Parliament. 
Madam President, we, the football West, are now going through what is the fate of sport : a defence spirit : the doorstep of victory and, yesterday, since yesterday evening, respect for the controversial defence. 
The very very one does not need her Council on this issue itself is in need of its own Council on this issue. 
With regard to buildings with approximately zero energy consumption of the Member States will provide clear objectives and develop action plans which will also include support measures. 
It would be profit down because fuel prices have increased, because fuel prices have risen. 
We should bear in mind that the Member States represented by the Council are an urgent player in the agreement are an urgent player. 
Also, we also need concrete coordinated programmes for cooperation with private companies, for innovation and for the development of research. 
Women in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan, women in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan, women in Afghanistan in Afghanistan in Afghanistan and in Afghanistan. 
It does not justify any mitigation of the application of the principle of precautionary measures or of zero tolerance for the existence of genetic modification of organisms, nor does it be mitigated. 
This is often defined by certain Member States, often triggering suspicions in the criticism of the discrimination of minorities living on their territory. 
( FR ) Madam President, Mrs Malmström, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, cooperation between Europe and the United States is essential in resolving the majority of crises in the world, and the new US administration of the US administration certainly represents an opportunity for this. 
The European Union must maintain a sensible and realistic policy towards Russia, that the European Union must maintain a sensible and realistic policy towards Russia. 
It is crucial that they come from the country themselves to come from the country themselves, they must come from the country themselves. 
Also, the Commission and Member States will strengthen their control of the minimum standards on health and safety at work. 
We therefore believe that it is important that these draft legislative or employment programmes do not address the same principle as the German Communist plans, where there was no truth at the start by the end. 
We are working in this direction in this direction to work towards this. 
We must respond to the expectations of the people of the South, in the South, of the people in the South, of the South, to respond to the expectations of the people of South South. 
Lastly, I welcome the contribution to the future Eighth Framework Programme, which must be more transparent, more flexible and accessible. 
It is a new task and a new responsibility for all Members of the European Parliament, and a new responsibility is a new task and a new responsibility for all Members of the European Parliament. 
It must be avoided at all costs and penalised in the most severe possible way possible. 
Also, the positions made by the report aimed at strengthening the EU 's role in multilateral security organisations, in G8 and 20, among other things. 
It simply offers an opportunity for very swift payment, immediately after the regulation of the relevant formalities, after the Ecofin meeting in November and after the signing of the 2010 budget for 2010. 
( IT ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, many of you have read the Kashgar Process ' Process, which is a trivial rotating rotating that is happening today in my country, a country with great democratic traditions, with a government elected by the sovereign people where, however, the democratic democratic legitimate in historic place by the media and courts. 
Also, the fact that the European Parliament has decided to prefer e-documents, particularly as regards declarations of the characteristics of the products pledged on the market is concerned, in particular, with regard to the declarations of products put on the market. 
It is therefore essential that Europe not forget to women who suffer from everyday violations of their fundamental rights as the right to life and physical prosperity - women condemned to death by residents ; women who are denied access to education ; women who are forced to live and living as refugees so that they can exercise freedom of expression of the Charter of Fundamental Rights, as well as fundamental rights, which are discriminated against only in their own terms of access to education ; women who are forced to live and as refugees, so that they can avoid and live as refugees, so that they can exercise freedom of the Charter of the Charter of Fundamental Rights of Fundamental Rights, as the Charter of Fundamental Rights, and which are all discriminated against. 
The decision of the European Parliament to approve the Interim Agreement between the European Union and the Pacific States of the Pacific States to approve the European Parliament 's decision to approve the Interim Agreement between the European Union and the Pacific States. 
The crisis and the debt crisis has, to some extent, had a useful impact by visiting a stronger sense of cooperation, particularly with regard to the common foreign and security policy. 
Mr President, although much remains, the controls and audit of EU funds are being improved and are becoming more comprehensive. 
I therefore agree with what the rapporteur said and I would like to ask for direct intervention by the Commission and the Council to achieve clarity, transparency, equal satisfaction, hence, and hence also on the safety of our territory and on this particular issue in terms of which, ladies and gentlemen, we must never stop being monitored. 
There is closed is closed conclusion. 
This all goes, because it shows the importance of the Commission when it comes to implementing the European project, a Commission that, according to the same Member, is a collective member of your Parliament. 
I condemn these acts of extremism, I condemn these acts of extremism. 
It will be in force not more than twenty months, with the Commission already surprising that it is intending to submit a proposal for a permanent agreement as soon as the new Treaty enters into force immediately, after the new Treaty enters into force. 
It has always been a question of a missile claim and suspicions of misleading and suspicions. 
I would like to see a 25 % reduction in the number of living people living in EU citizens, as well as ensuring that those who are excluded from the labour market can receive access to high quality work, while at the same time, we have the objective of eradicating the practice of undeclared work. 
Amendments that delete or reflection a very precise and specific point in the report - that the controversial political risks must not be subject to criminal prosecutions - are the amendments that I oppose and I am pleased to hear that many others do so in this strike. 
The situation would be to show the European Union 's totalitarian confirmation of the European Union 's title. 
It is not about Greece or for any other Member State or for any other Member State, or for any other Member State. 
We are beginning this discussion in the autumn of the debate in the autumn. 
I ask the Commission, in the opinion that it is, to the Commission, that is State aid to allocate 4 million to the fishermen of the French Government and therefore not this anti-competitive and illegally under the rules of the common fisheries policy ? 
but what growth is growth, but what growth is growth in growth ? 
It is necessary to avoid a targeted exchange of information and best practice, but it is also necessary to avoid double structures and avoid double structures. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the report on the ban of illegal logging, which was adopted by a large majority in the Committee on the Environment, Public Health and Food Safety is balanced. 
In Libya under the auspices of the United Nations and on the initiative of certain European Heads of State or Government demonstrate that when they want, Europe - or part of Europe - can act decisively in difficult times. 
I would be a former employee of the school of seven years later, later being a slaughter. 
The EU has not adopted a budget then and yet will still be set out in this House every month, our Presidency will have difficulty in fulfilling its duties. 
There is also something that exists in other areas such as beef and fishing : too much imports carried out too easily by third countries and undermining our own production. 
We therefore fully agree with the text that is adopted and which will establish a mid-term period of 30 days, in which the country must pay its duties to suppliers. 
Protection of our institutional powers, too, we have opposed the requests to introduce a procedure for the management of the committee for implementing measures so that the final consultation committee is put in place. 
I would like to discuss the content of the content. 
I would like to congratulate you on the Desertec Desertec project, in relation to the Desertec project. 
They receive them receive them receive them ? 
( PL ) Madam President, the new structure of public finances in the European Union was based on the aspirations to stabilise the reasonable financial rules and public expenditure, as well as on the full unemployment wishes to limit the tax sovereignty of the Member States. 
The problems are undoubtedly evident in the fact that, in 27 Commissioner, their areas of competence are often shocked, which results in unclear points. 
As counterfeiting organised crime, as I have already mentioned, I believe that we must fight with it with it with the help of this legislative instrument, with its commitment and joint efforts. 
Green Paper on the future of the future of the European TENpolicy ( short presentation ) policy ( short presentation ) policy on the future of the European transport network policy ( short presentation ) policy ( 
A certain excellent and expected proposals by the Commission aimed at simplifying the application procedure that gives Member States the Member States access to the relevant funds. 
On the other hand, in terms of the correct number of free trade agreements negotiated by the Commission, we will provide clearer and more complete answers to written deliberations through Commissioner Ashton 's officials. 
These are neglected to ignore them, and a unproductive approach which not only contradicts the principles that the external actions guided, but will also undermine the European social model. 
It is perhaps the weakest point in the law and we will certainly have to return to this in the future, but, on the other hand, it is a major step in significantly improving the rights of disabled people and the persons with reduced mobility. 
It is only the huge growth of demand outside the EU borders that will define this beyond the EU borders, and the huge growth in demand outside the EU borders will determine this. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - ( DE ) Mr President, Commissioner, thank you for your statement, for your statement. 
Japan must be concerned about all Member States, regardless of whether they have nuclear power plants or not, because if such disasters occur, radio radio will threaten all over Europe. 
The people have become victims of a blatant criminal act which has nothing to do with religion or a moral principle. 
Even then, even there is no sympathy with the Russian people who also suffered by the Communist dictatorship. 
Finally, I would like to thank international organisations such as the Qualification for peace ', International doctors for the prevention of nuclear war ( IUC ) and the International campaign for the ban on nuclear weapons ( ICANI ). 
The Member States must therefore immediately give the start of a programme for the fundamental renovation of the existing building Fund in order to achieve approximately zero energy consumption levels by 2050. 
I call an operational mechanism for distribution in price chain chain centrality chain, and we call for an optional mechanism for distribution in price chain centrality. 
However, I have not seen any sign of us that a solution is found nor that it is prepared - or at least at least at least in public - and I hope you will be able to clarify before us, whether in fact, there is plan in fact. 
UKIP encourages Belarus to repeal or declare a moratorium on the death penalty, the death penalty for the death penalty. 
The loss of human lives as a result of the spread of industrial waste that has occurred in Hungary, which has happened in Hungary. 
I agree with the Council that the situation is not yet sufficient enough to give up the support measures. 
On civil liberties, I firmly believe that we should look at what really happens to us now and that we need to increase our expenditure in the area of protection of refugees, as well as in the area of Roma integration. 
It is my hope that the Commission will take these remarks into account these remarks, and it is my hope that the Commission will take into account these remarks in these remarks. 
Their oil, as well as natural gas, and also for natural gas, as well as natural gas. 
Therefore, protection and the extension of forests based on natural processes and without trade objectives should be the most important priority of our policy, both for the fight against and for adapting developing and developing countries to climate change. 
The European Commission around 70 % of the EU Member States ' gross domestic product is created in the service sector, which is to say that the European Commission is created in the European Union 's GDP GDP. 
The legal guarantees have helped, because it has made clear that it is not necessary to attract to neutrality or abortion, or other problems, or other problems. 
There were also answers to high expectations of democratic rights, as regards democratic rights, in terms of democratic rights. 
The trade surplus of its own surplus, while artificial reducing the value of its national currency, lower the size of the wage, so that the amounts of the sums can not benefit from imports in China itself and, thirdly, the export prices are not able to benefit from European patent rights, but thirdly, by ignoring international patent rights so that the Chinese companies themselves can benefit from the fact that they themselves do not work. 
I know how quickly or how slowly this will happen, I do not know what the time is going to be done, but I know what the time the integration process should continue, but I certainly know that the integration process must continue. 
However, this, I would like to point out that the report not only takes place, but is a focus on the future, on development, on development, not only on the report on policy assessment of policy, but on the basis of the future. 
The guarantee of the quality and safety of the authorities, but also of providing protection for donors and recipients by setting competent authorities. 
half of the EU Member States are affected by the impulse of gas supplies from Russia 's gas supplies to Russia. 
What happened recently in Japan is essential to carry out the stress tests for European nuclear power stations for assessing health standards and risks, avoid potential accident and distributing the concerns of the public. 
We have realised that we are only at the beginning, not at the start, but not at the end of the process, but not at the end of the process. 
The obligation to release micro-entities from the obligation to prepare and publish annual financial accounts will not reduce the administrative burden. 
However, the need for specialised sectoral analyses remains updated and continues to be updated. 
To this end, we must ensure that border authorities have sufficient resources available to the border authorities with sufficient resources available to them. 
We doubt that constitutional change makes a major impression and that they make a major contribution to the democratisation of life in Turkey. 
They are often more often more difficult and more difficult, more difficult and more advanced process, and the result is mutual disappointment. 
As I think very important - evidence of this is the very large number of people who asked for the floor - we will give the floor to 10 people, twice more than the provided in the Rules of Procedure. 
I also say, in terms of the rapid measures - the measures to stop deforestation of tropical forests and measures for taking money from international air and sea transport, which harm climate transport, in particular, to use important measures in the poorest EU countries, in particular - that they must immediately produce results. 
I am very pleased that the President of Lithuania, Mrs Gael, please, form a commissioner and the government of Lithuania, have already said that the legitimate exile contradiction to Lithuania 's obligations under his constitution under his constitution. 
It is a goal of avoiding a situation in which development is extremely attacked in the major urban centres, thereby avoiding discrimination on the basis of gender equality and geographical origin of residents of rural areas. 
A year of volunteering ( 2011 ) will enable the activities organised in this area to adopt a European dimension, and we therefore hope that this will have a huge influence on civil society. 
On 25 immigrants arrived at this country by the Mediterranean, by unbelievable sentence the wrong message : Germany has shown that they are not ; the Canary Islands and Spain showed that 30 000 arrived at the African corner of African corners have not been intolerable for the European Union. 
We can find a way to develop a suitable and effective instrument for supplementing GDP, which can actually be applied, using clearly defined indicators and rely on high quality data. 
They are also a key element in the fight to prevent and tackle terrorism, which is subject to the debate today afternoon afternoon afternoon. 
This is why it is a reason that we do not support the proposal to introduce an international financial transaction tax for the introduction of an international financial transaction tax. 
Ladies and gentlemen, we come to the catchprocedure with the coast procedure. 
The charter for the freedom of the press will become a single paper only if European Heads of State or Government want to keep in this way. 
There are some people who want to turn the Tibetan Tibetan in gay and his share in the Slovak capital, even though he was responsible for the mass murders after the war. 
It is that young people are the main victims of the crisis and that we must take advantage of our opportunity to put them at the heart of the Europe 2020 strategy. 
change, political changes and changes in the vision, in our external delicate as a result of the new players and globalisation. 
These should stress the need for new and diversified lifelong learning, which is crucial for better quality of work and, particularly in the context of jobs, and the need to pay particular to young people, women and disabled people, as set out in the Europe 2020 strategy. 
There can be no interests in the reason that the persecuted and suffering countries can not be forgotten. 
We have committed to strengthening the influence and presence of Europe in the world, firmly convinced that this project has greater strength and greater viability than when it began, with such enthusiasm and this major scope for Europeans. 
The Western Balkans will not yet be part of the EU, stability in SouthEurope can only be achieved by extending the EU to the Balkans Balkans, by extension of the Balkans. 
It is also about hinting our public and credibility, and to limit our opportunities to effective cooperation. 
The Agency can do a great job in coordinating national policies, give greater value to all the policies that have been brought up in action. 
However, no longer is still included in the budget, which Mr Lewandowski has to present soon. 
It is not, as Mr Klaus said, to make the European Union more power against the Member States, but for something quite different, very different. 
Today 's vote we want the European Union to cooperate with the Haitian institutions in order to develop rules and regulations to help the country better use the financial assistance it has received in the last year and, above all, to do so in accordance with the principles of democracy and legality. 
On the return of the building, the prize will take place on Wednesday, 16 December, on 16 December, in Strasbourg, in Strasbourg. 
Rather, the need for better environmental standards with realistic and positive objectives which are not at stake in the face of the production sector, nor create a risk to the jobs of the Union. 
There can be no competition with social and environmental dumping strategies that are applied by some new economies, as China is, where labour costs are extremely low and where there is no means for social protection and the associated costs, or high environmental protection standards. 
There are also problems in other Member States, but in Italy, they are the most serious, in Italy, and they are the most serious problems. 
road maps are road maps which lay down the criteria set out, the implementation of which include the adoption of structural reforms in key areas of justice, freedom and security areas. 
You have shown Mr Majesterre, our unity, the unity of Germany - began even before, because we have changed our attitude, our approach to the common European history and our common European future. 
This addition to the addition of a general review clause allows a thorough review in the light of technical development and the understanding of the label of consumers later than 2014. 
The Commission is doubtful that we will have the time to establish a specific service at this late stage and before the elections. 
From this point of view, the European Union 's priority should be to promote and support the efforts that are currently being made to start international dialogue with President Sanckov, in Yemen, and with President Saleh. 
I am pleased that we are aware of the identity of Tajikistan and the special role played by the country in the region. 
From a global perspective, and I would like to ask you here to look at the waste electrical vehicles for China, we really need to draw up a bit more foresefront, as shown in the Commission communication. 
The text does not contain the most important point of view of the most important point of view of the most important point of view of the most important point of view of the text. 
Barroso, will you speak with the other commissioners and introduce a deserting of a visionary start until the equipment used is made used to be 100 % precisely ? 
It is an opportunity to enable new impetus to trade relations to and guarantees access to the European market - freed from duties and without quotas for most goods, for most goods. 
It is to see that there is a place for a great place forward in electric vehicles and in transport as a whole, particularly in cities, in cities. 
It has not yet done so yet. 
The role of the EU institutions to ensure that the principles of linguistic equality is respected both in the relationship between Member States and in the individual European institutions and in the relations of EU citizens with the national institutions and the bodies of the Community and with international institutions. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Mr President, there is no assessment of the social, environmental and economic consequences of the economic agreement between the European Union and Canada, there is no assessment of the social, environmental and economic consequences of the economic agreement between the European Union and Canada. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I would like to thank the Commissioner for having said that he was victims of his evening to join us in this forward-looking Chamber, and that he has made his message. 
Given these arguments, Commissioner, Mr President, do you not believe that your deny is extremely harmful to Italy 's regions, Europe and the Mediterranean regions, and also to other countries, and also to other countries, Mr, ? 
We are experiencing a major change in the situation of the situation, we are experiencing. 
It concerns all European citizens ' citizens ' citizens ' citizens, and it concerns all European citizens. 
What characterised the current debate between Mr Trichet, President Barroso and Chancellor Merkel, like the wave of the market, shows us that this was not a group of indicators of the points that have highlighted. 
They are the European Union 's accounts to 2004 and 60 % of the supposed cases of fraud are Italy from its own. 
future, this may lead to discards from the current system of separating structural funds from the Cohesion Fund could lead to discards from the current system. 
I must continue along the path to Europe, as the rest of the region is moving forward. 
The Court of Auditors does not cooperate in these areas or even fail to assess their own policy 's own policy, or not even manage to assess. 
As this nation has come into force in 2013, I will help to achieve the objective of harmonising and strengthening passenger rights at EU level, without any importance what transport means choose. 
It is enough enough enough enough, is enough enough enough. It is enough enough enough enough to have enough to do so. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, you now have a trilateral approach in the work of the European Investment Bank in the work of the European Investment Bank in the coming years. 
( EL ) Mr President, the economic governance package sets out a strong instrument for imposing capitalist restructuring in the same way as a single strategy for all Member States, which will strengthen competitiveness, profitability and power of capital. 
It is to remember that, despite the many concerns we have had, and despite the many challenges that we face, and despite the many challenges that Russia faces, there were also a number of positive changes. 
The argument of the producers of new, that the traditional roswine is a little old old old and, in these words, the type of roswine is a modern way of producing new wine production. 
However, I would like to comment on some of the amendments tabled to the amendments that have been tabled, I would like to comment on some of the amendments tabled, however, and I would like to comment on some of the amendments that have been tabled. 
We must do so to change this in order to change this ? 
I was able to vote in favour of this report because it sacrifices some of the difficult new powers of the European Union in the field of international trade in the name of the relevance of the agreement with the Council on executive powers in other areas. 
Member States where the mobile applications are given, dependents on each separate request in the light of the events related to it relating to it, where the decision is made to each individual request. 
We are self-applauding ourselves on the backs, because the trade of bonds in Portugal was well last week, while the truth is that the European Central Bank actually used taxpayers ' money to buy their own debt. 
We are aware that in Europe, approximately 50 000 aircraft aircraft funds are used to achieve the aims of aviation by general aim and business aviation, and close four times more small aircraft and paid are not used for sport and dispute treatment. 
It is important that geographical location is located as the key location between Europe and Asia is located and therefore played an important role in strengthening stability in the region. 
It is too sensitive to animal welfare issues of animal welfare. 
We will establish that we have already reached a number of important and rational measures in this sector, in this sector, and we will already have reached a number of important and rational measures in this sector. 
I plan on November to launch a Green Paper and a public consultation to collect opinions on how to improve our policies and instruments for better action with regard to the aid factors for sustainable and inclusive growth in partners, with which to address the main causes of poverty and add substantial added value to our development cooperation. 
Women are currently the most serious evidence of discrimination against women and human rights violations of women, and the violation of human rights is currently the most serious concern of women and the violation of human rights. 
They are imposed by the so-called ' of the six countries which set the Community budget for around 1 % of GDP. 
I would stress my support for the activities of the European Union because the European Union clearly recognises the independence of both regions at international level and on the part of the region at international level. 
Perhaps it would perhaps be a lesson to come from these EUR 2 billion, which the Research Fund, the Development Fund in Africa, will be suits lesson to be provided by these EUR 2 billion. 
During the debate I heard the words ', I heard the words of freedom, freedoms and justice '. 
It is not only better than the Baltic gas pipeline to Germany, which circumvents Poland, but will also increase our energy security, our energy security. 
I think that this is an extremely good resolution, I also think it is also a great thing that it is very good that, in general, there is a high level of agreement in the Commission, and also in the Council and in the European Parliament and in the European Parliament. 
The important element of fundamental rights - the freedom of expression must be protected in all countries of the world. 
Baroness Ashton, in 1999, in order to avoid distinguished in the opposition Benghazi, Gaddafi needed to land victims, who would have been responsible for the responsibility for the children contaminated by the IDC, due to poor Libyan health. 
In the world of hunger, 36 000 people are dying, because they do not have enough food to feed in the world, because they do not have enough food to feed. 
I also consider it an unquestionable matter of the temporary issue of the temporary transfers ' temporary issue. 
Certainly in our country, we must discuss whether we should be in the European Parliament, whether we should be in our country. 
Europe is held as hostages as hostages and hostages as Europe. 
As a result, the denial of climate change, the inequality of these issues is represented by a self-regrettable minority here in this House whose opinions should really be neglected and which have been contaminated here for a number of reasons, but which actually plural against the opinion of the citizens of all the European Union. 
I am encouraging that I encourage all my fellow Members to vote in favour of his support. 
There can be an end to this anomaly, as evidenced by the proposed strategy of the Council and the Commission in terms of Belarus, as showed by the proposed strategy of the Council and the Commission in terms of Belarus. 
It is that the majority of the substance of the report deserves our support, even though the document also contains some positions that we are completely in agreement with. 
We are now avoiding new economic demarketing lines between new and old old lines, now we are avoiding new economic degrading lines between new and old old. 
We have before us is a long one, it marks a lot of things, but it marks a lot of things. 
It must also be assured that its opinion is taken into account in terms of migration and integration, and it must be taken into account in terms of migration and integration, is taken into account. 
We must, first of all, curb the people with the right combined of skills, which will enable them to adapt to our rapidly changing society. 
The European Commission is particularly intended to eliminate barriers to the correct functioning of the internal market and to provide for the development in the field of e-commerce. 
These measures may stabilise the internal situation and prevent a humanitarian disaster that inevitably threatens this Eastern African African country with a population of ten million people, with a population of ten million people. 
A gender equality market is a prerequisite for promoting employment and tackling demographic problems. 
However, it is a distinction that it is not to conclude that the crisis is imposing measures in contrast to good policy. 
% of my region in my region have less than employees, in my region, less than employees, in my region, less than employees. 
The ideal case is that no one in the patient should leave their home country to obtain medical treatment, but in cases where this is needed, they must be able to do so, and they know that they have the right to treat this from the point of view of treatment and recovering disparities. 
It is also the fact that the concept of ' has been maintained, thus opening a ' to certain activities, where it is not necessary to achieve compliance with the procedures provided for in the legislation. 
I sincerely support his appeal and I am working with him to collect his appeal and to him to collect his appeal to the most signatures of the Netherlands as much signatures as possible in the Netherlands. 
I understand the logic to try to implement the EU 's decision to implement a European Union solution to a global problem. 
Indeed, as I said, we welcome the efforts to close Guantánamo, but we oppose the military committees and other continuing abuse. 
It is to initiate and promote a reconciliation process in which the United Nations and all local factors and all local factors, including neighbouring countries such as Iran, as Iran. 
It seems to me that politicians should dictate how many hours can be worked. 
It is that we are the only real European financial institution ; all our shareholders are Member States, and they are mainly the European Union 's Member States. 
It will also be strengthened by the need to monitor the service providers in order to ensure that all the technical requirements proposed by technical requirements are duly taken into account and respected in their exploitation. 
It must also be put in place, as the report rightly stresses, the reduction of bureaucracy relating to funding procedures, along with the introduction of strict sanctions in the event of irregularities or incompliance with existing legal regulations. 
policies must be supported with an appropriate budget, but also with reliable checks on the implementation of the programmes implemented with appropriate action and with the definition of good practice. 
( PT ) Mr President, there are some extremely important solutions to be taken within the framework of the extraordinary limits of the Union budget, which the heads of the EU 's heads seem not willing to change, thereby blocking all the perspectives for real convergence and cohesion. 
It has always taken the opinion of greater transparency and aimed at the purpose of taxes and charges and charges, and it considered that Member States must take the costs of implementing more stringent measures. 
A few points to which attention should be paid : firstly, the development of the cost calculation mechanism ; secondly, a list of diseases which will be covered by the system ; thirdly, the recognition of recipients, taking into account that the same medicines are not available in all Member States ; and fourthly, the promotion of e-health, e-mail. 
This is more unacceptable, the recent disclosure for Members who agreed to amend or draw up legislation in exchange for money, additional undermining the authority of Parliament, particularly in their efforts to combat fraud and corruption. 
The proper application of national authorities is properly implemented by the national authorities, this international agreement will be an important tool to provide an important means to ensure that life in the sea in the long term and to sustainable exploitation of fish stocks. 
The forecasts in the near future, 16 % or 80 million EU inhabitants will live below the poverty line, under the poverty threshold. 
Are you going to collect information regarding them more directly and more quickly, given that the problem seems to be deteriorating today, particularly in many Member States, in many Member States, in many Member States, in many times, in many Member States, in many Member States, in particular ? 
In Europe, one of every four women is victims of violence - domestic violence - of rape, sexual exploitation or genital mutilation. 
In addition, I also mentioned the important role of the European Parliament in the process of approving both cohesion policy and budgetary resources, and also of increasing it if the Treaty of Lisbon enters into force. 
This sense, I am very sorry that we have very simple information about cases of employment cases of corrupt accidents. 
I would like to say that transparency guarantees good governance and trust in the institutions, I would like to say, I would like to say, that transparency guarantees good governance and trust. 
There must also be measures to put forward that can help European producers in the pig industry, which, while aiming at adapting to new European legislation, have begun a process of relocating their sites, but it is too little likely to conclude it before the start of 2012. 
Therefore, youth training policies must be ambitious to enable young people to acquire skills that are better adapted to the needs of businesses. 
In the hope that, when it comes to the revision of the POSEI regulation, we will have the opportunity to make progress on some of the points raised today and that in general, in all the decisions on the common agricultural policy we can also work effectively and on the current regulation. 
Indeed, when we propose trade preferences to developing countries, we do not take this purely action in pragmatic, commercial considerations, but to show our solidarity with these countries with these countries. 
services have an extremely adverse impact and the results of their activities can be disastrous for the countries or organisations that they have assessed during the recent financial crisis. 
It is sometimes legitimate and sometimes not, without any real benefit to Europeans, and illegal waves of people and goods that are of course. 
Does it not be the case that the recovery of growth and employment depends on a true common action with the necessary resources, or prefer to act on innovation, education, training, support for SMEs and the fight against unemployment and poverty with the very unemployment and poverty of the very unemployment and the very unemployment consequences of this ? 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, as you have just said, the summit between the European Union and Russia will take place in Stockholm on 18 November. 
It is difficult to defend and protect Christians around the world, because it is not fully respected by the Christian philosophy itself. 
I personally am personally on the table of less fundamental ambitions in such fundamentalism, I am along with less fundamentalism, and I am going to go on as much ambition in a fair of such fundamentalism. 
We also asked Brazil and also asked Brazil to ask for Brazil and we also asked Brazil to ask for a Brazil and we also asked Brazil. 
There is things that, as accession to the European Union, they are obvious from themselves to the European Union, they are obvious from themselves. 
There should be commendable for this to be commendable. 
This, of course, we need meaningful sanctions in cases of actual infringements in the case of actual infringements of actual infringements. 
It is a good result, but I believe that we need to achieve much more in the future in the future. 
Those with which I am talking, want greater accessibility for themselves and for patients, as well as other specialists, to objective information on medicinal products. 
I would like to draw your attention to the fact that in this debate, questions are not provided for by the Chamber. 
The G20 summit will take place on 11 and 12 November in Seoul in Seoul, under the Presidency of France under the Presidency of France. 
However, it can only be carried out in connection with the protection of human rights in the world if it itself is a case of serving an example in this area. 
I am convinced that achieving all these important objectives will only be possible if, from the outset, we are working together to build a new climate of institutional cooperation - one of the main challenges in the Treaty of Lisbon, which we always speak too closely. 
Debates on cases of breaches of human rights, democracy and the rule of law ( announcement of motions for resolutions tabled ) : see Minutes 
With European instruments to help us to achieve this goal, namely the European Social Fund, and I believe that we must count on this. 
We are that this directive will change the situation and contribute to a true European defence market and contribute to a true European defence market, we are aware that this directive will make a real European defence market. 
It is also one of Iran 's advertising ; at a time when they were public condemned by catches, we allowed to be broadcasting for this geopolitical party. 
We should focus on programmes such as the lifelong learning and the Youth in Action ' programme. 
However, we should be carefully discussing how and, in what conditions we want to improve cooperation between business and universities, however, how we want to improve cooperation between businesses and universities, and what conditions we should also be very carefully discussing. 
It should be noted that, after one year in which we seen diplomacy and determination, we have achieved a positive result in a year in which we have seen diplomacy and determination. 
In addition to ensuring high quality, safe and effective cross-border healthcare, it is important to ensure the right to patients in the European Union to seek treatment abroad and the opportunities of national health systems and national health priorities in health care health care. 
It is that, according to the Treaty of Lisbon, there will be a permanent President under the Treaty of Lisbon, there will be a permanent President under the Treaty of Lisbon. 
It is the legitimate President of Cd'Ivoire, is the legitimate President of Cd'Ivoire, is the legitimate President of Cd'Ivoire. 
( DE ) Mrs Malmström, thank you for your excellent response, Commissioner Malmström, for your excellent response, for your excellent response, for your excellent response. 
We must punish him if Libya continues to give so many refugees freely free access to Europe, if Libya continues to give them so many refugees free access to Europe. 
A certain degree of this could be counterproductive to invest in the old and new infrastructure and a new infrastructure. 
One final question is one final point. 
large energy savings opportunities for savings from energy expenditure savings, energy costs for large energy savings from energy expenditure savings, and energy savings opportunities. 
I would like to thank the Prime Minister of Spain, Mr Zapatero, for his commitment to Europe and the Community method. 
I am also very desirable to review our cooperation with Belarus, as well as the promise of funding set out for it to be judged in September 2008, in order to continue to take on in September 2008 a new commitment to this country. 
It has indicated an example of the Republic of Cyprus, which is now under monitoring the Republic of Cyprus, which is under monitoring now under monitoring. 
The Socialists, the left in Parliament, have no arguments to put us back into the coast, I can very suddenly lead to this debate in question. 
As a result of this pact, a number of Member States have joined the euro area, for example, Latvia, Latvia, Lithuania, Poland, Denmark, Romania and Bulgaria, have joined the euro area, for example. 
A combined with stricter, really gives a result, and it is really a result. 
The involvement of local partners in cases where the Investment Bank cofinancing projects, we want to be more ambiguous and less ethical reporting and we want a common audit of all the European Investment Bank funds. 
It is that, in these times of economic crisis, a functioning internal market crisis could help economic recovery. 
A common register is also beneficial to lobbyists, as they will have to register alone once and for all once and for all. 
We are signalling our concern to our concern of partner, ally and friendship and friend, and we are signing our concern to partner, ally and friendship. 
in writing. - ( BG ) Ladies and gentlemen, the Commission 's reports do not establish any breach of competition within the internal market within the framework of the monopoly. 
It is that the response to the spread of Hinfluenza has been increased compared with the real scale of the problem, compared to the real scale of the problem. 
It proposes amending the proposal from it for 2011 to be amended to the need to mobilise the European Union Solidarity Fund to EUR 1824 million in appropriations for commitments and payments, with the aim of mitigating the effects of the floods caused by the airline in Poland, the Czech Republic, Hungary, Romania, Romania and Romania. 
Today could say 'no ' to this ' to this today ? ' today could it say 'no ' to this ? 
We also specify specific resources to increase the number of participants involved in the programme that are currently only at the moment, which are only just just as ten. 
The following questions to the Commission are the following questions that the Commission has tabled to the Commission the following questions, the following questions have been tabled. 
I was delighted that I was in the successful negotiations that led to the agreement that led to the agreement. 
In other words, it is important to control the implementation and changes in the emergence of the reference to the reference points, so that this is made point when some of the parties want to use the aforementioned opportunity. 
Europe will have hundreds of thousands of victims, but because this truth is shameful to the political elites, and therefore it is because it is the writer of a world that has been invaluable to be unconditionally true for global settlement, this scandal will be a scandal as many people and the elderly. 
There has been much more prepared than ever more so than ever, much more prepared. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, in December 2005, there was a Prime Minister in December 2005 who attended a sitting in this House. 
After all, the chaos do not have only short-term but also long-term needs, but also long-term needs, but also the long-term needs. 
For example, the Globalisation Adjustment Fund ( EGF ) for example, the Globalisation Adjustment Fund ( EGF ) for example, of the Globalisation Adjustment Fund ( FBG ) for example, for example, for the Globalisation Adjustment Fund ( FBG ) for example. 
It would be that no one is interested in this, no one is interested in this. 
This week 's wave of the covered spread of Yemen and Yemen covered in this respect of this resistance and Yemen. 
The fact that the clusters are not exclusively designed for SMEs, they have an important place in many clusters who have been set up throughout the EU. 
However, it is not new and is well known, however, but it is well known, but it is well known, but it is a good thing, however. 
It is important and I say the following to the President of the Commission and to all the Commissioners : we need to ensure a competitive European economy to have a competitive European economy in order to have a social Europe. 
My region, Ahma, the main activity, as well as one of the biggest sources of income, is the cultivation of in small incidents and the production of green. 
The most important difficulty - there is no doubt that other Members have also raised this - are the conflicts : the Palestinian conflict in the face of the Israeli Government, which systematically ignores international law and the agreements signed by the Annanox Agreement on the Norpolist Street ; the conflict in Western Sahara and the true military occupation of the North Cyprus Republic of Cyprus. 
It is the list of agreements with agreements with agreements with agreements is the list of agreements with agreements. 
However, this is regrettable, however, a right which is poor in some countries, is not respected in some countries. 
I say 'yes ' only six times only six times ago, a say is only a first six times ago. 
around EUR 40 million, we help around 7 000 workers in the labour market market market market, we are helping around 7 000 workers. 
Remuneration must, to the maximum extent, reflect the long-term results of companies ' companies ' long-term results in the long term, to the maximum extent, to the long-term results of companies. 
So I think that in this situation, when people are held in this area, we should oppose all acts of violence that hinder civilians to leave the conflict region. 
The work we face with the United States is that they will not even have adopted the necessary national legislation to take action on December to attach December. 
The proposal submitted should be allowed to grant Member States to grant certain businesses ( micro-entities ) from the obligation to prepare and publish annual accounts for annual accounts. 
The full respect of the commitments made can and - that is what it is right - it must guide Turkey along the path of its accession. 
This means that the problem of exceptions is not resolved and their use under the current directive will continue without defining the date of repealing them, with many weak restrictions and without any special control. 
Now, they are not currently speculative against the euro, but with the differences in the euro in the euro area, but with the differences in the euro area. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the action plan we will adopt, which we will adopt, aims to build, strengthened, extended and spread European judicial culture, European legal thinking. 
Moreover, Member States are obliged to ensure that no operations are taken to return to Article 3 of the European Convention on Human Rights, which obliges Member States to ensure that no person is returned back to their country if it is at risk of persecution or serious attacks after their return. 
Egypt and other countries of North Africa and the Middle East have increased flow of legal and illegal migrants to Europe and other countries in North Africa and the Middle East increased flow of legal and illegal migrants. 
The deficit has contributed to the global imbalances that are at the heart of the global economic crisis, which are at the heart of the global economic crisis. 
I believe that the EU must fully respect national history, culture and traditions and determination to denounce the Member States defending their right to self-devise and character, including Christian heritage and Christian symbols. 
This, in my opinion, if the debt economies are to remain in the euro area, they must be subject to strict budgetary control, in my opinion. 
The proposal under discussion is three languages ( English, French and German ), and all other languages remain second remain at second plan. 
I could quote many examples from the Member States of the European Union, including my country of Lithuania, where, for example, the share of a business of a business of a business of a business. 
Orbán was a politician to me, who was a politician who was deserved respect for me. 
in writing. - undemocratic and restrictive policies, Commissioner, I would like to express my voice to express my voice. 
Unfortunately, I did not receive an answer from you, I hope that this will be done now. 
Thursday, we will vote on a resolution on this issue on this matter on Thursday, on this matter, on a resolution on this matter, we will vote on a resolution on this matter. 
The CO2 tax, banking coalition and other similar - certainly taxpayers will be more tightened. 
The EIB 's external policies must continue to be carried out in accordance with the principles of reasonable banking practices, in accordance with the principles of reasonable banking practices. 
I think his importance will be showed for many years and years to come to him. 
I think that the European Union is a modern version of Laeken 's Lead, which is simply a institution that is a guide of solidarity and subsidiarity, protects human rights and is committed to protecting the social market economy, and the market itself is a means of creating social policy ; so there is nothing to limit the injure which we are simply defending half a half of European citizens who live in our Union. 
I would like to come back to it, I would like to come back to it, and I would like to come back to it. 
It is necessary to provide a condition for enhancing growth that creates jobs that create jobs, which create jobs, which create jobs, is necessary. 
Certainly, they must wait until June to take this decision to take this decision to take this decision to take this decision to take this decision ? 
in writing. - I strongly support its adoption of its adoption of its adoption of its adoption. 
As well as the intelligence flights of the CIA, the secret prisons and the catastrophic consequences of the military operations that have been carried out so far, we must not forget during the debate on the Middle East. 
There is, of course, the families of the victims deserve our sympathy and solidarity, but we must also be aware that the Thai nation is today very divided. 
The vote will take place on Wednesday 9 March 2011, 9 March 2011, on 11 March 2011, on 11,,,, 30,,,,,, 30, low. 
I suggest that the question of the identification marketing marks be presented in Doha as a useful contribution to the debate. 
I am pleased to say that I am involved in the Voluntary Acting scheme, and I intend to vote against my own interests and to the benefit of taxpayers ' interests. 
Its communication of 23 February 2009, which was the Community ' statement of 23 February 2009, the Commission, adopted the task of coordinating the available and existing sources of information on preventive measures and disasters. 
We must be sure that they know how much they will cost them, what quality and safety standards can and what their rights are, in the event that there is a problem arising. 
The Commission, between 1989 and 2007, 18 and the EU registered 18 deaths in the European Union, has been registered by the use of dichloromethane. 
The measures you have taken to try to stabilise the severe situation of dairy farmers. 
It is only a free day when the rules are clear, they are important to all and actually apply. 
The result of the Cancún conference is now important for the European Union, both in terms of visibility and in terms of results, and in terms of results. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
It is very short of course that very short time to be very short and very short. 
Does the Commission see this view, the Commission see this vision ? 
This was necessary for Directive 2006/to update the VAT situation at the moment to reach the risk of the VAT schemes for illegally recovery ( from you, based on fixed exports ) to the absolute minimum minimum. 
For 50 years, Europe has been enjoyed by the prosperity and we have a duty today to continue to protect this prosperity in the name of our citizens. 
The Member States no longer meet the conditions required by the Organisation for Economic Cooperation and Development after 1970 and we are faced with new extraordinary cases, without having new funds available to us. 
This can be expected that cooperation with Russia will play a very important role in a very important role, a unambiguous positive role, in the current serious economic crisis, in the current severe economic crisis. 
MEPs are wrong as they say that the Europe of health is now a reality '. 
EC and the Republic of Panel on certain aspects of air services ( vote ) 
It is being seen that the informal Employment Ministers meeting at the end of this month will end with concrete results in this area in this particular. 
Only airlines will airlines receive compensation for airlines to receive compensation ? 
Even though we will never achieve zero resources in a number of accidents, we can make a great deal to reduce the number of victims ' number of resources and, although we can never achieve zero accidents. 
These changes will be made to the Internet and may cause undesirable consequences for the European Union economy ' economy '. 
This is what we need to all together with Russia and Belarus, which are actually European history, a European history, religious, military and geopolitical plan. 
There is one simple reason for this, there is one simple reason for this. 
It is subsidiarity, subsidiarity and linguistic, subsidiarity and linguistic languages, which are subsidiarity and subsidiarity and the language. 
Then it is still a disgrace to the release of Gilad Shalit and to all those whose fault has not been proven without any doubt from the courts ? 
It is the definition of the United Nations of 19 nations of 19 nations is the definition of the United Nations. 
financing projects constitute a decision to allocate funding and are at the heart of the infrastructure that Europe needs to modernise and to fully use the potential of the internal market. 
Would this be the Commission to point out what role will Parliament and the stakeholders of the third parties, such as trade structures, in connection with a possible proposal or a solution to end the agreement ? 
It will also threaten the salaries and conditions for Canary workers and conditions for Canary workers. 
We must aim to ensure that, in this regard, a research programme will be created to help these resources in a way that they can be used in the best possible way as possible and is as sustainable as possible. 
I assure the family of Mrs Saberi in our solidarity and strong commitment to the European Parliament to ensure unconditional respect for human rights and democracy in Iran and the world. 
A pillar of actions as contrary to the restrictions in which European agriculture operates towards other agricultural regions around the world, and the second pillar includes the creation of a set of measures that enable Member States to ensure that agriculture receives additional benefits that allow it to carry out their functions. 
The concern of the rapporteur for the economic and financial crisis that we are experiencing and for the resulting lack of investment in the economic and financial crisis that we are experiencing and the resulting lack of investment is resulting in this lack of investment. 
It is, of course, not the owners of private aircraft aircraft, but the people who are usually less likely and who saved months to buy a flights for abroad. 
It is also that a debate on the new sources of the Union budget is urgently needed to be held on the agenda for the new sources of the Union budget. 
There is another other thing to us when we are leading to us because it is sometimes not very doubtful to be before themselves and to come to ourselves. 
It is that the planning that has been carried out there or, more precise lack of planning, simply must not be repeated. 
This report therefore calls for new rules and corporate social responsibility, which will be key elements of any future agreement. 
appropriations : see Minutes 
We are very pleased and sincerely all, and we are very sincere to be very sincere and sincerely party. 
I will continue with the second question, I will continue with the second question, and I will continue with the second question. 
There is also reference to procedural rights and the right to legal protection and to legal protection and to legal protection and to the right to legal protection. 
The Union is waiting to make progress, particularly in terms of human rights, equality between social sexuals, the protection of freedom of expression, the freedom of the press and the freedom of religion. 
Cartificial trends are disturbing two alarming trends : with the help of Islamic Muslim organisations, the Muslim world is gradually becoming increasingly supportive of immigrants ; Islamists, Islamists and the extreme Communist Left are complicity in the treaty of the foundations of our civilisation. 
Europe of Brussels wishes to hear the citizens, let me take into account the French and Dutch 'no ' of the European Constitution and to abandon the Treaty of Lisbon, which is clearly a cornerstone of Constitution. 
We are allocating significant funds to Kosovo on the Instrument for PI ( IPA ) as part of the total amount of EUR 12 billion agreed to the top of the donors ' conference in July 2008. 
The fact that the enhanced cooperation procedure is used cynically used. 
Unfortunately, the world of the computer is precisely the territory that parents do not manage to pull their children on their way. 
I am convinced that this agreement represents an important step forward and that the framework agreement on data protection between the European Union and the United States, which requires additional negotiations and may be important, will also be adopted. 
In fact, we have allowed a group of private banks to be created, and parental banks say that they can store the lecture of their children at the moment of birth and possibly use them to be used for treatment in the future if necessary. 
The Commission has, in principle, been consistent to see progress in the implementation of these fixed photovoltails for these reasons for these ratification purposes. 
I also expect the European Union 's society to realise its responsibilities in relation to all those who care about its resources and their resources. 
Marine Madrid adopted in February of the Spanish Presidency, the roadmap set out for implementing this policy was adopted in February by the Spanish Presidency. 
It accepts what they know, but everything across their horizontal horizontal, is causing concern, but all over them is worries. 
Europe still has many inequalities in the detriment of girls and women in employment, their personal lives, health and their right to access education and vocational training, as well as to loan loans in untraditional sectors and positions of responsibility. 
More than 55 million young people under 25 years are unemployed ( % ), which is doubly doubly more than the overall unemployment rate. 
Achieving agreement between the European and the Commission, along with the proposal tabled by the Eurocontrol, to act in this way, in this way, by the proposal that Eurocontrol is unanimously reached. 
As regards public procurement, they are indeed often the page of the paths of our work in the Member States. 
As we welcome, the recent adoption of a resolution on condemnation of human rights violations in Libya, we must take the same position on the continued illegal colonisation of occupation in Palestine. 
He has understood his colleague, Andrerkozy Merkel, he used to use this in the context of Russia in his recent meeting with Mr Putin. 
I would like to mention my thanks to the US and Canada and other nations in NATO for saving the corner of the coast of the coast. 
The problems, Macedonia remains a stable country in the region, have good relations with neighbouring countries, and I believe that it is firmly in the EU 's open route. 
In my opinion, because of the fact that we have two different approach, we also need a two-way legal basis, and we also need a two-legal legal basis. 
scientists which are doubt in these causes, and we should have one science, starting to Copenhagen. 
businesses are crucial to businesses. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, thank the rapporteur for his excellent work on the European Union 's membership of the Convention on Human Rights, which is in favour of European citizens : thanks to the Convention : thanks to the Convention, there will be a new court of the European Union, which will be a guarantee that the rights of European citizens will always be respected by the European Union and the Member States. 
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the aim of this proposal for a regulation is to include some of the recommendations adopted by the General Committee on Fisheries in the Mediterranean ( GFCM ) to improve legal certainty, while making an important step towards simplification. 
It remains open, because the problem is complex, because the problem is complex, is complex. 
Parliament has been calling on the Commission and the Council to simply press using a speech and taking some action to take place in a month. 
It also confirms the objectives included in the central road map of Bali, industrialised countries to reduce emissions by 80 % by 2050. 
After all, I firmly believe that this improved agreement, unlike the very problematic interim agreement last February, deserves Parliament 's consent. 
Therefore, a reasonable and well-considered process of optimising the legal framework for publication of public procurement is essential for the well-being of citizens, consumers and businesses of the European Union, as well as for national, regional and local authorities. 
It was a good idea that the Commission was present in this House today to report on the ban on the use of unfairly unbitterly tactics for shelterot corps, which will come into force since January 2012. 
In Central and Eastern Europe, which proved stable, did not get capital injections from never have been given. 
It is necessary that much more active research activities are needed to measure the impact of environmental and climate policies on employment and I would like the Commission to prioritise this area as part of the Eighth Framework Programme. 
in writing. - ( LT ) I welcome this document because it recommends the urban dimension of cohesion policy to focus on three objectives : firstly, to help urban areas to develop their fundamental geographical infrastructure as a prerequisite for growth, so as to fully exploit their potential contribution to economic growth in Europe, the diversification of economic base and environmental sustainability, in particular, with a view to maintaining and improving the quality of urban centres without urban infrastructure, without promoting the infrastructure, the need for smart urban recovery, and environmental requirements, while promoting the development of urban areas, while promoting the development of urban areas, the need for the development of urban and environmental sustainability, in particular, the context of the area of urban areas, in terms of the area and the European, the need for the development of smart areas, in particular the area of urban areas, the area of infrastructure and the European infrastructure, in terms of the area of the European infrastructure and the European infrastructure, the development of the European infrastructure, and the development of the European infrastructure, the development of the main particular particular terms of the area of the area of the area of the area of the area of the area of the agritime the area of the area of the area of the agrising and environmental requirements of the environment, the environment, and environmental sustainability and environmental sustainability and environmental sustainability and environmental sustainability and environmental sustainability and environmental sustainability of urban requirements of urban requirements of urban requirements of urban requirements of urban requirements. 
In this Union, where internal borders are actually deleted, Europe must, in the long term, provide the means to achieve its ambitions in order to achieve its ambitions. 
It is important to specify the level of carbon press and, moreover, to establish what costs it will be linked to it. 
The achievement of the objectives set out must be set out to choose the appropriate partnerships properly set out. 
It is aimed at ensuring that the provisions of the 2007 protocol are provided, thereby ensuring that the ozone of oil can recover and can avoid adverse impact on human health and on ecosystems. 
We stand up for the development of certification systems for certification certificates. 
Mr President, as the Chair of the Confederal Group of the Transatlantic Group, national communities and languages ' I strongly condemn the actions taken by the Belarusian authorities against the largest organisation of the Polish minority and against the members of the minority community. 
The prior assessment of the work of prosecutor, before the end of the investigation, we are preventing the prosecution of prosecution. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, this is some of a degrading sand taker of this. 
A market can be revised by promoting cross-border transactions, and I believe that this report can help achieve this objective. 
Financial interests : see Minutes 
There are also other issues that I will not mention here, which I am also about to mention here, too. 
The income was not compensated by the aid granted by the Member States, and the Member States have not been compensated for the income of income. 
I would point out that it is impossible to point out that the trend for the poverty growth is done for a year to be confused for one year. 
Certainly, when I speak of the public role of sport, the issues relating to education and preparation are very important, and I believe that education is all the more important, and I believe that education is all the more important for our common European identity. 
The directive on the recognition of professional qualifications can not be called success and will allow it to again call on this tribunal to accelerate work on the two directives, because without them, we will not have any progress in the internal market. 
The proof of is therefore therefore being attached to those countries that want to engage in limited use of DCM and who must prove that substances will be used in the safest possible way as possible and will ensure protection for workers. 
The dark in any part of the world can actually bring about a complete confusion throughout the whole market for all the others, this is not a situation that we can allow for continued. 
It is that, within the framework of the European market integration, the European market should, in the coming years, also remove restrictions on accessing the internal markets of the Member States ' internal markets. 
The weaknesses of the Court of Justice in areas where most problems have been identified, part of which I have just outlined, remains a priority priority. 
Given legislation lacks in some countries of the European Union, there are no lack in some countries in the European Union 's European Union, in some countries. 
The result of these efforts is being satisfactorily satisfactory to be satisfaction. 
The resolution, I congratulate the rapporteur and am proud that I am the first Member of the Slovakia Parliament, which has caused a debate on multilingualism within the institutions through written declaration. 
This regional approach should be overdue to alternative criteria such as, for example, the added value sectors. 
The Spanish Presidency included the development of electric vehicles among our priorities on our agenda, by preferred an alternative way to transport, in order to reduce our dependence on fossil fuels on the basis of oil oil in the transport sector, and thus to carry out a significant and decisive transport transport transport transport system. 
In order to increase energy efficiency by 20 %, I most concerned at my disposal, and most concerned, I am most concerned at the very least in increasing energy efficiency by 20 %. 
( PL ) From the slow economic growth of Europe and the causes of the crisis, too many conclusions can be made, too different conclusions can be made. 
As usual, colleagues use the severe situation of the attacked women and girls to raise the issue of abortion, and withdrawing in the report, the Morocco for the sexual and reproductive rights '. 
It is very important that the mutual recognition of recipients between Member States is not only about health care, but also for the following care, but we have a period where this detail can be finalised. 
Civil protection should focus on preparations for floods and drought, and on a civil protection basis, on flooding and drought, and on land. 
It is necessary to create a European strategy for these industries, where they can express their potential and to recognise their dual role as the persisters of culture and delays and, such as the creation of employment and jobs. 
The annual study of growth and the new study of growth, and we will also have national programmes for reforms where Member States will clearly state what their objectives will be and how to achieve them. 
Ladies and gentlemen, the order was set out in advance and verifiable carefully, but I would ask the rapporteur to take the floor to take the floor. 
I must say that I was very impressed by the expression that President Obama used in his speech in receiving the Nobel Prize when he said that when we are talking about how important it is to continue with the commitment, in relations with repression, the necessary decision matic deployment. 
For this resolution because it proposes a common ban on the use of cyanide in mining in the European Union by the end of 2011, and because I understand that a ban is currently the only one credible way to protect our water resources and ecosystem from pollution caused by the use of cyanides in duties duties. 
We can do everything we can to ensure the proper traceability of traceability, and we can ensure that the appropriate traceability is properly monitored. 
I still do not have a solution, but I can assure the honourable Member that we are trying, together with our Czech colleagues, to find a solution as soon as possible in the short possible time. 
The Commissioner can distinguish these moments and concerns, and misleading, the Commissioner can distinguish these moments and concerns ? 
Before the vote on paragraph : : : : on paragraph : : : : : on paragraph : : : : : on paragraph : : : : : : on on paragraph : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : paragraph on paragraph : : : : : : : : paragraph on paragraph on paragraph of the vote on paragraph : : : : : : : : : : : : : : on paragraph on paragraph of the vote on paragraph on paragraph of the vote on paragraph : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on paragraph : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on of on of on of on on on on on on on on on on on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on on on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on on on on of on of on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on of on of on of on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on on of on of on on on on on of on of on of on of on on on on on on on on on of on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on on on of on of on of on : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on on on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of the vote on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of on of 
We respect the use of spectrum spectrum for radio and cultural activities : this must be clearly clear. 
I have the commitment to provide as far as possible and that there is a preliminary and consistent evaluation of our agreements before and the subsequent evaluation of our agreements. 
However, the Parliament adopted a proposal that we voted for to extend the aid to 2018 to the year for extension. 
2010, the EIB has made loans for projects that contribute directly to reducing greenhouse gas emissions of approximately 20 billion, which is around 30 % of the total lending of loans. 
It is extremely imperative to impose on the very imperative that it is extremely imperative to impose on the table. 
Contrary to what has been said so many times, Parliament has repeatedly expressed its support for the current negotiations under the Delegation for relations with the countries of Mercosur, the delegation on the EuroParliamentary Assembly ( Euro ) and the plenary several parliamentary sessions. 
It was 2007 year when the cuts cut by % compared with the period 1970 2000, was 2007, when the cuts in % comparison with the period 2000. 
I think my opinion on this issue, including in my capacity as a member of the Committee on Agriculture and Rural Development, is shared by my fellow Members. 
also voting intentions : see Minutes 
It is that the provisions on animal experiments must be amended, but European research must not seek negative consequences for the new legislation. 
This, during the course of dialogue with the Council on this report, it has become clear that the call on the part of Parliament will not receive an answer. 
For your remarks, for your remarks, for your remarks, for your remarks, for your remarks. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to say this : Spain, as has always clearly shown its unreservedly support to the Treaty of Lisbon. 
Commissioner, I interest, I am interested to know how the Commission is trying to face these problems in the long term. 
The previous speakers also criticised the President and the President, and the High Representative, which I believe to be totally inappropriate. 
To conclude, I am very proud to say, within the framework of the current explanation of vote that together with all the Members of Parliament and all the political groups, we voted unanimously, because we clearly had the need for unanimity, not by dispute. 
It is important that such proportionality and equality be made in the external service is implemented. 
Germany is to be created in the creation of a figure ' ; in the Basel countries, in the Boling countries, it is done at the same time by all at the same time, in a little moment. 
It is to convince Member States to agree on easier procedures for the recognition of educational qualifications, regardless of the country in which they are received. 
on unfair commercial practices and the directive on misleading and comparative advertising, have a huge importance in terms of consumer viewpoint to have greater security and ensure legal certainty for businesses in the internal market. 
A framework of the free movement of workers and employees has been established in regulation ( EEC ) No 1612of the Council on the free movement of workers in the Community and has already been amended repeatedly and has already been amended. 
also voting intentions : see Minutes 
Workers are protesting against the measures taken by the government, workers who are neither employer or more paid than their fellow Members ; you can see the data themselves. 
in writing. - ( EL ) The MEPs of the Geneva Communist Party voted against the motion for a resolution of the political parties in the European Parliament calling for the immediate release of all the detentions, unfounded arrests and detained by the US in Guantánamo, and for the immediate and final closure of the basis that they also unleash the municial residual release of the Cuban Government 's Cuban Government and the Cuban Government 's opposition to the Cuban Government. 
Finally, the operational mechanism of cohesion policy is successful and, as a whole, it must be increased transparency and reduce bureaucracy and reduce bureaucracy. 
solidarity must provide a platform for the development of the European Union 's energy policy to develop EU energy policy. 
My colleague, the Vice-President Reding, is why I, the Vice-President Reding, now proposes a strategy that will be called for between the gender equality in the leadership of businesses '. 
Europe has a leading role to play in Copenhagen on climate change issues ; we can do so good work and with the ratification of all the ILO conventions. 
These are issues of access to jobs and to detention in the context of the Reception Directive and how best to meet the needs of the Member States, which are experiencing particular pressure in the context of the Dublin Regulation. 
In the bilateral border, there was agreement in March on a reduction in interest rate by 1 % and for extending the credits of credit. 
They are the creation of a permanent mechanism for protecting the euro against speculative attacks, monitoring the activities currently existing rating agencies and possibly establishing a European Credit Risk Agency. 
In itself, speaking in itself in itself. 
I think that the Council has also realised the importance of the proposal in terms of highlighting the need for a new integrated perspective. 
It is all, Mr President, Mr Reinfeldt, Commissioner, which I wanted to say in opening the debate. 
On the one hand, I will also observe a number of social, environmental and economic criteria, as I have committed to assessing all the regulations of the regulations. 
For some urgent concerns of the general concerns of the communities, workers and businesses throughout Europe. 
The urgent need to establish procedures for combating illegal trade in timber products by making better analyses and control of uncomplex commercial flows arising from the emergency. 
NNNNNNNNNNNNNNNthe InNthe InInNthe InInInInInInInInNthe InInInNthe InNNthe InNNthe InInNthe InNNthe InInInInInNthe InInInInInInInInInInInInInNthe InNthe InNRRRNthe InNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNNthe InNthe Nthe Nthe Nthe 
It is also the best decided here in plenary or those who believe it is not to be able to make a minute speaking after the report was not discussed in plenary. 
Mr President, I wonder why I am always seen to me that the Commission does not wish to present things to the European Parliament. 
I believe that the Motor of Romania, for example, is incomparable more comparable than those of the borders of other countries in the Schengen area, for example, is incomparable to be protected. 
The advice by the Commission by Venezuela will be important to ensure that this is done in a way that complies with European standards, using the best experience available by using the best available experience. 
A year of report is currently being used, which I believe is appropriate and I do not understand why we do not understand why a new triangle, which will end up being confused. 
However, ensuring that small carriers are not forced to stop the transportation in rural areas due to bureaucratic sharks or increased cost of insurance. 
Mr President, Commissioner, we are brave of the subject of discussing contacts between the institutions of the European Union and its citizens ' institutions and its citizens. 
checks are essential. The checks are essential. 
in writing. - ( LT ) I voted in favour of this resolution because I believe that it is necessary to create a system for the supervision and control of credit rating agencies to be established. 
The civilian population has mobilised, but this is in no way alleviated by the responsibility of the public authorities in this case. 
It is even to be forced to force if ordinary arguments do not give a result, even if ordinary arguments do not give rise. 
It would be if we had introduced it in European politics, we would not have now been here here here, we would not have been here. 
On the other hand, I voted in favour of references to the problems faced by agriculture as a result of climate change, as I believe that the most affected regions must be compensated in the most affected regions. 
Thirty, seriously or consistent solution to the problem of climate change, can not be found in the logic of the system that has caused it. 
We should provide full support to those countries that do not have the conditions, the basis or the opportunity to provide assistance to their citizens. 
There is particular impact on the small and medium-sized enterprises sector, which provides the majority of jobs, and is now a large proportion of employees, as a result of the reduction in export and reduction in development opportunities. 
There is reason to fear that it is pretty to fear to fear to be afraid. 
It is the type of instruments that we will propose which we will propose to propose to them, which we will propose. 
This would, of course, be contrary to the new Framework Directive on electronic communications Communications, that would be contrary to the new Framework Directive on electronic communications. 
There has become a form of new foreign policy and could help to create better living conditions throughout the region. 
Those who have bought in good conscience, and not even receive compensation for this. 
For this reason, I am, in line with no longer prepared to speak about the reports that are before us today. 
I would like to mention three violations of fundamental freedom of expression as a way of calling on the Council and the Commission, here united in a man - you, High Representative - to give a voice and thus to the people of those and all the other persecuted citizens. 
Human rights in all the countries of Europe is at the heart of EU cooperation is at the heart of the EU 's cooperation. 
Those we have taken there were fundamental and important, and there were fundamental and important. 
It is certainly a fundamental human right to achieve, which is when all people have physical, social and economic access to sufficient food. 
They have recommended it by them, and they have recommended it by them. 
We should examine this strategy in depth and create a administrative body as soon as possible, which is regulated with the implementation of the strategy and coordination with other Member States. 
It was not time to give our support to this report, in this report, to give our support to this report. 
We have introduced a obligation to interpret all documents, but only to those who are essential to enable human beings, which is subject to criminal prosecution, to understand what is happening with it or it is about. 
Those ideas can be seen at every step in the European Union, and so it should be, and so it should be. 
We continue to improve the clear and methods of a clear and meding approach that we have launched. 
farmers are already making efforts to provide safe products using techniques that do not harm the environment and comply with animal welfare standards. 
I am convinced that Mrs Malmström will be a great representative of Mrs Malmström to be a great representative, and I am sure that Mrs Malmström will be a great representative. 
I therefore believe that it is right to end the state subsidies for the uncompetitive mines in 2014. 
We need more effective coordination between the measures taken by the US and those taken by the EU and the measures taken by the US are needed. 
They are a rule of law, good governance, good governance, transparency, we need our experience as partners as partners. 
An unprecedented economic crisis that has caused severe attacks on a renewed renewal of a renewed disaster for developing countries. 
It was a unambiguous sign of the fact that MEPs voted against this report, was an unambiguous surprise and a clear sign of danger that can not be ignored. 
extremism ; there is no justification ; there is no justification ; there is possible. 
Unfortunately, European political leaders who visited the island have not found the time to meet the representatives of the dissuasions that have, for this reason, felt that isolated isolation was felt. 
In particular, you have raised the issue of the island of Maastricht and Lampedusa situation in particular. 
We are with what he said by him, and we are with what he said. 
The EU-Gulf Cooperation Council ( GCC ) continue for two decades now in an attempt to negotiate a free trade agreement between the EU and the Gulf Cooperation Council. 
It is also the fact that the accusations aimed at Romania, aimed at the EU, too, are also targeted at the blame for the accusations aimed at Romania. 
To this end, as far as the content is concerned, we must consider two main aspects to achieve success in implementing the implementation of the content. 
( NL ) Madam President, the European Parliament and Member States are applying double standards, the European Parliament and Member States to implement double standards. 
The age of patients involved in clinical tests with a cuts in increased length is, and at the same time, % of patients are over the age when, for the first time, they are at the same time, such a diagnost lifestyle. 
However, although it has not received other complaints on the implementation of electronic communications in Bulgaria, it will continue to monitor the current situation with a view to ensuring compliance with EU law. 
As regards the issue of genetically modified organisms, I would like to remind Parliament that the Union and Canada have signed a mutually acceptable decision to overcome these differences. 
In the light of the events and the need for a more differentiated approach to the examples of risk management procedures and risk management procedures, the Commission began the initiative during the holiday, 17 April - 18 April - 18 April - 18 April, cooperative, cooperative, proposed a coordinated European approach. 
However, it is necessary funds and research and research, and it is necessary, to make money available, and research. 
Madam President, Commissioner, I am of the most important exposure from the resolution is paragraph 7, which says : say, in accordance with the principles of better regulation, any future legislation will be accompanied by full assessment of the impact of the regulatory and administrative burdens, and to ensure that everyone is proportionate to achieve the objectives that it aims to achieve '. ' 
This is the Declaration by the President of the President of Poland, Alexander Kenya, and the President of Germany, Johanne Rhi Rhi Rhierhe, JosRRC, Jean Rajoel Rajoel Rio. 
In my telephone conversation, I am talking to the Prime Minister of Japan, he has also assured me that he also wishes to cooperate with us, including in international efforts that are to be made in the G8 and G20, to achieve higher levels of nuclear safety in the world. 
It was shocked by two parts : without weapons ' to the least developed countries and the Economic Partnership Agreements for developing countries from the ACP countries. 
We should take this into consideration the common struggle that is, of course, aimed at eliminating and eradicating all forms of discrimination. 
These principles are particularly important standards for quality standards and conditions for production, including from the point of view of combating climate change and the reduction of CO2 emissions. 
These rules will reduce bureaucracy, including through mutual recognition of regulatory solutions to each party countries and avoid dispute in duplication in duplication of resources. 
It is that in the process of opting Members, you do not have a great place for manoeuvre, in the process of opting the Members, for manoeuvre. 
Of course, the ideas of lowering quality and we want the consideration made in the European Union to be given to the European Union and value to be valued. 
This is very much welcome to all your comments, and we very much welcome all your comments, your comments, all your comments, and we very much welcome. 
The item is the statement by the High Representative for Foreign Affairs and Security Policy of the Commission on the situation in Iraq. 
1990 and 2005, and 2005, the transport sector has increased by % by %, by emissions, by emissions of transport sector. 
The needs made by the enlargement of the EU with Croatia 's accession and the corrections under the Treaty of Lisbon will be integrated into the charter or amended budget. 
It is therefore important to reach agreement at first reading at first reading at the first reading. 
By desirable work, the institutions have acquired legitimacy within the European structure, not via destroy, but not via the European structure. 
It is that volcano volcano are still continuing to stay in the eruption, as well as the Icelandic volcano. 
Would the young country succeed in integrating so many people for so short time so recently, for so long now ? 
It is the right path we must take and we should focus on the rights of creators and the prevention of piracy. 
on behalf of the INDGroup. - ( NL ) Mr President, the INPalestine, has undoubtedly been a question of doubt Islamic territory. 
Another text is proposed to replace paragraph 9, which will be replaced with paragraph 9, which is to replace paragraph 9, with which paragraph 9 is replaced. 
All our children are at risk, as the victims of the sexual exploitation of children and of child pornography are being killed. 
Based on these financial instruments and within the 201financial forecast budget, the Commission must also define a decision to finance the exploitation of gas from alternative sources that may have a tangible impact on the European gas market and energy market market market. 
The European Union must therefore adopt an industrial policy that combines competitiveness, sustainability and decent working conditions and decent working conditions. 
It is perfectly aware of the situation based on precise data on the basis of what has happened in AFukushima 's present situation. 
The Union has committed itself to intensifying its contribution to international coordination and to the High Representative and Vice-President is strongly interested in this issue. 
A border for sexual crimes should also be harmonised and harmonised. 
We defend free access to cultural heritage and daily solidarity between generations and between neighbours, and between neighbours, we defend free access to cultural heritage and daily solidarity. 
We must bear in mind that there are also migratory species, for example, tone, and that, every year, scientific criteria are laid down in the light of the next year. 
Minister, I welcome the restraints and - if I may be so - the man of analyses both Mr LGarrido and the Commissioner Olli Rehn, whom I wish to congratulate him and wish him the success of his new position. 
We were the first organisation that in 2006 came into cooperation and concluded cooperation with the Court of Justice, providing the International Criminal Court full political and diplomatic support through the course of the course, political dialogues and statements. 
We also ensure that some clarity is guaranteed in terms of funding is guaranteed in terms of funding, and we must ensure that some clarity is guaranteed in terms of funding. 
Those who travel to some of these travellers of long distance are also covered. 
Although what is trying to prove to demonstrate what is they trying to prove ? 
Perhaps this is the reason for such discrepancies between official statistics and the observations of medical workers ' medical statistics and the observations of medical workers ? 
We are not able to ask ourselves today about the scope of effective mechanisms for exerting pressure and for implementation, I really do not really know what kind of situation would then lead us to take action. 
The Union needs a new, medium-term vision of growth and development, combined with reasonable collection and a redistribution of financial resources. 
It is : who is responsible and who is responsible and who - the financial burden - the financial burden - the financial burden - the financial burden - and one - the financial burden - is, the financial burden - and who is, the financial burden, and who is, the financial burden ? 
We MEPs always have a fundamental role to play in the area of politics, in the administrative field, we must be able to look at the assistance of this work. 
The information society, particularly during the time of the development of broadband infrastructure, the precautionary price and the cost of processing data processing can be located on various places and even in various countries. 
Unfortunately, and this year, the representatives of the Council have ignored the invitation of the technical committee 's Committee on the Commission and this year have ignored the invitation of the technical committee. 
Unfortunately, I have delayed the vote because, when I come to the plenary Chamber, I have not worked on. 
These reasons, I decided to vote in favour of the provision as a whole as a whole in favour of the provision of the provision as a whole as a whole. 
We must fight against crimes on the Internet and against crimes that exploit children and young people, must fight against crimes, and against crimes against crimes, who exploit children and young people. 
Compared to other Member States, I feel sympathetic because sometimes this is only one third or public or is not used this opportunity. 
I would also like to thank the shadow rapporteurs from the Committee on the Committee on RSRE for their constructive support. 
It is another area where the need to fundamentally amend and improve the competitive environment and improve the competitive environment and improve the competitive environment, is needed. 
The latter is quite significant in the last few days, and it is rather significant. 
We also need independent monitoring structures to ensure the quality of the results of the EIB and its compliance with code of conduct. 
In our Presidency for the field of safety in road safety, the final negotiations between the Council and Parliament on a proposal for a regulation on the requirements for approval for general approval of the general safety of motor vehicles are the final negotiations between the Council and Parliament. 
We will have a European Credit Risk Agency for Credit Risk Rails Agency ? 
( FR ) Mr President, Mr Rehn, Mr Rehn, as you know, there are two ways of reducing deficits. 
statistics have also been discussed, discussion of statistics, and information has also been discussed. 
This report on equality between women and men, which we are voting every year, has particular importance to me, in my particular importance. 
It has therefore recommended a radical reform in social housing and in the objectives of the country by common interest and, in my opinion, it has formulated a limited definition of what social services are of general interest. 
It will help to eliminate poverty and enable the elderly to live decent living in a decent measure and to help eliminate poverty and enable the elderly to live in a decent manner. 
It is not enough because Article 9 is thought to promote the objectives of the European Union, as outlined in Article 3 of the Treaty. 
' Union ' will only succeed if it is implemented jointly with the Member States and regions and regions, together with the Innovation Union, if they are implemented with the Member States and regions. 
The large agricultural farms are expected more in terms of jobs and the environment, more jobs and the environment are expected. 
In conjunction with the Council and the European Parliament, we must develop this close and macroeconomic indicators of the Member States, together with the Council and the European Parliament, must develop this scourge and macroeconomic indicators, and the micro-economic indicators for the Member States. 
long-term solutions must be found in the context of the debate, which we have to start with on the new common agricultural policy, which we need to start with on the new common agricultural policy. 
The item is time for voting time is for a vote on time for voting time. 
Many questions very much are very much about matters. 
It is a serious process in which experience plays an increasingly important role in which experience plays an increasingly important role in trying to play in an increasingly important role in the event of an increasingly important role. 
The information provided by the Council, the Commission also stated that it will ensure that the provisions of the Treaty on Accession and that it remains the right to clarify by Member States, which continue to apply restrictions. 
We must, everything, think about the social dimension : it is a matter of people and we must ensure that they remain worthy of the dignity, be held useful and they will receive professional recognition and that they will have economic opportunities to survive. 
Your concern for cyanide, for cyanide, for an cyanide, for an cyanide, for an cyanide, for an cyanide. 
I am in favour of continuing quotas, I am in favour of continuing quotas, for the continuation of quotas to be continued. 
I do not agree with the approach that has been adopted, which often provides inappropriate to meet the needs of the African side, including in terms of the institutions and the private sector and the private sector, too. 
This clarification, there is no obstacle to informal exchange of good practices or best practices between the parties, or best practices between countries. 
As for research, and particularly the Commissioner and the seventh Framework Programme programmes, in particular, concerning research and, in particular, the Swiss and seven framework programmes. 
The Commission is now beginning to doubt whether safety is now being given, given the freight fragile freight, to compromise the inability to apply European legislation. 
I therefore strongly welcome your efforts and the situation you have made and I would like to congratulate you personally and I would like to congratulate you personally. 
It was not like the situation in Malta, where, as I understand, it is particularly difficult, but I think everyone in the European Union have experienced in something similar and no doubt we need to work together. 
The aim of this document is to assist Bulgaria 's efforts to decommission 4 of the exploitation of 4 of the bloc bloc of its nuclear power plant blocks. 
Unfortunately, it is also forgotten to visit the opposition, which would otherwise be usual to see something usually usual. 
I mentioned the Commission 's progress report by the Commission on progress in the progress of progress in the progress of the Commission report on the Commission 's Commission report on progress. 
There is almost in all areas of human activity, which is why maximum clarity must be guaranteed in their use and establish rules for their use in the European Union in the area of the economy, public health, public health, health, safety, safety, safety and administrative activities. 
We all of us, in all of us, that Turkey 's accession process to the EU continues to be of strategic importance to the European Union. 
We can keep our commitments to the countries of the South, making a differentiation between the various categories of the South, because they are not really able to put in the same nice and the same nice. 
We must send out a clear and consistent political message to the Commission and our citizens and our citizens ' political message to the Commission and to send out a clear and consistent political message to the Commission and our citizens. 
2008 report on human rights in the world and EU policy in this area ( debate ) 
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to start by saying - and not because of the labelling requirements, but most frankly, by expressing my sincere thanks to Vice-President of the Commission, the Commission, her staff, the Czech Presidency, who unfortunately can not be with us today and the members of the Committee on their positive and constructive cooperation in relation to this dossier. 
It is that, by doing its job, the Court states mistakes and irregularities in terms of these funds, it is that, in implementing its activities, the Court states that mistakes and irregularities in terms of these funds. 
However, I will conclude in June with regard to the 2020 strategy, in June, in the context of the 2020 strategy, in June, in the 2020 strategy ? 
At the summit, it must serve to review energy security policy, which must be applied on the basis of the criteria of interdependence, transparency, guaranteeing supply and combating climate change, as well as improving energy efficiency. 
In accordance with Rule 140 of the Rules of Procedure, the proposal is put to the Rules of Procedure, the proposal is put to the vote on the proposal to the vote in accordance with Article 140 of the Rules of Procedure. 
It is at all the largest number of victims of world journalists, and the world 's largest number of victims of world journalists is the world 's largest number of victims of world journalists. 
Currently, the UN Convention on the Sea law and the United Nations Fisheries Agricultural Agreement was sufficient for regulating the extraction of natural resources in the North River East and of the Marot Rhine. 
Among the next part: see Minutes 
I believe this satisfaction to be a argument that is presented at this point that there is no agenda at this time that there is no agenda for absurd day. 
Your following : firstly, will you take action now not only to monitor countries but also to strictly monitor the markets and, if so, what action does you do, what action ? 
Many money is being put on the table themselves, but they are actually intended to calm the financial markets, while people are promising only a pain. 
However, recognising the existing differences that are resulting from differences in interests and priorities, I believe that the European Union does not have a place in the world or that it should be imposed on a foreign policy of all the Member States in contrast to their own interests or even with their own history. 
We still have farmers who want and can produce food and produce food and produce food, and we still have farmers who want and can produce food. 
If we want to succeed, we must be able to make our European regions, to the small and large cities and to a reformed cohesion policy in accordance with the new situation. 
It is time to keep this wise and responsible and responsible, it is time to keep the time to keep the time wise and responsible and responsibly. 
It is the price to which we will prove to be united in terms of the principles that we so often say that we are complying with so often, so often to criticise the principles of others. 
On the contrary, I believe that all the declarations implemented to this budget for the financial year 2011 - because, yes, one budget is in itself and political, as Parliament has shown with the political priorities that it included in the budget - whether they are on own resources, the European added value added to this budget - the Commission 's declaration - or in this joint context, which was important and last moment by the Prime Minister of the European Union, I believe that all these statements show that all the present statements in the present budget, I believe that all the lines of the lines of the Commission - the declaration of the Commission - or that this statement - and in the context of what the same my opinion, which is important and followed by the present by the Prime Minister the present days, I believe that the present days of the present Presidency of the European Union. 
There is no unchanged an operational architecture structure and therefore it can be counterproductive by definitive efforts to intelligence. 
Environmental change and landscape amendments are also having an increasingly influence on people from the Arctic region, biodiversity and landscape, both on land and sea. 
In view of the improvements in the text reached by mediation, we will vote in favour of the improvements of the text, we will vote in favour. 
We would like to insist on the development of the civil dimension of the process of imposing peace and peacekeeping missions, as well as the management of crisis and following crisis recovery. 
Mr President, I abstained on this issue for two reasons for two reasons. 
Northern Sudan and South Sudan must be managed on the basis of the principles of democracy and the rule of law, in respect of human rights and social and economic rights. 
The consolidation taken by Greece is essential to strengthen fiscal sustainability and market confidence and to be welcomed by the Commission, the Eurogroup, the Eurogroup, the European Central Bank and the International Monetary Fund. 
The Council must know that the European Parliament does not wish to do its independent European supervisory structure and the ESRB to create dogmatism or with conviction on the part of all parties. 
It can not exactly define the sexual orientation or discrimination based on sexual orientation, precisely whether it can not be specified precisely to define sexual orientation. 
I am pleased that criminal sanctions are being recommended in the directive, particularly severe cases, for which these sanctions are needed both and appropriate. 
A region, every company, every citizen, we need, every citizen, we need a citizen, every single company, every citizen, we need. 
session of the session of the session session session session of the session session session session session session of the session session of the session session session session of the session session session session of the session of the session session session of the session of the session. 
The eligibility criteria identified by the EGF Regulation ( EGF ) This directive, which is why I voted for the mobilisation of the fund, which is why I voted in favour of the mobilisation of the fund. 
I would therefore like to invite Member States to properly implement the directives on equal treatment for men and women in employment. 
I also congratulate you in this difficult time for you, due to internal problems, I hope you will be capable of providing these problems and also preparing the next summit after three months. 
The Commissioner 's point, not only because we agree with it, but also because it expresses a goal that the world can not afford to do not to do so. 
You think you should change in the way you do your job ? 
Our farmers must be rewarded to providing services to society services must be rewarded to us. 
Information and promotion of agricultural products for the internal market and in third countries ( debate ) 
I appreciate what has been done today and I believe that, from today on, we must continue to deal with the financial terrorists of ratings and speculators, which are causing chaos in people 's lives and trying to reduce sovereign governments. 
All of its victims with a great wise man, with a great deal of dead, all of the victims of the victims of a great deal of dead. 
The resources of resources, as you said, Commissioner, is another factor which has exacerbated the conflict, which has exacerbated the conflict, as you said, is another factor that has exacerbated the conflict. 
It is aimed at making all Member States introduce equivalent treatment of medical assistance - namely access to free care for illegal migrants. 
The compromise 28 ; compromise that, rather, have enriched the strategic vision that we wanted to give to this report, of our commitment to the Mediterranean, rather than to the Mediterranean. 
In fact, this mainly concerns the flow of touched on the flow of tone energy, which is devoted from primary energy sources, which is devoted from primary energy sources. 
I will be happy to give you a longer and more in-depth response to this issue in writing if you send me a letter to me in short time, so I can make it more within the framework of the current Commission 's mandate. 
I will conclude the goodwill of a very unusual debate : I am here at the time of burden, and I am here, as the Southern Prime Minister of the Czech Republic, my brother and several are also a form of excellent form. 
A sector contributes to the development and competitiveness of the European Union and the completion of the internal market, and also has an impact on the quality of life of citizens ' lives. 
Yes, I have one question for Belarus, I have a question on Belarus, but I have a question on Belarus. 
The European Union should always aim for better regulation, and we should always aim for better regulation. 
For its part, the Commission must ensure appropriate levels of funding, the appropriate levels of funding must be guaranteed, the Commission must ensure that the appropriate levels of funding are adequate. 
This is why the Commission proposal for a directive is a positive step in the Commission 's proposal for a directive is a positive step, and therefore, a positive step. 
The taxpayers have had to save the banking sector in the European Union with the engineering of around around, tran, lasting euro, a tranche, EUR, EUR, and a lasting euro. 
The financial assets of the European public is a public good, which is very important to put forward the plan of the proposed directive, is very much too much to put forward. 
It is talk of the economy, integration and foreign policy, which is obviously important, which is clearly important. 
In addition, for the purposes of combating unemployment among low skilled people, and for promoting the employment of elderly citizens, it is imperative to promote recognition of national qualifications between Member States, as well as to promote certification after the discretion of skills acquired through informal cuts. 
However, we have a debate in plenary in plenary this Chamber, we have a debate in plenary, in plenary. 
All over the world, they are aimed at the models of the EU and it is with admiration, because we have the most advanced and binding agreements. 
This must be seen as we need to know how the operational and subsequent expenditure of this institution will be covered and that is going to be covered. 
It is that Switzerland must pay at 600 million, DG, OK a year of access, but the Swiss Government is taking into account the savings of money from being made available by the European Union, value, of a value, of billion, Swiss Francotland per year, or a sum of 28 billion, Swiss. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, before the 1970s, my fellow counties from Eastern Germany received freedom to travel. 
It is therefore increasingly important that Europe is finally providing itself with an effective instrument at last to provide an effective instrument, in the last instance, with an effective instrument, in the last instance. 
The German Government is revising its multiannual programme so that we will have to wait until the end of the year before we start discussing this important chapter in question. 
The 27 European countries can not agree on an agreement on a strategy strategy for an agreement on a strategy strategy for an agreement on a strategy strategy for the 27 European countries ? 
I do not see this reason to vote against the mobilisation of the Fund in this case in this case. 
It is not particularly pleased, are not very pleased. 
The civil society process in the process of drafting the agreement with Cameroon represents a positive indication of this, for this. 
absolutely nothing, nothing, nothing, is absolutely nothing, nothing, nothing, to do,. 
A characterised by Christian tradition is constantly showing their good intentions, which is characterised by Christian tradition, continually shows their good intentions. 
There must be a little attention to the disadvantaged areas, particularly to mountain areas and to small farms and to small farms. 
I would like to start with a positive position with what I believe is the most interesting and the most effective achievements of the 2011 budget and those that are particularly important for European citizens. 
I have this a number of complainants from the Schengen provisions from the Schengen provisions, I have a number of complaint from the Schengen provisions. 
Unfortunately, the example of Kyrgyzstan shows how poor governance and the lack of reforms can essentially lead to political instability and, ultimately, to violence, to violence. 
In this interests, social justice and the gender differences between the highest and the lowest remuneration in the company must be adopted acceptable. 
My country - Germany - and Germany - probably not probably not - probably not probably my country - probably not probably not probably - but probably my country, is unlikely to do. 
I was the final point : this climate conference is the following : the climate conference is over the end in the climate conference. 
That should be taken into consideration, that attention should be taken into account. 
Mr President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to thank everyone for the in-depth debate, and for their support that has been given me. 
I would like to point out that so important measures such as those we are debating today, require more time to think and consider ; the short time for macroeconomic ', which we had for the deadline that we have imposed on our deadline, is completely inadequate. 
To achieve this objective, as has been mentioned by the Committee on the Environment, Public Health and Food Safety, it is possible to achieve a level of assembly of the ECEC by 2016 and a level of recycling between 50 % and 75 % dependencies in dependency on category. 
What we need is to overlook the unresistance of the unrest practice of fixing profits and competition, known as security ', correction of the age of retirement and households. 
At the same time, we must be aware of the risks that we are at the same time, with the future risks that we are at our disposal. 
I have the information to have someone in the Commission to have intending to deal with this issue. 
Should Europe not give its approval to everything for all of the European Union not give its approval to everything for everything ? 
The report on this was a signal of some of us for the difficulties we have at the moment, but we were deeply hopeful to have been that the democratic spirit will take place in a country that has long been suffering from unambiguous and unacceptable conferences, which focus particularly on the concept of the nationality of Cd'Ivoire. 
It is a first step, a first step, a first step, is a first step in the first step. 
You must also understand that the strategic position of Sri Lanka also gives the area for foreign factors, it is moving on external factors, which are very difficult to control within the framework of the country itself. 
The Presidency is aimed not only at the European Parliament, but also to the Commission, because the majority of what we are doing is relating to the recovery of cuts contained in the Commission 's proposal, which the Council wishes to push, and also with the focus on measures to create jobs. 
At the same time, we will also achieve closer cooperation between the European Court of Justice, the European Court of Justice, the European Court of Human Rights and the national courts, and national courts, at the same time. 
We will discuss the Employment Summit in more detail. 
The problem among our fellow citizens, which is raised by all our meetings and is currently being held, is whether their savings are still in safety. 
It is that the Croatian and Slovenian governments are dealing with the key issues of the agreement in a completely different light, which does not result in mutual trust. 
We are sending it to the regions, to the trade unions, and to the conscientious and business organisations, so that the discussion can be discussed as decentralised as possible. 
The need for positive action to increase the representation of women in political, economic and corporate authorities with power of decision-making powers. 
First of all, paragraph stipulates that we can help end the crisis by increasing employment levels and proposing policies to benefit immigration from countries outside the EU, and even proposing that it be achieved to learn citizens ' learning. 
It must be part of the European agenda on the European agenda. 
Also, the inclusion of a clear reference to the Memorandum of the real autonomy of the Tibetan people ' in a urgent resolution in a matter of urgency. 
Now, consumers must bear this in mind this in mind, in mind now that the consumer must bear in mind in mind. 
We have always been in the opinion of one opinion, but you will probably be able to receive a new mandate soon in the new Commission, but I wish you every success, and I wish you every success. 
We feel sympathetic to all the dead, injured or murdered in such attacks. 
Common positions of Council positions : see Minutes 
Measurial conditions, particularly the storm of Xynthia, also affected Spain and the Canary Islands, as well as west France and other countries, western and other countries. 
In my opinion, a decision on European economic policy is the Euro Plus Pact, which provides a common agenda and common objectives and objectives. 
The European Parliament voted on individual and personal grounds for a European Parliament, personally and personally, on the basis of individual and personal basis. 
The racism and the storm of hatred by President Ahmadinejad and others deserve more deserves. 
The recent research and technology have evaded the opportunity to overcome the crisis, which, at the same time, is in favour of measures relating to climate change. 
What we are calling on you now, Commissioner, is as soon as possible to give Parliament a final response to whether the Hungarian constitution is in line with European legislation and fundamental rights. 
together, they reflect the multilateral nature of poverty and the whole range of situations in the Member States and the whole range of situations in the Member States, together, of the multiple nature of poverty and the whole range of situations in the Member States. 
I would like to propose the first step that the Commission could take, to give these countries in North Africa, who have gone down the path of democracy, free access to the market in Europe. 
We must take measures to combat this negative trend in the event of this negative trend. 
This must be done to prevent such products, processed by ', to fall into public facilities where food is being wasted. 
( IT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the most flexible types of work often acquire the form of unemployment contracts that can not guarantee workers ' social protection protection. 
Prime Minister, as a Hungarian and European, I would like to pass on the six months of the presidency with great deliberate and with the very high time that is high hunger. 
I am to repeat that a complex law would not serve the most to the interests of the countries ; in the case of public procurement, is on the contrary. 
Members, the official data, the official data are very different, and the official data are very different. 
We will supplement the positions created by the Treaty of Lisbon with the Treaty of Lisbon, which have created with the Treaty of Lisbon, with the Treaty of Lisbon, with the Treaty of Lisbon. 
We are coming back to this, because I will have the opportunity to come back, as you know, in the coming weeks or months, to a number of proposals that were united on the agenda approved by the Commission on 2 June, which was supported by the Council of the Ministers and adopted by the European Council. 
There is no desire to increase integration or tax transfers between the peoples of Europe, it will be necessary to destroy the existing monetary union and establish a healthy monetary union. 
We are asking that, in these circumstances, we do not face the delegation of the elections that the present government will organise in March, as these elections are a circumvention of the Mapua Agreement. 
The European Commission is a meaningless shot of the European Commission, it is a meaningless show in the European Commission. 
Arctic are aware of the growing influence of external social, economic and political factors on their lives, on their lives, of the Arctic are aware of the growing influence of external social, economic and political factors. 
It is for action to be actions to be taken, it is for action to be actions. 
The need for a growing role of the European Parliament in discussing these issues with debates, similar to those that we have here today : are positive, with different views, but with different points, but protecting a stronger European Union and stronger euro. 
The main problem is not the result of the physical lack of foodstuffs but because the poor can no longer afford to buy food products to such prices. 
It is also about economic integration and the Community acquis, as well as equal treatment of all companies in the European Union, all companies. 
Many of you have said, this is not simply the responsibility of one or two people ; all the European institutions and all the Member States must take collective responsibility. 
We call for the means of collective legal protection for collective legal protection. 
One of the four attacks set out by the Council Presidency would not have been stopped, even though probably the subsequent investigations would probably have been easier to be easier. 
The summit of the Arab League will be crucial to rebuild the unity of the Arab countries and, in particular, their overall support for the Arab Peace Peace Peace Peace Peace Initiative. 
also voting intentions : see Minutes 
Other controversial points have already been included in the general approach of the Council to the decision to impose financial penalties on the decision to impose financial penalties on other sports. 
It is that this change can not be imposed outside the outside of the Union. 
We look forward to cooperating in the future in the future with our sights to cooperate with us. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the nine round of the Jiminals ' negotiations did not result in concrete results and has not improved the situation of the Tibetan population on the ground. 
There must also be a social and cultural approach to avoid the deepening of the deepening and without this, the existing inequalities in terms of the levels of mode and employment. 
It will also strengthen the renewed EU consensus on enlargement based on the three ', namely consolidation, the implementation of specific conditions and communication combined with increased EU ability to integrate new Members into consideration. 
Monday, the morning has had an extraordinary conscience of Eurocontrol, which was agreed on the so-called model of the ' areas '. 
It is already working on it and will report to you on the results of it and report to you on the results of the results that you have already worked on it. 
It is noted that the European Union is a very characteristic and unique model built mainly on democracy and the coexistence of the peoples of the European Union. 
Our concern is that the differences in the treatment of the various professional activities must be removed in the light of the well-developed developments both at the level of organisation and of the sport of labour and the mechanisms of work or production. 
We need tools that we need our process, we need instruments, and we need instruments, tools that are necessary. 
I would like to congratulate the Court of Auditors on the fact that it is the right panel for this institution, as well as the progress that has been achieved in its work every year, but also to remind that we must do our work in this regard. 
As researchers, scientists, scientists, the creation of policies, workers in the Czechs, consumers and citizens, are employed. 
We should accept the facts to accept the facts, in fact, the facts of accepting the facts. 
They are forwarding a limited future in which the free movement of data is complex in shoulders where the large business is allowed to foresee innovation and in which Internet providers are becoming firmers. 
It must be simplified, as this will make our agriculture more competitive, thereby maintaining and creating jobs and contributing to the sustainable development of rural areas. 
in writing. - MEPs have received more than 400 petitions on the occasion of widespread commercial practices applied by some companies of companies ' publications, which concern thousands of mainly small businesses in the European Union. 
The charter and meat come to new historical corridors and, while there are at least 2 % increase in cereal production, the prices of these goods will continue to rise. 
I support the call for the Commission to submit a proposal for legislative amendments to both measures, this does not mean automatic support for the Commission 's proposal. 
The judges, apart from being required to be experts in their local law, which is sufficiently complicated in itself, must be obliged to have similar knowledge. 
Barroso committed itself by 3 % of investment in research and development investment in research and development investment in research and development. 
The work on the monitoring map and we support the construction of the country, including in sensitive areas such as legal order and governance of borders, and we are also in favour of building the state. 
It must clearly be clear, but it must be clear that the European Commission 's negotiating mandate must be strictly limited within the Community acquis to ensure that in future ACTA will not mean yet a fresh plant in a treaty '. 
There is no guarantee of purchases in the Netherlands, that it is used to enjoy good protection, but when purchasing online purchases, often from foreign shops, that protection is not guaranteed or is doubtful. 
We are considering this as part of the development of a comprehensive and integrated energy policy in the field of energy for Iraq for Iraq, Iraq, for Iraq. 
The debate is based on the position of the European Court of Auditors ' position, on the basis of the European Court of Auditors ' position. 
It is to condemn the terrible murder of the horrific murders committed by fanatics. 
Parties seem to be a little bit, but they are full of concrete initiatives, but they are full of concrete initiatives, with concrete initiatives, but they are full of concrete initiatives. 
We do not deal with the power of supermarkets in this area, we will not have a solution to have a solution. 
I know why, but I understand, but I understand that some of the large groups in this House were not prepared to face up to the Brazilian ambassador that was last week in Brussels. 
The modern acquis communautaire is one of the EU 's objectives. 
It is that the criteria of the criteria for determining the areas in a more disadvantaged situation are being arbitrarily complaceng. 
Above all, the creation of, above all, to promote interoperability has been created. 
However, including soya and technology, which can also be used for civil and military purposes, is considered to be technological products with dual use. 
It is also a me to take into consideration and to adopt the democratic process in Poland and in France with a supplementary meaning of this kind. 
part of the European Neighbourhood Policy has already had an initiative aimed at this region : Black Sea Synergy '. 
rapporteur for the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, I particularly note that the country made progress in 2009 and that the Commission proposed to define the date of opening negotiations. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, it is late and I will try to be brief, but not because the problems are less important than that there are problems. 
I would like to draw this attention to this because, as you know, the European External Action Service Treaty is to include the officials of the Commission, the Council and the diplomatic services of the Member States, the Council and the Member States ' diplomatic services. 
In this way, we are saving the money of European taxpayers ' money on the crucial lives of dictators to undermine their peoples and, at the same time, our own citizens live in a tunnel. 
We are guilty, recipient evidence and not materials drawn up by pressure groups that use climate change to pursue their own objectives or politicians, who use climate change to justify the existence of the European Union. 
Indeed, effective practices should be truly effective to prevent vicious practices in order to prevent vicious practices. 
Therefore, the creation of a monitoring mechanism and evaluation is very important if we want to gain the support of the citizens of the Member States ' Member States ' citizens. 
Air transport between the EU and Canada is very important for the future of the future of the two parties ' relations between the two parties. 
It is something that this is a regulation, not a directive, but not a directive, but not a directive, but not a directive. 
It is also to be welcomed, the Ukrainians must be improved, but they can count on us, ready to help them and help them, and we will see what this will lead to in the longer term. 
However, lending to loans and their attacks were based on the basis of the derivatives. 
I, of course, wish you every critical success in all your efforts to convince both sides. 
It is regrettable that it must be regrettable for this to be regrettable. 
The Commission clearly shows how sensitive these issues are, therefore, why if Parliament approved the proposed legislative resolution tomorrow, the Commission will fulfil its commitment from the framework agreement and will respond to the resolution in a route deadline. 
South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South Sudan and and South South South South South South South Sudan and and South South South South South South South South South South South South South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan and South Sudan Sudan Sudan Sudan and South Sudan South Sudan South Sudan South Sudan and South Sudan South Sudan South Sudan South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South Sudan and South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South South 
financial sector is interconnected with the Romanian sector, it is a financial sector that is interconnected with the Indian dynamic sector. 
It is advisable to give the authorities of the right to issue their own certificates for the airline product, thereby avoiding duplicating the duplication of assessments carried out by the authority of exporters. 
It will contribute to preventing a number of budgetary transfers, transfers, and will contribute to preventing a number of budgetary transfers, to the prevention of a number of budgetary transfers. 
It is particularly important, because we are debating a regulation this evening, whose measures are expected by thousands of actors in real conditions, in real conditions, in real conditions. 
contrary to the principle of transparency and limits Parliament 's role, which is still controlling the control function of the principle of transparency and limits the role of Parliament, which still has controls in place. 
They can receive part of the data of our passengers, but in three conditions, in three conditions, there can be a part of the data of our passengers, but in three conditions, in three conditions. 
My request, Commissioner, is the Union to use all its energy and authority to ensure that Member States as a whole adapt their legislation to international law. 
It is a denial of refusal to access the market for 14 years to the market for 14 years to be granted to the market. 
It is important consideration, because energy security is completed in the consumer or rather with the energy bill and whether it can pay it to it. 
Thank you very much for your attention, for your attention, for many attention, for your attention. 
The European Union has clear provisions concerning the immunity of MEPs and the fall of the immunity, which is why there must be a vote on them. 
I believe that we are now witnessing the result of a continued aspiration - part of the historic process of European integration - because human rights, democracy, democracy and the rule of law are part of the substance of European integration, which is of historical importance. 
discharge of the Commission is about the discharge of the Commission. 
minutes of the previous sitting : see Minutes 
It has also been discussed with the Commission and the Council, and it was also discussed with the Commission and the Council, and was discussed with the Commission and the Council. 
We must urgently establish what the Member States are facing in the implementation of the directive, and the difficulties for the professionals themselves themselves themselves are urgently faced with. 
Implementation in these Member States is also a matter of equality and non-discrimination within Europe, because the exclusion of these two countries would send out an absolute signal to their population, which has a great wish to join the area of free movement. 
My own country - Finland - is ready to propose its own national national strategy for Roma general use of the Roma. 
There is a lot of opportunities to be used for green investment and policies, such as elements that favour economic recovery and stability. 
I must summarise the debate, in conclusion, I would say that the European Union budget is actually very big in fact. 
However, it is about imports, however, that the compliance of our own rules can hardly be controlled, and it can be controlled. 
This case, the European Union directive and its internalisation is clearly failing ; the entry into conflict with natural laws and will have a significant negative impact on the insurance industry. 
It is permanent control of the dioxins, division of the sludge - I believe it is necessary to clean up the feedingstuffs of the EU in the territory of the whole EU, a better protection of agricultural producers who are not able to prevent the repercussions of such negligence and criminal schemes in feed chain. 
On the other hand, such security measures will enable a thorough analysis, which is impossible to be made at the borders, on the other hand, to be made. 
Madam President, this is indeed good news, but it is really good news, but it is really good news. 
For this reason, I supported this report for this reason, I supported this report. 
In the same period, all trade barriers in terms of agricultural production and fishing must be gradually removed, thus enabling free trade in food products. 
I believe that the case of German is a German problem, it is that the case of the Operation is a German problem. 
- ( IT ) I accept your invitation to your invitation to your invitation, I accept your invitation to your invitation, and I agree. 
( vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote 
The Union mobilised all the existing political instruments to support the Western Balkan countries in their aspirations to reform and regional cooperation and regional cooperation. 
It is the service to establish by taking into account the roles and cooperation between the Commission, the Council and Parliament and to be based on mutual trust and will for cooperation. 
Ladies and gentlemen, we support the Tunisians, and support the Tunisians, to support the Tunisians. 
It is also the need for a new integrated Community strategy, which will go further than 27 national plans, to go further than 27 national plans. 
Europe and the European Union arise as a peaceful project and now arise through the longest peaceful period in their history. 
Let me comment on the reports in one way that I am one of trying to focus on the substance in order to save time. 
I believe that the European Union, and the Commission, must support their common commitment to the objectives, the reform process and the strategy for adapting to local and health systems of the Global Fund. 
This way, I think, has been somewhat inconsistent between the passengers who reserve their flights through a tourism agency and those who reserve their biotics on the Internet ; that is, in my opinion, another matter that we must decide. 
My fellow Members that they supported this report that they supported this report that they supported this report. 
It is right that the EU is monitoring all the actions aimed at delaying those who openly criticise the mistakes of government officials ' mistakes. 
The vote vote : : : : : : : vote vote vote vote : : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote 
I would like to stress this that, by reducing the administrative burden on micro-entities, we must not violate the conditions for fair competition at the internal markets of the Member States, nor on the European Union market. 
President of the Council. - ( SV ) Mr President, thank you for the points expressed, thank you for the views that are really essential. 
There are differences in the events in Libya, where dialogue was replaced by military aggression and so far has become impossible to find a peaceful solution to the conflict. 
Your initial proposal is not perfect, it is not an ideal proposal, but your initial proposal, but is not perfect. 
Exploiting explanations of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote. 
Development aid ( CFP ) has played and will continue to play a role in critical terms in supporting our efforts to partners to address the crisis. 
Of course, we also want it, and that is precisely because we need concrete objectives in the social field and employment in the social field and employment sector, we also want, of course, precisely because we need concrete objectives in the social field and employment. 
We are with the rapporteur that companies must have freedom of establishment within the single market and can move their seats from one country to another country in another country. 
It is good that it will be good to succeed in reaching agreement on the amendments before the vote on Wednesday to have a complete unity throughout the Chamber. 
However, I agree with the fact that the Centre has not fully implemented its obligation to send a body to the body to decide on the implementation of the budget, a short, accountable, in the 2009 Directoratefor the number of domestic audits. 
The dynamic and diverse civil society and cultural society and media environment has developed dynamic and diverse civil society and diversity. 
At the same time, it will help to limit Europe 's dependence on energy imports, which is equally important, as we have recently seen during the crisis of natural gas. 
It is my opinion that Member States must be obliged to exchange the information contained in the dossier of correlation discretion - and I believe that the European Media Media System ( RROM ) is a definitive step forward in this front - to prevent the perpetrators of certain crimes from being able to enter connection with children, and hence to improve victims - not only during the investigation but after the last trial and not the conclusion of the trial of the judicial process. 
In the light of five of the seven coasts, films, many types of cycles and various important marines of marine hospitals. 
There are three associations : Norway, Iceland and Switzerland ; Liechtenstein must be made a fourth fourth. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
As they are under, as they are under the name of their name, the LTTENis mainly used for commercial purposes. 
This is simply what we need to do to do. 
It is the case of this text, which has just been explained very well by all the Members from all the parties and which concerns all third-country nationals who are legally living - I would highlight - in Europe. 
( FR ) Madam President, I share the satisfaction of all the Members of today 's debate and I would like to focus on territorial cohesion. 
It is that it is not all mentioned that 2 October will be one of the most important candidates throughout the EU history, and this will be during the Swedish Presidency. 
The economic, financial and banking crisis has been affected by the economic, financial and banking crisis, has been affected by the economic, financial and banking crisis. 
It is so important to continue to combat the trafficking of people who take advantage of unplaying and the difficulties that immigrants wish to go through in Europe. 
As Iraq and Egypt, it was a political regime, even on the standards of the Middle East, but also in the standards of the Middle East, it was secular, even in socio-economic liberal regime, even a liberal regime, even. 
There are two motions for resolutions on the basis of a resolutionallegations based on Article ( 5 ) and Article ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) ( 2 ) of the Rules of Procedure. 
year year year Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon : the Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership inPartnership Partnership inPartnership Cooperation Partnership AcPartnership AcPartnership AcPartnership AcPartnership Partnership AcPartnership Lisbon action partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Partnership Cooperation Partnership Partnership ( debate Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon year Lisbon year Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon year Lisbon year Lisbon year year Lisbon year Lisbon year following Lisbon year following Lisbon Lisbon : : : : : : following following following Lisbon Lisbon following Lisbon Lisbon following following following following Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon following following Lisbon Lisbon : : : : : following following following following Lisbon Lisbon Lisbon following following following Lisbon : : : : : following following following following following following following following Lisbon Lisbon : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : the the the Partnership the Partnership the the partnership the Partnership the the the the partnership the partnership the Partnership the Partnership the the the the the the the the the Hthe Hthe Partnership the Partnership the Hthe Hthe Hthe Hthe Hthe Partnership the Hthe Partnership Partnership the Hthe Hthe Partnership Partnership inininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininininin( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( debate ( ( ( ( ( ( ( debate ( 
It is aimed at improving passenger rights in bus and coach transport - a ambition I welcomed, by voting in favour of it. 
It is to see how Mr Mubarak can play another legal role in this transition, apart from withdrawing without withdrawal. 
However, it puts all the issues of immigration into immigration and inclusion, under the leadership of the Commissioner for Social Affairs, as these are social issues of social inclusion. 
It is in a dispute with the objective of territorial cohesion, where Member States are developed balanced by a geographical perspective - an objective set out in the Treaty of Lisbon. 
We are critical of the Russian side in the gas dispute between Russia and Ukraine and in the conflict between these two countries, and in the conflict between these two countries. 
governments are putting over them and what the government has proposed, and what the government has proposed is often being implemented in parliament. 
I will receive written reply to a written reply to a written reply. 
The right explanation is the main concern and fair criticisms that, unfortunately, is not at the expense of the questions and that is why it remains largely without value. 
The fact that consumption is the main characteristics of consumer society is the main chain of consumer society. 
It is actually a reality of the Presidency to make it easier, and it should be thus assessed in this way. 
It is that we are largely in this regard, but we still have to do a lot to do, but we still have a lot to do. 
The UN Human Rights Act needs new legal instruments for the permanent monitoring of the unrestraint violations of human rights and for rapid response in emergency situations, which arise as a result of the political situation in the world ( Egypt, Egypt, Iran ). 
It is, in short, short and short, a short one is short of the same. 
The citizens have benefited a significant benefit from agriculture in the form of food security, environmental protection, the fight against climate change, maintaining rural municipalities and support families of farmers ' families. 
( LT ) Madam President, I would like to congratulate my fellow Member and thank him for their cooperation in the preparation of this important report. 
Parliament 's work, a large proportion of which was done on the urgency, but I would stress the contribution by the Socialist Group in the European Parliament, which has had to receive greater recognition at the right time. 
This is being resorted to various bailouts for saving - appalling - and now everything is courageous in European economic governance. 
Member of the European Parliament, which has always given particular attention to the issues relating to preventing crime, security and police cooperation, I recognise the crucial importance of Europol to create safe European territories and prevention in Europe, and the need to strengthen various levels, including those that are now under discussion. 
The entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon in December 2009, the European Investment Bank has become instrument to support the European Union 's external policies and, at the same time, important partners in the way important partner to mobilise the Union 's economy. 
Without this, it is not certainly difficult to maintain independence and intrusive in the field of humanitarian activity and it is difficult to maintain independence and intrustworking in humanitarian activity. 
The Commission 's proposal for a regulation on the creation of this service is considered in the Community institutions. 
Their or freight were delayed or not all the transported, by which they have suffered large and small businesses and SMEs have also been made. 
The additional parliamentary mandions that Sweden and other Member States will receive if the Treaty of Lisbon enters into force, representatives of the forthcoming elections for the European Parliament and then receive the status of observers in Parliament. 
In the Arab world, showed that the direction followed up until now in the neighbourhood policy has proved wrong to be wrong. 
I see the letter for tabling the Correspondence of the Commissioner : I am sure that his draft draft is complete and ready to present to the Committee on Budgets. 
The estimates of almost EUR million have been estimated, which is close to around EUR million, close to % of Romania 's GDP, % of Romania 's GDP, of Romania 's GDP. 
Ferl would have to know this, and hearing should be aware of this, be aware of this. 
We urgently appeal and restraint and insist on the national authorities of Guinean to carry out a fully investigation into these events and to pass on the responsible justice justice. 
It is necessary to conclude with the Doha Round in Doha immediately, and we need to conclude with the Doha Round at the moment. 
It is not the EU 's discrepancy that has been put in place the powers of the Member States in this area, but, at the same time, refused to give up financial resources to the activities of the activities. 
It is certainly true that this Commission 's demand came too late and that it proposes less things than was possible than was possible. 
In the perspective, I see how the city continues to grow on the basis of well-allocated and well-controlled funds. 
He has also stated that the Commission should start to examine the possibility of Eurobonds - finally, I would say, I would say, finally, that I would say. 
I understand why Brussels must impose protection for the unusually unusually in Lapland and in Andry who coincide to the last secret secret. 
To this end, I hope that Member States will make a real commitment to improving the existing conditions and infrastructure to ensure that disabled people and persons with reduced mobility are provided services that meet their needs. 
Specifically specific tasks of the service are appointed through other legislative acts, through other legislation, through other legislation. 
A more in-depth analysis of the current obstacles to the entry of the entry into the entry of the entry, and the current obstacles to the entry of the entry into force of the entry. 
The Commission is responsible and we ask the Council, which is not present here, to respond to the expectations of European citizens in terms of nuclear safety in Europe 's nuclear safety. 
It is during a economic crisis, the EU is in order to put into place an agency for each problem. 
The joint is is is the joint debate on : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : is on : : : : : : : : : : : is on : : : : : : : : : is is the debate on : : : : : : : : : : : : is the joint debate on : : : : : : : is the debate on is the debate on : : : : : : : is is the debate on is. : is is. : is is. : is is. : is is is is. : is is is is. : is is. : is is is. : is is is is is is is. : is is is is is. : is is is is is is. : is is is is is is is is is is is. : is is is is. : is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is. : is is is is is is is is is is is is. : : is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is is : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : is is is is is is 
Product and characteristics of collective agricultural or forestry tractors ( vote ) 
For this reason, this fair criticism is the aims of the bank, the aims of the bank are criticisms. 
We have also managed to agree that we need to increase the role of the governing authorities and, especially of the supervisory authorities, including internal supervision in companies, including internal and external supervision. 
An amendment, one amendment, an amendment, an amendment, an amendment, a change that is being tabled. 
The conditions are provided in the Treaty of Lisbon and the mechanism for closer cooperation and I would like to point out that we have made the necessary warnings about their consequences. 
There are still serious distinction in the various EU countries in terms of the health of the population 's health of the people, yet to be considered by the various EU countries. 
We know the importance of Serbia is of taking a positive commitment ( the same applies to Croatia ), so that this country can maintain its integrity and carry out the necessary reforms and carry out the necessary reforms. 
I also contributed to providing almost unanimous ratification of the treaty, at least in Croatia, at least in Croatia. 
It was not involved in this work, because of the lack of guarantee ; it was not that it has taken the right to participate, because the rule has changed. 
However, I would like to make it quite clear that our goal is to work with the European Commission to ensure that the Schengen area is normally and in the best interests of our citizens, without giving the punishments of people with criminal intentions. 
Thank you for your efforts made, thank you for your efforts made, for your efforts made, for your efforts, for your efforts. 
A system is also far from satisfaction, particularly as regards the continuing repression of political parties other than the ruling, as well as the repression of various religious groups, and the repression of various religious groups. 
You say so high that you say that you are going on to destroy many of the voices of our foreign ministers, sometimes so high, that we hear not Holine Kalininja, but are the hunger of Catherine Ashton. 
The development of new economies and the balance between countries and their investment capacity and their investment capacity between the countries and their investment capacity. 
It is necessary to speed up the process of reviewing Directive on package travel travel, just as we need, on the one hand, to provide ourselves with ourselves. 
These measures are being driven in the procedures and sanctions procedures and chain these measures. 
Member States are responsible for the state of their finances and problems must be resolved in the countries where they are emerging. 
With regard to the standards of emissions from large combustion plants, I believe that the report has failed to fail. 
1997 and 2000, Commissioner, Romania is ' 9, 9 children, 9 children, 9 children. 
Unfortunately, ten years after the first implementation of the Statute relating to the post of the post of the Street, this is the new blind recipe for which it is in danger of turning into a light of weakening for the European economy. 
The port in Papua New Guinea is being revised in the waters created by operators from the countries concerned, with the only aim of making full use of my discharge from my duties provided by the EU during this interim agreement. 
It is being said that the Commission will indeed keep its promise to prepare not just a report but a real legislative proposal, but a real legislative proposal. 
I would like to focus one example : energy security : energy security : energy security : energy security, energy security : energy security, energy security, energy security. 
We are also making sure that the financial markets that we need to work again in the service of the real economy, not just on the contrary, as has happened in the last 15 years. 
I would like to draw attention to the fact that in 2006, the EU reformed the common organisation of the market for banana in 2006. 
So, we are not representing one country or one area, or one area : we represent all of Europe 's position. 
The European Union must necessarily intervene as soon as possible and we are looking forward to the Commission to draw up a comprehensive strategy as you, as you, Baroness Ashton, have shown, and, on the basis of it - the power of intervention, power of intervention. 
Let us be frank, let us be frank, at the same time, too, be frank. 
We are still receiving a lot of thousands of euros through the bases for general expenditure every month, without any reporting requirements in question in question, with regard to the amount in question. 
It does not provide a mechanism in their constitution that people would express their dissatisfaction, then faced with a revolution and violence that leads to this. 
It is that we have not set it up to us alone. 
It will not be completely perfect again, but it should be provided that a stable basis should be provided on a stable basis, but it should be a stable basis, but it should be provided that a stable basis. 
A country that has been refused to free trade and new export opportunities will not be easier to respond to the commitments and requirements that we are setting to it. 
( HU ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, thank you for my opportunity to speak on behalf of the Hungarian delegation of the European People 's Party of China. 
Mr Ffor taking the responsible role and wish him every success in achieving the ambitious objectives. 
It is in the interests of the younger generation of Switzerland and, of course, of young people in the countries that are going to be involved in schools, as part of the CoR programme - regional partnerships ' or in individual partnerships between schools, as well as the Erasmus programme. 
In accordance with Rule 123 of the Rules of Procedure, the Rules of Procedure will be transferred to the relevant adoption and will be published in the texts adopted at the meeting of 18 May 2010. 
At the very time, when the cooperation proposed will depend on the elections, it was stated quite clearly and for some time that the elections would be at least partly radically radically rather frankly, precise and free. 
It is that a billion people still hunger, most of them in the least developed countries ( NRS ), in other words - the poorest countries in the world. 
In terms of our work with the Council of Ministers, in view of the agreements and in the second reading, this is possible. 
It is being read in this dossier, I think that the Andean Community is possible to continue forward on the basis of the agreement, but I would be pleased to provide more detailed information through our services. 
As you said, the situation in Ukraine is not easy, the situation in Ukraine is not easy. 
Europe 's citizens and all of us all this is part of the added value that the European Union offers, which the European Union offers. 
How much it is going to save, its duty will continue to increase - all the more so if wages, unemployment and pensions are to be reduced, and public investment in infrastructure, education, health and households must be reduced. 
It is to focus on this issue in order to keep the sense of solidarity in our society in our society in the future in the future. 
It is crucial that, in order to ensure that not only we survive, we will survive, but we will also flourish, it is crucial that Member States fulfil the commitments and promises that have already taken on the table. 
I would stress the importance of preventing diagnosis and early intervention in the initial decline of the disease. 
There is limits, but there is also potential, and the initiative is also a real and important step towards supporting democracy in order to support democracy. 
The same thing should also be applied on the Internet, and the Internet should also be applied. 
It will become the world 's major international financial institution - the most important global financial force in the world - the most important financial power in terms of financial power. 
Terrorism is five elections being earmarked ? 
The authorities who must work in the pensions and, in fact, all social issues are the national or local authorities, rather than we, not we. 
It is also why there is no effect that the measures already taken to stabilise the financial sector already, but if there is such, it is not satisfactory. 
It is also stressed the fact that we need to compete on a global market, and we must therefore be concerned about the competitiveness of our maritime transport sector, while looking for more sustainable transport. 
There are also other serious consequences, and there are also serious consequences for other serious consequences, that have been serious consequences. 
It is to adopt policies that are being saved, especially in good times, so that we can have them in bad times times times. 
After all, 20 % to 40 % of global production of industrial alike is illegal sources of illegal sources of CO2. 
on behalf of the GUEGroup. - ( NL ) I am pleased that the Commission has taken the initiative to review the Animal Protection Directive used for scientific purposes. 
I am astounding to me why stronger and more comprehensive social rights are mainly seen as a problem as a problem. 
The Union guarantees freedom of expression and information in Article 11 of the Charter of Fundamental Rights and Article 10 of the European Convention on Human Rights. 
We are waiting for us to see with interest in how you will coordinate policy within the new Commission with your unique position to make two positions. 
In this connection, the Commission has once again made clear that it really intends to review all the existing acts of the period before the Treaty of Lisbon as part of the conformity in accordance with and come up with new proposals to the two legislative bodies : Parliament and the Council : Parliament and the Council. 
on economic and financial issues ( ESDP ) approved these principles and acknowledges the need to promote them as broad geographical plan as possible. 
This is the measure of the murdered wars where it had also been involved and the brutal impact on neighbouring countries and the international community has had adverse repercussions on the country and people in general. 
However, the next few months focus on the whole decision-making process will be on you, because a common position will have to be agreed on a common position. 
rapporteur. - The rapporteur proposes to welcome this communication as a methodology ' and calls for further analysis, the collection of data, dialogue and concrete proposals, and concrete proposals. 
It is necessary for all the Member States and all the regions of the Union, not only in the new Member States, to be in a position to invest and implement projects in these sectors and to implement projects in these sectors. 
It is not and will not immediately become the complete federation or even in traditional confederation, either in traditional confederation. 
The Commission asked for information from the Bulgarian authorities to convince whether the special intelligence funds are used to be properly used. 
I call on the European institutions to define the relevant priorities and to give their maintenance to the creation of public services, by providing a firm commitment on the part of the future government of Haiti. 
The report is more critical and, unfortunately, with the very significant progress of Turkey, particularly in matters relating to the freedoms of citizens and the judicial system. 
Parliament : see Minutes 
We are told that Parliament has been very well aware and that everything was clearly and transparent, the way in which the initiative was taken does not make us a good impression of negotiations that are taking place at the same time with other negotiations in the WTO. 
The European Union for the Association Council welcomes the new measures for Gaza and the West Bank of Luxembourg, characterised by Mr Neryalovsky, on the Association Council, the European Union welcomes the new measures for Gaza and the West Bank. 
In view of the increasing demand for transplantation in the European Union and the imbalances between the number of waiting for transplantation patients and the number of donations must aim to avoid the commercialisation of organ donation and stop the illegal trade in organs with authorities. 
It often affects the lives of European citizens in a poor way, and its institutions are difficult to understand. 
I am concerned that it is still necessary for a agricultural budget that will allocate its funds fairly and focus on regions such as Madeira and the Azores, which are faced with continuous difficulties because of their removal and isolation, small, small, climate and geographical location, and therefore, must receive continual support. 
Unfortunately, compared to men, in European women, there is four more likely to work in full unemployment time, employment and often forms part of their economy, characterised by a lack of employment contracts. 
I would like to ask the Commission to comment on the recent legislative changes in the Member States in terms of the joint judgments of the European Court of Justice Joint Undertaking. 
It is also the fact that the creation of and promotion of jobs have become a priority in these crisis times and our desire to move forward with education and training measures. 
They must also take initiatives and learn citizens that they must defend their privacy ; as we are concluding and despite our housing, we must ensure that the security of their electronic devices and their means of communication with the world. 
I am, in particular, in particular, by the declarations on the Structural Funds and cohesion policy declarations, and I am in particular, of the declarations on the Structural Funds and Cohesion Policy. 
Do I accept that your answer mean that your response means that you do not believe that the party of Mr Stosmussing is needed to ban Mr Strichet 's party - the President of the Bulgarian Socialist Party, for whom you have expressed your high personal value in terms of the work that he has done ? 
Vaccing statements made by prosecutors and different liberals are adopted for truth, false statements made by prosecutors and different lines are accepted. 
The fundamental common values of universality, access to high quality healthcare, equality and solidarity, include fundamental common values of universality and solidarity. 
We can leave the People 's Organisation of Nagoya in Iran ( PMOI ) from the list of terrorist organisations or we can stop the transitional treaties between Iran and the Member States of the EU and the candidate countries and Iran. 
Many very favourable points in these Economic Partnership Agreements and I am pleased that I was able to vote in favour of this report. 
Measures very courageous and political will, because they are located on various interests and many money in their own economy. 
It is a huge challenge for us, for us, is a huge challenge for us, is a huge challenge for us. 
In maritime transport, there will be rights similar to those set out in European legislation on travel with aircraft and trains. 
( DE ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the Temporary Committee on Climate Change has done a very good job on climate change. 
It is evident that genetically modified organisms are safe, must be strong and the public must have full confidence that the authorities are taking all the necessary safeguards and are carrying out tough tests. 
I also vote in favour of this resolution, because it recommends that the arbitration agreement between Croatia and Slovenia on the border and progress made in the resolution of other bilateral disputes, such as border disputes with Serbia, Montenegro and Bosnia and Herzegovina is recommended to be implemented. 
It was a strong political message by the European Parliament for the human rights expressed seriously within Europe, but also beyond its borders beyond its borders. 
In no way does it mean an increase in Parliament 's budget or the European budget or the European budget, in all, not in any way mean an increase in Parliament 's budget. 
It is trying to make sure that the implementation of this legal measure and its implementation at national level will not result in bureaucratic difficulties or even abuse of third countries outside the European Union 's borders. 
We can exclude the possibility of one of the consequences of the repression being shown by the Tibetan citizens who will be forced to take emergency measures. 
It is an extremely important issue that we expect in the autumn European Commission to propose a special directive on which we are expecting in the autumn European Commission to propose a special directive. 
I would leave the petitioner 's contribution to the petitioner to decide whether to abandon the right to privacy or confidentiality or on both. 
This is also the principle that is based on now on, and in the future, my efforts to my efforts, while I am a Commissioner - to offer the same guarantees to passengers the same guarantees to all transport sectors. 
It is important for the stability of the whole region of the Balkans, and we must therefore carry out continuous dialogue with the country at institutional level and we must therefore hold continuous dialogue with the country at the level of institutional level. 
, labelling and packaging of substances and courage ( and brave ) ( 
Trade trade is essential, trade is essential. 
It should be noted that, as these trade vehicles in question are used mainly by SMEs, it is important that their opportunities are also taken into account when the necessary changes are made. 
We must start by the areas where women suffer from their actual health situation - we must examine the situation of those who are concerned, without pay, the work of unemployment and the severe situation of many women who work hard to deal with the needs of the family and with the requirements of career. 
As regards the agricultural sector in the last twenty years, what has actually achieved this constant liberalisation of liberalisation for the last twenty years, what actually achieved this constant liberalisation of liberalisation ? 
The agreement expresses the new institutional relations agreement, the new institutional relations, which are in the same way that the new institutional relations are in place. 
It is also time that it is time for the European Union and the Member States to examine the new issues raised by the challenge of generations. 
Some of our members are forming a union of parties of our members, but we are against the single status, but we are against the single status. 
However, it is possible to give concrete figures, because these children are attributed to prostitution, slavery, forced labour and so on - areas for which there are no accurate data available for these children. 
We must accept the fact that traditional definition of a single market as something as something only limited, economic dimension needs a review needs to be reviewed. 
The official police free of the other day of the other day is not made up of the other day. 
A constitutional area, where % of voters are Catholics, where % of the voters are Catholics. 
The European Union is called on to step up the progress of the global fight against poverty and hunger - around 14, billion people live in extreme poverty, and to speed up the progress of the global fight against poverty and hunger - around 14, billion people live in extreme poverty. 
The programme has formulated strategic initiatives that we are taking on the obligation to table before the end of December. 
It is that Parliament must speak very loud and clear, ladies and gentlemen, ladies and gentlemen, that Parliament must speak very clearly, ladies and gentlemen, and that it must be said to Parliament, ladies and gentlemen. 
It is totally unacceptable for a freely elected member of my group to be compared with a bloody dictator of a bloody dictator. 
on the proposal for a directive on the application of patients ' rights in cross-border healthcare is an attempt to establish a consistent Community framework for providing security to patients in this area in which the guidelines made so far by the European Court of Justice have been made. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this report because I believe it is right and appropriate to defend our satisfaction from the epidemic diseases. 
It has always won the fifth, always wins. 
The Treaty, but we need to be able to improve and even more something more than ever, but we need to have a proper improvement and even more thing. 
It is of priority importance, in view of effective use of all funds, in view of the effective use of all funds, in view of the effective use of all funds. 
The entry of military parts of Saudi Arabia in Bahrain, I would like to highlight the fact that the six countries of the Gulf Cooperation Council have an agreement on collective security among themselves. 
The adoption of any new Member in the EU, including Macedonia, is only possible when all the requirements are met when all the requirements are met and with the clear agreement of the institutions of the EU and of all Member States. 
Mr President, I just want to be useful to be useful in the same way that I just have to be useful. 
At the time of current globalisation, international labour standards are the basis that ensuring that the growth of the global economy is to benefit everyone. 
It would be good if the next Presidency is taking up the problem, giving it the same importance to it, if the next Presidency has given it the same importance. 
It is not that some governments are not interested in the destruction of the rabies or black economy, but should not be an obstacle and should not be allowed to make us tolerate the scandalous shift of forests. 
It is very important news for the sport world and, above all, for the millions of Europeans who have a sport and attractive physical activity. 
policy must also take this into account, too, into account it must take into account. 
Sweden, for example, has a system called the FAD, called the FSS, for example, for example. 
I am very well aware of the consequences of the decisions adopted by credit rating agencies, and of the objection that these decisions may have on investors ' behaviour. 
I expect all respect for your opposition to your opposition to the same respect for the truth, I expect the same respect for the truth, and I expect respect for the truth. 
However, this does not mean that there is no thing to do in the meantime, in the meantime, that will not mean that there is any thing to do in the meantime. 
The United Kingdom is declining the United Kingdom of workers from outside the outside. 
There was a debate recently followed by confirming that this issue, the Internet will be present on the future agenda of the G8. 
The waste reduction initiative to minimum, and if the results of research and development results allow further recycling, because we devote great importance to the principle of regression. 
We therefore believe that the Commission and the Council must once again examine procedural rights in the current new scenario in which we are in the current new scenario today. 
As always, it is a matter of effective monitoring and control, and it is a matter of effective monitoring and control, as always, of effective monitoring and control. 
I therefore support the opinion of the Committee on Fisheries, which wants to end the derogation in the review of the agreement we are discussing. 
Those compensation promised to farmers without providing reliable funding to rural development programmes. 
We are aware that the common problem is not yet resolved yet by the common problem, but we are aware that the general problem is not yet resolved. 
In my opinion, there is a basis in the basis of the Treaty of Lisbon, in my opinion, the basis of the Treaty of Lisbon, in the basis of the Treaty of Lisbon, in the basis of Lisbon Treaty. 
A necessary condition is required to reflect the Serbia 's accession process in today 's time, and it has also affected Croatia and has also affected itself in Croatia. 
Unfortunately, it is not a place for all of us, which is why we need to vote against some of the amendments to the resolution. 
I would like to see more products than my region to apply to the GCC, and I hope that the Commission will adopt some of the proposals to simplify the application procedure for the application of the application procedure to have greater numbers of applications from my region in Northern Ireland. 
The second reading proposed for the second reading, generally guaranteeing improvement in terms of passenger rights in collective car, which we support. 
Of 20 million of the billion projects of the billions of euro projects, 20 million of the billions of europrojects. 
It is already withdrawing out of weeks outside the European institutions on the question of what needs to be done to help Greece and the euro area and to help Greece and the euro area. 
On the Environment, Public Health and Food Safety, we adopted a number of agreements with a large majority of agreements with a large majority of agreements with a majority of majority agreement. 
In a limited budget, I believe that the fund is extremely important, as it establishes the principle of attracting private capital in a model of public partnership, rating to the funds that we already have - the Cohesion Fund and others - and it is in the reserve that could attract money, rather than money by loan by borrowing them through the development of large projects ; that must be a rather specified fund that I think that is all about. 
They are, unfortunately, as happened with Manuel Roxana Robin Roxana, as has unfortunately been said, also with Manuel Roxana Roxana. 
That is not the case, it is not the case that it is not. 
( PL ) Mr President, this is a very important topic, but also a very sensitive subject, but also a very sensitive subject, too, is a very important subject, but also a very sensitive subject. 
The ' Trade Party plays a central coordinating role in measures to ensure the consistent nature of EU policies and their compliance with the 2009 communication, and I am ready to support this coordinated role under the commitment made by my precedential precedents. 
We have quite some similar views about how we need to act unity, while respecting our differences, while respecting our differences. 
It is essential that Bulgaria take some additional measures, namely the preparation of a special plan with action to be carried out at the moment in the Schengen area and also of a joint approach ( between Greece, Turkey, Bulgaria and Bulgaria ), so that the country can respond to possible increase the migratory pressure. 
I therefore hope that tomorrow, Members will be ready to face up to the challenge of this very important legislative package for Parliament, which, for the first time, has been in their history of colegislators ' history, precisely just as the Council. 
I do not like to have the opportunity to give the floor to Members on matters of such important, but you are also right to say that this would require an amendment to our Rules of Procedure. 
They are waiting to be faced with the court 10 years to be faced with 10 years of time for the sake of being faced with. 
tomorrow, Thursday, 25 November 2010 will take place, 25 November 2010, of 1200, at 1200, at 12. 
As the major structural structures and the regulatory reform of the financial sector must be carried out, but the current situation can only be improved by creating incentives, as well as through radical and comprehensive policies for modernisation and targeted investment. 
For this reason, I would like to ask all my fellow Members to show a sense of measure and political promises of vision and of political pronouncement in these discharge. 
The CAP can continue to work for European citizens and to meet their needs, it must receive strong support, and that of course means a strong budget. 
It is being placed, the producers of electrical and electronic equipment must be more actively involved in the collection and recycling system, but we can not release citizens from any responsibility for waste generating. 
I call for the simplification of the fundamental principle and abstained on the vote on the simplification of the fundamental principle and abstained on the voting principle. 
We are a regulation and a ordinary legislative procedure and we await the consultations with the European Council and the Member States on these matters. 
In Copenhagen, it is also the EU that must play a vital role in the negotiations on a comprehensive and ambitious and ambitious global agreement to combat climate change. 
It is to assess what has been achieved in this House - on the question of micro-creditation to deal with the violence of racial foundation - and all these issues must have a comprehensive strategy. 
It is a problem that is causing concern in the EU countries, which is why they must jointly act to find the appropriate solution to this problem. 
149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 
We should improve the framework for economic governance and thus contribute to the sustainable and balanced growth of the Union as a whole as a whole. 
The new Eastern neighbours of the European Union, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Azerbaijan, Georgia, Ukraine, Moldova, Moldova and Belarus, includes new Eastern neighbours of the European Union, Moldova and Belarus. 
Madam President, so far, in which, at the moment, 16 people will be in a hunger, in which, as a voice, to 16 people will be in hunger. 
This is a suppressing idea that the country is still still in internal political chaos in internal political chaos. 
It will often be able, and therefore, to make investments, and trade in all Member States, to be bailed and put to a College and put on board. 
I believe that you welcome, as the Council did, the decision by President Obama to close the Guantánamo Crisis to a year of year in Guantánamo to a year. 
I encourage the Commission not to give up the proposed measures and not to put pressure on the part of the Member States, because only some can be considered an example in these days can only be considered as an example. 
The European Union is participating in the European Union participating in the European Union ? 
Parliament 's greater protection for consumers and the fight against energy poverty is now stored in legislative texts, in Parliament, a great deal of legislation is now stored. 
A programme sets out the criteria for the content and the indicator of the invitation for the invitation of proposals to be made in 2009. 
Specifically speaking about economic governance, but what is it actually actually actually what is it actually representing it, but what is it actually actually going on ? 
There is the following message that is supported by a large majority 's support, which is supported by a large majority 's majority, is supported. 
The findings and calculations for a longer period will reveal the economic situation of both sides, the bilateral improvement in trade balance or contributing to improving the social situation. 
It was encouraged - in 1995, consensus has been reached worldwide, whereby women and men are equal than all the points of view, including political, economic, economic, legal and social, legal and social. 
It method of method of Community method, the Community method, of method, is the Community method. 
The collection of statistical data ; 
Mr Barrot, you have my support, as you ask Parliament, to have, at least from this rapporteur and you have it more than my first report, in my first report. 
We will stand shoulder to shoulder with you so that we prepare the necessary regulation of financial services, so that we prepare the necessary regulation of financial services. 
I hope that the Commission and the Member States will take action on the basis of the proposals included in it, which are based on the proposals that it has included in it, and I hope that the Commission and the Member States will take action on the basis of the proposals included in it. 
They are used on the Internet, how easy it is to false the fingerprints on German registrations and stress that, if the sellings for self-sufficiency are to be reduced to the form of credit cards, the frequency can be digital, which would make it very difficult to rely on biometric data, Lavalussa, would have been a very difficult one. 
They are the exclusive mobilisation of the aid mechanism and global solidarity mechanism, which sends thousands of people to support those affected at the first stage of the emergency situation. 
It is not even a little more luck that Commissioner De Gucht, but instead a prefer to speak with my colleague, I would like to speak with my colleague. 
( FR ) Mr President, 2009, 2009 was undoubtedly the most difficult year for the euro after its introduction, but at the same time the most useful and most useful. 
I welcome well-defined guidelines and concrete measures to protect jobs, ensuring high quality employment throughout Europe. 
prosperity will not come to a new and we therefore expect to further increase the flow of economic migrants leaving North Africa. 
Bosnia Herzegovina and Serbia are thinking of the issue of candidate candidate, and Serbia, are thinking of the issue of candidate candidate candidate. 
To conclude, I would like to mention another important aspect, namely how to make the maritime sector attractive to young people. 
Now that I am meeting with the people who are meeting with tobacco, between the issues they have asked, and what will happen with us ? 
I remind you that % of complaints have been granted in such a way as this is allowed by the complaints that have been made in this way. 
It is advertising climate justice because it concerns relations between developing and developed countries and the will to submit a credible proposal for financing measures and mitigation of the effects and adaptation and the way in which we show our willingness to lead the rest. 
Mrs Vassiliou, it is apologically apologically that he is not present to this debate, but he asked me to pass on his personal thanks to all the rapporteur for everything he did and for the efforts that made to achieve this objective. 
It is Europe not to lose sight, but to repeat and again to remind and insist on the same side, and to insist on Russia firmly and firmly and firmly, to fulfil its duties. 
It is that not all Member States have consular protection and, in many cases, consular protection is very limited, the food structures are inadequate even for the same consular bodies themselves. 
( PL ) The Europe 2020 strategy can not do all we can do here today, and what we are now going through today 's Europe 2020 strategy. 
( EL ) Thank you, Commissioner, for this very detailed response, for this very detailed response, for this very detailed response. 
For example, you are dealing with the situation of railways, it is at the heart of this at airports. 
I have been sitting in this Chamber for the last 10 years and I wonder how we will come to the table, by adopting a regulation after a regulation, which are aiming business and opportunities and, in fact, encouraging business to move beyond the European continent. 
The second global war, when Europe gradually began to accept that the independence of African States is ultimately unavoidable, the Kenyan states was clearly excluded from this, including together with the country that we now know as Zimbabwe. 
We need to develop the 2020 strategy, which enable the market to be conducted in economic recovery, while also making it possible to accept citizens ' acceptance, defending their interests ; on the part of consumers, ensuring their rights ; and on the part of SMEs, by providing them with the right to stimulus. 
We want to increase our efforts in relation to teachers with professional focus, people in the age of rail age and elderly people who are no longer in the education system and which are lagging behind the common development of society. 
It is also my opinion, and I think it is my opinion, my opinion, too. 
I am convinced that this will create differences between Member States and also in terms of the quantity of visa applications. 
There is a lot of the modest atmosphere in many urban atmosphere, and I think that this is showing the need for the European Union to achieve it, and for Turkey to agree with us on the readmission mission. 
Council and Commission on the preparation of the European Council meeting ( October ) ( October ) ( 
I must be inadmirable to repeat this message, I must be able to repeat this message in the near future. 
experiments have already been carried out in several countries, particularly in Latin America, where the prices have been exponentially exponential and quality has deteriorated. 
This is why, in the face of the challenges of the Committee on Employment and Social Affairs, it calls on the authorities to realise that public investment in these areas can not be compensated by private investment, which are also reduced and therefore ensuring the recovery of public finances in the short term. 
It is a concrete step that the citizens of the European Union Member States expect us to expect us to expect us to be a concrete step in the EU Member States. 
The rules proposed on the basis of scientific consultations are simplified compared to existing legislation, and they will facilitate inspection of fighters and reduce the cost of fishermen for fishermen. 
In the territory of one Member State in its various regions, different approaches may be necessary in its various regions, different approaches can be given. 
The competences between the Presidency of the Member States and the President of the European Council will be of great importance to the Presidency of the European Council, and the President of the European Council, of the European Council, to be of great importance. 
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, an extremely careful assessment must be made of the European Council 's request for the opening of negotiations with Japan for the conclusion of a free trade agreement. 
Parliament believes that the adoption of the law on the protection of minors of the harmful impact of public information by the Lithuanian Parliament is clearly an infringement of the treaty. 
Georgia 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I am very pleased that the World Forum Forum on water issues will take place in Istanbul and, most importantly, that the European Union will be involved with its delegation from the Commission and the European Parliament. 
We must regret that such measures are not provided for in place, and we must regret that such measures are not provided for. 
The future must be given particular attention to cohesion policy and structural policy policy, as well as agricultural policy, and it is also necessary to support small and medium-sized enterprises, as Europe will become a sustainable and competitive economy. 
This report, which once again stresses that we must help Moldova to recover economic, taking into account that around 40 % of its economy depends on agriculture. 
Unfortunately, the way the report has been met shows that it did not lead to reconciliation, but even more polarisation. 
On the other hand, a country which still depends on the production of fuel production is facing technological concerns that must be overcome, at the same time reducing emissions emissions, still very much on fuel production, is facing technological transport. 
The Treaty of Lisbon was proposed to the people of Lisbon, one of the arguments was that he would give the European Parliament greater influence to the European Parliament. 
It is that it is precisely the combination of actions to integrate people, and also the ways in which we have to do is what we need to do is what it is leading to strengthening integration and everything it includes. 
It is that the Commission has presented ambitious proposals to keep the economic situation under constant surveillance and that we will also make other proposals if this is to be necessary. 
This is a situation where a Polish prison is sentencing a person who is not in line with the principles of Polish law. 
It is a position that we should strengthen and help consolidate and consolidate ratify. 
The people believe that we will create a parallel system if we have a ' if we have a ' ' for everyone corridor instead of functional national ' ' ', which perhaps should be included. 
It is being seen that in the truth of enlargement, Parliament and the EU institutions are ignored issues of strategic importance to Member States, in the truth of enlargement, and the EU institutions are crucial to Member States. 
We voted in favour of this report by Czech MEP of our political group because we believe that it is of paramount importance : improving energy efficiency through information and communications technologies ( ICT ). 
We must keep the borders on the labour market open, provided that the flow of workers is legitimate and meet the needs of the country concerned. 
For attention, for attention, for attention. 
I voted for the proposal tabled by Parliament to call on the Commission to carry out an impact assessment and analyses of expenditure, the benefits and structure of the European Credit Foundation for credit rating, competences in the various areas of the provision of ratings : the public sector, companies and financial instruments. 
It is the Members who have called for Parliament to take into account the irony of the gratuity of this argument and those who have been presented following the negative leading leading to French flaws, Dutch and Irish. 
Baroness Ashton, let us act swiftly and aim at best results, because this will prove to be an overview of Europe 's very important checking. 
We are on the human rights violations, which we all need to condemn, without exception, and I therefore vote in favour of this resolution and add my voice to those of my fellow Members who urge all the parties to preserve provocaties and abstain from acts of violence. 
to the network to : cross-border exchange of electricity ( 
It also mentions that, so that others can join the EU, we in the EU must be well integrated because then the adoption of new Member States will be effective effectively. 
Social housing is endangering, on the one hand, the provisions relating to state aid, but it is also related to the definition that is used in establishing the eligible expenditure under the Structural Funds. 
Indeed, the European Union is all going on with control and governing the funds, it is doing things under the rules, in fact the European Union itself, and it is doing things under the rules. 
Our new economic architeconomy is in general lines there are in common lines there. 
These may mean changes within the framework of fishing and even to cause disputes with local fishing companies, which use factories to provide a high primary primary proposal for quality fishing in the market. 
The profit and modern development of today 's undividends of the University, but when many streets relating to business and with the focus on profits ( in particular, I think that the art and humanitarian science ( in particular ), it is very important to maintain the balance between the economic and intellectual successes, modern universities to maintain some of their significant academic attacks with their more finance in the past, in particular, in particular, in order to maintain the balance. 
These things are found in the programme, in the programme, in the programme, in the programme. 
The Commission did not take any part in the preparation of the resolution in the preparation of the resolution, in the preparation of the resolution, to the resolution does not take any part. 
With another example of a major issue in the Medicines Agency, which I believe will be able to discuss again. 
The kind of instruments aimed at areas of financial market financial market, is an absolute approach to the correct approach of the financial market, is an absolute approach. 
There is being satisfaction that there is a first result, but it is self-evident, of course, that this is not yet sufficient enough yet. 
At a little bit of bureaucracy and legislation - which has, until recently, still in the development of innovative small businesses - are removed and young people are starting to coincidence the dents of a stable future that we hope is implemented with opportunities. 
I am interested in my portfolio to my portfolio, I will follow the events very carefully. 
I will start by mentioning something that will happen soon - 8 March, because it will be an important day, because it is the International Day of women when Parliament in Strasbourg will be discussing the women 's Charter in Strasbourg. 
There will be global supervision of the financial markets, and there will be global supervision over the financial markets in the financial markets. 
This place has ever been ever going on day, every day, increasingly attractive to the Soviet Union, the Soviet Union. 
Because, direct, times,, ministers, but also the political and diplomatic corps, have done fantastic work. 
I voted in this way in favour of this. 
We are laws on a number of issues, and we are laws on a number of issues, on a number of issues, on a number of issues. 
As the troops were not able to make peace in Afghanistan the same did not have the same well and the money we have been going there. 
We therefore expect recognition of the European ambitions of Georgia, Moldova and Ukraine, to call on the call to press political pressure on these countries. 
The taxpayer should not be forced to pay for the damage to be paid to the taxpayer for the damage to be paid. 
The key emphasis on the debate on State aid for broadcasting is on the table, public broadcasting, and under the definition of each Member State, given the minimum resources that they have and the most important role to work in the public service. 
Turkey, on the part of Turkey, to the Iranian President, invited a conference made to the Sudanese President, who is discouraged for genocide and the relations of the country with Israel, seems to be showing that she is being destroyed by the West. 
Those who are deliberate in terms of the Committee on Petitions are the nature of which dispute is being conducted at local level, what opportunities are created for the development of local economy and, above all, will come back to this later - the uniform implementation of law in the European Union. 
The best ideas, however, as they are attracted, can not be done if there is no sufficient financial resources to do if there is no sufficient financial resources. 
It could have been hidden for years without being returned into court without being returned back to court. 
( PL ) Mr President, I endorse the draft European Parliament 's draft decision on the discharge of the General Secretary-General in respect of the implementation of the budget for the financial year 2007. 
Even the credits made available to the Community funds provided by Community funds provided institutional lever, which may and must fill the gap left to the banks in the wake of the financial crisis, which has already affected the real economy. 
meat will increase by 70 %, imports of poultry meat - by 25 %, with 25 %. 
The fact that some areas of medical standards in countries with high medical standards can be quickly conducted, there is a risk that the poorest Member States of the European Union, who have invested less in health, must pay huge differences of differentiation. 
Human rights are a key element in the EU-Eritrea relations relations. 
I also condemn and reject this double standard and I call on my fellow Members not to give political fire, but to give the answers to those responsible, the Commission and the Hungarian Government the Hungarian Government the evaluation and conclusion of this problem. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
However, what agriculture most needs in future is regulation that will be able to keep up the instability of the markets in some borders. 
There are three sicks of one old and seems that the Netherlands will play a player on fiscal fingerprints and seems to have to play in place. 
I hope that the Commission and the Council will continue along this path, and I hope that the Commission and the Council will continue along this path. 
The European Union 's policy and the future of the European Union depend exclusively on effective democracy, on effective democracy, on the European Union 's policy of EU policy and the future of the European Union, on an effective basis. 
Four reasons, which I consider to be very important and that is why I voted for this report : 1 ) the simplification and rationalisation of procedures in order to facilitate access to finance ; 2 ) the participation of small and medium-sized enterprises, which are essential to growth and employment ; ( 3 ) in the name of a competitive processing industry, which is capable of responding to market challenges ; and 4 ) the financing mechanism, which is currently very good to be achieved by definitive results. 
This crisis must, of course, be reflected in the commitment to the strategy, to convince in the change of model for growth and in the emphasis on economic, social and environmental aspects. 
The word ' is very important for good result in the good result. 
We, the Commission, are ready to do and to make our part in the negotiations and to make our contribution to the negotiations, once, as the ministers decide that sufficient progress has been made. 
We also recognise that there are also cultural differences that sometimes seem unimperniable. 
After all, it calls for the same type of unrisks and neoliberal policies and criteria, the tightening of the true dead, which is being imposed on the Member States without considering the causes of the problems or alternative policies that take into account the different levels of development of the economies of individual countries. 
I believe that we have to say a lot about the issue of Japan on the subject of the issue of Japan. 
The case of Farai Maguwu Maguwu shows the brutal repression in Zimbabwe, and the need to extend the scope of the Kimberley Process. 
We have almost not responded to us, almost in response. 
The Middle East and Africa countries have progressed and they are vital to us in some major areas, including in this of migratory flows, including in this of migration flows. 
I repeat what President Barroso said : that we are very encouraged by the political commitment by Prime Minister Orbán to submit amendments to the law if necessary, if necessary. 
This recommends a safety net and promotes the association of small farmers ' small farmers ' associations and promotes the association of small farmers. 
Those are the ideas I would like to combine before again coming to a certain proposals on the question of insurance for the Poles. 
The informal meeting of the ministers of energy ministers on 6 and 7 September, the Presidency wanted to carry out, common and discuss the first assessments and discuss the first assessments. 
A common labour market for researchers and, it is important to define and establish a common European career model in the field of research, as well as to introduce an integrated information system with proposals for employment and research in the whole of the European Union. 
The proposal to use a minute is much more simply and clear and clearly, and clearly, to use the proposal to use a more simply more clearly and clearly, clearly, to make use of a more open proposal. 
We expect decisions awaiting protection and we must respond to these expectations, precisely now, and not after a few months, but not after a few months. 
This proposal is very important and must be controlled by regulatory authorities in the Member States, and the regulatory authorities in the Member States must be controlled. 
Other facts and other policies that come to the fort, which come to the fort plan, which come to the forward-looking policies. 
Madam President, it seems again that the laws we adopt here, which we are adopting, are not implemented in all Member States, is not implemented in all Member States. 
It also presents its considerations of this, and my considerations on this, and my considerations about this. 
We propose extremely good measures which are fully in the line with the objectives of the European Union 's European Union objectives. 
It is not necessarily the prerequisite for maintaining employment, but also for the young people, but also for those who are on the labour market, but no longer have jobs, is necessarily a condition for Europeans to be able to reach their confidence to our public model. 
The European Asylum Support Office is an extremely important step towards establishing a common European asylum system, as provided for in the European Asylum and Immigration Office and in the Stockholm Programme. 
It claims to say that only 27 in 2008, it was allocated to 27, million people, million people, in 2008. 
They have cooperated very well and I believe that the result is also good and the result is good and the result, and the result is good, too. 
It is important that it is more democratic in the process of acquisition acquired in the years when the old FP7 has applied, and the fact that economic governance has become more democratic than involving the European Parliament throughout the monitoring process. 
There is no regret to be them, but the system is simply too unsustainable, but it is just too unsustainable. 
My region, the Greens, this is considered to be a victory of competition that will have serious consequences for employment. 
We need the country 's help to return to the labour market and to actually acquire economic independence from its recreational dependency. 
Indeed, one of the difficulties identified is the complexity and the severity of administrative procedures, as a result that the European funding applications for European research are being transfered to national funding and Europe is becoming unpopular in the field of research. 
It will also be subject to discussion on the part of public authorities, which are interested in the work of this agency 's Agency 's work. 
They have acted the democratic process of the content and forced a quarter of the country 's population to take care of the country 's population. 
( PL ) Madam President, for many years, nuclear energy has been considered for the energy of the future - ecologically, effective, unpolluting the environment, for many years, for the benefit of the energy of the future - environmental, unpolluting the environment. 
Malaysia more than 10 000 people are suffering this form of easing a form of easing a form of easily punishment every year. 
The report enthusiased for this report because it promotes the development of so-called intelligent transport systems ; that is, the use of new technologies in the field of transport. 
I am able to say that there is something suspicious in the fact that this report was kept, while ensuring the success of the referendum in Ireland and were well informed and then it is suddenly suddenly to put all the European Union 's representatives around the world to give the House their activities and become part of a single European diplomatic colonial. 
Only can it bring more suffering suffering and crisis and crisis situations into a more suffering and crisis situation. 
Our suggestions to your proposals, your proposals, your proposals, your proposals, are proposed. 
In this regard, I would like to highlight two issues that I consider vital in view of the current economic crisis and in the unemployment crisis and in the EU, in view of the protection of quality, decent employment and the creation of new opportunities for jobs under the Europe 2020 strategy. 
We are preparing for this during a responsible way in a responsible way that is responsible in a responsible way. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I, in my part, would like to thank you for this interesting debate on this interesting debate, for my part, for this interesting debate. 
We give us hope for the future, for the future, for the future, for the future, for the future, for the future, for the future. 
EU 2020 can be different to the EU 2020 ' may be different. 
vote vote vote vote vote vote 
We are aware that innovation, creativity and aspiration of becoming better, does not necessarily mean a market advantage, but we do not accept that only somebody is more and stronger with better links with the public, and in particular, those special benefits must be applied to the market and we are very pleased that the Commission is in its position to ensure that this does not happen. 
on behalf of the EFD Group. - Madam President, on behalf of the Confederal Group of the European United Left - Nordic Green Left - I would like to say that we believe that this extremely serious ; immediate action is now needed and now is not time for despices. 
Of course, we need zero letters, of course, and we need a necessary letter, of course. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, President-in-Office of the Council, Commissioner, the operation of Alast Aladi Against is a successful contribution to the security of the EU in the Horn of Africa and must be continued. 
I can now describe the situation at the moment, and I am using the Hungarian terminology, which is the one in half of the Council. 
Implementing ( Rule ) : see Minutes 
ambitious tasks are : to give more sensitivity to the opinion of European citizens, to achieve a more democratic European Union, thus giving impetus to European integration and European integration. 
The things I think that it will be very interesting when the Commission is starting to consider the future of the GSP regulation, to see whether the aspects of the regulation relating to ratification and the implementation of conventions on human rights could be improved. 
We have put a discussion on the amendment that we are trying to draft a budget, closer to the reality that I hope will also be supported by other groups when we vote later today. 
It is regrettable that Russia is not willing to introduce effective measures to avoid multiple cases where the Russian authorities have violated human rights and have been condemned by the Court of Justice. 
Those tens of nations without countries that must be mentioned, given that what the founders wanted to build is a Europe of nations, not a federalist Europe or the largest interests Europe. 
In other words, universities are not always considered to be in the market 's needs and most preceded by these are young people who finish their education. 
We are complex and our actions must necessarily be comprehensive in the meantime. 
Member States of the European Union have expressed their willingness to help in any way possible - with technical means by sending advice, by preparing all the means that can be needed - but, above all, it must be done with the consent of the affected countries in the region. 
It is the other side of the coin, the other side of the coin of the coin is the other side of the coin. 
However, the producers have had 10 years to achieve compliance with in order to achieve compliance with compliance with, however. 
It should also be a fundamental principle and in the creation of the European Systemic Risk Board ( ESRB ) European Systemic Risk Board. 
They also have the right to take advantage of the freedom of movement of movement, as well as of the freedom of movement, of movement. 
It is important to strengthen Parliament 's functions, which is an important priority both for the Commission and for the European Parliament as well as for the European Parliament. 
For years after the adoption of a provision, it is difficult to understand how it can be found that so few measures have been taken to implement it in the past of a provision. 
The second market ( services for repair activities and supporters and supply of reserves ) would remain subject to a specific regime of release. 
You probably have been aware of some unresolved issues, particularly in the area of energy and trade, and trade, in particular, in particular. 
It is also important for us to consider the functioning of public procurement procedures in Parliament, too, that it is important for us to consider the functioning of public procurement procedures in Parliament. 
The management of Hinfluenza in Europe is aware of the main problem : the lack of independent evaluation of the national competent health authorities and the subsequent inability to adapt public health measures in the best possible way and, in real time, towards real clinical and eping-off reality. 
It is being felt that this Parliament will play a key role in ensuring that the CAP is in no way compromised or reduced. 
There is an increase in imports of these talks, I believe that we will be witnesses of a mass leave of this sector from farmers. 
It is necessary to deal with speculation and a competitive devaluation among more than 20 national currencies, to deal with speculation and competitive devaluation among more than 20 nations currencies. 
We can divide our economic programme from our social agenda : there can be no economic recovery in social collapse, as can not be social progress in economic terms of economic destruction. 
It is more than the salaries of employment, representing a source of income and through work within the family and society, both young and older people are making a significant contribution to the more humane objectivity of our society and to stabilise services and jobs. 
It is also the reason why the Group of the Greens/European Free Alliance wanted to reach the document for a new committee, not because we believe that we can not improve the situation, but because this means putting forward a reform that will in future unqualified our legislative lives in future. 
Mr President, I believe that we are today building a good legislative act today today, I believe that we are building a good legislative act today. 
It is all of them who have fought for fundamental rights and freedom of the press, and you owe to my generation, which does not know something differently different. 
Let us stop ourselves being misleading, let us prevent public opinion in Europe and the Turks and let us finally put an end to negotiations with Turkey. 
Equally, infringements of international humanitarian law are being met with international humanitarian law violations. 
It must be a dialogue based on respect for international law and territorial integrity of the countries ' overall integrity. 
I just mention two of the recommendations in the report in the report, I just two of the recommendations in the report, to mention two of the recommendations in the report. 
There is therefore no doubt that the constant increase in food prices, as a result of increased prices for raw materials is increasingly urgent to the EU. 
I hope that the Member States will use the various instruments currently in place to combat the exclusion of Roma, such as the separation of a maximum of 2 % of the resources of the European Regional Development Fund resources to use the marginalised communities or the existing opportunities as part of the European Social Fund. 
Mr President, if you - or my fellow Members - do not think that the questions concerning Mercosur, which I and other Members have asked are unacceptable, because they were not appropriate issues, I believe that they were not adopted because there is such item on Thursday. 
What happens is that we have heard again requests for more cooperation and greater coordination at European level and the single European sky, something that has already been mentioned - will be useful in future. 
Members are being said to be appalling that they did not have been allowed to speak and not attended to hear how the Commissioner or the rapporteur explain and put their conclusions. 
I would stress the strong position of the international community that the surplus volunteering and unexpected changes in exchange rate exchange have adverse consequences for economic and financial stability. 
The authorities obviously implement unconstitutional laws and procedures are clearly implementing unconstitutional laws and procedures. 
To conclude, it is a conclusion to me that we also continue to need a strong European common agricultural policy. 
That is why the question of supervision in this area must be resolved. 
The European Union continues to extend a very geographical indication and, as I have already said in this Chamber, the Council has quick to provide candidate status before the countries concerned are able to achieve standards of quality of democracy that are at least close to a major satisfactory level. 
I agree with the rapporteur that it is necessary to improve the transparency of the forecasts and responsibility for the projects ; to improve the procurement procedure for public procurement levels of public procurement and work programmes ; to make mistakes of staff and improve the objective and transparency in this connection, as well as to apply the Financial Regulation to which they are subordinate. 
Mr President, the report we have before us is perhaps perhaps the most important report in the current period in the current period. 
What we are experiencing now, Mr President, is not in my opinion a monetary crisis in the Union, it is not even a crisis of our common currency ; but rather a crisis of EU governance governance. 
science two degrees of these cities mean that the rich countries must reduce their CO2 emissions by 40 %. 
What I would like to say to you first of all is that the Stockholm Programme really takes a form of the fate of the victims ' fate. 
in writing. - This report voted in favour of this report. 
We are working closely with the Member States and Parliament to find a solution to increase our disaster response capability, and the logic is very simple. 
This is why it is the reason for environmental and public health that the associated levels of pollution and for energy reasons relating to reducing oil remains and increasing difficulty in accessing this goods. 
Sweden will have the opportunity to put them into practice during its Presidency in the second half of this year. 
In the same years, Lithuania has been in the same situation, but it has not reached a decade of the early Question Time in inflation indicator. 
We must not, of course, not be in our own hands. 
An action plan was achieved by the last Energy efficiency plan, but it has nothing to do, that it can be achieved by 2020 that the objective of achieving by 2020. 
You know, the main objectives set out in the Europe 2020 strategy include an increase in the number of jobs, better conditions for research and development - improving education levels - we have referred to this topic in the previous question in a short and promotion of social inclusion, including poverty reduction. 
I am particularly, of the fact that, in the new European executive authority, Italy, in the person of Mr Tajani, will ensure that the horrific and competence has been identified, because it was defined as one of the key portfolios, namely industry, which is strategic in the management of the crisis and in the organisation of European production. 
We must do everything we can to ensure the competitiveness and sustainability of this sector and, at the same time, not forget the human and environmental factors, but also while also not forgetting the human and environmental factors. 
waste generate each day, causing damage to the environment and a negative impact on public health and the quality of life. 
There will be handling on the table. 
Are we not more expecting Russia 's democratisation in Russia 's democratisation ? 
This is the question : if we do not place things on the basis of the faith based, we discredit all European law and all our institutions and all our institutions. 
It would also be right to remember these victims too, too, that it would be right to remember these victims too. 
Progress to make progress on this matter in this matter will make progress. 
However, at a time when the economic and financial crisis exacerbates social inequalities, the provision of structural funds to Member States is reducing. 
It is, but it is, that is. 
We will be very careful to respect the fundamental principles of our proposal 's fundamental principles, too, to be considered to be complying with the fundamental principles of our proposal. 
We must integrate priorities for the acquisition of fundamental skills ( reading, written ) in their education programmes before teachers specialised. 
What we need is another economic and social model that is to oppose capitalism, which is opposing capitalism. 
Also, it is also very much to say that the number of mistakes or failures is comparable small - but there is still too much, there are still too much. 
It also ensures that public authorities will always be able to adopt regulations in favour of general interest in the general interest. 
It is to the extent that only 12 third countries outside Europe are only 12 third countries outside Europe meeting all the requirements and we therefore import beef from all of them alone. 
I believe you, Mrs Ashton, Mrs Ashton, Mrs Ashton,, Mrs Ashton, believe that I believe you, Mrs Ashton,,, Mrs Ashton,. 
During my fifth year 's fifth term, Mr Barroso, who has been negotiating some EU Member States in favour of the war in Iraq, led by George Bush, has never managed to regret the European Union or to strengthen its positions to national personal interests. 
The recent earthquake in Italy believes that it is covered in its written response by Mr Barroso and Mr Dimas, or does Mr Dimas have to take further initiatives to protect European citizens from earthquakes ? 
Other horizontal agreements on aircraft services, this agreement provides for a clause to be designed to all EU carriers to take advantage of the right to establish issues of safety and taxation of aviation fuel and decides on potential contradictions with EU competition rules. 
Copenhagen has set out as an absolute blown border with a blogger of cotland with a blown box of coast. 
Research workers certainly do not need Italian language, because they have learnt English, French and German and have everything necessary to say to these patents, to the detentions, to the detriment of Italian products. 
It will be 20 years ago, it will come back 20 years of year, it will come back to 20 years. 
Take into consideration the particularly difficult situation in which farmers are in the agricultural producers and ensuring that European farmers are fair competition. 
It is also enhanced cooperation at parliamentary level, for example, with organisations such as the Parliamentary Assembly of the Black Sea Economic Cooperation and WTO, and with the Black Sea Bank for trade and development. 
I did not vote in favour of the report on agriculture and international trade because it depends on the central element of EU trade policy : the free trade agreements : free trade agreements. 
Europe is the largest global donor of humanitarian aid - we can be proud of this and we must continue in the same spirit - but, in itself, humanitarian aid will not solve the conflict between the Israelis and the Palestinians. 
What now do now do we now have ? What about what is ? 
There is no sufficient financial resources to implement these objectives, then the initiative will remain not only on paper, but on paper, but on paper. 
It must be much wider to support their positions, the European Union must create mechanisms to build coalition and organise regular meetings with all democratic countries of other continents, with all the other continents. 
investment in the first instance of the procedure will improve the effectiveness of the asylum process, in the procedure, of the first instance, of the process of providing asylum seekers. 
Information technology information technology for customs purposes ( TCTS ) ( 
We are very strong about this, let us not be surrendering ! ! 
EULEX project, which the European Union hopes to have an impact in Kosovo, has more instrument for overlapping this internal division than anything else. 
We, in Europe, are failing to show the courage to start a new fair standard, then we will be saying exactly where we do not want to be, namely with protectionism and repealing 19 years in Europe. 
The various national systems are creating a huge problem for international trains, because the combined must or be brave on any border or equipped with several fights of systems. 
Finally, I would like to highlight one aspect of one aspect, I would like to highlight a key aspect, which is. 
55, million unemployment unemployment in 25 years under 25 years under the EU is almost twice of what is happening among the population in general as a whole. 
The proposal for enhanced cooperation in enhanced cooperation is proposed for enhanced cooperation in the proposal for enhanced cooperation. 
I would ensure that there will be no opening up of public services, nor pressure on privatisation, for privatisation, for privatisation. 
At the same time, I have to ask you, it is acceptable that the Council of Ministers Council of Ministers has systematically refused to accept the rule of law and to ignore the decisions of the first installation of the Institutive Court ? 
Mr President, the Europe 2020 strategy should help to generate economic growth in a way that will at the same time counteract social exclusion. 
To make all of us aware that the citizens have to realise that the added value of what we are doing here is real, practical benefit to them. 
I therefore support the idea that the resolution proposed in the resolution on independent response mechanisms that will allow for the immediate response to be responded immediately to crisis on human rights. 
AAAAAASerSerSerbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbbb. 
I would like to conclude by saying that today, we are in the case, Mr Barrot, who represents Mrs Hussein a regional policy Commissioner and, as has been said, he will make a binding statement by the Commission on the evaluation of the new measures for 2010 in relation to the three regulations. 
This is what is going on to encourage the involvement of shareholders in these corporations, which is paradoxical in many cases when the capital has been very small, regulated electronic votes. 
European Union in the Middle East ( debate ) 
What I worry is that a double standard is beginning to act in our institutions and in our institutions, too, to act. 
A change in the thinking in the EU can only work to reduce the damage caused by globalisation in the affected countries. 
Kosovo is very important, with Kosovo, very important. 
We need to see the situation in the Mediterranean, particularly on the Italian coast, where only four days of the burden of the burden have shown people. 
In the case of the Western Balkans, where such problems are even more complicated, it is particularly important to resolve them in relation to each country, where these problems are even more complicated. 
The export of radioactive waste to third countries is banned from exporting the export of radioactive waste to third countries. 
Firstly, we must support as far as possible, governments and the Commission in the initiatives that have recently been taken, as soon as possible, to be able to support, as possible, the governments and the Commission in the initiatives that have recently taken. 
These funds should be improved, improvements should be made to these funds, and improvements should be made to these funds. 
Before the vote vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote 
This directive was a very excellent opportunity to introduce common standards for all 27 Member States, as well as an excellent chance to simplify EU legislation on consumer rights, which is still fragile in the form of several legislative documents. 
The Commission will present a recommendation on media modelity for media mode of timetable year, the Commission will present a recommendation on media mode of motivation. 
It is clear that this legislation must be more stringent and therefore I would be afraid when I see that Italy and the United Kingdom, once again, once again, are stifting improvements in the Council. 
The potential that has so far not been used, as others have not been used, for development, demanding a rapid launch of the whole project. 
I say that they are important to the viability of the European economy 's viability, and they are important to the viability of the European economy 's viability. 
Van Rompuy said that the European Union 's ability to achieve consensus remains unbelievable and that is the case, but unfortunately there is consensus only on the lowest common denominator ! 
As a result, the health sector is gradually transformed from a courageous branch of individual services in general. 
Europe is not composed by ideal candidates ' candidates, and Europe is not made up of ideal candidates. 
I insist that this is necessary for long-term programming of the buildings policy in the area of the urban Fund, with a view to ensuring the sustainability of the budget. 
Mr President, can I be able to put a more general question here, here, to put a more general question here ? 
It is regrettable because the Hungarian Government, Hungary as a country, is currently presided by the European Union, because the Hungarian Government, and Hungary as a country, is now presided by the European Union. 
What is it ? What is it ? What is it ? ? What is it ? What is it ? What is it ? 
I am in the shipwness of the shipwreck industry - a industry which was once again the perpetrator of the export of industrial products, and it is now almost completely western. 
The issue of the European Union 's budgetary problems is being called undeniable in the budgetary problems of the Union 's budgetary problems. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this report on the single market for Europeans on the single market for Europeans on the Single Market for Europeans. 
I am in favour of Parliament 's widesupport for the improvement in the proposal to streamline the procedure for issuing solutions. 
I therefore do not think it is reasonable to adopt a new text of claiming that we are making new conclusions when we actually have nothing new to do in fact, which will get public and publication to get a new one. 
It is a pretext : these are only political games that have no purpose and nothing to achieve nothing and nothing has been achieved. 
Mr President, Baroness Ashton, I have a number of honourable issues about events in the Israeliconflict events in the Israeliconflict. 
EC and Antizon and Barovtic Guide for the visa waiver ( short statute ( 
We also efforts to ensure that rights are protected and in the internal context of international rights, and in the international context. 
There are regions facing a fall in economic activity, environmental deterioration, agricultural loss, an end to the activity of many companies, the massive loss of trees and nice. 
For ten years, discussions between the institutions have been sufficient between the institutions for ten years between the institutions for ten years, over the years, for 10 years, for the years, over the years, for over the years, for over the debate between the institutions are sufficient enough. 
It is to establish what has happened in Greece exactly what has happened in Greece, exactly what has happened in Greece. 
Measures are leading to limiting certain rights to individuals, who are aimed at which they are directed. 
We are those of the Sierra Lapland, not of Robert Leonarde, and not of Robert Rajoelina, as the many Commissioner Barnier knows. 
The scandal of Medior tor Venezuela invites us to strengthen precautionary measures before allowing the creation of medicines on the market, the serious mistake of the European Medicines Agency to be punished. 
President Lukashenko, Luxembourg, is absolutely horrific to everyone who defend democratic values. 
You are the arrest warrant for the Arrest Warrant issued by the ICC, is the repression of the current state chapter on Sudan for crimes against humanity and war crimes. 
Ratification of foods and feed ( Executive powers of the Commission ) ( vote ) 
Clearly, the everinterdependence between internal and external security, interdependence between internal and external security, is clear between the increasingly interdependence of internal and external security. 
It is at the heart of the whole unreasonable sense of the whole of unreasonable fragility. 
As regards women 's rights, freedom of religion and the treatment of suspected crimes set out in Turkey must also be respected throughout Turkey. 
Russia has great ambitions for cooperation in the field of foreign policy and security, for example, for example, there are currently no such ambitions on economic matters. 
We share your view that it is essential to ensure that the authorities can function, even though they have the heads of heads and that adequate funding is provided to the institutions. 
Their can be increased if we finally create a Community patent, preventing abuse by the small property of the small businesses of intellectual property to the production of cheap counterfeits products. 
It is my hope that the fact that the decisive phase of the debate on the future of cohesion policy will take place during my Presidency of my country, Poland will help to ensure that the proposals for significant reductions in the area of this policy will not actually actually be implemented in practice. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the legislative process that we are starting with the Treaty of Lisbon is very serious, is very serious. 
Now that the urgent action has been carried out, it is more trade, better harmonisation, a functioning internal market for goods and, especially services, and particularly services. 
It is, in order not to lose credibility, to start action immediately, to start action immediately and to start action. 
All Member States in future must face the risk of losing money from the EU budget in the event of continually inconsistent implementation of fiscal rules. 
Also welcomes the general commitment made by the Commission and the Member States during the International Donors ' Conference of donors, to allocate to a total of 12 billion, EUR 12 billion, of which in the form of aid, in the form of aid other than humanitarian aid, other than the Commission. 
As far as Cyprus is concerned, Turkey must stop being closed behind what happened in 2004. 
Mrder, European Serbia has a fundamental responsibility in this regard, of European values, in this respect, of European responsibility, in this respect, of European values. 
Adjusting is a cross-sectoral and concerns several sectoral policies, sectoral policies, and it concerns several sectoral policies. 
It is ; the Stockholm Programme explicitly points out this principle : in the last two years, 250 000 applications have been given to a large number, even worse during the last referendum year in the last year. 
There is still a profound discrimination in the workplace, there is a deep segregation on the labour market, the pay gap is still being maintained, there is still a shortage of women in guidance positions and in politics, insufficient, and support for maternity and for mothers. 
We recognise that it is now as it is now, it is not so effective, but so effective now. 
Moreover, the inclusion of social and environmental standards in trade agreements contributing to the regulation of globalisation is contributing to the inclusion of social and environmental standards in trade agreements contributing to the regulation of globalisation. 
Mr President, I welcome the vote on the EEAS, but now, now, I believe it is important to move from the procedures and structures to the actual borrowing of the service 's work. 
We must help the Sahel countries to increase the security sectors - my army, police, court and border control systems - in each country, in each country. 
The northern parts of the country is a tragedy which remains largely the risk of the rest of the world, because humanitarian organisations and journalists are prevented from witnessing to the witnesses of what has happened and rely on unchecked. 
gas must not be carried out without a study on the impact that will present the associated risks and measures necessary to protect local populations and owners with a view to environmental risks. 
Moreover, in recent years, the law has been obliged to make up for the last ferries and slow to prepare a space for church and unpurchased in their territory. 
It is difficult to understand the rest of the world, thereby losing trust and misleading Europe. 
The situation is the situation of small and medium-sized enterprises ( SMEs ) SMEs ( SMEs ) is the situation of small and medium-sized enterprises ( SMEs ). 
However, we do not forget that the abolition or reduction of the barriers to ICT products will also be beneficial to the European Union. 
Therefore, any evaluation of the Seventh Framework Programme ( FP7 ) of the European Community for Research, Technological Development and demonstration must be linked to the objectives of the Europe 2020 strategy and its implementation. 
What we find ourselves in showing is that growth can not be continually continually, it is rather striking because of the limited nature of natural resources, and also by the limited possibility of the planet to take on our waste and processing our waste. 
It is more worrying when conservative governments, which is the present Czech Presidency, are discussing the revision of the Barcelona targets and are returning to the cultivation of children at home. 
We must create appropriate conditions for women, so that they can actually work in these posts, and that means adequate care for children, adequate working times and other conditions that actually allow women to take these high posts to pay these high posts. 
What the honourable Members have expressed with different conviction on the rights of our role in the European Union in the forthcoming elections and the sessions that they are following is justified is justified. 
It is an exception to provide 100 % of the funding of these parties at the start of the financial year, not to 80 %, but to the funding from independent sources that parties must prove to be reduced to 10 %. 
I was in Cameroon and it was obvious that they are interested in better relations with the European Union, with the European Union. 
I support this system of system of system of system in favour of this system of system of system of this system. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
Please bear in mind that it is about being a type of major disasters that can not be foreseeeen - you can only react when you start to happen and you must show that you can be able to organise a response in a very short time. 
It is clear that, after the start of the accession negotiations on Turkey, it has made much more steps backwards than in the right direction. 
We must confuse the causes of the consequences and without underestimating terrorist risk - the main cause of the instability in Yemen is not terrorism. 
We are also concerned at then, and then we are concerned about building trust and friendly relations between our nations. 

I also stress the fact that Parliament is united in the request for a operational centre, and I am pleased that you, High Representative, have announced that you have announced that you are ready for a more comprehensive discussion on this idea. 
So how can we achieve the main objectives that we have set ourselves in the Europe 2020 strategy when we are at the same time cutting funding in these areas in these areas ? 
This part of our neighbourhood strategy was based on the existence of stability available for our neighbourhood strategy based on the existence of stability available. 
The financial crisis has clearly shown that there are three problems in the industry : lack of competition : the overon external ratings in the regulatory framework and lack of accountability and responsibility for ratings provided by CRAs. 
The World Trade Organisation programme ( WTO ), which includes deregulation, liberalisation and privatisation of services, contributes to increasing poverty for the majority of the world 's population, both in developing and in industrialised countries. 
In any case, it will be difficult to work in any situation that will be difficult to work in any case, in any case, work will be difficult to work. 
It is very positive that Parliament is discussing these issues and continues to monitor the situation as far as the signs are made in concrete and effective measures. 
A little before Christmas, when the workers are at the centre to note the anniversary of the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, Iranian officials of security forces are closed to be the centre. 
This will be our disappointment with Russia 's recent withdrawal from the recent withdrawal of Russia from the Treaty on Energy Charter. 
It will enable the EU and Member States to better coordinate their efforts and to give better visibility to the EU 's activities. 
Therefore, all the Member States of the European Union are calling for the fight against unemployment, particularly unemployment among young people, through constructive proposals with precise times in response to the problem of employment and poverty problem. 
It is not wishing to see things in this way that we should simply look at how the budget was implemented this year and the big problems we had with finding sufficient payments, even if the implementation of the solidarity instrument for example, for example, provided for some regions of Europe 's need. 
It is a fundamental principle of democracy : respect for the rule of law and for the rule of law and for independent institutions is a fundamental principle of democracy : respect for the rule of law and for the independent institutions. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, in conclusion, I would like to say that the work we have done will be allowed to do, of course, if Parliament adopted the package - to worry less about protecting our seas, the coast and our fellow citizens. 
As regards the chapter on public contracts, Canada must provide the same access to the United States under their trade agreement : in other words, European businesses must be able to participate in trade in the providers, regions and certain communities. 
agreements by the Council : see Minutes 
We must do this through internal legal rules, and the idea that Parliament should be involved as set out in Article concerning the selection of candidates for the Court is very interesting and more in-depth analysis. 
However, there are aspects of which we do not agree, such as the supposed link between energy efficiency and the so-called Europe 2020 strategy, which provides for the creation of a single market in energy, promoting market instruments, such as the European Emission Trading System of energy efficiency and ignores the need to protect a strong public sector, every Member State that must promote. 
Report on improving multilateral surveillance in the IMF and greater involvement of economies other than the current Members, can not be provided for a particular success in the context of the fact that a real success can be successful success. 
Our mental health is put into a document entitled to change ' and many of the calls for action in the rapporteur report are included in our national policy or are actually put into our legislation. 
The most developed region has GDP of hunger per capita per capita per capita per cent % of the average for the 27 Member States of the European Union, for the poorest region, this figure is only 26 %, in other words, 13 times less times less. 
This Parliament supported this Parliament with a host majority partial reform of the Treaty with a view to establishing a new instrument - a tool that did not even exist before. 
on behalf of the Verts/ALE Group. - Madam President, allow me to mention a few important issues which have now been made in connection with the activities of the Bank. 
I would like to be very clear to be very clear. 
We are, of course, different and sometimes in a timely manner contrary to our political images are clearly different and sometimes in a radically controversial manner. 
As regards the scope, the following should be said as follows : the following is to say as follows. 
I would like to answer to the Commission that there is a very constructive debate in the Commission - particularly from Mrs Reding - on the European Prosecutor, which is provided for in the Treaty of Lisbon. 
Secondly, I would like to mention the excellent work of the Islamic NGOs ' NGOs in favour of religious tolerance. 
More importance must be given to the Eastern Partnership and, in particular, to the Black Sea region, which is particularly geopolitical to energy security and the diversification of supply routes for the Union. 
It is very important that we concentrate the aid as quickly as possible, and it is very important that we concentrate the aid as possible as quickly as possible. 
We have given priority, above all, to the instruments aimed at mitigating the effects of the financial and economic crisis on European citizens. 
Life to access to abortion is indicative of the decline in the level of culture and for our mobilisation by human values. 
It will not put an agreement on the table in the World Trade Organisation, where we actually oppose the United States, because at the same time, when it was selling the banana sector in Europe and in the ACP countries, in return to the WTO 's refusal of the WTO legal disputes, the Commission has conducted negotiations on even more year since central and southern American countries. 
I agree with the idea that religious leaders must be limited to their freedom of conscience and religion in terms of homosexuality. 
There are separate initiatives of both initiatives that focus on a separate focus on the focus of both initiatives. 
I am sure that you are right in formal terms ; you are President of such clear understanding of things that I am not in doubt in this. 
I would like to emphasise once again that, if - as is said in the Treaty of Lisbon - we aim to discuss new own resources for Europe, this will not only be an additional tax for European citizens, but it will also mean that the payment of gross domestic product are reduced to the same size. 
In particular, the self-sufficiency of monks and monks ( monasting and monthly ( 
A directive that clearly can not be applied, but what is the response of Parliament ? 
In the United States, for example, they are not in the burden of the social system, but in some countries, they must leave the territories after the expiry of their contract, by giving these workers a recent increase in the local population, they must also be closer to the countries with traditional well-developed social systems if they remain in the country, once they lost, if they have been lost, if all the family, all those who are also endangered. 
The policy on the quality of agricultural products has found a credible and unanimous response from the Committee on Agriculture and Rural Development to the European Parliament, thereby making the full existing legislation more comprehensive. 
Commissioner, this crisis was not caused by any natural disaster, tsunami or another similar event, but by a series of bad solutions and a whole unsuccessful agricultural policy, failed to be a failure to take place. 
It is a step forward towards the gradual decommissioning of nuclear energy, which we approve. 
Those who plan - support for the demand for work, training and retraining, based on small businesses, support for self-employment - are ideal of support from the European Globalisation Adjustment Fund. 
I would like to thank the High Representative once again, because I received information that he had and wished to say something about this, and that it considers this fundamental obligation and the necessity, and will also make another statement of taking on what, although not component with the Staff Regulations of the Staff Regulations, will also assure us and those who find it extremely important when it comes to future work. 
As regards the implementation of the directive, I worry about the fact that the points of single contact points that must facilitate entrepreneurs by providing information on the conditions for business in a country, as well as in other Member States, are only functioning only in 14 countries to date. 
It is a very important issue, a very important issue, a very important issue, a very important issue, a very important issue. 
In which Member States must transpose these directives into their legislation, it is two years to be transposed, which is two years. 
It is irresponsible to limit the flexibility of the budget during the crisis during the crisis, it is irresponsible to limit the flexibility of the budget in the budget. 
This is what happens in the second half of this year 's current year 's year. 
A compromise reached with a great effort is that I hope will be supported tomorrow 's vote in favour of tomorrow 's vote. 
We are only here on a trian triangle here in the morning of three month. 
Extremely, the accusations that the Caribbean countries have been forced to sign the agreement are not true. 
documents : see Minutes 
There has recently been negotiations that such an example recently has been conducted, and this example has also been such. 
1 200 bilateral investment agreements concluded by the Member States on various, often uncompatible legal regimes must be fully implemented under the protection of the European Union without, in this way, violating the rights of the affected countries concerned. 
It is being seen that the Commission will come forward with proposals in this connection as soon as possible in the case of the Commission will come up with proposals in this connection as possible in the context of the Commission as soon as possible. 
Just as in those times, a group of unelected, today, an ageing bureaucrats, had shown us what a great success has been achieved. 
It should also provide access to intelligent systems developed in helping the citizens who seek to resolve legal problems are using large registers, lists of people employed in the judiciary, or simply demand the legal system of each Member State. 
In fact, they are a useful instrument that helps to make decisions in businesses and in the private sector and in the private sector, these are actually a useful instrument that helps to make decisions in businesses and in the private sector. 
The protection of discriminated against is confirmed in the most important legal acts - in the Treaty and in the Charter of Fundamental Rights, which the Treaty of Lisbon is referred to. 
This is, in general, also now that, when, in short, we must be as a firstfire and to put a store that is threatening today 's financial stability of Europe. 
Our solution is based on the recitals of the Court of Auditors, which issued a opinion with reservations on legality and regularity of operations relating to the European Police College 's budget, because of the fact that public procurement procedures have not been considered with public procurement provisions in all the times of financial regulations and its governing Council to inform the authority of discharge by 2011. 
European consumers ' opportunity to know all aspects of a product increases their knowledge and enhance their protection and enhances their protection. 
Mr President, I welcome many of the objectives of the EU 2020 strategy, such as focus on growth, characterised for innovative businesses, on sustainable growth and the achievement of high employment. 
on the Committee on Budgets. - ( DE ) Mr President, I would like to congratulate the Commission on this communication presented to the principle of openness, as we have presented before us before. 
The Commission decisions on the constant reduction in expenditure will have painful consequences for public health and for the rights of insurance and pensions, which, together with the request for higher taxes, will drastically low the living standards of people 's living standards. 
I therefore propose my support and support to the Czech Presidency for the initiative presented by this Parliament and I look forward to working together with their support by means of greater public awareness and recognition. 
However, also some incidents, which are the reason for our concern, our concern, and some incidents, which are the reason for our concern. 
It is so important to increase the creditation of the European Employment Office for the European Employment Office. 
A orientation was part of the elements proposed by the Commission and we have given great importance, but you also have to be aware, as the Commission is aware and that in some ACP countries, the sexuality is prohibited by law. 
The fight and the preparatory activity to combat HIlna Nedern Mandeldent means that he continues to be the pleasure of hope for millions of people around the world. 
( FR ) Mr President, I must say I must say that the sugar agreement, in your way that the trialogue was negotiated during the trialogue is disseminated by the proposal we made in the Committee on Regional Development and the Committee on Regional Development and the Committee on Agriculture and Rural Development and the Development of rural development, and I deeply regret this. 
It does not take into account the different needs of women and their economic and social conditions and their economic and social conditions, in the various needs of women and their economic and social conditions, of course. 
This must be recognised that this new step does not reduce the existing powers of the Union and its institutions and its institutions. 
A factor is a major legal aspect which distinguishes EPAs of previous trade preferences which have been applied under the Cotonou Convention and which have been harmful to trade between the ACP countries and the EU, and has led to significant uncertainty. 
Needless to monitoring closely and the case to close the DTP Party ( DTP ), currently dependent on the Constitutional Court. 
A question that is on the agenda of the various G20 summit is the reform of the international financial institutions, as Mrs Malmström has already mentioned. 
It is increasing a civil division, which is so specific to Europe and which is already worth too expensive, too expensive. 
You know, at the summit that took place later in December under the French Presidency, the Heads of State or Government approved the legislative act on small business. 
It will not allow us to allow us to do so will not allow us to allow us to do so. 
A council whose meeting has been held on 25 and 26 March 2010, for the first time, laid down as one of the EU objectives of 20 % increase in energy efficiency by 2020. 
Metrology directives ( debate ) 
I must be political and social modules, not only of economic and not only economic ones, but not only economic ones. 
The conference of donors in July the World Bank created a credible fund with a few donor donor donor to the broader social sector, including education, including education. 
The people of the People 's Democratic Republic of China for many years have been represented as the country with the worst human rights violations of the country. 
The government denies the existence of political prisoners and unfortunately does not allow international checks on independent human rights organisations to be allowed to be independent and regret to continue to prevent international checks on independent human rights. 
It is unveable that this is not the case that it is not the case. 
It is the link between the ceiling and own resources and their own resources, and the link is between the ceiling and their own resources, and their own resources ? 
Another programme of money reaches a index 1, while the micro-credits of the micro-credits programme may be reached in 5. 
I am voting against the contrary to the vote against the contrary. 
It has been possible through public, national and European aid through public, national and European aid, through public, national and European aid, by means of public, national and European aid. 
Declarations included in the register ( Article of the rules ) : see Minutes 
We will see whether the Member States have succeeded in using appropriations within the deadline of time, whether the Member States have succeeded in using appropriations. 
This amendment is aimed at preventing, on the part of the media funding, to promote sexual links or other forms of homosexual behaviour, which are not laid down in the constitution or in the civil code, not least because of the impact that information on mass media and mental development of children. 
The countries of subAfrica of subAfrica of these rights exist in many specific and uncertain conditions, and I would therefore like to stress that the European Union needs to take a responsible and humanitarian approach to health care in many specific and humane care areas. 
I am convinced that the implementation of this recommendation will continue to continue the traditional separation of the labour separation of the dead and woman 's labour. 
I can not underline the strategic importance of good relations with Latin America with Latin America, I can not underline the strategic importance of good relations with Latin America. 
It has said that it has not managed to prevent the crisis because no one is aware of who is aware of responsibility. 
A solution for the financial system, which is also worth considering, is what is called a Tobin tax. 
These issues must be put on a discussion, including the status of Jerusalem as a future capital of two countries, including the statute of Jerusalem, as a future capital of two countries. 
A common agricultural policy is being made up of Europe 's agricultural community, because Europe 's agricultural community must ensure food security and take on the path of sustainability. 
The Commission is therefore firmly believe that the vitally and strongly parliamentary dimension is strengthening the democratic legitimacy of the partnership. 
It is firmly convinced that cooperation must be consolidated, and this also means opening new forms of cooperation. 
Finally, the EU 's commitment to open trade goes hand in hand with its commitment to sustainable development, which is a comprehensive objective of EU policy, including in the context of the various initiatives of trade policy policy. 
On the other hand, Commissioner Wallström, Commissioner Wallström, who has very remarkable visits to Ireland on several occasions will face the strong unloved attitude that I believe is there in all Member States, the people who have been abandoned by the very substance of the European Union. 
This proposal is to continue the transition of the transitional regime for an additional period of 18 months, they have been presented by 1 January 2013, with the aim of laying down a new joint cooperative measures within the framework of the ongoing reform of the common fisheries policy, for which a proposal should be presented by the Commission in 2011. 
However, no plan must not discard the European Union 's attention from the Eastern Partnership, from the Eastern Partnership, however, of the European Union 's attention from the Eastern Partnership, from the Eastern Partnership. 
It is how should consumer protection be organised and its improvement be organised ? 
There is a different problem in different European countries, there are different backward in the various European countries, in the various European countries. 
The rest is very valuable and very appropriate, but the second secondary, but secondary, secondary. 
This is still awaiting the promised border values for noise produced by toys that are harmful to health. 
It is that Turkey wishes to join the European Union, because it will review the hands of the hope of putting forward with many money gained by European taxpayers, in the form of subsidies and that it is a possibility of granting up the surplus of the surplus and unemployed population, such as Britain, where either employment against loyment salaries, or would benefit services for social aid systems. 
It is unacceptable in the unacceptable situation, because a country is taking a position in its international relations against one of its own citizens. 
Therefore, other forums - which have begun with proposals for greater preservation - also close to 5 % - are also close to 5 %. 
I would be able to do so, but if we will give an example, and if we propose ideas between Parliament and the Commission for the ways we see to revive new growth and innovative approaches in the new economy, then the Member States also have to take responsibility and take such action. 
physical violence during the clashes in the best case could be regrettable and it only confirms the urgent need for external support for a peaceful transition to democracy. 
In view of achieving the Millennium Development Goals, I believe that it is vital to take action to help developing countries to deal with climate change. 
Unfortunately, we can no longer discover from the understanding that the state pension ( first pillar ) will be sufficient to ensure a standard standard for which workers have been employed and workers have been employed. 
It is, but it is, that is. 
This report by the central bank reports shows that the credit of SMEs in the UK in fact has fallen over the last few months and that the appropriations are expected to be held in the next few months. 
We remember that we are talking about refugees who often face intolerable in countries where they are adopted and where living conditions can sometimes be tragic if no decisions are quickly found. 
It is a report of paramount importance that the Member States are encouraged to pay particular attention to youth employment. 
reality is reality. It is reality, reality, is reality. 
Parts of the Korean Peninsula have become one huge camp, in which millions of corridors are closed, which, under the militaristic administration of their regime, can only dream of free life. 
Unfortunately, no, nor Members, are proposing that Member States should abandon to reduce taxes or to serious corrections that may lead to transparency of tax jurisdictions. 
The risk that the European semester will be a centre-right, bureaucratic initiative, a bureaucratic initiative. 
The Vietnam Government was a list of EU people and prisoners, whose situation has given particular concern to particular concern. 
We can achieve them at the same time and I assure you that this will happen in the same time, and I assure you that this will happen. 
I therefore believe that the European Union has an important role to play in this process in this process. 
A joint resolution was adopted only with a small additional additional additional additional convergence ( promoting industrial convergence in the areas where cyanide use of cyanide in mining ) was banned. 
It will happen if there is no alternatives to them, if there is no alternatives ? 
' 2009 ( announcement of the Ausposal ) ( 
I know that the number of cards involved in heavy road transport accidents is unproportionate to the number of care of road transport channels is unproportionate. 
( ES ) Mr President, the report on competition policy for 2008 for the first time includes hunger on cartels and consumers and consumers ' top time. 
It is to check whether Union funds are being used to be used to achieve whether these institutions are meeting the objectives outlined for them, and whether these institutions are meeting or whether any resources are being wasted. 
In view of the more fair distribution of compensation payments, I voted in favour of this report, I voted in favour of the more fair distribution of compensation payments, I voted in favour of the report. 
This opinion, but I can not agree with the rest of the other way, but I can not agree with the rest. 
The new agreement with the Republic of Moldova should be an association agreement, as with the other countries under the European Neighbourhood Policy under the European Neighbourhood Policy, in accordance with the other countries under the European Neighbourhood Policy. 
( PL ) Madam President, Commissioner, in May the European Parliament adopted a resolution on the simplification of the common agricultural policy simplification in May the European Parliament. 
connections, maritime, maritime, which would link the providers of southern Mediterranean ports with European and Mediterranean energy, are areas of significant potential in terms of investment, job creation and development of trade relations and development of trade relations. 
At the same time, it is deserving to note the growing number of illegal international adoptions with the participation of third countries which do not meet the conditions established by the Hague Convention. 
It is that the implementation of the legal obligations is becoming more difficult in debt and complicated chains by intercooperative companies. 
On the other hand, we believe that the European Banking Authority and the ECB can not guarantee regulatory supervision of the EIB, but we will, of course, not exclude the possibility of the EIB funding other types of contract on the basis of a voluntary approach by the EIB with other authorities. 
Their trial must also be brought to an end and against foreign journalists, workers from NGOs and the Iranian prisoners of foreign embassies in Tehran. 
On the part of the European Parliament, it is far from the finances of the Council to be transparent, on the part of the European Parliament, that it is far from being transparent. 
We can simply not ignore the obvious and important socio-economic parallel that played a role here, nor the enormous differences in the stage of developing the production systems between the North and the South Mediterranean countries. 
You, Commissioner, for the key declarations that you have made in the area of data protection and of the universal service that will enable us to work with you to make progress in these extremely important areas. 
We must therefore find a new balance between the privacy, the freedom of citizens and security, which is also a fundamental right for the citizens we represent in Parliament. 
both must be removed from the two must be removed from the end. 
Finally, what role the whole process is being retained to the European Parliament, when until now, that the Europe 2020 strategy was a project which was valid exclusively by the Council and the Commission, which has been the project that has been valid for the European Parliament ? 
It must also be the case of the European Parliament and of the Council before the review of the agreement, full report on its implementation and facilitate the involvement of representatives of Parliament as observers in the meetings of the Joint Committee meetings. 
However, I would point out very clearly that there is another aspect that we must discuss very seriously, namely that even to resolve problems relating to data protection, remains the question of whether the principle of the principle under which the bank data on millions of people in Europe are sent to the objectives of prevention, in practice, to the fight against terrorism. 
The negotiations with Mercosur, decided uniformly by the European Commission, does not provide anything good for European agriculture, which is in an unprecedented crisis that is in an unprecedented crisis. 
( IT ) Mr President, High Representative, ladies and gentlemen, I believe that the discussion and debate in this Chamber seriously strengthens the actions in view of the summit in May in May. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, thank the Council for his comments and I would like to thank the Council for his comments and wish to thank the new Commissioner - who makes his de today in this House - in the work we are preparing to carry out. 
It must take responsibility for how EU money is spent, focusing on processing fresh land and, in the case of the livestock sector, only for animals who are in the business in the year relating to payments. 
New open to the meeting has been presented on the link between the harmful use of alcohol, social development and the spread of infection, such as HIVand Toio, for important, an important link that deserves to be taken into account. 
To conclude the first phase of this oral report on the European Ombudsman 's annual report, we expect constructive work with the European Parliament to continue in the same way to promote the institution 's activities as a model of good governance for the national administrative authorities and to continue to function as a communication link between the European institutions and the citizens of Europe. 
ECvision between the European Community and the Malaysia Government on certain aspects of air services ( vote ) 
I therefore ask, at least in this case, that we do not contribute to the creation of additional burdens in the legal and economic environment in the European Union. 
It would question the events of 199, 1989, or from the autumn of 2006 ? 
You have not been informed of you, and were not informed of you ? 
( DE ) I proproproproproproproproprosugwe prosugin paragraph 10 to take the following : : 10 5 10 5 5 5 5 5 10 : 10 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 10 to be a mianina : : 10 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 5 to be a to be a way to be a way to be a : 10 to be a to be a into a paragraph to be a to anto be a to be a to anto be a to be anto be to be anto be to be to be mito be mito be a to be mito be to be a to be mito be to be to be mito be to be mito be to be to be to be to be to be to be to be to be mi: : : : : : : : 10 to be to be to be to be to be the : : to be to be the : to be to be to be to be mito be to be to be to be to be to be to be to be mito be mito be mito be mito be to be anto be to be to be anto be anto be anto be aninto be aninto be anto be to be to be to be to be to be to be anto be anto be mianto be mianto be mito be anto be mianto be mianto be mianto be mianto be mito be mianto be mito be mianto be mianto be mito be mianto be mianto be mianto be mianto be mianinaninanto be mito be mito be mito be mianto be mito be mianto be mianto be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the : to be the 10 to be mianto be mianinanto be abanto be abanto be abanto be anto be abanto be abanto be abanto be abanto be mianto be abanto be abanto be abanto be aban: : : : : : 10 be abanto be abanto be aban: 10 ing the 10 to be aban: 10 to be aban: : : 10 to be aban: 10 to be aban: 10 inthe 10 inthe 10 be aban: : : 10 be aban: 10 be aban: 10 to be the 10 be aban: 10 an: 10 to be abaninthe 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be abaninthe 10 to be abaninthe 10 to be abaninthe 10 be abaninthe : : : : : : 10 an: : : 10 be abanto be abanto be the 10 to be the 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be anto be the 10 to be the 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be abanto be ab: 10 to be aban: : : : : : : : : 10 to be the 10 to be to be be be be aban: : 10 10 10 10 10 to be to be to be to be to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : 10 to be the 10 10 10 10 10 to be the 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 to be the 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 10 : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : 10 10 10 10 10 10 to be to be the 10 to be the 10 to be the 10 10 to be the 10 10 10 to be 
As far as delay is concerned, you are concerned : there is some delay : there is some delay : there is some delay in the delay of delay. 
I would like to remind you that the creation of a single patent will bring benefits to the benefits of the patent system in Europe and, in particular, enable small and medium-sized enterprises, who are often neglected, improve competitiveness by better access to protection through the patent, as well as cuts in expenditure. 
It will depend on Irish voters, but I will be too disappointed if they are given pressure. 
The speaker agreed to answer a blue card question under Rule 149 ( 8 ) of the rules ). 
It is to understand the past and the causes of the crisis and I believe that the Union has prepared to hold its home, but today the focus on the future is to be on the future. 
It will be done, and we must also make savings, and we must also make savings. 
It is a good opportunity to lay the foundations for us to lay the foundations for the foundations. 
Last year, last year, they thought to a comparative smooth hundred throughout the Iraq in Iraq. 
It is that all the countries wishing to join and candidate countries must use democratic institutions to strengthen them, not undermine them. 
More than one quarter of all the Schengen visas issued in the world is more than a quarter of all the Schengen visas issued in the world. 
Proposals must be supported in combining innovative measures to help reduce material losses caused by flooding. 
In Slovenia, we have to vote on it in a referendum that will take place on 6 June this year on 6 June this year. 
It is not that this does not mean Europe to burden an additional financial responsibility that would fail to fail to any budget. 
Moreover, this resolution encourages Russia as a member of the Council of Europe, to commit to fully respecting European standards in the area of democracy, human rights and the rule of law. 
There is a lot of replacements that could help to provide the necessary protests, such as Polish, dare and Polish portfolios, a sick, a sick, not to mention the recreational and the dealers, which may significantly reduce greenhouse gas emissions. 
However, it is also important that, in the context of the limits that are imposed in the EU, it is also important that MEPs reduce their expenditure. 
Specifically examples and the Council are referring to some of them and the Council, and I refer to some of them. 
It is : what growth we mean in the century, where the whole global system is changing is changing ? 
It proposes a level playing field, which respects the differences and independence of the many associations, and will help civil participation in the political process to address the serious challenges put forward to it, both national and European level. 
For this reason, I have decided to support the rapporteur on this issue and to vote in favour of this report and to vote in favour of this report. 
The absence of a common immigration policy that is decent and consists of the values that Europe claims to stay, risk strengthening in the planned review of Article 13 of the problem of repression and persecution of illegal immigrants. 
What is worse : the treaties now already foresee that any other commitments or restrictions will be subject to other commitments or limits, perhaps, more, global,,,, on a scale : NATO, the UN, the UN and one generally knows what more so. 
I stand behind the efforts of the Member States to support the freedom of association and collective bargaining, to eliminate forced and compulsory work, to put an end to discrimination in the workplace and the profession and to the abolition of child labour. 
Also appropriate legislative solutions are also proper to ensure that religious pluralism is brought into line with European standards. 
The competitiveness of the sector must also be balanced, and the competitiveness of the sector must be balanced. 
There are only a few examples of examples and explanations of the general amendments that I call on you to support you, which I call on you to support you, and I would like to support. 
I was not answered on the question of Camp Ashraf Camp Ashraf, I did not answer to the question of Camp Ashraf. 
The vote vote : : : : : : : vote vote vote vote : : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote 
Parliament proposed a compromise at the last week, Parliament proposed a compromise at the last time at the last week at the last time at a time at a time in time, Parliament proposed a compromise at the last week. 
It is unfairly unambiguous and it is paradoxically pleased that the perpetrators often have much more rights and that much more talk of the rights of perpetrators than about the rights of victims. 
It is to ensure at least that these money will not go to the US, at least, come from the fact that these money will not go to the US. 
Delays with the answers and avoiding legislative and the moral obligations are signs of decent conduct. 
A change to be achieved in Copenhagen will have to be based on the principle of shared responsibility, but also on the limited responsibility. 
2008, the European Commission recognised that these languages represent an important link between people and countries from various regions in the world. 
We help the banana sector in these countries, we are helping them to develop the economy, create jobs and combat poverty. 
I therefore call on the Commission to ensure that in all our future action will be taken into account in all our future action, given the various characteristic features of each country - things that are actually functioning well and are essential to pension systems in the Member States. 
It is that in 2010, particular attention should be paid to the programme of training young entrepreneurs and supporting their own businesses in launch their own businesses. 
There is long to have a potential, and other minors and minors to be executed in Iran in Iran. 
To this end, it is decided to implement the policy of the in the South and maritime ' to immigrants ' policy. 
It is not here this evening here this evening, it is not here tonight that is here tonight. 
However, it would also be good to see this kind of commitment in other areas : for example, to promote financial supervision at European level, to engage in fiscal reform at European level or with a true commitment to a financial transaction tax. 
They are people who do not receive help, who do not receive help, but they are not receiving help. 
In this connection, I must warn you of unfair competition, for which the third world in the world is in the integrated market can create preconditions for prerequisites. 
A lot more attention to purchasing power and definitely purchased power in the internal ability of some regions is far less than the average for the country. 
They voted 'no ' because they did not go into sufficient Federal direction in sufficient Federal direction. 
We leave this country, I voted in favour of it, I voted in favour of it. 
You said last week - for which I thank you - during the talks with Mr Barroso and then that, if the law is incompatible with European law, you will submit it in your Parliament the necessary changes. 
The Commission is convinced that an adequate process will only be a coordinated within the Community framework, contrary to the unilateral initiatives of Member States to remove border controls on internal borders. 
A successful free of poverty, a trade transferation of Communism will not always disappear in the wake of the day. 
In particular, they are particularly concerned about their salaries, of the rights of workers and public services, and of demilitary and the right to a voice by smaller countries. 
500 workers will lose their jobs in the next month and, still, 151 1 1 000 workers are threatened by the chain along the chain. 
It must be a representative of the High Representative to make its commitment, which has already been highlighted in a number of reasons, to ensure that Member States such as Romania are currently unwell represented in the structures of the Commission and the Council on Foreign Affairs, which will be transferred to the EEAS, will be fairly represented in the European External Action Service. 
I would like to emphasise that we must help the natural emission of greenhouse gases, which is helping to preserve biodiversity diversity. 
We can achieve a vaccination in the field of equality between women and men, by providing a system for line with justice, because the respect for women is not enough and it can not be fully defined and included in the best documents, if it is not part of our culture, of our voices and remarks. 
Unfortunately, it is almost no mention of the need to combat anti-Roma attitude, the human rights aspect is concerned. 
The foundations for this already laid down by means of the climate change package and energy package agreed by the European Parliament and the Council in December 2008 on this occasion. 
The new comitology rules is a key element of the legislative process of the legislative process. 
It has been debated in this Chamber and I would like to thank Parliament for its strong support for the proposed creation of the category of category, inter alia regions over the next period. 
We have - and we must have - the good will to express solidarity and cooperate with the solution to resolve this problem - and we must have - good will to show solidarity and cooperate with the solution to solve this problem. 
We will be monitoring origin on documents so that this will be meaningful. 
A report essentially concerns in practice, which somehow it is always provided to the report, but which, on the other hand, retains jobs and, in my opinion, must be regulated throughout Europe. 
strongly supports the negotiations initiated by the Commission to achieve a comprehensive trade agreement between the EU and Canada between the EU and Canada. 
There are two areas that can help improve its energy security and have significant potential in terms of industrial development, innovation, territorial development and job creation. 
However, it can only succeed if it is done globally if it is done globally. 
We encourage European policy promoting illegal residence for the residents of migrants to register in the competent authorities, ensuring that this will not lead to rapid and procedures for returning to these workers ' rights. 
We would increase the number of courses and proposals to clean up and improve these skills, as well as promote companies to increase the number of opportunities offered to young people. 
Exploiting explanations of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote. 
It is more confusing to look at how quickly and easily, tens of billions of dollars to save bankruptcy banks, insurance companies, autonomous agencies for unforeseable mobility and duties of the use of car industries and how the dollar tens of millions of dollars are paid in the form of blackmail and hospitals responsible for the financial distance - at the sappearing - at the same time, the mory of the morrich to increased morrich for increased development aid to foreign aid in the field of foreign aid. 
It was at the beginning of this month that Southern Nazi has been abolished to death in the North Korean prison because it has spread the pain, the wealth of its fellow people. 
It is contrary to the spirit of the freezing the settlement of settlements and damaging efforts to create a atmosphere that can help achieve a lasting solution to the conflict. 
It should be possible to present the optimisation of the tools already available, which will become more effective and visible, with the aim of enabling closer cooperation, to be able to mobilise all the necessary resources. 
It is possible to introduce higher standards such as these without money, and all costs are transferred to the authorities, which should introduce standards that should be introduced. 
Interinstitutional and more balanced cooperation in terms of the budget and financial perspectives ; 3 ) ; 3. 
I have mentioned this aim, the path to be very unresolved, was not entirely in the rotating of the roswine, because, despite our united goal, our initial objective of the initial expensive courses in the Council. 
foreign policy must help to help to calm the situation in the light of the situation. 
The least developed countries ', which is used by the UN, is not based exclusively on the level of income at hunger in hunger by the population, but takes into account human capital and economic development problems. 
The rules of origin, the negotiations with South Korea have led to a number of changes which are in agreement with the ongoing reform process in these rules, in these rules. 
It is ready to propose the services of staff with the necessary experience of work in the EEAS, all the moment, where the work of the EEAS is set up in which the work of the EEAS is created. 
There are now, at times, very small civil organisations, who have an excellent long-term job of local civil organisations, who are doing a long-term long-term long-term job at local level. 
We are not trying to get these SMEs out of a excessive bureaucratic burden with an excessive bureaucratic burden. 
European innovation partnerships ' are a tool for creating synergies between already existing programmes between European, national and regional programmes. 
We must do the same, we must credit up small businesses by channelling money to be actually not in practice as countries with debt but as countries with credit. 
The desire to be linked to the year 's year and commitment, to a unilateral commitment to reducing the EU 's common emissions by 200 % to the level of 1990 and the proposal made to switch to a 30 % reduction in emissions if other large producers of emissions are also agreed to contribute to global efforts to reduce emissions. 
However, I do not want to talk about the political aspects of this event, but about the fact that the new government does not have one woman in its members. 
For this reason, I am in favour of a realistic approach and of the maximum use of the treaty using the treaty we have. 
The Progressive Alliance of Socialists and Democrats are doing their job in full remembering this responsibility. 
Likewise, as this disgraceful not enough funding, there is a value of money for countries that could benefit from the financing instrument for cooperation with industrialised and other countries and territories with high income ( ISA ), but I will end, Mr President, not be able to do so, because there is another solution to the legal basis of this instrument. 
It will also help to increase consumer confidence and also the interest of businesses to cross-border transactions to cross-border transactions. 
Unfortunately, we are now in a situation of talking about those who are abducted and held in the hearing of piracy from piracy. 
The European Union should include this issue on the agenda of relations with Iamana as a matter that does not seek postponement. 
I would like to assure you that the Commission has monitored regularly on the transposition and implementation of the Qualification and Tax Directive. 
in writing. - I am in favour of this report, given that the current fisheries partnership agreement between the European Community and San Tomand Principality is in force since 2006 and the deadline for the protocol to it has come to the end of 31 May 2011. 
Many negative energy severe stations from Germany from Germany, from Germany, from the German energy settlements from Germany, are very negative. 
The new functions of Europol will only be possible by changing the legal basis for participating by the European Parliament 's participation in the European Parliament. 
The New Zealand of the uncontrolled use of cross-border healthcare would have been enormous in the case of the New Zealand of the uncontrolled use of cross-border healthcare could have been huge. 
This case, we found a solution that I would have set as a model example, while this decision will be used later this week and later this week in relation to another important legislative act. 
It is essential that the emphasis is placed in particular on the observance of fundamental human rights of the person involved, in other words, suspected and undermined, in all the photographs of criminal proceedings and, at the same time, to ensure the relevant level of data protection for personal data protection. 
( DE ) Mr President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, I would like to express my sincere thanks to those colleagues from the European Parliament and the European Commission who have been involved in the work on the joint report. 
Members, those of you who will come back to the next term of office : we will have to make double efforts to ensure that the Commission is rejected once and for all, not only conditional upon this Commission. 
We have 1 500 cases in which we are working on in cooperation by tackling the problems, through mediation, mainly in the name of citizens, but also on behalf of a large number of businesses. 
Our opinion is such assistance is better and more effective than direct aid, where the money is used without a right to judge. 
As regards the third and final element of the Spring Group 's Special Group, I come to the follow-up that I come to in the next action. 
Last year, this government adopted a new media law, which guarantees the freedom of the press, which guarantees freedom of the press, last year, was adopted last year, which ensures freedom of the press. 
significant social issues where people who are partial, go beyond what they need to do. 
It is a cease-fire and opening of not only corridors of humanitarian aid, but all the controls, because what would happen if people do not have any trade in place and there is no trade in people ? 
Parliament and Parliament must work hand in hand and ensure that these funds coincide with our will with our will, coincidence, with our will, with our will. 
Unfortunately, the three frozen conflict in the region has seriously hindered the full development of the European Neighbourhood Policy and not only this, but also the development of states themselves, too. 
It is possible to make secure investment for a long period of time to make secure investment for a long period for a long period. 
The Council has proposed once again to address the need to set a target of reducing carbon dioxide in the European Union from 30 %, opening the possibility of 40 % of industrialised countries and proposing it - and this is essential for international negotiations - Europe to provide EUR 30 billion for the climate fund for developing countries by 2020. 
It is being seen that the new European microfinance instrument for employment and social inclusion of Progress will give them a significant support in this regard. 
I would like to emphasise this urgently the need for the Member States and their respective regions to apply to European funds that are available to them at their disposal. 
IUEE recommends that the Council approaches the accession of both parties in the Schengen area and I would like to thank all my fellow Members for the professional work they have done. 
Within the framework of the ' plan ( democracy, dialogue, dedicated ) must show to the citizens that the European Union and its institutions are transparent and serve to citizens. 
The House, which is responsible for external financial control, states that, following a careful assessment of the accounts of the Centre 's accounts, she has obtained sufficient assurance that they are reliable and that the underlying transactions are legal and regular. 
However, it is much more than ever more than that, however, but it is much more than that, however, more than that, and much more than that is. 
The Tibetan population is banned to do whatever it is to save their own culture, identity and religion. 
President cut off the speaker ) the speaker of the speaker ). 
So, using our debate today, because we are preparing for the London Summit next week, I propose that we Europe take the central role in replacing so-called in the past Washington Consensus with a new and principal economic consensus of our time. 
Not proposed by the EU institutions, and they are elected by the citizens of the Member States ' citizens of the Member States ' Member States ' citizens. 
In particular, given the objectives of reducing metals and red shocks, and attack on meat consumption and dairy products. 
The report and its recommendations and its recommendations, its reports and its recommendations, its reports and its recommendations, and its recommendations. 
It is the third largest EU trading partner and is essential strategic to Europe 's energy supply supplies, and is of the strategic importance to Europe 's energy supply. 
This does not mean that perhaps, perhaps, perhaps there is something fundamentally wrong in the European Union ? 
On the contrary to the interim agreement signed between the EU and the US on processing and transfer of financial data for European citizens, not only because it is very much emphasised, given that it calls for proportionality, as well as the integrity and security of European financial data, but also because Parliament has not been given the chance to properly exercise its prerogatives. 
There should be more effective coordination of objectives and funds, and it is closely linked to the EU 2020 strategy and EU policies for the post-2013 period. 
This is what I draw my attention to Amendments 3, 4, 4 and 5, to Amendments, 4, 4 and 5. 
I am sure whether I understood all the details, but I can, of course, come to an end in them later. 
I say this recently, and I note this this time I note my remarks specifically to you, Mr President, and I say this time, and I note this time, and I note my remarks in particular to you, Mr President. 
The potential consequences of delaying the implementation of the return to illegal migration, while this person has to receive his remuneration. 
These also includes the implementation of these requirements for existing buildings requirements for existing buildings, and also involving the implementation of these requirements for existing buildings. 
policies risk still being able to pull growth in the mirror when it is only starting to return to positive values, even though the rate that is increasing the burden of production capabilities remains low. 
Progress made through this directive compared to existing legislation is that patients will be able to choose their providers of health services and have access to information about the quality and safety of the care they receive. 
Budget and management ( BBG ) as a tool for managing the allocation of budgetary resources for the 2007-2013 Financial Framework ( debate ) 
This is the fact that the spirit of being the spirit of adopting here Guantánamo prisoners, as it seems to be that they will risk security after their release after their release ? 
I would like to take this opportunity to point out a new instrument that must be created by the European Parliament and could be financed by this instrument, in order to support people in even more effective and flexible way that are often risking their lives in the fight for democracy, the rule of law and human rights in countries with dictators of dictatorships and open regimes, as well as in transition to countries in democracy in which they have a strong opportunity to combat democratic assistance in the prevention of democratic assistance, and to have more democratic assistance in the preventive way. 
The cities and urban areas need particular attention within the framework of cohesion policy, in the framework of cohesion policy, in particular, in the framework of cohesion policy. 
on the opinion of the Committee on Development. - ( LT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to emphasise that the Treaty of Lisbon will give the European Union more opportunities to take the initiative in shaping development policy to improve the coordination of donors ' donors ' coordination when defining tasks and providing assistance more effective assistance. 
Mr President, the promise of the internal market in the EU is worth 17 % of the global market in goods and the internal market in the EU is 28 % of the world market in services in the EU 's world market of services is 28 % of the world market of services. 
However, one must recognise - as many things in life - when things do not work and think about alternatives. 
We explain to them what is actually a true visa and so we should avoid ambiguity and other unreasonable points that could occur. 
The limited time has only been mentioned several examples of your examples, which we believe is in need high or even higher levels of protection. 
The CAP must be understandable not only for farmers, but also for taxpayers, but also for taxpayers, but also for taxpayers, but also for taxpayers, too. 
These matters are well regulated in this text, but we believe that there are three points that we need to improve. 
That is why for Thailand, it is imperative for us to find consensus with all parties on how to move forward towards a more pressing society. 
It must be transferred to the other side : Hamas, not Israel must pay for the implementation of Gilad Shalit, a European hostage, for a stagnant offer. 
It is that the many calls from the European Union and other parts of the world to improve the human rights situation are simply being ignored. 
Our High Representative seems to be saying that much has been said, but it is doing so very little, but it is doing so little bit. 
Many things to say about the development of dialogue between citizens and institutions in the European Union, many things are said about the development of dialogue between citizens and institutions in the European Union. 
The Commission was aimed at preventing the marketing of visas ' marking '. 
However, I would like to say to me, the obvious obvious of the African States : you know that what is happening in Zimbabwe is wrong. 
It will become much more complicated, it will be much more complicated. 
The statistics of the International Monetary Fund ( IMF ) in economic terms of Taiwan are in the world, with its EUR 12billion in the world, and its GNI must be highlighted in 1950. 
Unfortunately, which will unfortunately be taken on the one future date, may be in favour of reviewing financial instruments, as the amending budgets and the general budget must be applied to the same approach. 
The Malaysia has signed a number of international conventions, including the Universal Declaration of Human Rights, the Convention on the Elimination of all Forms of Violence ( CEAN ) and the Convention on the Rights of the Child Child, it still refuses to sign others, and particularly the Convention on Human Rights and other forms of cruel, inhuman or degrading. 
in writing. - strongly supports the establishment of a common European immigration policy ', welcomes the institutional consequences of the Treaty of Lisbon, in particular, the extension of codecision procedure and the vote by qualified majority for all the policies on immigration ' and the adoption of the European Pact ', in other words, a humanitarian, security policy based on security measures, immigration policy, which criminalises immigrants and undermines immigrants. 
I would like to point out two aspects of the two aspects of the two aspects of the report, I would like to point out two aspects of the two aspects. 
Is that what he is, it is it that he, he is ? 
In recent weeks, the lives of millions of Poles, Czechs, Slovak and Hungarians have been violated by the floods and natural disasters in Central Europe. 
It is being said that we will be able to start negotiations in this direction soon soon in this regard. 
The preconditions are preconditions for the Council to decide on Article 4 ( 2 ) of the Accession of the Accession Act on the removal of internal airline checks, land and maritime borders. 
The legislative solutions that we adopted will serve as an additional incentive to mobilise European producers, which will realise that green technologies are an opportunity for development. 
Madam President, the constitution of Pakistan is making a difference between Muslims and non-Muslims, thereby enabling discrimination based on religion based on religion. 
I would like to raise the issue of prior approval of hospital treatment, the introduction of a whole series of constraints for the Member States, even though this principle allows both the control of both the financial balance of health systems and the guarantee of the conditions for the recovery of expenditure. 
To take advantage of the power of these communities to make use of the power of these communities, these communities, of course, of taking advantage of the power of these communities. 
These are key elements in this programme in this programme ? 
Together with the European Parliament, we have made significant progress in the context of the Spanish Presidency in the field of financial regulation and in the area of financial regulation, too. 
Those who supported self-regulation in the past must now be adopted in the financing of self-funding. 
in writing. - ( DE ) We need a differentiated approach to the enlargement strategy for enlargement. 
The fundamental principles of which common cooperation are being governed with the United States for the purposes of counteract terrorism and the mechanisms for communicating information on the transactions of its citizens, who are considered to be suspicious or regular. 
It has also reached an agreement with Slovenia ratified by the parliament relatively quickly, which shows the determination to fulfil the requirements that are decisive to fulfil requirements. 
Finally, I would like to mention the crucial role that the European Parliament has played to promote EU ambitious climate policy. 
We have seen at a very important point at a very important point at a very important time, at a very important point, at a very important time. 
local transport is being held a discussion about the violation of passenger transport, while the amendment tabled in Parliament refers to the elimination of a single century of contact that provides transparency and guarantees fair competition. 
The provision of sufficient amount of safe and capital food is a key political priority in the European Union and in the world. 
We are serious about it, the Europe 2020 strategy can focus our local, national economies and European economies to future growth sources, the Europe 2020 strategy can be taken seriously, the Europe 2020 strategy, the Europe 2020 strategy can aim at our local, national economies and European economies to future growth sources. 
The vote is the vote is the vote is the vote on the vote is the vote on the vote. 
I would like to withdraw the slogan of this : raising noise does not result in good and good failure to raise '. 
What I would like to say is : do you make the point to present the TEC 's attention the idea of jointly defining the sharp failure to compare energy saving wind. 
It is on the cross, the cross is at the crossroads of crossing. 
A lot can achieve to achieve this can achieve a lot to achieve. 
( ES ) Mr President, Mr Barroso, a united Europe, which gives priority to global growth and employment, will be able to carry out international economic recovery actions, to strengthen the prevention of crisis management, improve the regulation of the financial systems and support the most vulnerable countries in this first global crisis. 
We are trying to emerge from the crisis, we are promoting job creation, including independent workers, and that is also independent workers. 
The motion for a resolution is in line with the following : it warns it that the Lithuanian State is blamed by freedom and the principle of equality and non-discrimination based on sexual orientation. 
As regards my proposal, Article 186 is a provision for a large number of products, but the milk is not among them. 
It has finally taken its duties and significantly improved and significantly improved the Commission 's proposal and proposal to the Commission 's Commission proposal. 
The situation is what the situation is that the EU will become even closer to the dangerous situation where it will lose its competitiveness to other countries such as the United States, Japan or the countries of the RoIRR. 
This is to avoid scenario scenarios, where the funds remain unused because of excessive regulations and procedures, it is essential to manage and implement cohesion policy to be simplified. 
You will have this opportunity at the end of the debate to speak under the ' procedure, to have the catchprocedure, at the end of the debate. 
An additional measure will provide an additional precautionary measure against abuse and the proliferation of weapons of mass destruction for mass destruction. 
In this connection, I would like to mention briefly that we have developed the original proposals in very close cooperation with the industry in very close cooperation with the relevant industry. 
I say this, I say to you, this, I say, to you, to you, that, I say, to you, that ? 
This is what the SOLVIT prices require additional resources require additional resources, additional resources, additional resources, require additional resources. 
It is a text that not only introduces a European level of the principles of the Financial Stability Council agreed at the G20 meeting in September 2009, but goes further and beyond and rigorous, putting clear and rigorous phenomena to the remuneration of the border and investment institutions and investment companies. 
I have since said that I advocated the point that this will create uncertainty and will simply result in new requests for exemption and exclusion. 
vote on vote on vote on vote on vote on vote on the vote. 
It can be achieved by proposing the leading part of efforts to reopen the single European market, to the single European market, to reopen the world market. 
It is a difficult here that, if we can not compete with the Chinese Chinese, how will we compete with one China with improved energy efficiency in the coming years ? 
The first and most important objective of the directive must therefore be to protect public health from falsified medicines, and the most important objective of the directive, must therefore be to protect public health by falsified medicines. 
( RO ) Madam President, President of the Commission, the strengthening of energy security is an important item from your programme of your programme, of your programme, of your programme, is important. 
A energy technology plan is aimed at contributing to the achievement of this objective precisely to the achievement of this objective. 
It is an alternative to providing care to home homes for children waiting for adoption or resolving problems in their biological families. 
You are in place at European level with the same energy and determination, we will also move Europe forward towards modernisation. 
fishing is very dependent on oil price price price price, very dependent on oil prices. 
It is important that we support European SMEs, as well as full liberalisation of the movement of people, goods and services, to the utmost extent to the full benefits of the functioning of the single market. 
I therefore ask the Commission to correct this illegal situation in the absence of this illegal situation. 
There must also be significant changes to its internal structures and in decision-making procedures in their internal structures and in the decision-making procedures. 
It also underlines the concern of the impact of the prejudice trade trade judicial judgments on the labour market in Europe. 
Mr President, Commissioner, 2010 is the year of biodiversity and the current regulation will be set up an important provision containing important measures to combat climate change and to preserve biodiversity diversity. 
The agreement must be met : to keep the global warming under the Fund, to cover all countries and to adapt the future efforts to higher levels of ambition, in order to accede to the trap of new knowledge. 
I also commend the work of President Caldern in Mexico, and he also deserves our support in the fight against cartel cartels. 
It is so possible to prove that Europe can be a leader in this area, too, to prove that Europe can be a leader in this area. 
Europe 2020 is a project for growth and employment - we need concrete projects - we need tools, we need procedures, we need to have a punishing mechanism so that it can successfully be successfully implemented. 
This type of support provisions to continue in the documents on the relevant programmes for the 2007 period - 2013, 2013. 
We should also pay equal attention to the South and East, and we should pay attention to the South and to the East and to pay equal attention to the South and to the East. 
The European Union 's priority objectives should be to implement a transparent, clear, effective and high quality regulatory environment objectives. 
It must play its role in playing its role in playing a role. 
Unfortunately, it is regrettable that the importance of human trafficking is not aware of the parliaments of 16 Member States, including I have to say, my own country and they have not seen the necessary to ratify and adopt the Council Convention on Human Rights in 2005. 
The review of EU legislation concerns mainly technical issues, which have no major political impact on the review of EU legislation, which are particularly about technical issues that have no major political impact. 
The consumer spending of the private sector of hunger in the private sector of the population is increasing by more than 80 % over the last decade, in the last decade. 
We need a stable European economic governance, but we must first tackle the chaos caused by debt, but we need a stable European economic governance, but we must first tackle the chaos. 
Of course, we must, of course, support democracy and the protection of human rights and the protection of human rights and the protection of human rights. 
We must emerge from the recession, we must plan the necessary financial resources at European level and the idea of our own resources should be put into practice in practice, in practice, implemented by the recession. 
The Mediterranean countries of these new technologies are not spreading the same topic on the same topic as the Mediterranean countries. 
I call on the Commission and the Council to step up dialogue and the implementation of the specific measures as part of their relations with these countries. 
It is a mechanism for the wing up of persons seeking to cross the borders of the EU without travel documents, in a way that does not only respect fundamental human rights, but also forces many of them to resort to the more dangerous attempts to enter the Union, often with the cost of their lives, and, of course, the rise in the causes of human trafficking. 
The evening of the International Convention on the Protection of Human Rights of all the workers and the members of their families adopted by the UN, this Holocaust is totally unacceptable : the Union must finally take into account the conclusions of the numerous studies that show that the benefits - both individual and collective for the economy and for the people adopted, and for the countries of origin, with the full of the country and the full implementation of the country, with the full handicap and ineffective application of the law of the law of the migrants. 
amending budget No 1/2008 on the European Union for the 2008 financial year 2008 ( ( 
They did not want this and the people of France and the Netherlands have said 'no ' and said 'no '. 
It is important for us to apply our rules in correct terms of correct terms, correct, correct, to apply our rules. 
( HU ) Mr President, with the accession of Romania and Bulgaria in 2007, part of the Black Sea has become an internal sea sea of the European Union. 
This justifies our actions and, on this occasion, I would like to congratulate Mr Barroso on the ideas he has presented to us today in Parliament today. 
All union must never be the victim of such behaviour. 
thousands of people died, seven thousand thousand thousand disappeared, hundreds of thousands of people have remained without a home, millions of people are without work. 
The agreement on imports in the EU for fishery products and aquaculture products, particularly the conditions in which products produced outside the EU are made available to the market - parallel or in competition with European fishery products and aquaculture products - is essential and every analysis of these sectors of the European economy must necessarily bear it in mind. 
My final point, the issue behind Guantánamo was one of the mistakes that have hard harm the moral authority of the United States to the world. 
A measure which applies to the pays ' principle is aimed at encouraging the gradual renewal of the cartels travelling on our roads. 
At a time when these policies must be united in future, these policies must be united in the future. 
The taxpayers who live in north and the South of the tunnel Brenner in Italy and Austria, who live in north and in the South of the tunnel in Italy and Austria. 
2000, the number of employees in the agencies was 1219, and it is today, and it is here. 
I see the reason for it to stop it and I hope you will assess the very legitimate reasons that I have indicated for the approval of it. 
It is essential to make a crucial difference. 
A few minutes have seen things quite different from a few things, quite different, in a few minutes, in a few things, in quite different words. 
The report currently has 000 patients in the European Union, who are waiting for the right now in the European Union, who are waiting for the proper donor donation of organs. 
cases where human rights are systematically violated, the specific references to the relevant states are an extremely important instrument both in the UN Human Rights Council and in the United Nations General Assembly. 
My home is this : can we expect to receive a mandate for a new negotiating negotiations on the transfer of written data before or during the summer summer summer : can we expect to receive a mandate for a new negotiating mandate ? 
rules on eligibility of expenditure ; the eligibility of expenditure ; 
Not only our people are not only our future, they are our present one and we will insist on our present, either, and we will insist on our future. 
More generally, beyond the financial systems, with the use of short-term initiatives in pursuing our long-term objectives, we will draw double taxation. 
However, of course, this is the legitimate practice of legal barbarity, which are measurable to the blame that our newspapers communicate to us. 
This, almost 80 % of people from minority groups living below the poverty line, below the poverty line, almost 80 % of the people of minority groups, are living below the poverty line. 
MEPs must also be responsible for the way in which they vote. 
Indeed, it was due to the lack of experience in a country that has experienced almost half a century, but also to those who were fully prepared to exploit these weaknesses. 
After all, the Solidarity Solidarity can make three major achievements in its history, in its history, highlight three major achievements in its history, in its history, in its history,. 
In view of this, it is clear that the European Union must put pressure on the UN Secretary-General to draw up a true independent assessment. 
We can exert pressure on the Commission, but it would prefer not to do so when we are so hard for us to have been so much time. 
There is a lot of living in the face of poverty, quite below the poverty line, in the face of poverty, in a very far too much way, in the face of poverty. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this resolution because fishing, particularly in the Mediterranean, is something more than just one economic activity - is part of culture and the way in life. 
This is very undeniable that, by 2010, the press will become the most prosperous disease in modern society. 
This would highlight the importance of providing appropriate information on social provisions, as well as of the creation of appropriate infrastructure and paternity areas to ensure compliance with provisions. 
We imagine that the education of someone is continuing for 30 years, and the employment life of 30 years will be retired for them to be retired for 40 years. 
: Croatia, Macedonia and Southern Europe, Macedonia and SouthEurope, and SouthEurope, Europe, and SouthEurope, Europe, and Southern Europe, Europe and Southern Europe, is going on. 
The introduction of border controls between Liechtenstein and Switzerland for the first time in local places, where there has been no real limit for more than a century for more than a century. 
However, all of this happens, and in order to succeed in the Union for the Mediterranean, appropriate resources are needed, and this time we should not be treated with an irregionable one. 
In order to present a more complete picture of the development of the internal market, the Committee on the Internal Market and Consumer Protection calls for the Internal Market Scoreboard to be published at the same time, the SOLVIT report, the report by the Office for the Commission to be oriented for the development of the markets in small markets. 
It is also financial effort to create a suitable infrastructure, including a sufficient number of safe places for parallel and services in the network of European roads, so that the drivers can really respect the provisions for time management and rest periods. 
It will missed the facts and support what it said, and will support what it said. 
However, we know that this is a very serious disease of very serious financial consequences and therefore also represents a very serious social problem, and a very serious social problem. 
' ' ' is '. 
In two words, it would increase the burden on the British taxpayer taxpayer taxpayer, if increased, for the British taxpayer. 
I therefore support the report by my colleague Social Democrat, who supports a strong CAP responsible for young farmers ; proposes combating speculation on agricultural markets and price volatility, which causes ; and confirms that the fight against poverty within the EU and around the world must become a priority, such as food security and access to food food prices. 
It indicates that among the large countries such as Portugal are dealing very well in such comparisons and that larger countries like Spain are today recognised as leaders in terms of organisation and best practices and best practices. 
It is to discuss this frameworks, to face up to this inhumane phenomenon and to effectively combat sexual violence in Haiti. 
I have heard, which I have given the impression of one excellent principle, the free movement of people is one of the most important freedoms. 
It was largely discredited, thanks to several Member States, which have very dubious results in respect of human rights abides. 
A major sense of repairing a building so that an energy-efficient effective one can be remained unlikely if there is no restraint then, because then the employment has been increased drastically. 
I have started and will continue to work, and I can confirm my commitment to it, and I can confirm my commitment. 
I was a supporter of the creation of opportunities for dispute for people with disabilities with disabilities. 
I believe that the report comes out of the difficult situation and is a first, important step towards the creation of a strong European foreign policy decided to stand up for its own role and political importance on the international stage. 
renewable energy, which these countries have, is essential for their economic and social development, allowing them to move towards energy independence so that they can deal with the global crisis. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
It is that the resolution has been submitted, but most importantly, it is important that human rights are made to shape a transition over the economy. 
With an extremely interest in what you will say is what you will say, what you will say, is very much in the interests of you say. 
The forced abortion abortion abortion abortion, has been forced. 
The disputes in connection with the Euroagreements have rely on the full of diplomatic solutions to the Euroagreements, on the basis of diplomatic solutions, have relied on the basis of diplomatic solutions. 
Out of this, I do not agree with the fight against HIIV in sensitive matters such as abortion, as abortion, I do not agree to the fight against HIV. 
The deployment of money in Roma seasons does not result in the Roma settlements, as shows, by experience so far. 
In other words, Central Europe shows that there is still a future for the former parties - even for them, there is therefore a life after the death of the old system, in fact. 
It is aimed at facilitating the provision of services throughout Europe, and it is aimed at facilitating the provision of services throughout Europe. 
I, too, regret the regret that the Council is not here, here, not here, here, but I am sorry, but I am sorry, too. 
To achieve this, the definition of the goal is the best way to use resources in a more effective way - an objective to pursue, particularly if the result is the sincere and due to a woman 's sincere and worries. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
We must reach them or delay them, but enable them to successfully integrate into public life and continue their professional development. 
In this sense, I would like to stress that the dementia, of course, do not only concern the pain ; they also concern the people around them, such as the members of families and health workers, such as the members of families and health workers. 
What you say in your resolutions is that the rights of a national state are over the rights of the individual citizens. 
This is, of course, leading to greater transparency of the legal provisions of European legislation on consumer protection legislation, in the field of consumer protection. 
That is what we are looking for with civil society and parts of the administration and we will try to find a common language with the government on its responsibilities to achieve the Millennium Development Goals. 
A procedure will also streamline the process of issuing authorised authorisation through a centralised evaluation of food safety by the European Food Safety Authority ( EBA ) and will provide precise deficiencies for each stage of the process. 
This initial phase of reducing the plenary session of the Joint Parliamentary Assembly would make sense in this beginning. 
The extent to the seriousness of the consequences of mental health infringements, today in the world and in Europe, there are still countries where the problem is not given sufficient attention to the problem. 
Not all of them have been adopted, particularly those who are advocating instruments for regulating the markets and intervention mechanisms that guarantee farmers fair prices and the right of each country to produce. 
Madam President, I am not a supporter of the notion that our economic sands are being hit in the small reductions of the added tax, something we have seen in the UK - with frankly - a significant positive positive positive effect. 
We welcome Russia 's active commitment to promoting dialogue between the Presidents of Armenia and Azerbaijan in relation to the problem of Nagornoin Nagorno. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, we know from our experience of experience what the geological and the blank barbargains are, ladies and gentlemen, what we know what the geologic and the blank bargains are. 
It was critical, but constructive support for our commitment to our commitment with Turkey in a very important period of crucial time has been critical, but constructive support for our commitment to Turkey in a crucial period. 
agreement will help exchange ideas and try to make the well-being of the scientific community, industry and ordinary citizens ' well-being. 
The last point can be that we have the opportunity to say it, and therefore all Ukrainians must be confident that integration, cooperation with Europe and changes in legislation are their personal responsibility to their personal responsibility. 
Members who have submitted a request to speak will be informed about whether or not they were elected or not. 
It is also so unlikely that women are exposed to greater risk of falling into poverty than men ; particularly, it is a great risk in the older women and self-parents. 
Proposals are made in Parliament and proposals are made in Parliament. 
( HU ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, millions of European citizens expect us to make swift decisions, ladies and gentlemen, to make swift decisions, and to make it possible for us to take swift decisions. 
It will also have to be included in your mandate and in the outcome of your negotiations and in the outcome of your negotiations. 
The system will be completed to protect fundamental rights within the Union and you have personally aware that under the Treaty of Lisbon, this is not an opportunity but to achieve a system for protecting fundamental rights within the Union. 
At this meeting, it will be to present the formal agreement on the credits for Greece, the financial support package to address Greece 's severe financial situation, a member of the euro area, and to consider the lessons that may be drawn from the situation and agreements for the future of the euro area and the whole of the European Union. 
The creation of the Green Paper on the reform of the common fisheries policy gives us all the opportunity to change the common fisheries policy and I hope that Members will benefit from this chance to see the greatest possible number of voters in the green Paper so that their voice is heard. 
The EIB has taken concrete steps to address the situation, particularly by setting up its Committee on audit, which has significant experience in banking supervision. 
There is one last point to touch on one final point in the last point, which has been touched on a final point. 
It is stressed that border controls are under Community law, particularly the Code of the Schengen borders, in particular. 
in writing. - ( tabling for oral reply and written declarations ( submission ) : see Minutes 
However, it is a time for action, however, for action is a time, for action, for action is a time, for action ? 
We want to create a museum, but we had the opportunity today to say our position and to say that the control on the press by the Italian Prime Minister is a misuse. 
Democracy, where citizens enjoy fundamental freedoms and human rights, will result in significant advantages for Georgia. 
It must be seriously addressed by the people responsible for policies that are responsible for policies that are responsible for policies. 
Also, it must be applied as regards labelling of animals of animals feeding genetically modified food products. 
The Commission will provide support to the impact assessment, which will show the justification for this initiative, the Commission will propose tightening up EU legislation, in particular, to improve checks and the implementation of the Regulation on the transport of waste. 
I start to respond very briefly, because the document that the honourable Member mentioned is not a document adopted by the Commission and has no authorisation for his publication, but the Commission intends to adopt a communication later this month to the Council and Parliament in which the benefits and costs related to an increase in the target of reducing greenhouse gas emissions by 30 %. 
I hope that this will not only be a strategy that remains in the other strategy that remains on the other throut, so I would like to point out what is emphasised in the report - the importance of implementing and controls. 
Ininvestment fund has announced that the operations that are being prepared will also be balanced in terms of the geographical scope. 
Tening closely monitoring trends in terms of the photops and related markets related to the phones and related markets. 
However, paragraph is possible to be subject to different interpretations of different interpretation, however, to the subject of different interpretations, however. 
It is aimed at establishing a common framework for passenger rights in bus and coach transport by guaranteeing them a level of protection that has already been introduced for other vehicles such as trains and air phones. 
The new text we have added new requirements for transparency, which are of paramount importance, which are of paramount importance. 
A stable framework for cooperation through the Black Sea Synergy Integration initiative, which was set up some time ago, even though there are no real results. 
I am convinced that the European Union must send out a clear message to Belarus that it is ready to review relations with the country if Belarus is not abstained by human rights and democratic principles and not taking corrective action. 
fundamental right can be open to the European Council conventions and elsewhere, but not in practice, not in practice, but also in practice. 
Or is it a Pittsburgh to pay to a Polo or perhaps we are either boating a Poles, and a Pittsburgh and, ultimately, no thing do we have nothing to do ? 
I am always in favour of this, first of all, being put to the safety of consumers and their right to information, and that is what is about all food. 
We want money to exceed capital blocks to exceed capital blocks, we want money to prevail capital. 
in writing. - This report because I support the annual review of the Europe 2020 strategy, the main emphasis to which the integrated guidelines of employment and economic policy guidelines must be integrated. 
We therefore need Russia 's help to convince Iran not to create a nuclear bombing of a bombing, but we need to convince Iran to do not to create nuclear bombing. 
I would like to thank you, Mr Diamandouros, and I will conclude by saying that, as a result of your daily work, we have concrete evidence that it is not only possible to adopt these challenges, but especially to give appropriate and satisfactory answers to the citizens. 
President Obama has clearly confirmed its ambition to have a world without nuclear weapons and its commitment to striving the Treaty on full ban on nuclear attempts ( DCC ) by the United States. 
However, new, sustainable ways of better and more efficient use of resources and goods are becoming increasingly necessary, but they are sustainable, sustainable ways of using better and more efficient use of resources and the goods. 
The allocation of the EGF funds have been simplified in the light of the complex situation in the labour market and the growing number of unemployed people. 
It will be a positive result that this will be a positive result, as a positive result, that this will be a positive result. 
The argument against this kind of action is the situation in the Member States which have attacked to it at national level. 
It is now a question of negotiating a particular agenda for the TEC, which reflects these priorities in question. 
For this reason, I voted in favour of this report, for this reason, of this report, of the report, which is why I voted in favour of it. 
in writing. - ( PT ) The fact that the fact that the fact that the various EU Member States have not yet recognised the independence of Kosovo is enough to show us that the content of this resolution is unacceptable. 
It is not acceptable to more and more institutions providing services of public interest to be exposed to private competition. 
Indeed, the Commission has issued its guidelines for a low cancer race and we are now pushing on the Member States to comply with these guidelines and introduce programmes for a lower speed for cancer in their countries as soon as possible. 
The fact that the new protocol is also provided for for a provision for the temporary suspension of the implementation of the protocol in the event of human rights violations. 
It will also be a major test and challenge for Hungary, too, and a challenge for Hungary, for Hungary, and a major test will also be a major test and a major challenge for Hungary. 
Just as in agriculture, we establish high environmental standards and standards for quality and animal protection for our fishermen, which is, of course, also reflected in prices. 
It is my knowledge of what the social position is, what is the real position of the Socialists ', is, and I know what the real position of the Socialists is. 
I believe that this own-initiative report is timely and, as a whole, I am in favour of this own-initiative report, I believe that this own-initiative report is timely and, as a whole, I support it. 
It is of the opinion that the use of antimicrobial substances could result in the closure of the insufficiently implementing hygiene norms. 
In cases of breach of human rights, democracy and the rule of law ( announcement of motions for resolutions tabled ) : see Minutes 
I also request that the present order be maintained, and I am asking for this order to be maintained, to keep this order. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, first of all, I would like to thank the shadow rapporteurs, with whom we really cooperative in writing this report, and, secondly, to all the Members of the committee secretariat, because this was a very difficult task. 
The fact that economic governance, the economic governance, the economic government of the Union, must have a strong foundation for the Union 's economic governance, the economic government of the Union must have a strong basis. 
However, it is very clear that the future of our Mercosur partners is certainly allowing the reopening of the negotiations, but that is not, of course, of course, ensuring that their successful conclusion is successful in the successful conclusion. 
The estimates of experts, for a period of 10 years, by 15, the most important environmental viewpoint in the Danube River will disappear, in the case that the Uganda is continuing in the same way as has been done so far, namely, with the highest possible extract possible extractions. 
However, the fact should not, however, stop raising these issues in Parliament should not, however, be a matter of fact, but should not be the case in fact. 
Finally, I would like to say that I hope that the fundamental provisions in this report will be included in the essential reforms in future in the future. 
It is not only welcome, but also necessary to maintain the reliability of the EU and its common fisheries policy and its common fisheries policy. 
It will also strengthen the credibility of the Union from third countries, as it regularly requires the observance of human rights within its bilateral relations. 
The role of implementing and making the creation of a workforce at the start of a deregulatory financial regulatory framework, in an effective financial framework. 
It is that this will affect too negative on the livelihood of the Maltese fishermen, is that this will affect the share of the Malaysia fishing fishermen. 
networks that facilitate the flow of information and providing support in the need for businesses guided by men, while women are more vulnerable than that point in terms of view. 
in writing. - This document is because there is a need to strengthen the supervision of the European market, to provide better access to basic banking services, to the creation of a single integrated market and to eliminate tax barriers and double taxation. 
The European Monitoring Centre for Drugs and Drug Addiction ( EMCDDA ) in Croatia is not carried out in the middle of a study among the population as a whole on the illegal use of drugs as a whole, on drug use. 
We should speak openly on the subject of domestic violence and human trafficking, which is still a still leak and, of course, to introduce the principle of gender equality in the study process of teachers from the initial schools. 
The EPEPEPEPEPEPCO is held without irresponsible, and the EPSCO is held in irresponsible terms of the European EPSCO. 
The conditions have already been mentioned : the quality of public expenditure, the aim of sustainable development, employment policy, the fight against climate change, it is, of course, necessary to compensate as soon as possible to the deficits of previous administrations so that the countries that we help to reach the root. 
This is why 9 May, differently, it is adopted by the old and the new Member States, particularly by the Baltic States, which have lost their independence as a country and whose intelligence was deleted. 
It is regulated in other directives, in the negotiations on which the European Parliament has been involved in the last years in the negotiations on which the European Parliament has been involved. 
It is a programme that enables you, and I hope that this will be possible, we will meet in Railway. 
I am in the sensitive nature of this issue in Europe, as a result of experience, left its press on the people during totalitarian regimes, which without any legal basis, have taken place in the private life of their citizens. 
Exploiting explanations of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote on the explanations of vote of vote. 
It is that the Cyprus issue has its burden on the negotiations, it is that the Cyprus issue has a burden on the negotiations. 
agriculture is one of the most problematic issues and continues to be terribly overlooked in cooperation between the European Union and ACP countries. 
institutional conditions have been adopted to bring about making the citizens close to the citizens and to do so more democratic, more transparent and more effective. 
It offers great potential for development, but it also puts serious challenges both in the developed and in the least developed Member States of the European Union, too. 
For 30 years, this man is expecting that her presence after a trial characterised by errors and omins, as well as with racist interventions. 
but, at the very least, which we can expect from people who come to Europe is to respect them the pressing rules that we can see. 
There are 4 February, there will be reports that we have recently presented, will be there, of course, also historic ( I think we can now call it historic ) on climate and energy package, which we have presented a few years ago during the term of office of my previous Commission. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, in this Chamber, I would say too few hopes, and I at least regret that there are no more Members who are interested in these issues. 
Your voices or spent on the creation of a new asylum service, which will undoubtedly strengthen pressure on the UK ? 
It is simultaneous and provocative and provocative at the same time. 
We must forget that the adopted directive only addresses patients ' rights while the issue of the free movement of health services in the European Union remains unresolved. 
The codified companies are to create a system providing full transparency and which allows us to establish which of them are sticking to the rules and which not. 
It was a very difficult issue during our debates, but we have finally managed to reach a very good compromise on hazardous substances. 
It is a text that, like the two previous previous ones, is aimed at laying down the conditions for road charges in the various countries, is striving to avoid exile distortions so that it does not result in distortions of competition or discrimination or discrimination. 
There can be inconsistency between Romania and Germany between Germany and Germany. 
It is intended to provide training and retraining and to improve skills so that people are prepared to find work and to help them find work. 
The funds and business for sharing capital companies will have to register in the Council on the veterinary of supply when they are going beyond certain very high capital mills. 
It has his or not shared her or nor she of responsibility for the responsibility of us. 
It is when the Member States talk about the financial consequences, it should be understood that the quality of decision making, the first time and ensuring that the procedure of appeal is effectively operating is effectively, and where we can save money and where we can have fair solutions and fair solutions. 
Mr President, one or two years ago, when the euro was strong, the Street, was he was held, the capital of the collapse and explained how it could happen. 
Many money in 2007 and we now have to deal with control systems that are only there, or those who are only functioning in sport. 
The sitting suspended in 1730, a vote is resumed in 1735 35 35,, a low, low, ). 
The Commission has reacted quickly to the economic and financial crisis and the competition policy measures and competition policy measures have been effectively revised and effectively. 
This is happening under the pretext of preserving the privileges that the major groups have benefited - particularly those of the rulings - for which the instrument of the European Union has contributed, such as the Stability and Growth Pact, the economic and monetary union, and the euro. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, as a liberal, I must stress that the Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe is a group that has always supported the enlargement process, because we believe in Europe that is compositive by all its Member States, namely, strong, united Europe. 
Mrs Georgieva 's statement would have been the same two weeks ago before the current events have been events before. 
It is another example of Europe 's place in the service of Europeans, while promoting solidarity between peoples and create benefits for patients, particularly for those suffering from rare or chronic diseases, and which can benefit from access to centres for the race and achievements of the disease they suffer. 
Wherever any case, I will continue to inform the leaders of your political groups immediately, to a few hours after the end of any European Council meeting. 
I would like to propose a reasonable exit of the situation that has occurred in the situation that arise from the situation that arise in the situation that arise. 
A solution can and can be decided, but certainly will not solve the problem of the security of airports ' security, but it can certainly not solve the problem of airports ' security. 
The producers in the European Union must be protected and I do not believe that a trade agreement with Mercosur would achieve this. 
We are aware that neurodegenerative diseases such as Alzheimer 's disease and Parkin are among the biggest challenges in mental health, and therefore the fight against these diseases must respond to three challenges : providing all the hours of patients ' care for the increasing number of patients, improving the conditions where many of those care provides greater support for families and insurance, and many more resources for research, so that patients are reduced to the number of patients. 
As for Syria, we want to fulfil its obligations and therefore to respect the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights and the UN Convention against Torrific, which is actually a party ; we call on Syria to end its policy to the human rights defenders of human rights and their families and to free the protection of human rights defenders, political prisoners and the leaders of peace. 
They are trained to deal with exceptional conditions under the flights, the security ranks of trading airlines are reviewed, checked and confirmed by regulatory authorities and airlines have the necessary experience in the work over volcano areas, as their safety register shows. 
The financial crisis and the significant decline in the number of loans granted, I support the European Commission 's proposal to create the instrument for microfinance designed to the most vulnerable groups, particularly for women, young people, young people, young people and unemployed. 
part of the protection of the European fisheries interests of the fisheries sector in the EU, during the negotiations, the Commission is also aimed at removing the trade partners imposed by our trade partners, which are a threat to the potential for EU industry 's exports in order to ensure equal conditions for competition in bilateral and multilateral trade fishing products. 
However, I would like to once again turn to the opportunity that the industrialised world in the United States and Europe has again, and is to say, to the ability that the industry has has has in the United States and Europe. 
It is one of the most important objectives of the most important objectives, and is one of the most important objectives of the most important objectives. 
This must be examined as closely as possible as possible as possible as regards whether the appropriate readmission agreements for the readmission of minors asylum seekers and economic migrants could prevent abuse of the system of the system. 
Who or she or she will she give a signal to the police or end the treaty, or to end the treaty ? 
We support the proposed directive proposed, we support the proposed directive proposed, which is proposed. 
On the basis of this interpretation, the process will be put into an even more retroium than it is at the moment than it is, which would result in further displacement. 
In particular, we call on the US and China in particular, in particular, and China in particular, in particular. 
It is harmful to this is harmful to it. 
It is a very delicate proposal, and I would like to define it more precisely, precisely, precisely. 
Madam President, Japan is still under the threat of a nuclear disaster, Japan is still under threat of nuclear disaster. 
It is not only part of the European geographical nature, but not only part of the European geographical geographical nature, but is not only part of the European geographical geography. 
Copenhagen has reached the irony not only of the Kroes II, but also of the launch of one of the most rare winners of decades. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of the resolution on the process of European integration of Serbia and the Republic of Serbia on the Stabilisation and Association Agreement because I believe that constructive approaches in regional cooperation and good neighbourly relations are essential components of the stabilisation and association process and play an important role in the process of the process of the transforming the Western Balkans in the region of long-term stability and sustainable development. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
The agreement is three years ago, three years old agreement is three years old. 
The volume of price volatility, I called on the Commission, as part of the new CAP, to provide a more important role to the instruments for intervention and to adopt stricter measures to limit speculation on agricultural markets. 
The Zimbabwe Government will apply all the necessary measures in accordance with the resolutions of the Kimberley Process to restore the normal work of last during the Illegal activity of last minute. 
The amendments refer to Kosovo, gender equality, the rights of minorities, civil society, public transport, to public transport, to the environment and to relations with Bosnia. 
safeguards that we asked the Commission, were rejected by the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ), to the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ). 
These can not have economic development, jobs, stability and security for everyone. 
It is clear to these people who want to take care that Europe 's streets have not been put in place, that Europe can not provide work, prosperity and asylum for everyone and that many of these travel journeys are completing with detention and deportation. 
It is mainly about the fact that Dutch citizens will have to get their knees and pay the accounts of the weak Member States, some of which joined the euro area with fraud. 
For example, cohesion is not the only real instrument that will help us to develop innovation and create jobs and growth, for example, is not the only real instrument that will help us to develop innovation and create jobs and growth. 
We, MEPs, must have the same responsibility to take note of our common expenditure on administrative allowances at a level of EUR 4 months, and for all others. 
Europe must focus on developing the correct capabilities to shape at the time and ensuring the effective functioning of the existing institutions, rather than on the building of additional institutions, which is expensive and unnecessary club. 
It is therefore surprising that the European Council has never all been discussing its whole existence, has not discussed EU-China relations. 
This protocol to amend the Air Transport Agreement is subject to approval by Parliament, while the initial agreement was concluded after consultation with Parliament with Parliament. 
Also important measures to open up product markets, such as too regulated sectors and professions, are also very regulated. 
I say that the motion for a resolution that we have seen is very appropriate, and we also welcome the constructive position not to vote on the agreements so far and the fact that the motion for a resolution requires a proper mechanism for the review of the agreements. 
The Commission therefore urged the Member States of the euro area to decide on a mechanism to ensure the financial stability of the euro area as a whole - a mechanism that will be rapid in accordance with the Treaty and the provision for ensuring liquidity and without the possibility of automatic actions provided for in it. 
The right to freedom of thought, conscience and religion of fundamental human right that we hope to defend through this resolution through the resolution, is the case that we hope to defend. 
The year to fight poverty is obliged to say that dealing with poverty and inequality in the Danube region is a challenge that must be addressed through the strategy. 
Product guarantee ( vote ) 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, this is a repetition in this House, this is a repetition of this Parliament, and this is a repetition of this debate in Parliament. 
We must objectively say that we have done a great deal of work and the results of it can clearly see a commitment to defending human rights and its effects. 
I would like to conclude by saying to the Council, whether to the rotating Presidency or to the permanent Presidency, and to tell you that the Treaty of Lisbon has changed the times under the Treaty of Lisbon. 
There is to be financial limitations in the financing instrument for development cooperation, the resources which were intended to be targeted only to countries with emerging markets and developing countries. 
They must have the same status as they are to have the same status. 
The proposal combines combining the needs of ordinary people in line with the wealth produced in our country is combined in combined with the wealth of the wealth that is produced in our country. 
The EU is insisting on how to slaughter the tax, in any case, it must be dealt with by the brutal contribution in question to the Member State in question in question. 
The European Parliament has once again called for the European Parliament to protect SMEs in today 's resolution once again on the protection of small and medium-sized enterprises. 
In this connection, I would like to focus on the debate on the issue of derivatives ' derivatives. 
It is time for mixed solutions at national level to be applied in the long term, which will be important in the long term, which is not made easy and easy. 
For 10 years, the European Socialists have been fighting in the European Parliament for a financial transaction tax will have many benefits from this tax for 10 years. 
It is also the case of the aid to Georgia, which we have just voted on what we have just voted on in the case of the aid for Georgia, which we have just voted on. 
Unfortunately, the European Union is finding a difficult strategy for the development of a common strategy against the economic crisis, of course, against the economic crisis, against the economic crisis, of the European Union, of the European Union, to find a difficult strategy for the development of a common strategy against the economic crisis. 
It shows political will, which is very important, but the achievement of this objective can only be achieved in a very technical and very strict way. 
We are going to act quickly to help Greece to help Greece to help Greece to help Greece quickly. 
This new version will have to be supplied in a third time of time, a new version of product will have to be supplied in a third time. 
Just for ordinary citizens, students, students, tourists ; it also increases business opportunities, and that is very good enough and that is something very good. 
It would like to take the floor, but we have five minutes for the catchprocedure - for everyone in a minute - for every minute - so five people can speak, so five people can be said. 
After all, we must distinguish what is needed and important, and I believe that you have done good work. 
'yes ', followed by the word against, become the most abuse of the worst ', of the word ', has become the most abuse. 
The budget allocated to around EUR billion for the period 2007-2013, with the light of the years of the Seventh Framework Programme ( FP7 ) has become one of the biggest programmes for supporting research in the world and represents the EU 's main instrument in research policy. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I would like to congratulate the President of the Cancún conference in Cancún for transparent negotiations during such a complex process during such a complex process. 
We therefore support this proposal, just as the competent committee has been submitted, and we can already thank Commissioner Tajani for the significant assurances that the Chamber has given to this House on this matter. 
The current situation is willing to fear that at European level, we are contributing to all the areas of all the more to these differences, to this inequality in the coming years and decades. 
I can not support this report with a clear conscience which explains my vote on this issue. 
However, the Union must constantly support the people of this country and not only as making statements that risk their lives every day in order to protest against these unemployed. 
There will be gradually a gradual differentiation of sanctions within the framework of the precautionary and corrective measures of the Stability and Growth Pact. 
( NL ) Mr President, the President of the UEGroup, Michel Platform recently presented to the European Parliament a excellent proposal to limit the flow of the flow of the traffic in the Gulf of Lukashenko. 
( FR ) Mr President, yesterday, the President quite appropriate hearings here very much to speak to the method of the European Community 's work method. 
in the Group of the Greens/European Free Alliance, we also find it important to limit our blue-fits- area on the ' self-employment self-employment. 
Progress is provided within the negotiations with Central America, in the negotiations with Central America, with Central America, with Central America. 
The attacks taken by Christian faith and its shows are also under pressure in Europe itself, often below the criticisation of crisis, such as secularity approach and neutrality of the countries and institutions. 
The motion for a resolution that I have already voted in the Committee on Economic and Monetary Affairs, and for which I voted in plenary, but it is a clear message from the European Parliament on the part of the European Parliament. 
Delo! : deemplowand ! 
The solutions are extremely political, not technical, and I find it unacceptable to this unacceptable, unacceptable, not to the decisions. 
During its drafting of close cooperation and with thousands of women and women and women organisations, which is why the basis of this document is unique. 
Lastly, I would like to say that it is a good idea to create independent intervention forces and in the participation of the Solidarity Fund. 
It is by you aware that this is the reason for the death of women between 35 and age in the EU and our wish for the Member States, among other things, to introduce costprogrammes at national level and to open specialised delivery for the rate of the date. 
I would like to see a quick implementation, I would like to see quick results - and that is where the interests of European citizens are first serving the interests of European citizens, and then also of European industry. 
It is so important that the European Commission is ready to put additional pressure on the European Commission to provide additional pressure. 
We are building a Europe where there is no place for nationalism, where we are not placing a place for nationalism. 
The Member States must leave to deal with ethical issues such as the evidence and abortion, and the Member States must be able to deal with ethical issues. 
The victory of the left-2006 television visits, the problem as a hearing on the disappearance of the disappearance of the left. 
I will give this House an excellent starting point, especially in the negotiations with the Council, because I believe that together with the Commission - and I thank the Commissioner for his clear position - Parliament will be able to create a situation tomorrow that will ultimately lead to a successful conclusion of the negotiations with the Council. 
I would like to mention, for example, the Presidency 's website where information is proposed for meetings, working documents and tanks to other three points of language, for example, three languages. 
business : see Minutes 
The conclusion of fisheries agreements is also the EU 's overall objective of maintaining and maintaining the fishing activities of its ships, particularly the fishing fleet, and therefore the fishing fleet, for a given plan, is essential to achieve this document on the achievement of the external policy objectives of the common fisheries policy objectives. 
democracy for democracy for democracy is democracy. 
They can only exercise on them on them to only European authorities can only exercise European authorities. 
An answer that Parliament and the report proposes is more money, although there is no clear indication where these money is made is made, where there is no clear denounced. 
on certain documents : see Minutes 
This is increasingly important to have accurate and reliable data, which distinguish the different characteristics and provide a starting point for different intervention, which contribute to the treatment of any case in essentially in nature. 
The EU is good, understandable and fair, comprehensible and fair. 
EC and the Republic of Serbia for stabilisation and association between the EC and Serbia on stabilisation and Association and Association. 
Mr President, Commissioner, our work has not been finished, our work has not been completed. 
I am convinced that the best way to deal with the problem of spread is to give up nuclear energy once and for all, because the citizens ' use also has their dangers and, more so, can not be firmly reminded that the civil nuclear technology will not be used for military purposes. 
It is being said that they will define more ambitious targets and objectives will be set out. 
They are increasing their difficulties and they are incapable of fulfilling their responsibilities and are incapable of fulfilling their duties. 
The slow is also the most important people for the child, and the debate are the most important people for the child, for the child, for their children. 
projects that can be financed from private sources are managed in different ways. 
It is not agreed that it is time to change priorities in international trade and to reject free trade because of the negative impact it has had on the financial, economic, economic, economic, food and social crisis, which people are now suffering with growing unemployment and poverty. 
Of course, it is, of course, a good thing, of course, a good good thing, of course, to be a good thing. 
I am therefore pleased that, in the extra industry, there is security security plans to be made and I will vote in accordance with this. 
In no way will they have a blackmail laws against discrimination, but rather completion them to their socio-economic integration. 
You have heard, you would have heard, that you would hear that she had gone down to hear that she had gone down. 
We must remember that there are already many EU legislation in the field of energy markets, namely because these laws were not respected, the review of this law has been required. 
Before the Verheugen, a number of Members from the Committee on Industry, Research and Energy visited Catholiday to understand how the Scientific investor invested in Scientifi. 
( HU ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, if we want to be honest if we are to be fair, we must regret that credit rating agencies are essentially supported by companies in international plea. 
I said I said that it is necessary to see what is needed and then to decide how we can do so, and then how we can do so best. 
Most of you know, insurance and professional pension provision are two subjects that are very expensive to me, in fact, the issues that I show the greatest interests within the Committee on Economic and Monetary Affairs. 
It is encouraging that this is what happened in our eyes, and it is in the light of our eyes. 
Supporting is the idea that cooperation between the EU and Canada should focus on financing mechanisms, as well as on support for the development of purely of third countries. 
It is a function of standing democracy, human rights and freedom of expression in discussions with the Russians, it is a function to stay democracy, human rights and freedom of expression. 
The awareness of the process and the population of the process was one of the great challenges adopted by almost all the actors in the process. 
I would stress the call in the resolution to make every effort to ensure a return to normal life and to the provision of all the necessary conditions so that refugees and in the internal displacement ( Voluntary Persons ( Volunal Law ) can be returned to voluntarily, safety and dignity in their homes. 
The situation today remains sirrent today remains in the mercian oppressive situation. 
The Barcelona Process was put forward by the Heads of State or Government at the summit on the Mediterranean, held in Paris 13 July 2008. 
With regard to the last question, this is not about all the Members of the Commission, unfortunately we are now unable to publish data relating to other financial resources related to other financial resources. 
The reports are being expressed to be firm on the need to prevent debts and deficits and deficits and have certainly been drawn up in accordance with the economic philosophy that I support. 
The time has then since then, the Commission has done nothing to do so until now, the Commission has done so far since then. 
The frank message is to send out to the government and to the opposition in Greece and to which we in Europe must adopt if we really want to help the country really. 
I am sure I can say that there are many areas where the EU and the US are closely cooperating in order to extend our strategic partnership and achieving results. 
The European Parliament also committed to the question of its resolution in its resolution, too, in the end of 2008, the European Parliament also committed itself to the issue of the issue of the resolution. 
The solution to our energy problems can be found to resolve our energy problems, and the solution to our energy problems could be found. 
President cut off the speaker ) the speaker of the speaker ) 
It is best achieved if it is to have a significant financial participation itself, so that it must have a significant financial participation itself. 
The emphasis placed in this concept on the digital mographity among young people, because they use the most digital technologies, and therefore they must be able to do so in a safe and effective manner. 
That way, we are making a great success, although it is somewhat remembered by large combustion plants. 
friends, it is even more important that the controversial issues are discussed openly, and that these controversial issues are discussed. 
In normal circumstances, it would be possible to propose the permanently residing people to participate in local advice, but we all know very well that the majority of those who are not Latvia 's citizens, hardly could have been described as a matter of normality in the country. 
Thank you, Mr President, Mr President, Mr President,, thank you, Mr President,, Madam President, for your thanks, Mr President. 
Indeed, divisions are issued both Arabs and in both parts of city, but what the Commission said last week is : you must show discrimination against the Israelis in East Erdors, because, in all cases, the city is a comprehensive structure - and it can not change - and it can not be managed by the only local authority. 
It is important to control the conditions where third-country products are produced and imported and imported into the conditions where third-country products are being produced and imported. 
Members who participated in the Committee on the negotiations were a despair of these proposals were a crucial decision to these proposals. 
The one side has its strength and the other is the weak and division of the division. 
It is important that training, work or for treatment : they should feel at their home and have the same rights as they have at home where they are in Europe. 
We need a dualty, colleagues, colleagues, and we need a dual, colleagues, to be able to do so. 
They are asking the citizens, but I can assure you that a number of those who are being asked by many legal careers who are trying to obtain additional information on an emergency sensitive competition area. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this report on the opportunities for fishing and financial resources provided for in the Fisheries Partnership Agreement between the European Community and the Democratic Republic of San Tony Zapata and Teezed, as it is provided for temporary implementation of new protocol so that the activities of European vessels are not disrupted. 
Secretive development and we do not know how and when use could be used and when they could be used. 
In their home situation, they simply want to go out where in the EU - where they are presenting them a church to try there and so that they are only usually involved in our social systems. 
10 resolutions and the Loogical Declaration on the second revision of the Cotonou Agreement on the second revision of the Cotonou Agreement on Cotonou Consulation. 
Declarations included in the register ( Rule 123 ) : see Minutes 
I would like to thank everyone who has worked on the legislative package in the legislative package, who have worked on the legislative package. 
Mr President, I would like to thank the rapporteur for accepting my proposal to encourage the producers of computer programmes to take further measures to block access to sixth points containing pornography and violence. 
A fair position that we can adopt today must be : our Egyptians, choose freedom, not the chair ! 
Particularly attention to the development of the least developed areas, particularly small regions, which are left behind by the mid-regional regional and which must be dealt with far greater shortcomings than the surrounding areas of them. 
The two countries have achieved a great success in the Union and we must not forget this, despite the fact that today, both of these countries are faced with difficult economic reforms. 
I therefore believe that the Commission must also be responsibly responsible in terms of the powers granted to it under the Treaties ' power. 
The report is to give passenger to the sea transport framework for legal protection, which is similar to the existing rail and air transport existing, with particular attention to passengers with disabilities and reduced mobility. 
General Motors does not close the Opel in Belgium, because there are difficulties : there are EUR billion, but it does not prevent it from cutting 2 600 600 600 600 000 jobs into the latter. 
That we are in the case today, where are we in the day now, we are in the case today ? 
Europe is quite rightly willing to create a common policy and a currency, but, above all, it is necessary ', but above all, it is necessary '. 
session of the session of the session session session session of the session session session session session session of the session session of the session session session session of the session session session session of the session of the session session session of the session of the session. 
The officials and remarkable ministers, such as Carde Sharia Sharia, Sanckov Voldnat and others, Onymon, and the Prime Minister, have done an excellent job, Mr Fischer, for example. 
We believe that it should be ensured that volunteering will not replace the actions of the Member States, but that it should not be used as a way of meeting the needs for which social services meet for which social services are responsible for. 
This commitment that the European Union intends to take over the next few years in terms of coordinating policies at European level is positive. 
It will also consider how Regulation ( EC ) Regulation ( EC ) No 4/2003 can be improved further in the longer term, in order to support the development of stronger and true transnational political parties and foundations at European level, with a view to the development of a truly European public public space. 
There are units of the Liberal Group of the Liberal Group of the Liberal Group. 
access to food for all within a growing global demand and food shortage for several billion people worldwide is a major and major challenge in the world. 
Action has increased the risks relating to the loss of trust, distortion of competition, legal uncertainty and high levels of expenditure accurately affected by banks, which are borne by taxpayers. 
That is why I did not vote for the amendments, it is that they have been formulated in a very old way, as if the discussion on Tobin tax was held 20 years ago. 
There has been mention earlier, the objectives of the proposals are essential, and Tolern, that they have received a separately legal basis in Article 194 of the Treaty of Lisbon, in which a word is literally chosen. 
The legitimacy of the new service is also dependent on its composition, and on its composition, and it is also up to its composition. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, in the debate on energy options to the European Union, one thing is certain : the most important thing, the cheapest and most sustainable energy source is the saved energy source. 
In the Senate and Talen, for example, in order to defend the attacks of wars, hunger and global warming and women, the walls spread from the prices for detention, the portfolios of our cities to the Libyan Chinese Chapter, where even children come under arrest on the basis of the Return Directive. 
Member States have been simply ignoring the need to invest in modernising their installations for years, for years, in modernising the need to invest in modernising their installations. 
They believe that deficits are, first and foremost, a product of poor intentions of these countries, as if the neoliberal model you never have been aware of the fire crisis of 1929, and as long as it did not have caused to pressure on the purchase of people and caused a reduction in tax : two that was first place in the very crucial terms of the public revenue at the heart of the public debt. 
There are three people in the Commission who have the right to express the opinion, but the Commission 's positions are the positions expressed by the President of the College and by the Commissioner concerned. 
It is unreasonable to me that Members expect the immunity of immunity, and we must also visit the burden of the economic crisis. 
There are nice Turkish governance, and in the last century and Serbian, the last time that people need is violence from the other way in which there is violence from the other way. 
It is essential to make the right judgment and to discuss this with your voters, so that you can do so. 
Requests on matters of political importance to matters of political importance. 
Please pass this to Mr Barroso from my name, of my name, to Mr Barroso, from my name, of my name. 
The Union is already working in this regard : proposals are being put forward on the capital and credit rating agencies by the Commission and are currently being discussed by Parliament and are now being discussed by Parliament. 
In the light of these data, I am calling on you to ask you : did the Commission examine the consequences of these policies of strict limitations, for which you are asking for and which the countries to follow in order to emerge from the crisis ? 
These are now often empty words, particularly for approximately 15million Christians who live in Pakistan, particularly for approximately 15million Christians who live in Pakistan. 
We can do everything we can to protect the single currency, the euro, and to calm the markets. 
However, we will not, we will not, however, be able to put an end to the economic crisis in Europe until we point out those who are responsible for it. 
I will try to change this provision because we can not allow a situation where Members who are involved in the list of the speakers will not be able to speak, because another Member is interrupted in practice. 
This is changing, it is changing, and this is changing. 
The European Parliament : the Single Market in diversity ' is the principle that we must be guided in our overall work within the European Union and outside of the European Union. 
The concern of most Europeans in terms of Iran 's nuclear programme and the confidentiality of the Iranian regime that it will be used only to citizens objectives. 
I had two controversial amendments to me, two controversial amendments, there were two controversial amendments. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
It will need to take a few generations to be misleading to this minority to adopt certain rules of social coexistence. 
It is a statement in a ruling in the Kurdish Interview in Delta of 7 October 2009. 
The Commission 's proposal was implemented in its original form, this would mean that in Denmark we would have liked to have been able to increase approximately twice the number of pesticides on the market. 
Unfortunately, we can not yet put animal test still, nor can we say with the right thing that will be possible. 
The UK must ensure that the reduced gas supplies it will be stored as a national resource to prevent it as a national resource of not allowing common EU resource to become. 
Kosovo is a key priority for the European Union and a multiethnic Kosovo, and a major priority for the European Union. 
It is essential that the European Commission - and I know, Mr Vice-President, is aware that you know - present real solutions as soon as possible, so that we can protect passengers if the airline was to travel, announcements of the inconsistency in the way that they have reserved their diseases. 
To support this resolution because, despite the obvious lack of progress and contradictions with the Community acquis, it calls for accession, which, in my opinion, is very quick. 
The situation in Belarus has deteriorated and is now growing great concern now, and it is now very much about a great deal of concern to the situation in Belarus. 
It is also to focus on this, to the importance of the health fiscal policy is important, to the importance of the health fiscal policy. 
Madam President, in short detail : we have two more reports and climate debate on the climate debate, because we are sending a signal to the Council, whose meeting began this evening. 
We decided to abstain in the final vote in the final vote in the final vote, in the final vote, to abstain. 
It has always noted this date of respect, but unfortunately it has not yet received the necessary attention to the European institutions and in the Member States. 
It will enable us to encourage car manufacturers to use green innovation to ensure the competitiveness of the European car industry 's car industry. 
This would not like to make the opportunity to stress that this proposal will make a significant reduction in noise on roads, as the reduction in the level of noise in tyres will create preconditions for significant improvement in the situation. 
Next committee of amendments tabled in plenary ( Rule 156 ) : see Minutes 
They can participate in practice if they have already applied budgetary support in a satisfactory manner as part of the EFF, as well as those that have proved a clear commitment to providing monitoring and achieving the MDGs. 
Transport, there are no direct routes, there are not short-term solutions, and this must be an opportunity - all the more so that the White Paper is being prepared - to include, introduce and stress the necessary measures to reduce our overall dependence on air transport. 
This is the Member States once again stressing their solidarity with those of them who are most affected by migratory movements and reaffirming their willingness to provide the necessary support to develop the situation with the development of the situation. 
The new Member States now have the European Union 's organisation of the new Member States on the market for wine since 2007, the new Member States now are meeting the European Union 's organisation of the market for wine since 2007. 
However, the hypocritical hypocritical of this report, the hypocritical of this report, however, is the hypocritical of this report. 
The European Anti-Fraud Office must be applied carefully, and the European Anti-Fraud Office must be applied. 
It will be sacrificed if citizens are allowed to give refusal to access the Internet : a very serious issue : a very serious issue is to be given to citizens. 
The citizens and businesses will be able to take full advantage of the benefits of the single market only after the implementation of this objective is only after the achievement of this objective. 
Through its consistent and permanent commitment to achieving a true autonomy for the people of the Dalai Lama, and proposed the world model for how to achieve democracy without the use of violence without the use of violence. 
next sittings : see Minutes 
There is no real responsibility in any real responsibility in any real responsibility in Europe and it is in Europe that is in Europe. 
I and my colleagues share the desire expressed in your decision to grant discharge : we want to see a measurable accelerability of progress made in recent years, in improving the financial management of the European budget, including the strengthening of accountability and responsibility of the major stakeholders. 
I feel it is only % of me, and this will create major problems for farmers throughout the UK. 
In the context of a crisis, we must use the opportunity to transform and retrain the labour market in order to avoid negative social consequences. 
in writing. - ( IT ) Integrated and Communication technologies ( ICT ) are currently an integral part of the European Union economy and the public economy. 
We have the first real analysis of the cohesion policy programmes for the 2007-2013 period of the 2007-2013 period, to have the first real analysis of the cohesion policy programmes. 
It is a question of trade and energy, we are more dependent or more to call it in another way, that everyone has become necessary for the other partner. 
The rights of employees, of trade unions rights and social protection rights, must at least be given the same importance, and, indeed, an advantage, to the internal market and the freedom of services. 
Restrees must have a safety certificate for safety, which will enable their use in all Member States to be used in all Member States. 
The goal of the common agricultural policy ( CAP ), set out in Article of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union, is to increase agricultural productivity by supporting technical progress and providing rational development of agricultural production and the maximum use of production factors, particularly of the production factors '. 

It is important to have a sufficient number of funds management bodies to control the passports of the governing companies properly. 
As financial support for people who have completed university universities, it is essential for the smooth transition to the labour market to the labour market. 
In order to achieve greater frequency of air, it is recognised for several decades, both through action at national and European Union level and by international conventions and by international conventions. 
It will make a significant contribution to increasing understanding, knowledge and credibility in the EU 's terms of the understanding and credibility. 
I am, of course, referring to the Treaty of Lisbon, an important Treaty whose centre ' is a citizen, the key pillar, the way we all, Parliament, the Commission and the Council can move to the citizens. 
It is the only way to ensure the future of small and medium-sized farms, as well as the right to produce and the right to make every country to security and independence in terms of food. 
The fishing fishing fishing fishing of a Member State which is being kept to me is unacceptable. 
The beneficiaries of rural areas have been hit hardest, never had a programme for Roma communities as part of European programmes for rural development programmes. 
However, EU aid also comes to the responsibility of the countries themselves, who wish to take advantage of the institutions and the increased economic opportunities and increased economic opportunities. 
( ES ) Mr President, in the last few weeks, we have been deployed by the constant demonstrations of the people of the Iranian people, who have been faced with the old and south of the blind in the blame and the parallel of their parts. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
It is not said about how the Swedish Presidency will ensure respect for the blackmail, guarantees given to the Irish people. 
However, the question of what competences are provided in terms of relations between the country and a citizen is, of course, as fundamental and as sensitive as, and should be debated in Parliament. 
The electoral activity in the two days of the elections was particularly encouraging in the two days of the elections. 
It supports the free expression of opinion and accepts all the consequences that have been made and all of this effect has also been achieved, or does not support it, or does not support it. 
We must repeat this Chamber that, since it is a waste of people and makes rural areas more attractive to the people and hence, agriculture can not be considered as another economic activity as each other ? 
However, the financial crisis means, however, that Member States must step up their support for the least developed countries through public aid for development and cooperation in adapting and mitigating climate change effects. 
% of the milk production produced in the EU is sold in the European market and constitutes a significant majority of the income of dairy farmers ' incomes. 
It should be said that if these past gaps put the financial system at risk, they must undoubtedly be remedied. 
As regards interest rates, there are several Member States that have introduced a pride limit - as a condition, to say - which is approximately 8 to 95 to 95, %, to 95 %. 
There are very specific aspects concerning the consumption of meat and I do not believe that in this report, there is a place for them in the report. 
The diversity of the fact ) is not necessary to provide you with additional details of the terrible case of David Islam, but we do not need to provide you with additional details about the terrible case of David Islamist Islam. 
They are more than justified in view of the policy of raw repression by the Chinese Government, which has been going on for over 50 years, regardless of the short and, I would say, false peace during the Olympics '. 
Their doctors are in the United States of the United States, they are in the United States of America. 
However, I would like to see a clear statement from the Commission on the managerial misleading at national level and its negative impact on the European Union - ultimately, the failure of the Portuguese Government coincides at the moment, just when the government decided to do what the stability framework requires for it. 
The priorities of European agriculture, such as food security, regulation of the market and territorial device, are clearly reaffirmed, as well as the consequences of the budget in the budget relation to which the CAP 's ambitions must be considered. 
One more point I would like to touch on : I am a member of the delegation for relations with Canada and we could also take a cohesive approach to Canada and with similar views to ensure fair true developments in the North High Representative and particularly for the autonomous population. 
Do you think that the weak coordination of national economic strategies is sufficient enough to coordinate national economic strategies is enough. 
Other instruments, which could also be a valuable resource in the current situation, which could be valuable, with the current situation. 
The EU must ask itself to ask whether in a strict European sense some of Russia 's actions can be recognised as fully democratic. 
Ladies and gentlemen, I share the concerns of Europeans on what is happening now in what is happening. 
However, in terms of better coherence and better legality, it would, however, have been lower if these two two proposals were added to the current asylum package. 
This measure is EUR million for this measure is EUR million, EUR million is for this measure, a million in the latter 's measure. 
Venezuela 's government is committed to the rule of law and human rights, it must defend and respect freedom of expression and assess the extremely important contribution to the criticism and openness that it has been very pleased to the constitution of the constitution. 
There were discussions that took place in a Constitutional Delegation, Romania, focused on the new concerns of the Member States on the economic and social development of the Danube. 
The use of validated corps or the branch leaders should have free access throughout the EU. 
These last days ago, I was before the vote in the Middle East in the G20 in the G20 in the G20, in the past days ago. 
% of complaints have been concluded within three months of three months and these complaints have been completed within three months. 
It is all the more important in the current economic crisis, even more important in the current economic crisis, in the current economic crisis, in the current economic crisis. 
We do not forget that banks are not sustainable at risk of risk being sustainable at risk, not forget, that banks are not sustainable at risk. 
farmers are doing their work, respecting strict criteria for health and safety, and safety, by respecting strict criteria for health and safety. 
We can provide adequate protection for the sources of information to the sources of information from countries that are not safe ? 
I believe that in the near future, the Canadian authorities will make every effort to repeal your visas in order to revoke your visas. 
- ( ES ) Madam President, in this late week, the Commission probably has to deal with other things more urgent than the report in question. 
However, I would like to look beyond the ratification process and to talk about how we should implement the Treaty of Lisbon, which is a huge step towards political union and the creation of a community of values. 
We in the European Union must be deeply grateful for the role the United States played in the world and for their role in our last history. 
We have abandoned from the time of time, and during the time we have omitted, discussing this issue, two or three people could have spoken. 
More than the right thing, I oppose what has been said, the more clearly than your speech, Mr Brandt, that we are on the right track. 
Three, the growing photographs from the European Central Bank debates should be published, as is the practice in the United States, Japan and Sweden, and Sweden. 
I am thinking of the development of synergies for an integrated approach between various sectoral policies that exist in the field of regional policy, as highlighted in the report, as highlighted in this report. 
Transparency on the part of financial intermediaries has become a specific means of tax evasion and tax fraud and has led to the severe situation that we are currently experiencing. 
The process will probably be concluded in the autumn of this year and when the final texts are paralysed by the negotiators, the Commission will submit them in the Council for signing and conclusion of the free trade agreement. 
It is only a stamp on a footh alone in a place on a footh alone on a footh, just a plant on a footh in the press. 
Be look at what is happening before our eyes, please look at what is happening before our eyes. 
Europeans who live there - people who want to feel they live in a united Europe, who wish to feel living in a united Europe. 
It is that there are many examples of anticipating in this House here in this House of antimicrobials, here in many examples of anticipation. 
The report notes that the majority of EU children are trained without having the necessary linguistic faiths of linguistic knowledge. 
We are adding to this structural difficulties and, in particular, shortcomings in terms of governance, the challenges that the workers are facing are obvious. 
These are the concrete achievements of Cancún, the concrete achievements of Cancún, are the concrete achievements of Cancún, and the concrete achievements of Cancún, are the concrete achievements of Cancún and the concrete achievements. 
I add one more question on this subject, another more question on this subject. 
The policy instruments of policy must be used in a way that ensures that the trap of a strong interventions of growth moved under traditional industrial policy. 
The package of interventions contained in the proposal for a regulation of the European Parliament and of the Council may be effective in preventing macroeconomic imbalances, particularly in the euro area. 
It is very important that the point that the economic and financial crisis and the climate crisis has the same roots cornerstones. 
Is it the EU institutions to address the Court of Justice decision to reduce the increase in the salaries of public officials in the EU 's heads of government officials ? 
We should follow good examples as the Norway and Russia cooperation on the gas Plus ' in Barack Church in Baroness. 
( HU ) While we are still on the subject of relations between the European Union and Russia, I must mention today 's topic of the European Union and Russia relations, and I must mention today 's topics of common ground. 
Indeed, the European Court of Human Rights in Strasbourg will protect fundamental rights and freedoms against EU action in fact the European Court of Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms. 
political is a very important political issue, a very important issue is very important, very important. 
I therefore tell you that we will try to act quickly in a situation that is now dependent on the Constitutional Court of the Czech Republic in Prague. 
I would like to focus on two parts of the world : firstly, Central Asia, Central Asia, first, on the world : firstly, Central Asia, Central Asia, on the world 's two parts of the world : firstly, Central Asia, Central Asia. 
It would also benefit both sides and ensure continuous flow of natural gas to Europe 's natural gas. 
Mr President, I take the floor to draw your attention to Article 28 ( 2 ) of the Rules of Procedure, as everyone can ask for a question to be given to the President of Parliament and to receive a response within 30 days. 
I voted in favour of this amendment and I am pleased that it was adopted and I am pleased that it was adopted that it was adopted. 
It is simple : what we prefer - growth without jobs or growth without jobs or growth in jobs with jobs, jobs ? 
This process is essential in this process, it is essential that this process is essential. 
Of course, we share the same common European objective, of course, the same common European objective. 
What we must pass is that democracy can not be imposed by and that it is unacceptable for demonstrations to be punished by sending the army with a order to strive without warning. 
As many other things, as many other things start at home, are starting to home. 
That is why we need to have a strict control system for control in order to prevent the relocation and the adjustment of money, particularly in unstable countries with a high level of corruption and low management levels. 
Who, the transatlantic relations more important than the questions of the Members ' questions, on the part of the European Parliament, is in the transatlantic relationship more important than the issues ? 
The current statistics of the world 's population are continually increasing and considering that by 2050, it will increase by around 40 % and will lead to an increase in food demand, which is expected to double the current requirements for the current requirements. 
Then we should explain this lack of scandalous villages, this unpregnant attitude, then not pregnant ? 
The treaty to end this project - no one has no longer needed it. 
I, of course, love your criticism, the Swedish freedom and economy, but please remember that, while we have a visa, we should not feel shocking off our shots. 
The political conflict in Thailand is very quickly revised in serious civil waves, which has led to the death of many demonstrators following intervention by the forces of the repressive passion. 
This must be encouraged to use trade systems online, which will help eradicate corruption and fraud in the public procurement system, in the system of public procurement, to be used. 
industry, as any other economic sector is increasingly exposed to global competition, is increasingly exposed to global competition competition. 
I support the opinion of the Committee on Development that, if such a tax is introduced, part of revenue should be delayed for financing development funding. 
I will give you one example to show how it works on how this works. 
It is often often these instruments that define the characteristic nature of the market today today, today, today 's market characteristic. 
These are said in the autumn, they are not the generation ' and are absolutely right to do. 
The fact that the Council, under the leadership of the Spanish Presidency, has already formulated its position and is capable of taking up discussions with Parliament, which has, of course, particularly interests and legitimate legitimacy on this issue. 
I believe that the European Parliament must play a crucial role in the fight against this serious logging lobbyist logo in the fight against this serious lofty. 
I would like to present a case relating to fundamental rights relating to fundamental rights, and I would like to present a case relating to fundamental rights. 
I share it, but I share it, but I would like to assure the House that we are moving with maximum rapid rate. 
This is something that is important here, indeed, about a question of life and death, this issue to me is doubly important, because my voters are particularly supposedly supposedly needed by it. 
Amendment, as I believe that the taxpayers in each country must ensure that the people of the disabled have sufficient financial resources to be considered to be credible creditors of the credit market. 
It can be seen as the last paradox that the last Balkan political pulse, a father of the complex Balkan political politically politically politically. 

technical harmonisation is also an important issue that we are dealing with, and it is also an important issue that is important in our technical harmonisation. 
The European Commission has put questions about the transparency of the codecision process and better coordination of the responses to the response. 
The last matter was ignored in the past, this issue was ignored. 
The tests the European Union must work to harmonise international standards at the highest level, within the G20 and the International Atomic Energy Agency, based on the objectives of the Western European Nuclear Regulation for new reactors. 
We in this House are thus representing Europe, we in this Parliament in Parliament. 
It also endorses support for SMEs, who, at the present time, have a serious need for it to be given to it. 
There were a lack of transparency in several areas of transparency, and there were also marked market abuse and there were also marked market abuse. 
To date, talks are not enough enough to have so far been debated enough to debate so far, so far, so far are not enough. 
It will continue to wait until the damage is not a remove, because if it comes to water, it will stop the work of the whole of the trade pipeline. 
It includes, first and foremost, the true authorisation of sales sales in different marks, marks, in fact, different marks, and so that the sale of the sale sale sales are actually allowed to be allowed to be set out. 
We will have a informal European Council meeting tomorrow in Brussels to prepare the EU common position tomorrow. 
However, it is one can restore confidence and trust and how it can be recovered and how it can be recovered. 
They will be a question of opinion and I would not expect the Commission to intervene in this case, but when the Community said frank lies with the Commission, will the Commission form a rapid feature for the next two or three months to be able to respond directly to the lies and describes to the European Union, or when the candidates can come to you for practical information, so that the Community 's activities ? 
However, differences in employment legislation in developing countries ' development law and developing countries ' development legislation. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, first of all, I would like to thank the rapporteur for her commitment and excellent cooperation, because this is really an important topic, in fact, a very important subject. 
2010 is being prepared in the autumn of the financial crisis, the financial crisis is is being drawn up. 
The most clear question of the treaty is the objectives of reducing the emissions of the various countries and how industrialised countries will contribute to financing investment in reducing climate change in developing countries. 
A policy of dialogue with Belarus has led to some results : now almost half of the Belarusians are in favour of closer relations with the European Union. 
It is even more shocking and so it is not only a train who happens with a train but with that, which is the pride of our region ; the railway line is also new, open only a few years ago. 
I say that what is built through the directive is that Europe of health is a Europe of health, it is a Europe of health. 
In this regard, cross-border trade will encourage cross-border trade in this respect, cross-border trade. 
The citizens of these countries are very important in order to be dependent on the resolution of a bilateral dispute resolution. 
The definition are transposed in 15 Member States in the 15 Member States, in particular, in the various Member States, in the definition are transposed in the 15 in the 15 Member States. 
The Commission is a reason to hope that a united Europe will not mean a violent Europe, particularly during the time of crisis. 
2009 was a year where the aid was vitally needed to maintain the integrity and competitiveness of the single market was a year in order to maintain the integrity and competitiveness of the single market. 
On the more specific, it confirms the principle that the failed commitments that are in the cohesion sector must be implemented, and not as the Council simply proposes to simply be cut. 
Today 's Cuban medical care could be curriculated more than 50 000 cases of cholera, moved for the recovery of health and hospitals and has provided medical care for many gambling. 
It is the responsibility, Mr Reinfeldt, to tell your colleagues that the best way to deal with the Commission is to make a single recovery plan and invest in sustainable energy and in the new economy. 
This is why coordination between Member States must be improved and more effective and solidarity in order to prevent and treatment of people living with dementia, particularly Alzheimer 's disease, and support for people from their critical criticisms. 
Our resolutions, demonstrations and bilateral negotiations between the EU and China have not made any improvement in the human rights situation. 
Those who do not meet the requirements of political correctness, which is unworthy of the European Union, which describes the inconvenience within the Union, are excluded and suspended to other rules. 
It is you that one of the fundamental values based on which the European Union is based is on is the observance of the rights of those belonging to minorities and with the entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon, this is clearly mentioned in Article 2 of the Treaty. 
It is impossible not possible to make it impossible to make it impossible to see it impossible. 
I support the new initiative on Alzheimer 's disease and other forms of dementia, I support the new initiative on Alzheimer 's disease and other forms of dementia. 
The fishing activities within the framework of the legal norms issued by the authorised regulations issued under the Fisheries Partnership Agreement between the European Community and the Republic of Seychelles and the Committee on the Local in the Indian Ocean, which regulates and governed the fishing fishing stocks in the region. 
The Union must remain military capabilities, to keep to its military ambitions and to maintain its ambition in the common security and defence policy ( CFP ), as stated in the trialogue of trialogue prepared by France, Germany, Poland and Poland. 
Those who are before us today and the report on the European Security Strategy, all the conclusions are concluded that the European Union can do things different if all the work together to ensure that we have a completely consistent policy - that the CFSP covers, the Community dimension, and, of course, the actions of the Member States. 
We have managed to do a lot about this, but thanks to the work of our rapporteur, we have seemed to have received the best possible solution. 
I have already mentioned, including the forthcoming improvements in public procurement legislation, and I would not like to repeat them. 
2006, before the renewal of the programmes, we in the European Parliament were naturally aware that we have not been isolated and that we must try to integrate all the others to us all. 
The rapporteur was right when he said that the common asylum policy must be built on the principle of solidarity. 
It is that this is a scarce public resource and its cross-border scale justify our intervention as legislators of the European Union, but we should not formulate this process as opposed to the various ways of using that we can define for frequent airports. 
The fall of the Majestro Cameroon Cameroon 's crime is secret, the Former Yugoslav Republic of Congo ( former Yugoslav Republic of Congo ) in the settlements and the most brutal violence that led to the death of millions of millions. 
subsidiarity and the community of social services in the EU ( debate ) 
We are very grateful for the council and I hope my colleagues and I can also correct this in the forthcoming common elections. 
However, it also means that, in future, Parliament must deepen its supervisory procedures in future, it also means that, in future, Parliament must deepen its supervisory procedures. 
Among the next sitting : see Minutes 
in writing. - Today 's resolution voted in favour of the request for discharge for 2009 2009 of the European Centre for the Development of Vocational Training. 
Indeed, the European Council really believes that savings must be made, the leaders of European countries must address this issue. 
I would like to mention what has happened in the evacuation of evacuation. 
The first pillar will also make it possible to encourage farmers to adopt good practices and to be effective in economic and environmental terms. 
In this regard, it is the issue of blackmail class in this regard. 
It is this method of the Convention that was used in the preparation of the Charter of Fundamental Rights and, above all, to the Constitutional Treaty. 
It has shown that the fishermen in Bulgaria have not even been aware that there is such an opportunity and such regulation in this regulation. 
It is where the sea has been polluted - a American - European or whom else is to be another sea. 
In addition to the Balkans, the bilateral border dispute between Croatia and Slovenia must not hinder its accession to the European Union and I hope that Macedonia will soon start negotiations soon and start negotiations. 
These proposals are good, but the Israelis have remained in a blind way because, although not authorising such materials to enter Gaza, they without any voices of illegal voices of the material supplied to the construction industry in Israel, the West Bank, thereby destroying the natural disaster of natural environment, while, at the same time, the legal weight of the land in the land of the land 's land did not receive any financial benefits in the West Bank. 
It is that, in order to tackle this growth, we must improve national plans to combat cancer and carry out a much more effective information campaign aimed at the people of the EU. 
The European Parliament on this brutal murder is the expression of our opposition against the growing brutal rape of religious grounds in Pakistan, but it is also unambiguous to see that we will not abandon religious minorities whose rights are very often broken. 
The time has been done so far, now the forthcoming continuation of the continuation of the continuation. 
It is now a problem is already a problem, now a problem is a problem that is already a problem. 
In the Mediterranean, however, it clearly shows that this issue is not only about the credibility of the matter, but of the viability of the European Common Immigration Policy, which is the objective of the area of freedom, security and justice in accordance with Articles 67 to the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union. 
With this, the European Parliament clearly states that there is no place for discrimination on the basis of age or gender, which is particularly important in the context of the social debate on equality between women and men. 
I also agree with Commissioner Hedegaard that we must ensure that there are sufficient payments in the Structural Funds that enable us to fulfil our promises to the new Member States. 
The report on the simplification of the implementation of the framework programmes for research, in the report on the simplification of the implementation of the framework programmes for research. 
In this connection, we must come up with real innovative solutions and ensure that the correct incentives are provided by policy makers. 
It can also be difficult, but the Italian people must decide themselves, but they must be able to decide on themselves. 
This proposal is to create a legal framework for the introduction of intelligent transport systems ( ITS ) in Europe in the field of road transport and interactions with other types of transport ( for a system of global positive position, automatic warning, automatic warning and instruments for monitoring traffic traffic traffic. 
It is one of the positive things that, in terms of the transport of passengers, we have succeeded in reducing the number of transport barriers to areas close to borders, where there is an intense flow of cross-border transport and transport flow. 
We are in a situation where our passports are sure and the data protection laws are respected then the European Union will then make a decisive step forward in the interests of children and against abduction and child trafficking. 
We voted for this draft amending report, which will enable the mobilisation of the Solidarity Fund for the people of Madeira and the affected by the Kurdish Regions in France and which, of course, we have, of course, supported it is important to highlight a few things in addition to the delay in the delay in the mobilisation of the funds that we have mentioned earlier. 
We are giving time and not doing this in the time of crisis, and we are not doing so in the time of crisis. 
Other significant changes have been voted on, other significant changes have been voted on, other significant changes have been voted on. 
The values remain at Member State level remain, at Member State level, and the Member States remain, competent. 
There is the situation is being put in accordance with the figures that have been submitted to us this morning, which were presented to us this morning. 
It is important that an ambitious and legally binding agreement on climate change is reached in Copenhagen on the Copenhagen conference to achieve an ambitious and legally binding agreement on climate change. 
The emerging economies mean that it is essential for the European Union, for its citizens and Member States to be more united and, therefore, to be more effective and thus to make our causes more effective and our interests at the global level. 
This is why it deserves particular attention to this reason, deserves particular attention, to be paid to special attention, in particular. 
It is also necessary to take into account the various circumstances prevailing in Europe to ensure that the survival of micro-enterprises operating at a close level. 
It is not in fact possible to devote Parliament the issue of meat from cloned animals from this proposal to the proposal, because it is in fact possible to devote to only a few paragraphs of such innovative and new technology as cloning animals, even though in some countries, this is a usually usual phenomenon. 
It is also in the European Parliament 's duty and in the Committee on Human Rights to remind the Council and the Commission that the results of the dialogue on human rights dialogue have a significant role to play at the summit itself. 
At the same time, this new strategy must be put at the heart of the foundations of economic growth in the EU 's economic growth. 
It is the case in many countries with very large districtors, which have the capacity to spread several marks - for example, in the UK - and this is also the case in a rare popular area where, in economic terms, it makes sense for the doctors to sell different marks in the same trade. 
Baroness Ashton has affected some details, but their answers were disappointing, but her answers were disappointed. 
It is essential that the pressure not to increase the pressure on national health systems or to contribute to inequality in these systems, patients must have the right and freedom to seek cross-border healthcare, and they must be informed of the same rights. 
The review of this directive has highlighted several issues relating to its implementation, and several issues relating to its implementation are highlighted in the course of the review of this directive. 
There is also something I regret, and it is regrettable that the implementation of all these new repressive and preventive laws will take a very time to take time. 
I therefore sincerely believe that we need both the punishment of the warnings and sanctions that my fellow Members are asking for and the promotion of infrastructure at European level. 
It is that we now have a directive that must ensure that everyone has the right to understand the authorities and the industry in court and to understand in such situations, which is one of the main preconditions for the rule of law. 
12 August 2009, Taiwan asked for international aid, and Russia, for international aid, for international aid, and international aid. 
It can be called ' to be ' between ' or, in other words, between the so-called countries ' to cohesion ' for cohesion. 
We are taking the diseases caused by intolerable diseases. 
White words in the agreement, there is actually no basis in fact, and we know this well and we know that well, in fact, we know that. 
It is encouraging that market actors are involved in the market to reduce the amounts of radioactive waste and manage them effectively. 
Finally, I would like to say that many women have survived as a result of the efforts of society and the work of the southern and organisations of women. 
We must increase our capabilities as avoidance of the oligopolities or excessive dependence. 
For SMEs, particularly in the least developed regions, particularly in the least developed regions, and it is also interest in small and medium-sized enterprises. 
We are also serious because of our development cooperation and humanitarian aid cooperation, which we are proud of. 
I support the mergement of the delegations of the Commission in third countries, of the Council and of the offices of the Special EU representatives, as well as the creation of EU embassies '. 
I support the proposal to amend Article of the Rules of Procedure on the procedure of joint meetings of committee committees ' procedure for the amendment of Article of the Rules of Procedure. 
In many cases, the scope of regulation so that the regulation could also cover small lorries, would also require additional burden on operators of small lords and, in many cases, it would not be possible for them to meet the requirements of the regulation ; 
The approval of Amendment 3 is making this resolution in parts of partial and serious harm to the rest of the text, which is, of course, the approval of Amendment 3, makes this resolution more difficult to the rest of the text. 
The 2011 budget has been made trying to make such savings realised in order to achieve such savings in 2011. 
It is now up to the Member States to agree on the main issues so that the negotiations are planned to go place in place. 
I think my fellow Member thinks the same thing, my fellow Member, the same thing is thinking to me. 
It is a terrible place of horrific place is horrific. 
I would just like to stress the following fact : the dictator Gaddafi dictator used against the demonstrators and the boxes of arms of us. 
It will continue to make its contribution to peacekeeping operations, whether the UN or the European Union will continue to contribute to the UN. 
The urgent things must be developed, particularly for the most vulnerable people and for government structures, who have no choice today, except to pass their rights to the US forces. 
I can understand why this authority is obviously an unnecessary budget surplus - for example, surplus of around EUR 27 million in 2008, and, on 31 December 2008, it has accumulated the EUR almost EUR 50 million. 
This way, in relation to how to link these two elements, I believe that we should look closely at how we can help consumers at the most effectively, because they often have no time to go to a lawyer, but if they want to find quick assistance quickly and easily. 
It is an opportunity for its use of the use of military and aggressive targets and aggressive objectives to use military and aggressive targets. 
The incident in Bangkova Mare incidentally seen in Romania, as well as the Chernobyl disaster - with consequences for three countries and a destructive impact on ecosystems in the affected turmoil of hundreds of kilometres. 
The rapporteur for his overall approach and the quality of the work carried out and the quality of the work carried out by the rapporteur for his work carried out. 
The rule of law and fundamental rights of the European Union must be carried out in full respect of the rule of law and of fundamental rights laid down at European Union level in the Charter of Fundamental Rights. 
I believe that the status of political parties at European level could only pave the way for the participation of the population, but also for the creation of a true transnational party system which will be vital to ensuring greater democracy in Europe. 
It is good action is a good thing, a good thing, good thing, a good thing is a good thing, a good thing, good thing. 
It is also that we must not forget about the impact of the environment, which will provide the new system for following the scourge in tyres, reducing CO2 emissions by carbon dioxide emissions. 
There is a comprehensive list of questions of questions that need to be resolved which must be resolved. 
Of course, this is not all we could like to wish, but that is not all we could like to wish. 
The actors in the outermost French regions have the feeling that they have been punished by limits for production that comply with European standards, make them less competitive than their direct competitors. 
The administration of women, the heads of the basic ministerial, such as the finances, justice, social solidarity and goodwill, and also prosecutor of the publication. 
We want a free trade agreement between the EU and India, which contributes to promoting sustainable development and has clear clauses on the observance of ILO standards, environmental rules and obligations concerning corporate social responsibility. 
I am not a Spanish speaker, too, but I am not a Spanish speaker, of Italy, but I am not a representative of Italy. 
It is a position of various recommendations relating to policies that are needed to strengthen the recovery required to help Europe maintain its international competitiveness and achieve the objectives of the EU 2020 strategy objectives. 
The United States spend trillion trillion dollars of security, we in Europe are slowly or in place in the development of our own strategy. 
This report is to define at a early stage Parliament 's position on the new financial instrument for cooperation. 
It is vital that the COP 17 year will achieve a comprehensive binding agreement on combating climate change, which provides for sanctions for countries that continue to give up to cooperate. 
Is it enough for the EU to be able to build a sphere of influence in the region in the region in the region, so that the region can build a sphere of influence ? 
It is that only a despair countries have achieved the objective of the objective of %, a gross national product for development aid. 
It is the size of the low sector in Europe to reduce, not continually increasing, but not continually increasing. 
I call, in this world of deliberate change - climate change - environmental demands, energy needs, risk of terrorism, poverty and inequality, with which we must fight, a financial crisis that we must deal with - let us not close to protectionism that is the road to the legitimate. 
The Commission will include the Directoratefor Employment in the management effort in order to see what is happening in Greece what is happening. 
The last particular attention must be paid to both national and European level and particular attention, both at national and European level. 
We do everything we can to achieve greater harmony between Parliament and the Council and we also do with regard to issues relating to the procedure. 
I therefore voted in favour of this report, which is why I voted in favour of this report. 
It would not seem a very good position that this case would not seem to be very good in this case. 
Given the possible new initiative that will enable us to finally make progress within the World Trade Organisation ( WTO ) progress within the World Trade Organisation ( WTO ) progress. 
The foreign troops are ready to withdraw from Iraq Iraq, and they are prepared to withdraw from Iraq. 
It is absolutely undemocratic and wrong and wrong, and wrong. 
We must make it clear that it is not the time now to stop the aid that these people need, especially medical assistance. 
Africa many young women and night war women and wars are victims of war attacks and rape rape, many young women and night wars. 
It is something that you have taken the heart and the work very hard on it is something that you have taken on the table. 
The speaker agreed to answer a blue card question under Rule 149 ( 8 ) ) 
It is extremely important that the internal market is not affected by unfounded and unfair competition is not affected by unfounded competition. 
This is the first time in the first time, the directive is related to access to the Internet and the fundamental rights of citizens through the new version of Amendment, in the new version. 
Judicial Afiuni is a violation of its fundamental personal rights and a very serious threat to the independence of the judiciary of the judiciary, and a very serious threat to the independence of the judiciary. 
I am critical because the Council as one of the European Union 's main institutions can not and should not stand by this debate, because the Council, as one of the key institutions, can not and should not come from. 
It is a major strategic partner of the European Union, and it is a major strategic partner of the European Union, a major strategic partner of the European Union. 
The European Refugee Fund will show light on the need for the European Union Member States to fully play their part in resettlement to fill the gap that exists both in terms of the number of countries involved in the programme and the capacity for each country. 
It is also denounced to condemn all repression measures and the Belarusian authorities to be called for to end all forms of persecution, stopping and threats against civil society activists, violating and threats against civil society activists. 
( ES ) Madam President, this week we heard the excellent news that moment, more than 20 000 new new ones have opened in the sea that more than 20 000 new new to you. 
Social partners and a significant majority of civil society have been very involved, and they have not shared responsibility, and they have not, therefore, shared responsibility. 
At the same time, and taking into account the assessment of these programmes, the Commission adopted reports for Ireland, Greece, Spain, France, Latvia, Latvia and Malta, and consider the evaluation of these programmes, the Commission adopted reports on Ireland. 
Development policies can be found in all our committees and we must bear in mind this in mind in mind this in mind. 
General Motors is a company who has lost their competitiveness as a result of pension costs incurred by the American trade unions and trade unions. 
Sahrajevo can be secured by improving the situation of the population 's population, by improving the situation of the population, and it can be done. 
It is definitely a crucial topic and we need to focus on it and we need to focus greater attention on it and we need to pay greater attention to it. 
History shows that in its development, Belarus is obviously influenced by the West, and the Russian tradition, in terms of religion, all forms of education and the majority of value systems, the European method of thinking that Russia has enriched. 
A Commission made up of competent and committed Europeans, a Commission to make the full possible use of its right to initiative. 
I would like to call on you, Commissioner, to monitor the choice procedure, to monitor the choice procedure. 
The Baltic Sea is an internal European Union for the Baltic Sea region, for the Baltic Sea, an internal European Union for the Baltic Sea is internal for the European Union. 
The American and Canadian military, I welcome both the rapid and effective deployment of groups from Slovakia and the international Malaysia military day. 
Of 70 000 men and women have been involved in this period in more than 20 of their missions than 20 000 men and women have been involved in this period. 
A national contact point will play the role played by one logic and must cooperate with other national contact points with other national contact points. 
Professional procedures for public procurement for construction, services and supply in the area of defence and security ( debate ) 
However, it is clear whether we can, however, apply, for example, rapid exposure to transit areas, which has proven to be decent in Germany, for example. 
We can ask ourselves, of course, whether European policy in this area is sufficiently competent to have a European policy in this area. 
In many Member States, regardless of their party belonging to their party belonging to the fact that the anti-democratic measures of your government, the economic populism, the media law and the tolerance of the extremely deliberation of the very very defeat of European standards and values. 
It is a country both on the Universal Declaration of Human Rights and the United Nations Council of Europe Convention on Human Rights. 
We are entirely a new proposal by Parliament, very different from the Commission and with a different view from the Council, and with a different view to us, with a different view to the Council. 
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, let me answer one aspect, namely, the question of the name of the country and let me start by expressing my deep sympathy to the Members of the indispute and even the insults that are in question. 
Venezuela must quickly release the Judge Afiuni and put an end to attacks on the independence of the judiciary. 
It was a question that the answer to this issue was given by Parliament, which recently submitted to me a new mandate, and shows that Parliament believes that it can be credible to me to carry out this policy. 
The fact that this regulation should, in particular, stress the need to prevent unfounded and undesirable distribution of technologies and software, as the number of attacks using modern technologies and software increasing. 
Commissioner, it has sent us a reply to us, in which, among other things, it was written to reside by these double law, that the right to residence is recognised by European legislation. 
Ladies and gentlemen, if there are so protests - hearing - please - vote again - we will vote on paragraph again. 
Providing that speculative everyday threatening the stability of the single currency, isolating and exerting pressure on Member States, a solution can only be achieved by maintaining solidarity at EU level by respect for solidarity. 
A protection order can be issued by a request for protection if they decide to be transformed into another Member State or if they simply want to spend some time there. 
For decades, the country is not able to invest its revenue from oil in sustainable development or in infrastructure development. 
However, we must not, too, rush and ' because of bloody basin forest to foresee the whole Kurdish Kenya '. 
They are saying that the situation is too complicated and that there is no transparency and experience that they are not sufficiently transparent and trying to make the right decisions. 
It is that the first leaders who have congratulated Mr Lukashenko on his election victory were the Russian President, Mr Medvedev, Mr Piebalgs and the President of Ukraine, Mr Yanukovych, shows their understanding of democracy and the boxic perspective that is expected in Belarus in this regard. 
The Member States, on the other hand, it is really to put this extraordinary instrument into practice in practice, in practice, to the exclusive instrument. 
We are a thorough debate on this issue, and not only in the European Parliament, but also in the national parliaments, as well as the heads of national authorities, should also be committed to national authorities. 
It is also another example of the other countries in this regard, including developing countries, and also to give an example in this regard to the rest of the other countries. 
There are mainly the faunited Islamic extremists of extremists, mainly trivial extremists. 
I do not endorse the language in paragraph 10, where the High Representative is called on to make every effort to make the Union 's accession to CCCCCCCCCCCCB accession joined. 
We call on the Council and the Commission, especially the High Representative for Foreign Affairs, to adopt clear indications on our relations with third countries, in the context of the new European External Action Service. 
This ambitious proposal, and I believe that the EU 's efforts must be supported globally by the efforts of the major industry countries. 
We also learn lessons as far as I am concerned, in this regard, there are three lessons for us to learn lessons in this regard. 
Not consideration of this, not consideration of this, but it does not take into account it, either. 
We can include regions and local authorities in order to successfully succeed in this strategy and, in particular, how can we promote better and monitor the restructuring of national budgets and budgets ? 
The summit - has revealed the Intergovernmental Burma - he sent a letter to Heads of State or Government, in one of the applications that the Council has asked for economic strategy in their governments and that he must be responsible for it and that the level of EU level must be responsible for it. 
It must include the resolution of positive problems such as the return of internal displacement of persons or the issue of the season 's settlement. 
I just know the cheeeeer with a round of circles surrounding it around it one mark of the toptoxic chargings, just as I know the charter of paper. 
in writing. - I am in favour of labelling of the country of origin and the holiday and welcome this legislation in this legislation. 
My country, I agree with the debate to continue, but I would like to avoid disputes, but I would like to avoid disputes. 
In particular, with investments in green infrastructure in green infrastructure, in particular, with investments in green infrastructure. 
The difficulty is the many of rules that make every control system of ineffective control of ineffective rules, which make use of the control system of ineffective control of non-effective. 
I think it is more appropriate to use English language in English. 
I am in favour of the call by the European Parliament to the Commission and the Member States for further development and the affirming of initiatives that provide racial support both directly and indirectly. 
The conclusions in the report are extremely clear and very well explained to the measures by the European Commission, which had to be taken up with this issue a very time ago, to clarify the action of the regime in the coming prices, at least in relation to the domestic sector. 
As regards the division of waste waste collection in the waste waste waste waste waste land, the Commission report states that only nine countries have achieved their indicators in 2006 to reduce in 2006 - according to quite limited information that there are. 
It is vital to condemn the recent cases in countries that are far from here, but there are established Christian communities in them, but there are established Christian communities. 
in writing. - The European perspective for the European perspective for all the countries of the Western Balkans negotiated on this occasion, then it is tightening up, and the final example is the meeting of the Council meeting of 8 December 2008 on 8 December 2008, of the Council meeting of 8 December 2008. 
It is now time now to have it come to be implemented in a very concrete way that it is now in a very concrete way that it has come to an effect in a very concrete way. 
It raises the issue of the visa charges of victims as a right of courts to the courts not to impose penalties for criminal acts by the victims of forced to force. 
Moreover, I believe that the problem of energy security is also crucial in the area of combating climate change, and I believe that the problem of energy security is also crucial in the area of combating climate change. 
It is good to set targets that, between the other things, should have been more ambitious, it is better if the necessary resources are available, if the necessary resources are available. 
The framework conditions for this study of the Implementation is the financial transaction tax not to violate competition, not to distort competition. 
There is no doubt that the detention of the Catholic leaders and Hushearing, the destruction of more than 23 000 hectares of cultures, of which are being made of description substances, and 000 hectares of masses, closing over 50 000 drug laboratories and the detention of more than 45 000 people involved in this process. 
Also, apart from the multilingual victims, the earthquake has affected the basis of the country so significant causes by the causes of this natural disaster. 
It is not to wait for the Commission 's investigation to be investigated by the Commission 's investigation. 
The difficult internal situation of the Serbian Government has adopted a very constructive and responsible approach to the position of EULEX mission in Kosovo. 
We know that this is not the case at all the same. 
We hope that the next United Nations conference on racism will not be remembered by unacceptable rivers, which represent the same incidence of hatred and racism. 
As a solution, this should be brought before a debate on policy in the European Parliament and in the Council, as a decision, on policy in the European Parliament and in the Council. 
It is that this symbolic gesture is of crucial importance that this symbol of this symbolic gesture. 
It is strange, in Haiti, we are the only participating in building the road infrastructure in the construction of road infrastructure. 
However, I would like to thank Commissioner Kroes, for expressing my sincere thanks to Commissioner Kroes and I would like to express my sincere congratulations to Commissioner Kroes. 
Over recent years, 75 % of terrorist attacks have been committed for religious reasons for Christians and Christians in recent years. 
The Presidency has been fighting for these last few months, but it has not managed to complement the gaps and we are now in a new Presidency, which, since last Thursday, shows many energy, but, for a very long time, was not on the ground. 
They are responsible for establishing these rules, and we must not avoid this task, and we must not avoid this task. 
We must also think about the creation of a true conference body between us and the United States of America, too, of the creation of a true conference of a true conference of the transatlantic authorities between us and the United States. 
We need to ensure a high level of consumer protection, as well as legal certainty for producers, we urgently need to ensure that these products are applied in a horizontal plan, not only to the new foods, but also to the materials that are not first reading in contact with food and with the directives on cosmetics, as well as the regulation on authorisation on the marketing of biocidal products, and, and on regulation on the authorisation on authorisation of the marketing of biocidal markets, which is not first debate at present. 
They are politicians who can never have confidence, so that, Mr Rehn, how do you believe that you will be able to ensure that Dutch taxpayers are not revised in a terrible manner ? 
On operations only for week would the normal functioning of the normal functioning of six thousand schools would be sufficient for the normal functioning of six thousand schools. 
An area is an area of equal treatment in regions which fall between 1 and 2 target and 2 target. 
The workforce can make sure that the companies can be located in other ways, the companies can have confidence in the treaties, and consumers can be sure that the value of a product or service is real and has been defined in transparent terms. 
They must be able to measure sustainability, but, above all, to assess the assessment of the economy of this country 's economy, to assess the quantitative change in employment data, to assess the level of innovation in small fishing and assess the use of these resources. 
Georgia macrofinancial financial assistance ( Georgia ) of Georgia ( 
It could also play its part in the long term when we are working to deal with the situation in North Africa, but we also have other instruments that are not used to use. 
The fact that the report seems to be ' than in its original form, it is still in accordance with the Commission 's Green Paper entitled to work ' and still ends the title that flexibility is and must be a fundamental tool for the economy. 
Moreover, the problem of pollution should not be seen as part of this issue as part of this issue. 
Measures will make it possible to help European citizens and businesses to pass their rights, particularly with regard to recognising qualifications of training or social compensation, as well as compensation for residence. 
Eurojust is not clearly defined by Eurojust, either, clearly defined. 
With regard to the question, who should collect the charges, I believe that subsidiarity continues to be the best option, because ultimately, they are not the Member States, but the citizens, but the citizens should ultimately pay. 
The EU financial framework is an opportunity to make a strategic choice for the future for the future, is a strategic choice for the future, for the future, for the future,. 
It is being seen that this will be achieved by investing in research investment in research. 
However, however, another concern is also another concern, but another concern is also another concern. 
There has also been mention of the so-called ', which forms growth at national level. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I would like to thank you in one or other part of all the contributions to the debate on the support you are giving to the EU in the very important work on climate negotiations. 
I therefore propose that we examine whether the passenger agencies and airlines that reserves flights to countries with dangerous airlines or airports, to inform passengers automatically for this, even though the same is not in the blacklist. 
I would like to add that the economic, social and territorial cohesion policy of the European Union recently has been ignored as far as the definition of the priorities of the Union has been set out. 
On the point of the industry, it is not only evaluated that the report by the Committee on the Environment Committee provides much greater clarity for what they are expected, but also the fairer and more effective sharing of responsibility between the various parts of the supply chain that I have just described. 
The list of objectives of the European Union 's economic growth, the social objective and the fight against poverty is also important for Europe, because their achievement will help to ensure the economic independence of the European Union. 
Who here explains to me what are those visits in Moscow to the Prime Ministers of Slovakia and Bulgaria ? 
I believe that the European Parliament must support the best conditions for mothers and children equally, and must support the European Parliament, the European Parliament must support the same level the best conditions for mothers and children. 
It has already been mentioned, the Member States have benefited from the powers made available to them by the Treaty of Lisbon to offer initiatives on criminal justice, and the absence of progress in terms of procedural rights since 2004 was partly overcome this first right from the central Presidency. 
I say to say that none of the Members of the committee are in favour of a pandemic of the parts ' not only in my own memory '. 
There may be a very strong incentive for someone to want to ', but it should be counterproductive in any way ; otherwise, the costs that our production system is already starting to pay - and pays ready to obtain results - will be made up of. 
Our countries will be strong enough to offer work and others to offer work and to offer others. 
The German Free Democratic Party representatives in the European Parliament has been supported by the representatives of the German Free Democratic Party. 
We are discussing real violations, those who have already happened, those who have already happened in the case of real violations. 
What is important is for the protection of the operating forests in Cameroon, is, above all, the fight against corruption - both at administrative level and when it comes to private farmers, the continuation of effective trade proceedings and, of course, the sustainable practices in the forestry sector. 
Like others, they are present in the list of measures that can be adopted by the Commission on intelligent transport systems set out in the directive. 
Are they not ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? 
I would also like to stress that I think that, in recent years, the Commission and the Commissioner have made a very good and constructive contribution to this issue. 
On a message on a message for each of you, a message of a message for each of you all of you. 
It recognises that the free market and individuals and individuals in Europe are vital for the process of recovery and, namely, of this fundamental British Conservatives, support it. 
However, is it a change of change, Mr Barroso and, Mr Barroso, that is a change, Mr Barroso and, however, a change is, Mr Barroso ? 
What I would like to say is that in the case of maritime assistance services ( MMS ) services and the Belgian authorities, according to the last figures, was the Belgian authorities. 
We also expect all Member States to provide control and transparency, but we also expect that of our own institutions, and the Council is responsible for what is happening or not happening in the Member States. 
Madam President, Mrs Malmström, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, I would like to express my condolences to the victims of the Criminal Group, both on the part of the Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe and Democrats for Europe and on behalf of the three Troika of the Liberal Party, which has been directly meeting last week in the case last week, in order to discuss, among other things, the situation in Guinea, the Greens of the Liberal Vice-President of the Liberal Party, which has been sadly regretterated by the violence that has been directly affected by the violence that we have seen last. 
It would be good to introduce even more and more requirements for interpreters, because what benefits from the interpretation, if we can not guarantee the quality of interpretation as a interpretation is in the case of the interpreters ? 
It would be grateful for this, particularly in the light of the denial by China, particularly in the light of China 's denial. 
Many, that the two institutions have failed to find a common language in the two institutions and the two institutions have failed to find a common ground. 
It is in this way that the European Parliament, the Commission and the Czech Presidency would prove that, at a time of unprecedented crisis, the European institutions have been extremely tight. 
I am extremely critical of such support for the budget, and I am very critical of such support for the budget. 
There is closed is closed conclusion. 
However, without affecting the overall support of the European Police Office, with the entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon and its impact on police cooperation, the rapporteur and its colleagues on the report in the Committee on Civil Liberties, Justice and Home Affairs, believe that the measures to implement the Europol decision should not be amended until the adoption of such measures in accordance with the new legal framework provided for in the Treaty of Lisbon. 
There is no way to really attack human trafficking without attacking the industry 's industry 's sector. 
According to the United Nations General Declaration on Human Rights and the Convention on Human Rights and Fundamental Freedoms, all citizens enjoy equal rights and freedoms, religion, political, national origin, or other social or other form of origin, should be provided without any discrimination, particularly on the basis of the Church, the Church, the Church, the Chamber, the language, religion, religion, political, political, political or other belief, national origin, or other social property, or any other person, or another sign another sign, or, or another, or in particular, or the case. 
It is also a very bad sign that we are sending to the countries outside the EU, which we are asking to ratify the same conventions that we are demanding. 
( EL ) Mr President, you said you said that talks have begun between Frontex and Turkey and the Commission and that the Commission report on them by the Council, and that the Commission report on them by the Council. 
The Roma inclusion strategy is a very important issue for Roma inclusion, in a very important matter, a very important issue. 
It is being seen that, when using the same methods, the same way forward is to ensure that the gas required emotion is made available at a time where there are countries wishing to provide their resources to provide their resources for the project. 
Then a social and stable unitary Europe, Europe, the Europe that the citizens of the EU expect and will be happy to accept and will be happy to accept. 
The agreement provides for joint inspections of safety data ( inspections of aircraft and information ), as well as enhanced regulatory cooperation and consultation at technical level, in order to be resolved before the dispute has been made. 
This is now obviously a true player in us before us now, a unlegitimate struggle for power is being played out of a unlegitimate struggle for power. 
We are doing so, but sometimes sometimes sometimes, we do not manage, because things are not in our hands, but in their hands, but in their hands. 
Care interested in pure purely financial facts are interested in purely financial facts. 
I understand the need for exceptional measures caused by the economic crisis, I am concerned at the speed of the changes and the way in which some Member States are trying to impose on the rest of certain decisions. 
It is only suggesting that only dominant per capita per capita, compared to 1 200 dollars for Korea, for Australia and for the US, Australia and the US, too. 
( NL ) I would like to express my warm thanks to the Commissioner for the answers that he has given to the answers that a number of very specific questions. 
So the only thing I have to say at the moment is that we must do everything we can to do in our power - the Commission and everyone together - to ensure that the implementation of research projects will be achieved with the high quality of the necessary quality projects so that the appropriations can be paid out. 
The esteems ' can be used to stabilise the position of the financial institutions of the private market institutions, the private market institutions, and the future ' position can be used '. 
The European Union should actively help those corps who are at risk of risk, to transform interim in a safe state. 
It is a police investigation, which the company in question in question provides full assistance to the full of assistance. 
I hope that the government will make efforts to obtain funding and that it will target financial resources at local level to create added value, to provide direct benefits to citizens and thereby reduce energy poverty. 
I also share the general view that the attitude to Roma should be correct, but most of the problems mentioned in this report can be given to the way in which these people have chosen. 
It is not, it is not, not, not, not, but it is not. 
There have been very often a few weeks since the end of the Hungarian Presidency, very criticisms have been made to the Hungarians and very often these criticisms were unfounded and unfounded. 
It is a good report that is particularly important in the current economic crisis, which requires active measures aimed at the labour market, which will not be left the most vulnerable people to remain labour market for themselves. 
We need a structure for coordination between the institutions and the EU agencies, as well as those in the Member States and international partners, we need a structure for coordination between the institutions and the EU agencies and those of the EU agencies, as well as in the Member States and international partners. 
Iraq, where six years after the decline of dictators, the old Christian communities in the world are harassed, pregnant and murdered. 
I am with the common visa policy that facilitates legal travel and introduces measures aimed at making it easier to facilitate the process of submitting and processing visas ( reduced prices ), simplified procedures for issuing visas, the use of multiple visas, longer deadlines of validity ). 
It is in his country of the epidemic and must use these several days to achieve a smart and credible agreement. 
The Treaty of Lisbon allows Parliament to present objections or withdraw the amendments or complements of the legislations of the Commission 's legislative acts. 
agreement reflects the European Union 's commitment in this region of the world and sends a strong political signal to the countries in it. 
I therefore believe that this is probably justified and better structured cooperation with the European Parliament, I believe that this is probably justified and better, with the European Parliament. 
Mr President, we are now a light of our iceggs and we ask ourselves whether it is sufficiently broad and strong in order to cover the coup. 
on behalf of the ECR Group. - Madam President, I must unfortunately say that, unfortunately, I must say that, as the European Council seems to be able to make some dangerous changes and we must be concerned about this. 
There are some proposals for a rigour, but I do not know where the river are being found. 
At some time, the number of workers made redundant as a result of the recession, a significant supranational projections of the Commission 's original estimates regarding the number of workers who would like to take advantage of the fund from the fund. 
The Union has had to intervene and use all the resources available to the people with poor housing conditions, particularly by marginalised communities, which were previously in the past to access the ERDF resources. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
You are giving you the floor to your position of the President of the European Parliament to give the President of the European Parliament your post of the European Parliament your post for your election of you. 
European citizens, who have been held as hostages in Darfur for several months, are exempt, but at the same time, we know that the situation in Darfur is, as was before. 
It means, on the one hand, that airlines in future will be able to obtain information on what security charges are to apply to them, for the purpose of these charges, of whether they are too high - which is still happening at the moment in individual places - and, after the next step, that the passengers and passengers will, of course, be able to understand what the airlines are required. 
Among the next sitting : the Protocol of the next sitting : the Protocol, the Protocol of the coming sitting : 
I am pleased that my amendments in this sense have found a place in the text in this regard. I am pleased that I am happy to see that my amendments in this sense, in this sense, in the text, in the text. 
The common strategy will take place, firstly, on a communication on a global strategy for PNR, including a set of general requirements to be observed in any agreement on PNR data with third country data ; secondly, two guidelines for negotiating PNR agreements with the US and Australia and guidelines for negotiating a new agreement with Canada ; and thirdly, a new proposal for PNR data by the EU Commission on the basis of an impact assessment. 
The medicine agency is still hard to get things forward, even though there are already several years to go. 
Thursday and Friday, a conference on the subject organised by the Czech Presidency will be held this week and I am sure that a positive and interesting discussion will be received and interesting discussion on labelling labelling. 
The worst kind of sexual violence is the worst military military action, which is the worst military action, the worst military action. 
It was an important point, Madam President, when the question was put to the Committee on Employment, no one in the committee has done what the decornerstone has meant what the decore, until I did not try to explain them even if the Presidency. 
I therefore hope that Parliament 's decision will be productive and will serve to stimulate the attitudes and the level of attention on this issue significantly improves in a very long future. 
I have been surprised by the original budget, which the Secretary-General has made up, which has proposed an increase of more than 5 %, but it is all the more surprising me, the fact that he is not here today. 
You will see you in 2009 that the promise of our credits is increasing more in the new Member States than in old old. 
Parliament is now beginning to criticise one of its Member States, and that it is now beginning to criticise one of its Member States, and its Member States, to criticise. 
The current Commission proposal is provided for a period of five years for the Commission to be provided for within the next year, the current proposal is provided for within the Commission for five years. 
The specific requirements for ensuring the creation of Member States of national regulators and organisational framework, as well as the preparation of appropriate national programmes for the management of spent fuel and radioactive waste - their generation to the eruption of them. 
I think, with other things, that the creation of a committee and a network for technology to promote cooperation in technology is extremely important. 
The border controls so far are one of the most underestimated challenges facing the European Union, which is too often trying to risk the idea that the protection of borders and the prevention of irregular immigration are tasks with which the whole of Europe has to deal with. 
A great deal of questions that I believe - I am convinced - the Council will consider during the accession negotiations and will do everything possible to resolve them. 
It must also be taken into consideration in future, in future, that attention should be taken into consideration. 
These are what has to do to bilateral agreements will be additional a further balanced player in a more balanced way. 
We can close our eyes to the violations of human rights and, in accordance with the European Parliament resolution of 10 February 2010, I would suggest that we take firm measures to support the rights defenders by providing temporary asylum seekers. 
As the sun for Spain, it is like the wind of the western coast of Ireland, which is what is like. 
It opens the way to an even more aggressive marketing marketing mark, which is not supported by stable scientific evidence. 
It will help more cultural exchange and cooperation between the EU and third countries, to a greater extent, cultural exchange and cooperation between the EU and third countries. 
It is that this concerns many thoughts of the Spanish and ordinary people who have chosen to do so, Spain has their own home. 
We also ensure that developing countries such as China are supported by developing countries as China as China. 
It is an important issue : it is part of the agreement : it is part of the agreement that is part of the agreement. 
The amendments which have been laid down beyond the 50 amendments set out in Article 156, which is why I have come back to the Committee on the table in the competent committee. 
It is a response to you that you propose to keep this mistake, even though you are wrong for everything, continuing the European Union 's decline and increase powers by more control of national budgets and by imposing the people in Europe unprecedented austerity, in a rigour of limitation. 
It is not over last. 
The G20 G20 achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved the following significant : : G20 achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved the following significant achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved the following significant achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved achieved 
It is a desire that, thanks to the compromise amendments that have been signed by the three most political groups in Parliament, we have managed to find a real solution to this problem, a decision which interested in the successful elements of previous EU legislation, which represents a compromise between the various legal situations in the Member States and which also contributes to protecting workers ' rights and employees ' rights. 
As improving the implementation and link between biodiversity and climate change, climate change between biodiversity and climate change demands particular attention to be paid to special attention. 
The votes of the votes - several of 80 attenders - have been in favour of the treaty - including the sentences from the citizens of the citizens of the Democratic Party ( DCC ), the party which was founded on time ago ), which showed that in the Czech Republic has a very strong sense of responsibility for Europe and the EU, as well as for continuing the integration process and actively. 
The European Union has therefore recognised that it is more difficult to tackle the effects of the crisis, rather than other major economic centres such as the United States, China, China, Japan and India. 
We need it at a time when, as part of the banking sector, private banks show that they are no longer working against common interests, that they are no longer doing their job to provide society with credit. 
However, we already know all this, however, all of us already know, all of us already know, all of us already know that all of us already know. 
That is why we tabled such amendments, with the unanimous approval of the Committee on Constitutional Affairs, with the unanimous approval of the Committee on Constitutional Affairs. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, first of all, I would like to thank my fellow Members who helped to draw up a broad comprehensive report under the Commission communication, for their willingness to agree and the fact that we have united not around the most simple solution, but about a working agreement. 
It is an institution that works under the leadership of the Tibetan Government in exile and aims at supporting dialogue. 
However, what was said to me was the fact that, once again, emphasis has been placed on the part of promoting medical tourism. 
We have started working on this report, the need for long-term investment has already been obvious, given what has happened in the European Union. 
Firstly, we must be concerned about ensuring that the emergency situation is not spread yet and therefore to make it clear, for example, that everyone who has public money from Europe is obliged to do not remove employees. 
The first partin February will take place during the first partin February. 
Many benefits from regional food products : lower cost for transport and lower risk of food distribution, and lower risk of food distribution. 
This situation is abuse of the use of young workers and employees are forced to put uncertain temporary posts or exploited during a series of consistency posts. 
The Commission gives the reasons for the Commission - there are rules that cover our national systems, and our model, I repeat, is based on the information available and evaluation of the existing information and evaluation. 
( FR ) Mr President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, this report is vital for the future of the European project, which must include solidarity and ambitious targets, particularly in view of the budgetary crises that Member States are currently struggling with at the moment. 
It is a concern that the presentation of the project and before the Belarusian and Lithuanian society is organised superfluous and does not meet the main issues. 
The majority of errors are noticeable by the Court of Auditors and the Commission in the projects and payments governed by the Member States shows very clearly where more efforts are needed and immediately, as shared governance is about 80 % of the European funds. 
Today, today, a resolution takes account of the fact that fisheries management must be based on upand accurate scientific knowledge of stocks. 
I also spoke in favour of the acceleration of the negotiations on the EU-Gulf trade agreement. 
This is why Parliament, the Commission and the Council agreed to pursue this goal in the Commission and the Council to pursue this objective. 
The Neighbourhood Policy has shown itself to be an effective instrument of foreign policy, encouraging the strengthening of relations with third countries, which has some real benefits. 
In my opinion, a much more transparent and more lasting solution to this issue, which clearly says that, in the next revision of the interim Partnership Agreement, the Defence of Partnership rules will be abolished for the time. 
With regard to the generation of generating renewable energy, I would like to thank Parliament, which supported the recovery plan and I assure my conviction in the future in the use of wind energy from located installations. 
It is obviously important for the proposal to introduce automatic exchange of tax information both within the European Union and at international level and at international level. 
It is a key point of flexibility that you have asked me to ensure that EPAs replace a trade regime with another ACP, which is completely reduced to regional solutions to regional needs, without undermining the solidarity of the ACP. 
The Council and the Council included this principle in the regulations establishing the authorities, and particularly in Members, and which Minister Gymore mentioned a moment ago. 
and humhumhumhumhumhumhumhumHerzegovina and humhumhumHerzegovina ( vote ) vote ( vote ) vote ) vote ) vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote vote 
It is a fact that the law is about fundamental rules and values of the European Union, which is a community based on the rule of law. 
Our group therefore calls for the rules not to be so strict, so much tightening, for the rules to be not so strict, so much. 
Another thing I am extremely important to have been to use more resources to increase the energy efficiency of our buildings ' energy efficiency in our buildings. 
It is very concerned about the high level of slowdown and illegal trade with what has been seen recently. 
However, the current situation of the car industry, given that car car car is not sold, in the debate with the Council, it has become clear that 12 months, in fact, it is probably unrealistic and we had to take into consideration the serious consequences for the environment of the discards that are still in a positive position. 
This is why it is in the course of the course and Turkey is the status of candidate candidate candidate country. 
( FR ) Mr President, Taiwan is hoping for a growing natural disaster after a precedent in the country for the last 50 years. 
There must be no infringements, because this would be unfair to others, often much less weak and more poor producers. 
People must pay inequalities to lawyers and other experts to defend themselves without who knows what chance they can have for success. 
The resolution does not help to address the problem, nor to strengthen stability and peace in the region, to strengthen stability and peace. 
The speaker agreed to take a blue card question under Rule 149 ( 8 ) ) ( 8 ) of the Rules of Procedure ). 
Ladies and gentlemen, I would like to make a final comment, which will, to some extent, returned to me there where I began where I began. 
In these circumstances, there are no well-functioning democratic institutions of this kind, things can seriously be seriously embedded. 
At a time when almost 25 million Europeans have registered as unemployed, a directive has been put forward once again aimed at facilitating immigration for people seeking work. 
The conclusion of a interim agreement between the European Union and the United States so that the US authorities can continue to analyse the data from transactions between European countries in the territory of the Netherlands. 
The proceedings will take place on Wednesday, 6 May 2009, 6 May 2009, on Wednesday, on 6 May 2009. 
Similarly, the accession of the European Union can not be reflected either on the position of the individual Member States in terms of the European Court of Human Rights or on the protocols and reserves. 
It is good when it is good when it is done well when it is done well. 
This is not a viable thing, because a unanimous solution is required then, then you must say what the process you are determining. 
( DE ) Madam President, as a reverse supporter of the European idea, I was against the Treaty of Lisbon, precisely because it opens the way we have heard a time ago, and it did not create a future generation of the clear and unambiguous sense that I wish to see. 
I would like to stress this once again, once again, once again, to emphasise it again once again once again once again, once again, once again, once again, as a matter of principle. 
It is the key issue of the new implementation : society will have confidence and feel safe and feel safe in safety. 
The entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon, the criteria of the Treaty of Lisbon, can not be subject to political transactions or special agreements or special agreements. 
149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 
We will play a major role here that our contribution to play a major role here, that our contribution will play a major role here. 
I would like to put the elements of this joint approach, which reflects the statement adopted by the communication adopted, which reflects the statement adopted by this joint approach, which reflects the statement adopted by the communication adopted by this joint approach. 
During economic decline, we must support our industries relating to creative activity and the artists that contribute to our GDP, employment, growth and global export. 
I think this was quite clear two weeks ago, when the volcanic ash fifth came to the volcano fifth, when the volcano fifth came to a close. 
It is a situation of the United Nations is complicated and that a G20 where the arrangements are irrelevant, but there is opportunities for major advertising, is much more simple. 
It is a quota of President Klaus and that is probably the only one I agree with him that he has already gone so quickly and has been so much more so far, and he will not be possible to stop it or back. 
The policy of the Member States ' transport ministers includes a demand for sustainable and more oriented towards the future of transport policy for the European Union every Sunday, while making it possible to prevent everything actively to make such a policy of this kind. 
Do you be cooperation in dealing with the breach of competition rules on third countries ' rules in relation to third countries, as regards third countries, you have a cooperation in dealing with the infringements of competition rules ? 
The fact that the European system of responsibility for the absence of a legal responsibility must be equal to the protection of consumers and confidence in the markets to improve, thereby increasing the vital cycle of products. 
I am sure that the Commission will say more on this issue after a little after a little after a little, I am sure that the Commission will say in this matter. 
The entry into force of the Treaty of Lisbon and the two institutions need a formal agreement on the cuts of expenditure, which would replace what has been existed for 30 years ', in the agreement '. 
waste electrical and electronic equipment is the fastest growing waste stream of waste in the European Union. 
We are currently in place a deficit because we have consistently cut taxes on capital and created conditions for ever more inequality distribution of wealth. 
Those in other Member States will have unhindered access to health services which do not exist in their home countries due to certain natural conditions will also benefit from this. 
An action of Stockholm must reflect these needs in terms of mobility, employment rights, the needs of businesses and equal opportunities, among other things, while promoting legal certainty and access to rapid and effective justice. 
( NL ) Mr President, in the fault of the House, there is a photographs for the biofuels saw in Canada. 
My question is : what effect are : what consequences are ? What are the consequences of their consequences : what are they really all about their consequences ? 
The conclusion is : State aid must be maintained, because it helps the competitiveness of European maritime transport and the economy of the Member States ' European maritime transport and the economy of the Member States. 
It is not a job of the European Parliament, Parliament, is not a job of the European Parliament, but is not a job of the European Parliament. 
We also consider it important to defence the talks of accession with Croatia 's accession talks with Croatia, too, to be consider it important to protect the accession talks with Croatia with Croatia. 
Ferl, it is not yet late to act late, but it is not yet late to act later on. 
The exercise of arrests where people are held who have clearly not done anything else, except that they have exercised their right to expression of opinion. 
The resolution is also called for even greater presence of EULEX in Kosovo, even more strongly, in Kosovo. 
It is that every one of you are going through this in every single vote in Parliament. 
You all know, our cooperation with Tajikistan is still governed by the Trade and Cooperation Agreement concluded with the GRC in 1989 and confirmed by Tajikistan in 1994. 
In terms of diversification, it must not only cover the new energy supplies, but also supplies, but also suppliers. 
The agreement was provided too hard, but it is honest to say that it has lost its viability and we are going on in a share of the bail today. 
I support the introduction of a true Tobin tax, Tobin tax, in favour of the introduction of a real Tobin tax. 
Therefore, the Greek Government does not have to ask him to provide for financial support, even though we will continue to follow up the situation closely. 
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, the American Peologist Sandh Sandddddddling once preceded that the clash of civilisations has been classified. 
Amendments must be amended. 
Once again, the small farms have suffered the most of the crisis suffered since the crisis have suffered since the crisis the most of the crisis. 
In our resolution, in our resolution that we will adopt tomorrow, there are a number of proposals to adopt tomorrow, there are a number of proposals to us, in our resolution, which will be adopted tomorrow. 
Article 4 ( 2 ) of the Act on the accession of Romania and Bulgaria to the Schengen acquis, the precondition for the elimination of controls on internal borders with these countries is the checking that Schengen requirements are being implemented. 
Parliament is for clear European regulations, for clear European regulations, for European regulations. 
We talked about some of these issues of these issues, and we talked about some of these issues of these issues. 
The only solution to the problems relating to corruption and organised crime is the consistent implementation of the new laws and provisions and provisions. 
I have had a discussion that I have heard that, of course, it is possible - if you want to create personal fingerprints from these fingerprints of these data. 
There is a legal basis for making accession into fact, in fact, to make accession a reality, in fact, to make accession a legal basis for making the accession of accession into reality. 
As the allocation of renewable energy production is indeed one of the main objectives of the Europe 2020 strategy, I assume that, in the coming period, we will certainly have a higher budget in this area, including in the regional policy budget line. 
A legal agreement on global climate policy would be precisely formulated and covered by hundreds of issues in areas such as : quantitative targets for reducing emissions in industrialised countries for 2020 and then, specific targets for emissions in developing countries for 2020, and then financial assistance to developing industrialised countries, development and transferability and technology transfer of technologies and rules for their reporting. 
You will call on them to include an additional phrase ' for the wine produced in the traditional way, because our Spanish friends must sell their surplus out of battery new ones, because they have not eradicated. 
I am in the Commission for having been in this position that it was at the same time as this position that was put to the Commission. 
However, I have now reduced, however, now, at the moment, a reduction in the migration, however, and I have now reduced the timetable. 
Waste system of added value in connection with the issuing of invaluation of invaluation ( 
Do you believe that it is realistic to expect electric vehicles to be widespread in Europe by 201to be tracked by 201. 
There is place a place here for a fair sense of prudence to nuclear energy to nuclear energy to nuclear energy to nuclear energy to nuclear power, here ? 
voters have the right to know that we are very serious and we do not accept the critical decisions of the Council. 
The most perfect treaty can not, in itself, resolve many of the problems in many of the problems, and the most perfect treaty can not, in itself, solve the most problems. 
I think that this resolution represents the first step to which the people of Japan are in the first instance to ensure that the people of Japan are all humanitarian, technical and financial support, which will need in the coming months and years. 
Given that, when the creation of new rights, other freedoms should not be limited. 
The money must be allocated to education, health, health, agriculture and the construction of institutional capacity and the creation of institutional capacity. 
It is the case in Spain, as many other examples mentioned in the Chamber, which have nothing to do with the subject that caused so much concern during the debate. 
Assange is faced with extremism everyday day, whether it is about the bombing of Hitler, or on the streets of Post Pigue, Lukashenko and Rapland Railway. 
With a report on the use of mobile phones in managing mobile phones in managing the vehicle management instrument. 
Though 000 people have died and, of course, we are all unhappy with this, of course, and we are all unhappy with this. 
military solution is implemented with problems of military solution to address problems with problems. 
The main social services of asylum seekers, while at the same time high high level of social security, such as the citizens of the Member State in question, is unrealistic and unrealistic. 
building is one of Europe 's biggest industries, which is responsible for 10 % of GDP and % of gross basic capital, is one of Europe 's biggest basic value. 
It is noted that the report is drawn up on the basis of the previous experience within the EU in terms of the functioning of the economic and monetary union, which establishes the need for a improved framework for economic governance, as proposed in the report. 
During the programming period 200period 200, funding was concentrated at a time of EUR 140 million, 50 % cofinanced by the ERDF. 
It will significantly improve both the links between the relevant markets and between people, and will create new opportunities for the air sector by gradually liberalisation of foreign ownership rules. 
Many coach coach transport and in Ireland are carried out by local carriers, small and family businesses, from very coach, small and family businesses. 
vote on vote on vote on vote on vote on vote on the vote. 
The Stability and Growth Pact does not owe to the lack of consistency or rapid reduction of the annual deficit to the Maastricht Treaty aimed at a new debt of 3 % in the Treaty of Maastricht. 
This is against any increase in Parliament 's staff ' staff and, if further evaluation is to be made, that another EUR 1 500 per month for the secretariat allowances, it will be built on taxpayers ' taxpayers ' taxpayers '. 
I call on the Commission not to stop following the link between the high prices of food prices and increased energy prices, especially on fuel, which are used. 
During the June Council, this issue in June to resolve once and for all and clearly to state that it is the workers, not the politicians, who have to choose their working hours. 
The admissibility procedures, public procurement and the coverage of absorption will no longer be a European problem. 
It is therefore necessary, regardless of the evidence that the standards are equal and if they are as they are, then there is no justification not to transpose this principle throughout the European Union and, hopefully, at the very short time and throughout the world to achieve the desired movement of specialists. 
It is also that, if we wish to devote a way of reducing CO2, we must focus not on the steel or modernising industry, but rather on the energy sector. 
This context is necessary to proceed with a thorough assessment of the rescue and recovering package and recovering the effectiveness of State aid measures for State aid measures. 
Mr President, in my voting list, it seems that paragraph 36 was withdrawn and I wonder whether we should have voted at all. 
The social crisis in the country is increasing to unprecedented levels, which is due to the path that the Members of the European Union and the measures implemented at national level, are being made, dictated by them : more intense reference policies, increased exploitation of workers, new antisocial measures that increase inequalities, increasing employment and job inequality, and increasing poverty and social exclusion. 
in writing. - ( CS ) I voted in favour of this report as I believe that the European Union 's common agricultural policy must continue to be a common agricultural policy and that, in future, there must be no renationalisation in this area. 
We all would like to respond to energy demand mainly through renewable renewable sources, mainly through renewable energy, through renewable sources, through renewable sources. 
You are not convinced in satisfaction that trade preferences can be used to promote wealth and to combat radicalism. 
The sitting suspended at noon is resumed at 12.00 ) at 12.00. 
These are important steps towards equality in the direction of equality of equality. 
Finally, energy efficiency will not create quality jobs unless a true strategic EU initiative is based on a true strategic initiative that is granted by the limits of the free market. 
Action in Brussels without providing a link at national level, it reduces the effectiveness of the Member State, reduces the effectiveness of the Member States so much more effectively. 
It is for all international exposures that are of the length of the long life between three weeks and three months and which are not a fundamental trade nature. 
In directly to the method of comparable profits, as the amendment suggests, it does not mean that we will necessarily receive a thorough response. 
It is never evident by the World Health Organisation or the Community acquis communautaire. 
With the ordinary legislative procedure and the Treaty of Lisbon, and I therefore believe that we should all take advantage of them to achieve the objectives. 
You are leaving this completely indifferent to this particular scandal to this particular scandal to this particular scandal, and you are completely different to this particular scandal. 
This has been done for a long time now, and we have nothing more specifically, I hope that we will have some result soon, otherwise nothing else, but also to take further action in the foreseeeable future. 
In fact, it is nothing, but I ask the authors of these absolutely disgraceful amendments to withdraw them, because they are a black of house for Parliament. 
For all you and the Swedish Presidency have done in these six months, in these six months, in these six months. 
The speed with which every country is progressing on its path towards EU membership is set by the candidate side or the potential candidate. 
In addition, more resources must be provided than the European Union budget budget, more money must be made available than the European Union budget. 
on behalf of the Commission. - Madam President, on behalf of the Commission, and, in particular, its Vice-President Reding, I would like to thank the rapporteur for this valuable report, which analyses several key aspects regarding the impact of modern advertising advertising and consumer behaviour. 
on behalf of the ECR Group. - Madam President, the ECR Group supported the initial agreement on the SWIFT of the Council with the United States and their Terrorist Finance Tracking Programme for Terrorists in the transfer of financial reports in compliance with the provision of of of of, of course, certain safeguard measures. 
The fact that the EU must ensure that its citizens and food security and long-term development of agricultural sectors, considerably changes must be made in agriculture to maintain productivity at a time when it must adapt to the more stringent environmental restrictions that are currently in force. 
A framework of the European Union budget is being drawn up in such a way that it is becoming more stringent during the sevenperiod, particularly in the agricultural field. 
I support the technical measure for facilitating the organisation of international exposure to the organisation of international exposure to the organisation of international exposure that have been put into place. 
This letter, in August 2008, the Minister for Justice has finally informed me of his results. 
European support for national efforts not only in the area of prevention and treatment, but also in coordination of the financing of research, the spread of best practices and adequate funding for the pharmaceutical industry, which is working to open effective medicines, we will not be able to help the independence and dignity of people suffering from diseases that are very radiological, including in terms of their emotional and social relations. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, just a few words in the summary of the very interesting debate today, for which I thank all the speakers for whom I thank all the speakers. 
These conditions mean that we must join and consider all these discharge procedures in terms of the control costs. 
However, the rapporteur is aware that the Greens have submitted their own amendments which provide for the modernisation of the line between the Ukrainian and the Chief of Munich, but the rapporteur again states that the changes we are making through this report are providing for the tabling of amendments to the text rather than updating it. 
It is so that it is not be important to ignore the positive impact of improving the improved management of biomanagement of biodiversity waste, namely the impact on the functioning of the internal market, on agriculture, by safeguarding and rebuilding fruit of soil and promoting renewable energy. 
With regard to funding - rightly, it will have to be in the next financial perspective, in the next financial perspective, it will have to be in the next financial perspective. 
( EL ) Mr President, it seems that, in the proposals that the US Secretariat made to Israel during his visit was included and that it has stopped building and the extension of severe places in the West Bank, open roads and cease the construction routes and cease of the statest of the Eritrea and the ern Uight Palestinians, and, in relation to Gaza - to allow the necessary decision of the necessary materials to restorance materials and to re-establish the construction points of construction routes. 
This time, we are going to make use of the lessons that we can learn from this process and indeed work hard for growth, aimed at both at European and at national level. 
At this point, it was a length of time and a length and a crazisis and Parliament knows that very well and well. 
It is a structural problem, widespread in all areas, countries and continents, and continents, and continents. 
The need to make more effort to reduce the risk of disasters and to provide support - apart from the specific support - to support the capacity of communities in relation to the preparation of disasters. 
Achieving between the European Parliament and the European Council, has enabled the implementation of a temporary budget - something that could have been reflected in the negative impact of European cohesion and agricultural policy. 
This must be guaranteed that the leapers and development policies will enable effective development to be made available and that the development policies and policies will enable effective development to be effective. 
The vote will take place tomorrow tomorrow tomorrow, tomorrow, tomorrow will take place at the very forefront of us. 
This is clearer than ever, the importance of our partnership with the EIB and the European Union in meeting our commitments, both to our shareholders and to the countries where we are working on them. 
Member States are looking for ways to cuts in the budget budget in the Member States to look for ways of cuts in the budget in the Member States. 
I think the European Union really has achieved its objectives and now has decisions and decisions on its citizens and for their citizens. 
However, I think that this is wrong, I believe, but I think it is wrong, but I think it is wrong. 
A justification is required for air transport security of air transport safety, air transport safety, air transport security is required. 
Not only will it be beneficial to the environment, but will it also help to preserve local jobs. 
To achieve this, we must focus on the Member States so that - as Spain has done, in addition to the transposition of the Council framework decision on this matter - we can develop and implement plans for action with the involvement of interests groups, including programmes to improve awareness of the population and social mobilisation, without negling work on international cooperation. 
In general, the ratification process of a European treaty is too often seen as a sand or Pyonus Poles victory, too often, as a process of ratifying a European treaty, too often seems to be a victory. 
We are taking a young woman who visits French, Italian or Belgian school, and, in the merced time, when he has been socialised with his returns, he is abandoned by the reality and forced to worry about her tragedy to him by the end of his lives. 
It is this programme to preserve its funds in full, in full of the size of full, to maintain its funds. 
I therefore support the adoption of this agreement, not only because it seems fair, but also because it is also because it is also because it has a three-off of cases at the very few cases of the unfailed discrimination that still exists between the people of the EU. 
The overwhelming painment of women and mothers in Europe and around the world do not have other problems and problems in the world ? 
Madam President, thank you for giving me the opportunity to say a few words on this important international issue on this important international issue. 
Madam President, I would like to congratulate the Czech Presidency on its initiative to come up with the proposal for the Eastern Partnership, which will be very soon formally represented and I would like to call on the governments of the Member States to fully engage in this initiative with this initiative. 
Branged a strong speech has been made unstrong at a rate of rare and a strong speech is being made unequivocally rate. 
Of course, no problems will not be distributed without problems without problems, of course, without problems, without problems, of course, without problems. 
SEPA is not covered by the agreement ; most of the public proclaims are not affected by the agreement ; the majority of the public proclaims are not affected. 
appropriations : see Minutes 
This system is increasingly personal data that can also be collected for reasons, the legality of which are subject to interpretation. 
A process for reform of the Agency, which is in the course that is in the course of the discussion, still requires a thorough discussion, so the mandate of the Agency, which expires on 13 March 2010, to extend. 
A major element of the common asylum system is a welcome dimension ', a ' dimension ' ', ', a key element. 
We should be absolutely sure that the timber timber of Cameroon, the Republic of Congo or which would be a third country, has been transported and proposed on the market legally and in complying with the needs of local communities and the forest law on forest management. 
( FR ) Madam President, Commissioner, in your description of the prospect of the European Neighbourhood Policy in the Southern Mediterranean, you mentioned the possible categories of catches. 
I can be brief, because all the important issues have already been addressed, as I can all the matters have been addressed. 
However, there is also a second dimension, however, and there is also a second second dimension, of course, a second dimension, and there is also a second dimension, however. 
The EU officials ' officials ' delegation are provided for discipline procedures applicable to the infringement of this obligation. 
This severe metals may lead to serious air pollution of air pollution pollution, and they may have a serious effect on the heavy metals. 
The Union has shown good will by eliminating partial visa sanctions against the officials of Belarus 's officials, has shown good will, by abolishing partially, by the abolition of the visa sanctions against the officials of Belarus. 
The particular substance of the particular link between two components of civil conscience - the legal thought and historic memory - is fully held by the modern Russian community on human rights and probably probably also by Russian civil society as a whole. 
It is a real problem of informal oil, a real problem of informal oil, in fact. 
In Europe, we are the preferences of regulation and supervision of the financial markets and supervision of the financial markets and supervision of the financial markets. 
A year is 300 000 tonnes per year, at 300 000 tonnes of tonne, at 300 000 tonnes per year, and it is 300 000 tonnes of equal level. 
We must take into consideration the various favourable conditions everywhere in the European Union, taking into account the various favourable conditions. 
The picture taken by the report that will be published tomorrow on the speculation that will be published on the speculation of the specialisation of Member States in the European Union. 
rule, your gold rule, in other words, the automatic exchange of all fiscal, banking and financial information for all inevitable discrepancies will result in the deadline of unlawful data. 
Madam President, Canada is one of the oldest and most united partners of the European Union, Canada is one of the most in the oldest and most united partners of the European Union. 
The people must be given the means to improve and extend their qualifications and increase their qualifications. 
The regulation submitted to the exposure are subject to special customs regime regulated by the Paris Convention. 
I think we share a common goal - to help the market to function properly - to help the market to function properly and to function properly. 
However, a patient is faced with unfounded time ago in its own country, we must not hope if it wants to travel to a place where it will receive more quickly, and probably also higher quality healthcare. 
We have also heard from you and asked for the permanent, transparent procedure for the Anti-Counterfeiting Trade Agreement ( ACTA ) and to ensure that the European Parliament and the citizens represented by Parliament are regularly and in detail about the progress of negotiations, while respecting the provisions of conferences for conferences that you have just led to us to the agreement relating to the agreement. 
As the guardians, the treaty is obliged to follow up for such signs of signs of signs of this kind. 
There will be a little more and that we will take place in a few days ' time to take place. 
The solution is guided and the need for environmentally friendly agriculture and support for the fight against climate change, and to combat climate change. 
It was undoubtedly one of the engines of the overall macro-regions of the macro-regions for the overall macro-economic approach on the strategy. 
You are going to propose your proposals, but you will not solve the main problem with them, but you will not solve the main problem. 
There has been no prior to the fact that a system of stopping such disparities with such disparities, and the lack of sufficient control of public authorities, in addition to security systems required and apply by the operators of platforms to the risk of contamination and, ultimately, specific risk relating to pollution, to hypocritical areas, particularly in particular. 
It is a fact that I am today, I am speaking rather than an another rapporteur, but I will allow myself to say a few words to highlight something that is already contained in the Committee on Budgets, namely, that it is important, of course, that it is important, of course, that we always think of savings and of whether the costs that are being made are justified and most appropriate. 
So let us not start with the accusations that only for Brussels is there privatisation for Brussels is a privatisation. 
It is a position of this legislative period that the role of the European Council is no longer limited to the only accessible speech by the President. 
Proposals enable Member States to define who falls and who is not in the scope of the directive on car transport activities in road transport. 
I have said this is an important step, but not the last step, but not the last step, but not the last one, but not the last one, but not the last one, but not the last one, but not the last step. 
I therefore believe that the recommendation made today to the Commission on the part of Parliament to review in the near future the impact of the crisis on air traffic and review in this context is the most appropriate method that we can propose in these uncertain times in these times. 
Mr President, I am not just speaking as a Member or as a volcano in the northpower to the northpolitician politician, I would just like to warn all that the northern police does not only constitute economic or energy heritage in the field of our heritage, but is also among the main examples of our heritage, of course. 
It is possible to make this difference and the Commissioner without doubt aware that this should be the case. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - ( NL ) I would like to thank the rapporteurs on behalf of our group rapporteurs. 
The spontaneous access to unregulated markets has been authorised for trade in official places for trade. 
Today, it is aimed at assuring you that the Commission is committed to the work that it has committed itself to taking into account all the policies that can have an impact on the reform of the common fisheries policy. 
initiatives that are truly oriented to ordinary people could be successful, even if they do not even follow the spirit of European Federalism. 
We now have no 10th in this case the 100-Election of the Procedures in this case we need, which we need very much, is the case that we need at the moment, that we do not have at the moment, that is the moment, that we have now. 
They may leave the following of individual, uncontrolled acts of revenge and often organised murders that perpetrators are normally seeking to cover the bail-out. 
We face this problem and solve it and solve it. 
We face, we are consolidating or monopoly in supply or transit, a lack of interconnected market and a particularly vulnerable dependence on the eastern border of the Union. 
Moreover, the European Union is based on undisputed values which include countering all forms of discrimination, and I will work to uphold this value throughout its entire mandate. 
There is an initiative that goes more than simply to use GDP in preparing the Structural Funds, including the codification of Djibouti as a measure of inequality in evaluation - where there is an inadequate situation. 
We doubt that geographical location, the removal of the markets and other similar factors are causing a number of difficulties and so on. 
I abstain from the vote in favour of voting against the vote. 
It is obvious that, if the ECB did not provide this liquidity to exchange such guarantees, which are actually quite shortly very likely to be very likely to be failed to fail to the ECB. 
Democratic European Development Fund ( EDF ) ( 
Indeed, the refusal of the European Parliament to respect the Irish negative vote is contrary to the spirit of the Charter of the Charter of Auditors. 
It will particularly apply to multifamily families, particularly for multifamily families. 
Some measures are some measures to achieve the goal of building an internal market that is based on free movement between Member States, in order to achieve the objective of building a internal market that is based on free movement between Member States. 
The information provided by the Hungarian authorities the bluefin card channel does not contain a high concentration of heavy metals and therefore does not consider dangerous waste. 
We are doing in Europe in Europe, we are doing so in Europe ? 
The public should be prepared and provided by the public by a single place for access to the public, in a single place for access to access. 
I am very much discussing and I do not know whether the idea will have success - whether the parliament will vote in favour of our proposal. 
On the one hand, it is a risk to the health of EU citizens, because the conditions of imported food production are not clear, but, on the other hand, the attitude to European agriculture is unequal, because EU standards for production and processing agricultural production are not applied on agricultural produce imported from Mercosur countries. 
To the creation of the conditions required for peaceful coexistence, it goes through the European Union and by supporting the visa regime, we are making our own contribution to achieving this goal. 
I am firmly against the creation of new agencies, and I am firmly against the creation of new agencies. 
They are obvious facts and they require them, they encourage the implementation of a global strategy on a global scale. 
It is precisely that this year in the budget that there is a new position this year in the budget, the Baltic Sea Strategy, and I hope that the Commission and Parliament will start together with the appropriate projects and will find the appropriate means for the appropriate measures to be put in place. 
This report because it outlines the European Parliament 's proposals, which provide for concrete measures to promote corporate social responsibility within the framework of the European Union 's trade policy. 
Constitutional structures in the Czech Republic will also find a way to overcome such illegal blocking blocks as such as illegal blocking blocks. 
All the assurances that the opportunity given by the collection of states has not been used, it was not used. 
We believe that the aim of the European Arrest Warrant is to help combat terrorism - and we all know that it has become much more than that. 
We know that Greece has no intention of leaving the euro area to leave the euro area to the euro area. 
We would like to point out that we voted against these proposals and regret the fact that they were provoked. 
My report calls on the European Commission to work with the Member States to make a map for the remaining visible areas in Europe and to develop a strategy for increasing their protection. 
It is that we can deal with globalisation not with force, but with inspiration, but with inspiration. 
No, it was not the right method, but the correct method was not the right method. 
The Council has done everything possible again in order to prevent our work as auditors as auditors, a year again, the Council has done everything possible to prevent our work. 
We can motivate a higher number of women to start working as self-employed workers and, in this regard, the directive marks a step in the right direction. 
It is good news for the credibility of the EU 's agricultural market and in all areas it is done in good work. 
It is a excessive use of chemicals in agriculture, which damages our food and the environment, and farmers are forced to pay high price for these industrial products. 
2009 discharge : the 2009 budget, the 10th and 10European Development Fund ( ERDF ) discharge ( ERDF ) discharge. 
I am convinced that, with their conviction and with the cooperation of the Czech Presidency, we are in a situation of reaching agreement at first reading, which is very important. 
More Europe and genuine cooperation with the United States in order to achieve the Millennium Development Goals. 
The resolution calling for the possibility of coordinating at European level in complying with international conventions on the instruments concerning the instrument for international adoption, so as to improve the protection of the child 's asylum services, the preparation of international adoptions, the processing of applications on international adoptions for international adoptions and services following adoption, given that all international conventions on the protection of the rights of the child family or the protection of children or the remaining of children or children. 
It is a bad sign that two of the parties in the conflict - Morocco and Algeria - is not cooperating, despite the unstable situation in Tunisia, in Tunisia. 
A future agreement on a package of proposals to create a new financial supervisory structure in the European Union and future agreement on a package of proposals to create a new financial supervisory structure. 
It is certainly not the goal of achieving without two of the most important issues on the day : the variety of market volatility and price ( having been affected by speculation on the markets ) and the reduction in food stocks. 
The European Commission, which was governed by the European Commission, is the pretext of this debate on discharge, while the part that the European Investment Bank has been governed is currently excluded by discharge, and I would like to come back to this later. 
A request must also be made at Community level, national authorities are also strictly applied to implement the strict regulations, and the strict rules must be put in place. 
services must include health and providing care, education, time, transport, transport and broad broad relations, and broad this relationship must include health and providing care, education, transport and broad relations. 
I am convinced that most of you will share the rapporteur 's opinion and confirm the vital improvements made in this agreement. 
I also express my disagreement with the fact that in paragraph 31 of the report, a directive on corporate social responsibility should not be adopted. 
I think this is a very good reason why we do not allow the European Union to sign up to the Convention to sign the Convention on the Functioning of the European Union. 
Measures must be implemented fully in accordance with international maritime law, in full compliance with international maritime law. 
part of the budget is affected by various types of budget is affected by various mistakes of error, which are affected by various types of error. 
We are all taking this into account and we will take it into account it in all of this and we will take this into account. 
I will say that the Innovation Union can be a really good instrument for resolving climate issues in the Union, and I would say that the Innovation Union can be a truly good instrument for resolving climate problems. 
I take this opportunity to return to the first part of this issue and raise the subject of public procurement in general and the subject of limited procedures for which many people claim to be or lead to a reallocation of funds. 
There is now a permanent President and a High Representative for Foreign Affairs issues, and there is now a permanent President and a High Representative for Foreign Affairs. 
This document establishes a single procedure for applying third-country nationals who wish to be admitted to the territory of a Member State in order to work there and offer them a legal status. 
It is now in the middle of the economic crisis, but we must not allow it to block our reasonable and prevent us from putting ambitious targets in these areas. 
In some kind of agreements will only have any importance when we can be sure that foreign companies are no longer exploiting local companies, which do not have any professional knowledge of forestry and the environment, and when the Republic of Congo has dealt with corruption. 
There is objectivity and transparency in the distribution of money between Member States between Member States and the Member States to have objectivity and transparency in the distribution of money between Member States. 
There is not only a help for women in the development of their career but, in particular, they can develop the skills of children as members of society. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
Would codecision procedure or what is the codecision procedure or what about what is it or what about ? 
The fact that a large amount of investment is already made in this area will be wise to recognise national differences in accordance with the subsidiarity principle of principle, in line with the subsidiarity principle, in this area. 
We must know that they have our solidarity that they have our solidarity, our solidarity, have to have our solidarity, and they must be aware that they have our solidarity. 
However, we still reaffirm other hundreds of thousands of good intentions, however, and we still have the other thoughts of thousands of good intentions with good intentions. 
The Commission has been going on in the next few months to come up with a revised proposal for revision, with a view to the opposite position of the Council, with the resistant position of the Council. 
Climate change, I hear that there is a common view here of the active role that the European Union should play in Copenhagen and now on. 
It is possible to find a solution here to address the problem of once and for all and for all and for all, once and for all, as soon as possible to find a solution to the problem of the problem. 
It is also as good and the proposal by Mr Calfin Calfide to help economic development and democratic changes in the Mediterranean region - now, in particular in Tunisia and Egypt, in particular, in Tunisia. 
We need to see how developing economies are emerging, so we need to focus on this area as quickly as possible, as possible, as quickly as possible, we need to focus on this area as possible. 
As you, I and support the Community method and the treaty that clearly sets out a division of responsibilities. 
You have the floor, sadly, to have the floor, to have the floor, you have the floor. 
After all, at second reading, we will support it if it is clear that we are using a green and sustainable approach to the second reading if it is clearly used. 
We have not examined in detail the courageous effects of all the regulations that are currently being examined in detail the case that we have now considered. 
There are there are all those in place, which only operate for a few hours of the working day, which limits the access of parents to the labour market. 
( IT ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the funds that are blocked by the European Union are probably the ones which are designed to more specifically lead the soil to merit. 
You would also forget that people are aware of the irregularity and deliberate abuse of social services in Europe. 
unfair competition is unfair to the inadequately functioning of the market, which has led to the inadequately functioning of the market, which has led to the inadequately functioning of the market. 
Madam President, what is the logic that the Council and the Commission makes to believe that the policies imposed on Ireland will not increase debt or that this will not be the result of the implementation of these policies or similar policies in the European Union ? 
It is mainly a condition that, mainly, Serbia 's integration in the European Union is the resolution of severe cases of human rights violations and related to them, a problem of close cooperation with the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia. 
The European Commission therefore called on this issue to be considered as regards the intentions of Brazil, during the next Transparency Committee 's next Transnistria Committee to the WTO to the WTO of March 2011. 
The concerns are the result of the statements by Mrs Ashton and his statements last past, but also of her first action after the post-office comes into office. 
It was the first side of the Soviet bloc, which announced its independence from the GSP, which has declared its independence. 
The majority of Europe has done so far from the current system in which global multinational multinational corporations and the banks of the world are governing the world and governing banks. 
It will describe this policy through the European Parliament and by fighting for a share with workers and social movements to make the dreams of young generations for democratic, social, minimum, ministerial, environmental and peaceful war Europe. 
It was initially created because around 80 % of the population lives in cities and, because of climate change, we now want to address this. 
Our Fukushima is primarily obliged to strengthen our requirements in the field of nuclear safety, above all, in our foreign safety standards. 
The conclusions should have been to strengthen nuclear security, the test of weaknesses, the freezing of projects for building new nuclear plants in the European Union and more effective investment in clean energy and energy storage. 
two days of the socialist opposition in the country, Mr Munich, was here in Parliament. 
It intends to present a new communication on the modernisation of higher education later this year later this year 's year 's intention to present a new communication on the modernisation of high education later this year. 
It is a key action to ensure the food security and survival of people, and this is the original objective of any fisheries policy in every fisheries policy. 
Have hear the President informed the President that if Parliament has to show its true force, we will have to review them ? 
In particular, the heads have called for decisive action to provide appropriate financial support through the European financial stability mechanism to the entry into force of the permanent mechanism to the entry into force of the permanent mechanism. 
The experiment of dominant domination by the United States is to end and it will be replaced by the concept of multipoliticism, which may also lead to conflict. 
We must also ensure that the project projects will provide international mediation organisations, the EMAO and the secretariat of the Convention by Espoo, explained and justified answers and based on the choice of building, environmental impact, regular and plans for evacuation. 
We are aware of the ongoing nationalist programmes, we realise that the compromise and the agreement are possible in Bosnia and Herzegovina and Herzegovina. 
We are further than ever since the achievement of sustainable transport, more than ever, of the achievement of sustainable transport, of sustainable transport, more than ever, than ever, of achieving sustainable transport. 
The Commissioner will take into consideration the conclusions of the Sarajevo Charter, where we were involved and we as representatives of the Commission and Parliament, together with experts, organisations and associations, the NGOs and associations of the debate there are in practice as prepared for the World Waste Forum Forum Forum. 
It is also possible for women to coincide family and professional life, but also to achieve the objectives of gender equality : this is what we are fighting for today for all European women. 
It is that, in the second debate on the crisis in the car industry, the proposals made during the debate in February. 
As soon as we are modest, we must also remember that these achievements also provide a great responsibility for the future and a great deal of responsibility for the future. 
In the EU, it has raised between 16 and 18 million tonnes per year, from which between 65 and 75, million tonnes are designed to the market for vegetables. 
Member States also need support to modernise the highly polluting industrial sector in order to reduce the emissions of harmful greenhouse gases, but at the same time remain jobs and provide economic growth. 
The directive without borders ' is a wonderful opportunity for all patients in the European Union, but especially for patients from countries that are less developed where there is what to be desired by health services in health services. 
The financial crisis has strengthened and increased the need to look at the decological problems relating to the more responsible management of companies. 
We must see what you intend to do with this package for goods as part of a broader strategy for managing the Community legislation for consumers. 
It is that the global economic and financial crisis has even affected the most developed economies, but we must not forget that it has affected even more so, even more so, the poorest countries and the poorest countries. 
In Northern Ireland, we have not forgotten the victims of the past and the victims of terrorism, so I call on Parliament to support the campaign for compensation from Libya. 
They must also provide for measures to be taken in terms of social and demographic trends and focus on support given to families who care to patients, thus providing social protection to vulnerable persons suffering from dementia. 
We have a policy that is merely repressive and unjust to asylum seekers, to the authorities and, ultimately, as we open, and to European taxpayers ' taxpayers ' taxpayers. 
All the situations would have been to have a crisis, but the fact that we have no sufficient instruments to address it, and that we have not yet made progress with the euro funds, deemed us to have made any progress in the euro, deep pressure. 
It was in cooperation with the European Commission to define the highest possible standards for oil extracting operations in European waters. 
Some Member States have it, and in others, it may not be the case, but it is a fact that in the new Hungarian Government, Hungary 's government has abolished this symbol Ombudsman. 
China recently stated that there is no intention of reducing the ratio of using its energy sources - 80 % coal to 20 % oil - and in practice it declares that it wishes to double its energy needs by 2020. 
The fact that the document we are going to discuss and I hope that we will be able to approve tomorrow is very good news for Europe. 
It may be that it is simply not enough to be enough in terms of climate change today 's volunteering. 
I see too little plans in this area, but we must continue to make efforts to do so in this direction. 
2009, the European Parliament 's Committee on Petitions received 1 petitions, but only % of them were adopted for manoeuvre within the Committee 's competence. 
( FR ) Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, I would like to mention something in the protocol : the Community has no competences in the area of housing in general, and particularly in the area of social housing. 
In Europe, many of these countries are very damaging when it comes to showing solidarity, but unfortunately, there is a great risk of forgetting or being made available to the tragedy of our gathering in Haiti. 
This tragedy is indisputable and there is no dimensions at the expense of this tragedy. 
The Commission has itself the urgent task of finding a solution to the conflicts concerning the use of minority languages in all EU countries without exception, without exception, of exception. 
Today 's times, the Internet has the positive quality of traditive democratic countries such as Italy to dismantle all possible political, geographical, economic and social barriers to information before information. 
As has already been mentioned here today, it is opening up between the words and our affairs - or, in other words, that, it is a concern between the internal and external reactions of the EU. 
Supporting, support is provided to specific projects and attempts to ensure that the laws are properly and effectively implemented to combat discrimination law. 
This gradual problem affecting youth unemployment are other social and economic risks and social costs for our societies and expenditure on our societies. 
In addition to this short-term objective, the new strategy gives Europe a programme - in fact, as Michel Barnier pointed out in his welcomed - a programme for action - so that the European Union can emerge from the economic crisis, recovering economic growth and ensuring that this growth creates more and better jobs. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
This point, ACTA will not have an impact on European citizens, because it will not create new obligations for the European Union and the need to implement legislation. 
It is a debate that, in a debate like this, when we are discussing such a subject, we should focus on future measures to ensure that citizens are avoided by such situations and, if I may allow me to point out, perhaps it is even more important to ask ourselves whether there is no such figures that have been made available to public attention, in some way as to reduce the confidence of citizens in the work of the EU institutions. 
It means that cities are responsible for reducing CO2 emissions by more than 20 % by 2020, by 2020, for more than 20 % by 2020. 
I know - and I am speaking to you - that the years ' are a severe period that the Italian Labour MEPs have now adopted hard time. 
This report is in principle a new report, given the inevitable political content : it is trying to highlight and speed up important debates in the European institutions and Member States on all the issues included in the economic governance package. 
Would it be possible to use the Erasmus programmes and to improve communication in border regions and on what would you have place in this regard ? 
elected by you for the important new posts in the EU, they can already determine them without prejudge ideas, because they are still largely unaware of the majority of European citizens. 
However, it also means ( particularly in the digital era era era, that opportunities must be provided in this century and for the development of public broadcasting, which will symbolic quality, cultural and social unity. 
It is not in a position to comment on the definition of the territory or the borders of a Member State, because these matters are only the responsibility of the Member States and regulations are regulated solely by the applicable provisions of international law. 
You, too, know you, of you. 
My country - Poland - the political right fate, which is fully under the influence of homosexuality, does not allow for the same in early sexual education and limit protection against contraception and legal abortion. 
It is time for international justice to do its work in Sri Lanka, as well as elsewhere, and it is time for international justice to do its work. 
These are not only the global crisis and the decline in the economy, among other things, with the cutting of local and external markets, but also the common agricultural policy - a neoliberal policy that the European Commission has continued to provoke in recent years, which has contributed significantly to the current crisis. 
We must aim to reduce the differences between the current level of animal welfare standards in the various Member States of the Union, because there are currently major discrepancies in animal welfare conditions and there is an increasing destabilisation of animals for animals. 
I am voting on the resolution on the resolution on smoking smoking in the resolution on the resolution on smoking. 
It is also clearly stated in the Protocol on the public broadcasting system - and television spread to the Treaty of Amsterdam. 
On the other hand, Member States must also show solidarity with the Community, with the same kind of fulfilment, with honest obligations to which decisions together have been made. 
It is a good idea that Parliament should debate not only this fact but also the conduct of Fijing and of a large number of multinational companies in Europe, aimed at trade unions, such as this behaviour does not respect workers ' rights. 
It is good, but it could work better, but it could also work better, but it could also work better and better. 
It is important for Ukraine to participate in the Eastern Partnership and in the Parliamentary Assembly of the Euronest Euronest Parliamentary Assembly, which is cooperating with the European Parliament. 
Indeed, it is particularly wishing to strengthen governance - with particular attention, including to budgetary support, and to take into account the low levels of income - and to invest significantly in infrastructure, particularly in roads. 
It is a high office of the Israeli army responsible for the following : for the indiscriminate use of a fleet, of the indiscriminate use of a fantasy, of the indiscriminate disparity between civilian and soldiers, of human consequences, of the blocking, which is a means of collective punishment and of the violation of military law. 
It is not true that Europe is in its time to come to its backs shape of all global problems, but it is not true that Europe, in its time, that it is all global problems. 
I have said three in the merging strikes, but, at the very least we are in Brussels, we will call them out of the blame for unsmoking. 
However, we have been asked to deal with the urgent question, and we took into consideration this fact when adopting the package of regulations, Parliament has never avoided political responsibility. 
On the basis of the evaluation of the European Council, the Council will adopt guidelines for the employment policy of the Member States ' employment policy of the Member States ' Member States ' Member States ' assessment. 
It must be understood that a Conservative who took on the supermarket would not be there if it was not biodiversity. 
( RO ) Madam President, the Black Sea is important for the European Union not only because of its strategic location, but also because of the opportunities that have been available, economic opportunities and conditions for enhanced regional development. 
We must show good remarks and ask the people, our voters, whether they agree with this. 
It is very important, because, first of all, I believe that it strengthens Parliament 's legitimacy, because it gives the public direct access to Parliament not via parties, but thus allowing direct access to us and only one similar law. 
It has called for better mutual understanding between the two banks, between the two banks, and I have been calling for better understanding between the two banks. 
These areas are being put in the report on the High North North of the European Parliament, together with valuable proposals on how to act in future. 
The bloody cycle of the collapse of the South Yugoslavia and the transfer of new borders is closing to the disclosure of new ranks of Balkan and global level through the imperialist law, divided and train, which will double new tensions and intervention. 
The European Union is a powerful incentive for other Western Balkan countries, which are progressing towards European integration, to carry out the necessary political, economic and legislative reforms, to strengthen stability and promote the revision and reconciliation of the region in the region. 
It is therefore : who should taxes be increased, and why must taxes be increased, and which taxes must be increased ? 
I try to answer my response to the answer to the Commissioner. 
It is due to the Treaty of Lisbon, which I am going to come into force, Parliament will, in general, need further legislative capacity, but with the introduction of the Statute of the parliamentary assembly since the start of the current parliamentary term, there is still no proof that Members actually need to cooperate. 
I would like to emphasise one other principle of still more principle, I would like to focus on one other principle. 
This was what we supported in favour of rejecting the agreement and regret that it was not adopted. 
We can see the sioner in this : hopefully we hope that we will not go from a chaos in aviation in another way. 
The rules for people 's transport should not affect the freedom of the authorities at a lower level to organise their public transport themselves. 
However, their illegal accedent accency for freedom, they depend on the assistance of legitimate disruptions that are adopted in a particular price to help end the Sinai border, even without the necessary documents. 
It is also possible to include civil society as fully as possible in institutional actions to eradicate human trafficking and to carry out campaigns for awareness and clarification of the risks groups. 
The role of catalyst, the role of catalyst, the role of catalyst, the role of catching capital. 
Once again, I am addressing the most disgraceful characteristics of its dictatorship 's dictatorship, once again, of the most disgraceful characteristics of its dictatorship. 
Moreover, your direction is also wrong, because you are assuming that the two market is equally large, both markets are equally large. 
I would like to conclude, Mr President, by raising the following considerations in response to some specific issues of the following considerations in response to certain specific issues. 
There is much more opportunities for improvement and they must be considered critical by the European Commission. 
As the ICT sector sector sector are responsible for 5 % of European GDP with a market value, a year and with a much greater contribution to increasing general productivity ( 20 % directly from the ICT sector and 30 % of investment in ICT, how does the Commission intend to deal with the fragility of digital markets ? 
Cooperation in the area of the creation of a unitary patent protection ( debate ) 
Question Time ( Commission ) questions ) to the Commission ( Commission questions ) 
Health has been a bad coup of more serious health problems and there are far more serious health problems for resolving simple subsidies from large pharmaceutical companies. 
It is probably a directive that contains the most courageous rules in the world on the factors affecting the remuneration of remuneration. 
Europe has given its neighbours, including those in Central and Eastern Europe, the prospect of membership, including in Central and Eastern Europe, of the prospect of membership. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I conclude by close, I am finishing, I am finishing, I am finishing. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I would like to refer to the House 's attention from the aspirations and to return to the issue of vaccines that prevent death cases of death. 
Many efforts are very important because access to the region is crucial for international trade and the transportation of goods and the transportation of goods. 
They can focus their advertising to a consumer profile and avoid the double group outside the whole group. 
in writing. - ( PT ) The process of discharge is now focused on 2009, it is important to learn lessons for the future and also to simplify financial governance, in the end. 
In the event of an accident, what resources we have to avoid in order to avoid pollution pollution of coastal coast ? 
It is twenty months after the real start of the activity is made equal and to see whether everything is going on in smooth or not to express a cautious word - whether it seems that everything looks to be done in smooth. 
In order to mobilise the countries sharing your liberal economic forecasts to oppose protectionism at this stage. 
( IT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, in my opinion, industrial policy, which is extremely concentrated exclusively on businesses operating internationally and using new technologies is not the best way forward to success. 
However, this is what we are in constant contact with its representatives, particularly in the context of progress in the progress of the dialogue process, and we believe and we believe in future continue in the same way. 
We also have sufficient resources in the flexibility instrument so that we can react and change our priorities. 
The region 's cooperation areas in the region, which is expected to participate in the EU 's involvement, represent a very decisive list of a very destiny list. 
Is the European Union using public money to subsidise groups to subsidise pressure groups for pressure pressure groups ? 
On behalf of my group, I would like to express our solidarity with the whole agricultural sector and, in particular, with the strike of dairy farmers and their actions throughout Europe. 
: European beef products from his origin and aggressive meat meat products from beef and aggressive meat products. 
It is clear that there is a huge interest in the natural resources of the Arctic region 's natural resources, that the Arctic region is very much in the midst of the Arctic region. 
I have seen all the speeches and certainly the unanimous opinion of Parliament 's unanimity in practice, and I have seen the unanimous opinion of Parliament 's unanimity. 
It is to overcome the eight years of socialist governance, recovering the political and economic dynamism and economic dynamism in Hungary and, as the reduction in debt levels, and the reduction in debt. 
This proposal is now being ignored, which shows that it is true : the new Member States are considered to be second class Members of the European Union. 
The youth organisations in Belarus are not allowed to freely carry out their activities ; instead of course, they must work illegally and work illegally. 
Unfortunately, Turkish labour legislation is still not complying with European standards and employers often benefiting the maximum possible use of this situation. 
( CS ) Thank you, Madam President, Madam President, Madam President, Madam President, for your very much, Madam President. 
It is contradiction - it is not possible to have an increase of EUR 300 million and, at the same time, to have no increase in EUR 300 million and, at the same time, to have no increase in an increase in the rate of an increase in EUR 300 million and, at the same time, no increase. 
This is five years ago and it is a interactive process where we must also see the people that the Member States have proposed to form the Commission. 
An emotion because there are not only opportunities for professional development, adding wages or money for research, but research centres do not employ new medicines, because not only have funds, but not only do they have the organisation, but there is no new groups and that they lack new ideas and develop new ideas. 
We must do this together to do this together, to do so in conjunction with this. 
It is a asymmetric element that the Palestinians, the Palestinian, dramatic murdered, while they are used as human shields without comparing this with the Israelis who have been killed and the thousands who live under threat because the bloody could not compensate for more cord be overseen. 
8 of the European Union 10 children are using the Internet and I believe that we must make particular care to protect the most vulnerable children against abuse, deriving to sexual abuse and harassment. 
I also make it clear that these criteria were set out by the Member States and for them not demanded approval by the Commission and for them. 
The delay that continues to prevail on this issue and the continuing distribution of the disease, with high death and particularly devastating consequences for the least developed countries, as well as those in the most serious humanitarian situation, must mobilise the situation of concern and the commitment of the EU institutions and Member States to provide the available resources for comprehensive and effective response, capable of providing the necessary harmonisation of the proper treatment and harmonisation of the policies for treatment and harmonisation of the policies. 
( FR ) Madam President, Commissioner, the Commissioner, adopted these amendments to the draft budget for the financial year 2011, the Committee on Budgets wanted to act responsibly. 
Constitutional changes in a transparent and inclusive way is essential to Turkey 's progress towards Turkey 's progress. 
The hard work that we have already managed to reach a compromise that will benefit patients who will be protected against unfoundable time of delay and, at the same time, we have reached a balance that will ensure that Member States will be able to follow what is happening in the mistaken and financial terms. 
It is in danger of economic spending on local meat, and it is increasingly reduced than additional cost for imports of feed, even though in addition to the economic problem and in anticipating the objectives of climate targets in protein production, and contributes significantly to the reduction in greenhouse gas emissions. 
It would be that they were given a written authorisation for an inaction, but Chancellor was in the gallery, but it was a written authority. 
It is not summarily to turn its sovereign territory, as was the case of Georgia, in the case of Georgia. 
We do not have great progress in recognising Kosovo, as many people would like, as those in Kosovo would like. 
It is very regrettable if the creation of an Ecolabel has failed due to bureaucratic bailouts. 
It also called on the Heads of State or Government of the European Council in June to discuss this issue in June. 
I comment on some of these areas of these areas, and I comment on some of these areas. 
Given that animal welfare is one of the priorities of the Swedish Presidency and, given that countries like Ireland have already successfully implemented animal welfare schemes in terms of the transport of animals, including the WHO on animal welfare for the boxes, ensuring that the protection of animals are better prepared for exports to be better prepared, so as to keep journeys on the Swedish Presidency to take a life of animals in the lifelong term, in order to ensure that the animal welfare of animals between the one animals in the lifestyle of life ? 
The current situation when energy is used as a political instrument, the importance of this fact can not be underestimated. 
It is our interest to adopt the proposal to work in protecting our values and interests in a constructive dialogue, cooperation that we hope will lead to tangible results in future. 
I was not among those who supported it, which supported it, which supported it, but I supported it. 
It will be responsible for putting the strategy into the Council and the old start of its implementation, and for the launch of its implementation. 
We have done better work if we were to define clear principles and we have delegated responsibility for implementing and developing these principles themselves. 
So far, even now, the organisations of farmers recognise that no more than 9 % of the products will have to disappear, not just now but gradually, for several years, for several years, for a year now. 
I believe that the time has now come to start thinking on the question of how to remedy the pilot strategy in question again. 
We saw this threat in the debate today today, we saw this threat in the debate today today, today 's debate today, today 's debate. 
Other ideas relating to the roll-call vote on the legislative reports, not for any final vote, but to the final vote on legislative reports, which I think I mentioned earlier. 
The national parliaments should take the spouse and intervene with their governments so that the latter do not make sense what the European Parliament proposes for a Europe that protects its citizens ' rights. 
It is aware of how serious this problem is, and this problem is, the problem is, how serious the problem is. 
The resolution on the mass acts of cruel in Nigeria, which unfortunately are only one aspect of the rambasket of the human rights situation in the country. 
An agreement on counterfeiting ( ACTA ) contains the potential to have an extremely negative impact on civil freedoms and today 's vote is doing nothing to reduce these fears. 
The Christmas are trying to form a government without the involvement of Mr Selary and Congress delayed the vote so that no power is returned to power. 
It is being seen that the Commission is aware of the important role played by the economic industry, and the Commission is aware of the important role played by the business industry. 
A large number of political issues, legal issues and security issues which need further studies and consultations, and which - will also require - the commitment of the Ministers of Justice and Home Affairs of the Member States. 
Before we criticise ourselves, we should put our own home in order to put in place our own home. 
Those who is confusing the general public does not therefore mean that we should not therefore be concerned about climate change, but it means that more research is needed. 
A major element is the package for coordinating economic policies presented by Commissioner Rehn on 12 May, which was examined yesterday in the Ecofin Council in the Council. 
However, management and planning of the land is the responsibility of each Member State of each Member State, and it is the management and planning of the land that is responsible for each Member State to be responsible. 
The concern of animal welfare, but I would like to ask for a realistic regulation that also allows for animal trade, which is legal and proper controlled, and I would like to say that we do not need additional regulations. 
This is why the use of the instrument within the 2011 budget is linked to the need to finance the programmes ' and the CRD programmes - including within the framework of the EU 2020 strategy - as well as providing financial assistance to the Palestinian Pension, the peace and UN Agency for the support of Palestinian refugees in the Middle East. 
It is not a matter that this is a matter that is not being dealt with in the report, but I believe that we must follow this aspect very closely, as this is linked to the consequences of our fellow citizens. 
Commissioner, I would like to ask you to be particularly vigilant in this regard. 
It is clear that a clearer picture will only come up when it comes to what happens with Turkey 's accession to the EU and what statute Russia will have in relation to the Union, and what the status will have in relation to the Union. 
We must define the necessary action at European Union level to complement national actions with a positive social effect. 
The political support is vital, all the more so as there is a risk, and I strongly emphasise that Moldova is considered a local problem that is a step in turning into a problem for Romanians within the European Union. 
These countries are also considerable differences in the context of the general principles of the Financial Stability Council, which allowed too much freedom to be misleading in their implementation, at European level, at European level, to ensure that Member States implement the text of the directive in the consistency in the context of the directive in consistent terms. 
It is that we need to suspend this process temporary process, that we must temporarily put an end to this process. 
It will be possible to use 2014 and to provide precise, better than one memory, while the precise valence of GPS is a few metres. 
We must do this in a way that the Afghan Afghan people are included and which respects their dignity and, as the most important priority, of course, includes - whether it is like whether it is like some people 's hearing - the dignity of women. 
However, it is the activity of export credit agencies to be subject to strict supervision of strict difficulties in order to avoid future difficulties. 
A challenge of the time we live, and the unique need to use mechanisms in itself unique, to help unemployed and to promote their reintegration into the labour market, become fully clear when we are making this problem of the current lack of trust in the markets and the reduction of investment. 
The basis for pessimism, for the basis of pessimism, for pessimism. 
It is also stopping to act and the massacres are already losing their power already losing their power. 
I am in the idea of extending the copyright period, whether to 70 years or 95, and I am confused to it, not because it is doubtful and not in the figure of the digital era, but also because it is also quite clear, such action will be, above all, the benefit of industry, but not the old arrests that are fighting for the survival. 
We always have the banking structures in place, and the banking structures are the same as the same as the same. 
The resolution, which aims at simplifying public procurement rules, while contributing to increasing the level of legal certainty levels of legal certainty. 
Finally, I did not feel completely satisfied in the reading of the draft joint resolution that we will vote on Thursday, which I was going to vote on. 
Wherever any case, from the Bureau, I have told me that this amendment is valid only because of the part that is amended. 
All these areas must be provided with a strong and sustainable structure as quickly as possible to ensure that we can provide a common set of rules whether or whether it is a question of the accounts of the Member States, of their behaviour in economic governance, in economic governance or for the reform of our financial services. 
We fail to reach agreement - and now is the last point in which we can do so - we will lose around EUR million from the margins for 2010 and we will therefore lose the opportunity to mass unrest within the framework of the margins for 2011. 
The instrument supplements very well our policy to demand that other countries support human rights support for human rights, and we demand that other countries be very well asking for the other countries to support human rights. 
I propose, in fact, a agenda for transforming Europe is actually a agenda for transforming Europe. 
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, the right to asylum is one of the fundamental values of the European Union and no one is courageous to pronounce him in their speeches public. 
in writing. - In favour of this report on the evaluation of the assessment of the action plan for the protection and welfare of animal welfare for the 200period 200. 
It was a key requirement for our group 's group 's group 's group to be a fundamental requirement. 
Islamic immigrants, this will also have an impact over Europe and we must prepare for such a possible future. 
There is proposing the mobilisation of EUR 250, and I support the proposal for the mobilisation of EUR 250 and I support the proposal for the mobilisation of EUR 250, and I support the proposal for the mobilisation of EUR 250 000. 
peace, we would risk everything we have achieved and everything we want to achieve in the coming years. 
It is essential to restore this dialogue and to rebuild this dialogue, and it is essential to rebuild this dialogue and to rebuild this dialogue. 
Baroness Ashton will now continue to work on this framework, together with the European Parliament and propose a final decision at the latest by April next year at the latest next year to be put forward at the latest. 
in writing. - The group voted in favour because 16 of the amendments tabled in the compromise amendments proposed by the rapporteur, including the amendment insisting on the application to be linked to closer cooperation with the International Criminal Tribunal for the former Yugoslavia ( ICTY ). 
Even in terms of immigration, Member States must take seriously the Members of the European Parliament seriously, even in terms of immigration, Member States must take seriously. 
rapporteur for the Committee on International Trade ( INTA ) I hope that the increased sums of heading 4 ( EU as a global partner ) should be invested in deliberate and specified to stimulate greater trade flows, and, among other things, to remove barriers, we should achieve higher GDP and employment growth. 
The EU and will call on Belarus to take further unduly steps towards democratic standards without which our relations can not develop their full potential. 
I would like to draw your attention to the fact that, in the discussion on energy efficiency and, in particular, the security of supply and the associated diversification of energy sources, we are, to a certain extent, neglecting to a source of energy source of energy. 
That is that what the Irish are not only, and not only they are expecting from the European Union, I think it is completely logical. 
( FR ) Mr President, my question will be very short, because the debate is very thorough and I have the feeling that by leaving some extreme fingertics, we share the same concern. 
In relation to reduced production levels, mainly concern ordinary people who work for these companies, for these companies, for those companies. 
We have introduced legislation which, in many cases, is not scientifically justified and put European producers, European farmers, in an extremely adverse situation, in the extremely disadvantaged situation. 
The technical measures are defined by a regulation which was designed by a series of transitional measures and extended to 30 June 2011, because it was not reached with the Council on the Commission proposal of 2008 for a new regulation that was aimed at simplifying and clarifying the existing legislation to ensure more effective implementation of rules and to take into account local characteristics. 
The antibiotics are actually the biggest threat that we face, for the health of both people and animals, to antibiotics, in fact, the biggest threat to which we face, for the health of both people and animals. 
We noted the 10anniversary of International Women 's Day of International Women 's Day of International Women 's Day yesterday. 
In the opinion of fishermen, this significant report should have a significant impact on the structure of the future common fisheries policy in the area of the market organisation. 
in writing. - ( LT ) I voted in favour of the resolution on formal support for export credits of exports of credit. 
The conditions for SMEs to receive appropriate support under the Union 's regional policy of the Union, given their importance to improve social relations in urban areas or poor populations. 
( SV ) Mr President, the number of products covered by this legislation could also be used for civil and military purposes is much greater than we thought at the beginning. 
This issue, let me say that it is because it is about the systems of gold extraction systems, and certainly not a cartop, company could easily set up adequate economic and financial resources for technologies that are compatible with the environment and safe health. 
In the meantime, we are also rapid and adopt the interim Economic Partnership Agreement with Papua Negotiations and Fijing, which will be an example of what the Commission will be involved in all the Pacific States, but, in the meantime, we also quickly embark on the interim agreement on the Economic Partnership with Papua New Guinea and Fijing, which can serve as an example of what we can achieve in the future. 
This is what the Commission has certain obligations that are caused by the Euratom Treaty. 
It is, then, the responsibility of the African Union, the Arab League or the terrible FYRONUC, show that the Islamic Conference of Presidents is under way. 
innovation in the Treaty of Lisbon and not least, the existence of the permanent Presidency of the European Union, because this provides continuity and consistency in the long term. 
documents : see Minutes 
Based on the slavery of the Opporteure of the Ophenomena of a prison is a growing hospital for people disrupted by tuberculosis. 
In addition to all of the said here, I would like to highlight the accession of the accession I would like to highlight two points that I consider : the establishment of control outside the Union and the extremist of the Convention ; in other words, its implementation in all the acts of the Union, including outside the EU territory. 
A process, as mentioned in the proposal, is bureaucratic and we as Parliament have the right to seek ways of reducing this bureaucracy and introducing a optimistic process. 
It is not included in foreign policy and defence policy nor its aim is to release the Commission from its task to properly carry out, without monitoring and monitor the proper implementation of all the texts. 
More than these minority groups are numerous groups of minority groups, and these minority groups are numerous. 
The condition for the next period of activity is the existence of sufficient number of their significant requests for recovering expenditure, submitted by beneficiaries. 
They want to receive healthcare close to home and to their own language and their own language and their own language. 
The absurd of a citizen 's right to citizenship, limited access to education, saved for entry into marriage, limiting freedom of movement and destruction of sheeeep, church and other frontlings. 
For years, they have often resorted to military forces for military forces, often resorted to military forces. 
Ladies and gentlemen, two days ago, four schools in city Bagugar, have condemned awareness of racist hundred hundred days ago. 
All today, 154 countries have abolished the death penalty in law or in practice, in practice, already 154 states have abolished, today. 
A idea, even the whole argument in favour of the existence of the Treaty of Lisbon - all that was designed to demonstrate to the citizens why they should provide more powers to the EU - is precisely what we are paying to today, when we received what we wanted. 
It is a success that the European Parliament - against the will of the Council, extended the regulation for all the domestic and cross-border services of distance from 250 km or more, while the Council proposed a minimum distance of 500 km. 
EU political framework for combating violence against women ( debate ) 
Let us assure you that we have taken this consultation very seriously, we take this consultation very seriously. 
These agreements was not to prevent trade interruption, but they do not necessarily lead to comprehensive EPAs. 
We voted in plenary on the report on agriculture and international trade in the report on agriculture and international trade in the Committee on Agriculture and the international trade in the plenary session of plenary. 
It said that this enhanced cooperation, which is currently included 25 of the 27 Member States, could be used to fragmentary the single market fragmentation. 
In view of your critical remarks to the Commission on the need to improve its activities in terms of the implementation of the budget, in terms of the implementation of the budget. 
They also said that, following the signing of this agreement, solidarity between the Pacific States has shown in the Pacific, a sharp manifestation that creates the sense of division, and this leads to a breakthrough of certain regional groups due to the pressures in connection with the signing of temporary agreements. 
As regards the mechanism for Greece, which the Council has decided, and for which I have serious doubts and which I have serious doubts. 
The report is also being debated, what role it has and there should be Eurojust when there arising such conflicts of jurisdiction for jurisdiction. 
We are to do so, but it seems that we do not do so in this particular case in this particular case, but it seems that we have not done it. 
The Presidency has stated that the strategy for the Baltic States in the Baltic Sea region is one of the priority issues. 
It is not resolved by stress tests for a incident in a century for a century. 
The control and control are certainly crucial to ensure that the policy under the programme is transparent, but provided that the administrative burden for small and medium-sized enterprises - the driving force of the EU economy - is reduced to a minimum. 
I would like to stress that, until now, the rapporteur Zelaya Green Green Green Paper has fulfilled his duties in his excellent obligations. 
The time has come for this process to end this process at last, finally conclude to conclude this process. 
The report on Alzheimer 2009 on Alzheimer 's disease is concerned : on the basis of the number of people in the world suffering from whatever nature of the disease is, of million. 
It means eliminating the military situation and including all democratic forces in the steps taken now, now, in the steps taken. 
It is a small proportion of the street, which is worth EUR million, of the additional EUR million, and it is a small proportion of the stream funds, which are worth EUR million. 
We all agree with the principle we are debating this morning, but it should not only be applied in the European Union, but also throughout the world. 
The European Council, therefore, of 19 and 20 March welcomes the communication by President Barroso that the Commission intends to propose an increase in the ceiling of a financial balance to EUR 50 billion in financial balance to EUR 50 billion. 
At a political, social and technical level, it is essential to achieve the objectives of the single European sky objectives. 
The text of the AFC Directive does not directly establish the obligation to create independent authorities ' independent authorities. 
On the Internet, infrastructure restructuring the dairy sector, renewable energy sources, the protection of biodiversity and water resources are key to resolving a large percentage of problems in these regions and create alternatives to the people living there. 
It is regrettable that the conference in Brussels coincides with the session of the session in Brussels coincide with the session of the session is regrettable. 
It explains its application and adapts it to the real needs of the common fisheries policy in the context of the new Treaty of Lisbon, which is why I appreciate it positively. 
2004, I was involved in a delegation that visited the Committee on the Lifelong Legal Affairs of Switzerland 's Parliament 's Committee on Civil Lifelong Legal Affairs. 
Above all, as we have told us, the SADC, these improvements have been achieved to a very limited extent to a very limited extent. 
A neighbour European country that wants to join the EU in future, Ukraine must receive a clear political signal to encourage the authorities to implement a package of reform measures approved by the EU. 
It is important to create interesting and nursery remuneration programmes that offer good professional opportunities. 
Also, the fact that the report also provides for - in the case that there is a change in pension security - sufficient time for people adapting to their financial future is being considered. 
Lastly, associations and allies are being advocated to protect the interests of illegally residing in a country of workers so that they can sign signals for unconventional employers without fear of a final persecution. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
Cuban is being presented very well during hearing in the European Parliament and its candidate, not caused any doubts. 
We hamper stopping for further deepening the problem immediately, immediately deepening the problem of the problem, immediately and immediately exacerbating the problem. 
It is important to do everything possible to deal with this problem, because it causes major difficulties to the people who are going into the industry of this type of type of type of type of type of disease. 
There are many aspects of this issue and many of them are included in the report and many of them are included in the report. 
It is then that the Council has given even more powers to the European Parliament, including powers over the UK economy, which is the most important problem of the British people today. 
A partnership that allows EU vessels to flee fishing in the waters of the MDGs in exchange for financial support will undoubtedly contribute to strengthening the economy of the region. 
The concern that it is difficult to deal with this cruel trade, and also about the terrible consequences for the people who are deprived of their authorities, whether it would be forced or not : a decline in life as a cruel in the quality of life, chronic diseases and, in many cases, death. 
in writing. - ( PT ) I voted against this motion for a resolution on the motion for a resolution. 
A year later, the consequences of the disaster in Haiti are severe and human, economic and social terms in the country, church ches of chaos later later later, and later, the consequences of the disaster in Haiti are severe and socially affected by the human, economic and social terms in the country. 
By checking the shift in the tyres, we can reduce the cost of fuel, and hence also of damaging emissions, and by introducing in 2011, the modern e-year system for control of management at one year, a reduction will be achieved at the number of accidents on European roads. 
Supporting in any way possible in its development towards democracy and human rights within the EU Eastern Partnership. 
In other words, it marks the emergence of real legislative power for European citizens, as the Commission will be obliged to respond to this citizens ' initiative by delaying a study or proposing a directive on the table. 
To be honest, the concessions that Europe has made in the agricultural sector have made are justified, are raising legitimate concerns and raising specific issues : what is the justification of quotas granted by Europe in the sectors of the crisis and the sugar that exceeds the productive opportunities of these countries ? 
However, I have the impression that an attempt is made to take advantage of this established movement to impose discrimination against the family based on a cornerstone between the dead and woman and against the freedom of religion, particularly with regard to religious schools. 
in writing. - ( FR ) According to EPAs, the sugar and banana coming ACP countries will not be allowed to the markets in the outermost French regions for ten years, on a renewal basis, and thus will protect the production of these two pillars in the countries concerned. 
The text text text text text text : : : : : : : : : : text text, ! : : text bfive five five five five five b. 
It is not fair, it is not fair, just just just fair, but not fair. 
However, there can be no direct monitoring of their amount of quality and quality monitoring only if there is a reliable database for data, however, without direct supervision of their amount of quality and quality, if there is a reliable database for data. 
The fact that the fight against illegal employment can not be considered frank, in fact, to be seen in a fantastic way. 
The criticism that I spoke in a minute 's one-minute minute I was speaking about the criticism that I had. 
It is very important to deepen cooperation between Member States and with third countries, to ensure dialogue with the NGOs and to call on the Commission to establish a European coordinator on these issues. 
There is also Japan will not enter into a deal because it is defending their own producers and the high standard that they value. 
It is called on to the Council and perhaps to all of us to discuss very closely how sensible it is to put forward ambitious environmental targets and to debate them and to welcome them here, but when the time has come to their implementation and to transform them into particular legislation, then it is now a very good one in Europe. 
We will achieve this by extending the mandate or the creation of a mechanism to inherite the work of Tribunal is not a major issue for us ; and as far as we see, we might perhaps perhaps and find some way to put the judges, lawyers and secretarial regime in the crisis of exile. 
We have already mentioned, we must be more flexible to be able to respond more effectively to it. 
Is this going through a preaching effect of the free trade agreement on the free trade agreement ? 
The freedom of religion is under pressure pressure and by the widespread rejection of religion, where attempts are being made to eliminate the spiritual world of the vigilance of the public life of public life. 
It is a question of how key this is about how crucial it is about how important it is. 
Parliament Parliament asParliament adopted the request ) Parliament Parliament Parliament Parliament adopted the request ) Parliament Parliament Parliament Parliament adopted the request ) Parliament Parliament accepdethe request ) 
The situation of the most in the Member States should be taken into account the Member States themselves or communities themselves, or the general ones themselves, should be taken into account. 
He has had to leave, because the heads of the group has accused of vicism, which ( as you know ) is one of the worst crimes in Italy when it is dominated by domination, by dominant culture in Italy, belonging to his television, the Poles only the first people in the Democratic Party, among all the mirands - from all the trees, doctors, sh, journalists and share some, from journalists and journalists, from the country and the country. 
They have become 12 months, but I am nevertheless pleased that there is a compromise, because I am in principle positive, in principle, a positive person. 
That documents are quite openly calling for the rethinking of the first pillar, and also for automatically increasing the retirement law by the age of the age of the age of the age of life expectancy. 
This is despaiming the further despair of the Europe 2020 strategy, which is where Europe 2020 strategy is placed. 
What we are seeing so often in life is unfortunately also happening in this case with industrial installations. 
Gender genocide in Tibet in Tibet is operating in Tibet, in Tibet. 
It is that political justifiable solutions that have been made in terms of Kozloduy Kozloduy can not be long decided in the forthcoming development of the forthcoming energy mix of the European Union 's energy mix. 
It should ensure equal social protection and women 's rights when they are employed in family business and, among other things, the risks of the market, production and the financial crisis must provide for optimum regime for their own social and health care. 
( FR ) Mr President, President-in-Office of the Council, ladies and gentlemen, first of all, I would like to thank the Swedish Presidency and congratulate them on the truly remarkable work that has been done. 
As poverty and social exclusion have a multidimensional nature, we must systematically include the prevention in other policies, so that all EU citizens can have a decent life. 
You know, there is a consultation document prepared in a spirit of deliberate inspiration. 
I have been in the region of Kivu in the Eastern Democratic Republic of Congo, where this terrible practice is used by wars and members of armed groups. 
The EU institutions are trying to try to experience the experience of macro-financial assistance to Ukraine and to avoid further delays. 
We believe that we will keep this policy in question and we will always be very clear, when we know and have undeniable evidence of the existence of such cases. 
However, the proposals submitted by the European Commission as a result of the Council guidelines are very concerned both in terms of excessive deficit and in terms of the communication on the increase in retirement age. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, since some positive events are being seen in Russia, we would like to amend the torture that is starting with : sadly, the authorities have denied the authorisation of all the demonstrations on the part of the strategy '. 
People are afraid to escape regardless of four thousand hours, the cease-fire announced by the government. 
An interim agreement was concluded with Papua New Guinea-Papua and the Republic of the island of the Fiji Fijing, who hope to achieve their goal, namely to protect the sugar industry and the production of tuna fish tuna. 
The negotiations also participate a major delegation from the European Parliament whose Members are today among us today. 
They, for example, are the loss of opportunities for economic growth, the weakening of the tax base and the relevant consequences for public investment, increased social support costs, or even the danger of trade unemployment and social exclusion. 
countries which will not require the number of new card line card number to demand that the number of new card card card is not required. 
It is to try to create a sense of security between the public and consumers that food they buy in the supermarkets or tactics is safe to secure a sense of security between the public and consumers. 
In this light of the light of the farm slowdown, we will not control the development in these countries in these countries, we will not control the development in these countries. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
More importantly, it is the war sentences mentioned in Strasbourg sentences not only face justice, but also propose to increase. 
The crisis would be bold if four billion could have been resolved compared to the revenue of the Member States of the European Union would have been bold if four billion were to be resolved by the European Union Member States. 
It will remain after the expiry of these five years of the withdrawal of these five years ? 
Amendments the need to strengthen the management of resources and the traceability of fishery products, as well as responsible consumption, and to point out that the source of the supply of fish is limited to the quantity of natural resource, which means that there is a limit for how much fish can be fished, consumed and consumed. 
However, congratulations, I did not hear a congratulations to the Cativial Church, and, in particular, to Parliament for its role, which has proved fundamental to be in the missile defence of all in Cuba, who are fighting for freedom and dignity. 
The European Union is the only interest side of the Arctic, which has directly recognised that, as the unity of industrialised countries, it is responsible, together with other industrialised areas, for the changes that are taking place in the Arctic. 
It is more important, globally, with even greater power in the world, and it is more globally more globally. 
The mobilisation of the European Union Solidarity Fund proposes the mobilisation of the European Union Solidarity Fund, in favour of Poland, Slovakia, Hungary, the Czech Republic, Croatia and Romania, based on point 26 of the Interinstitutional Agreement of 17 May 2006 on budgetary discipline and good financial management ( IIAs ). 
In my opinion, the Commission 's draft must be better prepared and therefore of Parliament needs more time to take its decision to make its decision. 
The UN Charter of Personment and the founded charter of peace and solidarity, and solidarity, is respected, and the foundation of the UN Charter of the United Nations for the world of Peace of peace and solidarity. 
In the light of the participants in the peaceful demonstration and arrest of the leaders of the opposition and candidates in the elections by the opposition is clearly a violation of human rights and shows that measures are abandoned, the ability to improve relations with democratic countries in Europe. 
I believe that Parliament should be able to monitor closely the way in which the agreement is developed and respected and the Commission must ensure it is made. 
This must use the discharge of this as a priority of boosting these changes to these changes, we must use the discharge to boost discharge. 
It has highlighted that the protection of biodiversity is essential for the quality of ecosystems, has a direct impact on important functions such as food production or the prevention of water and prevention of the cleansing and prevents the cleansing and flooding. 
The recommendations and recommendations made by the report on the subject of the revised policies in this area have been welcome, as they concern the scope and the purpose of State aid. 
However, one must be completely luncher to accept the derivatives on the basis of human rights, does you not think, not think, about thinking ? 
It is also Tunisia to accept the opposite of those who have reached the territory of the EU Member States, and do not need international protection. 
It is also the case in which this flexibility will enable Member States to use when the Commission does not exercise its competence, an institutional framework to help citizens to access justice in third countries, particularly in the area of family law matters. 
They have the right to fair prices and they need a suitable price support system to ensure a reasonable minimum price of line and reasonable income for their survival. 
This regulation expires to 31 December 2011, on 31 December 2011, the current regulation expires to 31 December 2011. 
There is no one who will represent our interests in this area that will represent our interests in this area, and there is no one who will represent our interests in this area. 
It is being said that this report will be available before the second reading of the text was adopted before the second reading of the text. 
Nodidididididididididididididididididididi. 
SMEs are therefore most replaced by these complex tax systems of tax systems, and therefore, SMEs are the most replaceable SMEs. 
It is that we support it that we support it, we support it, we support it, in favour of it. 
Members will notice that the institutions of the EU and, in particular, the Commission, show significant political commitment to fundamental rights and freedom of information, the freedom of expression and freedom of the media freedom. 
The group believes that this package should contain three key elements of the element of the element of the element of the two main elements. 
Supporting the plan for the Middle East, which was approved by the EU and the aim is to the imperialists to subordinate the whole region. 
It is good that we can make a continuous point that we can make in order to ensure food security in Europe in future, in future, in future, in future. 
Climate climate change caused by human activity is a fact, a fact, a fact that is caused by human activity, is a fact. 
We are of the same that some Members are seeking to disguise criticism against the history of the history of human rights in Russia. 
It is about human rights, I think it seems to me that, for example, as far as the press is concerned, India has better legislation than some Member States of the European Union. 
We are about labelling to labelling, we come to labelling. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, first of all, I would like to congratulate my fellow Member on the extraordinary work of this report, which is so technical, but includes real consequences for the security of Europe 's citizens. 
It is an example of changing in President Obama 's approach to close the design in Guantánamo Bay prison, which is an example of change in the approach of President Obama 's approach to closing the basis in Guantánamo Bay. 
on behalf of the GUEGroup. - ( DE ) Mr Barroso. - ( DE ) Mr Barroso, what do you think about the idea of creating a European institution to promote the production of renewable energy, to ensure energy in terms of environmental and for five energy savings within the EU Treaty on the EU Treaty on the EU ? 
The second impact can also be emerging in other sectors, such as the farming sector, for example, in the sector, in the sector. 
The dimension should also be present and contribute to showing the benefits of cohesion policy of the European Union for the European Union. 
The British Government, in the Northern Ireland peace process in the Northern Ireland peace process, in the Northern Ireland peace process. 
Finally, we must have a European bonds market market market in bonds, we must have a European bonds market. 
It is a good concern in the sense that the European Parliament has repeatedly examined cases of electoral respect for human rights in Lithuania by the government of this country. 
Mr President, I fear that these concerns have been exacerbated in order to political factions here in Europe and elsewhere in Europe and I would like to make it clear to our future energy mix, where I have no fear and panels and I am under the subject of nuclear energy based on scientific evidence. 
I am convinced that the permissible levels of radioactive contamination must be reviewed regularly in order to take into account the most recent international scientific achievements and scientifically justified recommendations and avoid existing divergences in the legislative practice. 
It is important that innovation comes out of the laboratories and research centres and should be used so that they respond to the needs of European citizens. 
The proposal sets out attacks on the burden of proven to be proven, which, frankly, is unacceptable, is unacceptable. 
At the end of the Iranian fundamentalist regime has shown its influence in the region, particularly as controls on the domestic affairs of Iraq, then this region will be further further than peace in the future and the world will face greater threat. 
There is now increasing 11 % - % of alone year ago - in fact, there has been more than two times ago - and there has been a truly rise in more than two times ago - and there has been a truly rise in more than two times ago. 
We analyse the economic situation of Maastricht, without including Basel Basel Basin, it is clear that the gross domestic domestic product of the region is far less than 75 %, and more, even more so, is even lower than that the poorest regions of the European Union, which shows that further necessary assistance is vital. 
We are of maximum limits, we are of maximum limits. 
A new Member State with a totalitarian experience of our Community membership is of great importance to us, and we believe that we believe that we have a moral duty to strengthen cooperation with those who have left outside it outside it. 
in writing. - in favour of the proposal for a European Parliament recommendation to the Council on the strategic partnership between the European Union and Brazil, because I believe that this is beneficial both parties and can contribute to the development of links between these two entities, with the aim of cooperating the joint good of the two regions, and throughout the world. 
No one is doubt that the Lukashenko regime is a regime, but it is also a totalitarian regime, just as the Castro regime in Cuba. 
We can help the correlators in this situation in this situation, in the case of the Korean, in this situation ? 
I also add that this is not a mixed milestone, but I would like to add that this is not a milestone in a deliberate day. 
We must remember this, we must remember this, and we must remember this. 
I support every initiative to give up the Strasbourg Seat in Strasbourg session to give up any initiative in favour of abandoning from the Strasbourg Session. 
Barroso, I know that you do not believe that you do not believe that even millions of unemployed and additional social exclusion are acceptable prices to pay for the rapid fiscal consolidation, but it seems to be the road to which you do. 
Every year, approximately 14 million Europeans have developed a kind of dementia, with Alzheimer 's disease responsible for half of cases. 
However, the Commission is the largest donor of official development aid by providing EUR billion a year, providing EUR billion per year, but it is not enough, however. 
Achievable on 15 December 2009, the EU group of Latin America and the United States on the duties on banana imports seems to have advantages, but it does not fully compatible with the legitimate interests of all parties. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I have a oral proposal for two amendments to be tabled for two amendments, I have a strong proposal for two amendments to be tabled. 
However, I believe that, although the 2011 budget is not bad, it could have been better, it could have been better. 
However, there is something common, namely to provide an economic format for balancing the negative aspects of the island regions, namely to provide economic format for the balance of negative aspects. 
We, in turn, are taking the obligation to address the proposal on the order of order to rush down to rapid production, for our part, to address the proposal for rapid production. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, Commissioner, the motions for resolutions that have been presented in Parliament, to clearly understand that Parliament - as has already been pointed out - has not been sufficiently informed about the specific situation of the negotiations. 
I therefore welcome the fact that he has recognised in his speech that in the North Sea, the United Kingdom and Norway are already working with one of the highest standards in the world. 
He was here for the house, I met it once again on the evening in Brussels and I was very impressed by him and I was very impressed by him and I was very impressed by him. 
The agreed recommendations in the single legislative act will simplify the administration and increase the effectiveness that is something that should be welcomed. 
However, we hope that the common sense can help the various political elements to look closely at what is right and fair when it comes to moving forward on the path to European unity. 
Of 70 000 people died in this conflict, in this conflict, the conflict died in this conflict, in this conflict, 70 000 people died in this conflict. 
We must most fully use the opportunities that the Treaty of Lisbon gives to the Treaty of Lisbon in order to pave the way to the next COP to the next COP. 
This Europe, which is why this Europe - a Europe that rejects the emigration of eurobonds, a Europe that refuses to grant tax transactions - is a Europe that will itself destroy its own European project. 
Parliament report is the first report of Parliament to examine the implementation of this new instrument and has a double objective : 
This report contains many of the solutions that have been made, many of the decisions, and many of the decisions contain in many of the decisions. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, I would like to congratulate the rapporteur and the political groups on the excellent work of this report, which I fully support. 
It will be automatic culture for culture for culture for culture for culture. 
They are providing for a reply before the consequences of implementing the decision making are made to be made to the effect of implementing the decision making, before the implementation of the decision is made. 
The second Commission is that Barroso can consider the technical competence with what is going on with what is more '. 
A day marks the start, but not the end of our cooperation, but not the end of our cooperation, our cooperation. 
The position was supported in the opinion of the Committee on Legal Affairs in the opinion of the Committee on Legal Affairs. 
on behalf of the PPE-DE Group. - ( EL ) Mr President, Commissioner, I will start by thanking the thanks provided by comprehensive information and I assure you that I welcome the measures you have taken by you. 
The Commission should focus on three points : the view of the money not to be overwhelming in administrative terms, the Commission should take effective measures to provide the funds made to actually implement its aim and the use of practices containing in the segregation, to be limited. 
A problem with the order of voting that was fortunately resolved, which was under question the way in which a major political problem can be resolved here : through the three and small political three three three three and subsequently accused to the administration that nothing can do in this matter. 
In order to deal with the situation, there must be some adaptation, a compromise that has been known as a compromise, a compromise that has been made known. 
We also criticise and accuse PMOI, one of the most proof opposition movements of the people of Iran, without real evidence, in an attempt to try to be a deliberate authoritarian regime of the Islamic Republic of Iran. 
The UK Independence Party MEPs voted in favour of these amendments, mainly because we oppose the VCVO increase in the budget and because the limitation in the spending of these budget lines, as proposed by the Group of the European Conservatives and Reformists could lead to a reduction in payments outside the budget. 
in writing. - ( NL ) It is a good thing that the Hungarian Prime Minister clearly underlined his willingness to correct the new media law if the EU asked for this. 
on behalf of the ECR Group. - Madam President, after the ambassadors and the fanatics of the Italian colleagues from the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ), perhaps we can now be able to redouble the land again. 
The principle of subsidiarity is the best thing to leave European nations to the taxpayer in question. 
A little controversial, claim is very legitimate when we think of the importance of women in rural areas or in farms, is very legitimate. 
Unfortunately, in the light of the current proposals for the European Union 2020 strategy, I have the feeling that this can remain empty words if we can not take into account the views of those who will have to do this strategy, in other words, young people. 
We can start with the agenda now and then once again come back to all your questions on the parton 5 and 6 May. 
The undeniable, widecorruption corruption and the legality of weapons and drugs are being shut down, and the settlements in the region are being severely closed. 
Arrest Warrant means that British citizens accused of a crime from another Member State of the European Union can now be protected by British courts or even by the Minister for Home Affairs, whether and if there is a serious injustice injustice, obviously. 
This resolution rightly underlines that cooperation with the International Criminal Tribunal for the Former Yugoslavia, including the transfer of the last two disclosure persons of Hague is a fundamental condition for Serbia 's progress towards EU membership '. 
attacks attacked the UN facilities of the UN facilities attacks on attacks. 
Transport systems are modern applications aimed at providing innovative services in terms of types of transport and traffic management that enable different benefits to be better informed and contribute to safer, more coordinated and more intelligent use of transport networks. 
For an economic supranational country launched in recent days will not only make Greece but also all 27 Member States of the European Union in the protectorate of the EU. 
It is a European country that has probably allowed the largest abuse of international adoption in 1990s, immediately after the fall of Communism. 
I will find a solution to this issue in future for the future in future, in future, for the future. 
The European Union sector plays an important role in the Europe 2020 strategy, with regard to the various social and economic challenges, in terms of the various social and social challenges. 
Are we going back to good Europeans if we did not do so if we did not do so ? 
I believe, in other words, that this is based on it, not least on the basis of it is based, but not the end of the day. 
It is more than any other country, and it is more than any other country than anywhere else is in any other country. 
I can only interpret in the sense that our rights are extended to us that our rights are expanded. 
You also asked you to engage in the necessary improvements in the sales of products ' sales, too, to engage in the necessary improvements in the sales of products. 
In particular, small and medium-sized enterprises, are in particular, requesting legal certainty and rapid procedures and fast procedures. 
It was : how you can ask us something like this, all is in the north is in the north. 
It is the question of this issue, which is the matter, is the matter. 
It is up to a strong financial support for the European Agricultural Fund for Rural Development to reduce the differences between rural and urban areas. 
On the grounds - you mentioned some of them - you said - some of them - speak in itself. 
One of the names of one of employment or sold, we can not prevent extremists from being driven or from being very much bound by the same. 
There are still many other ways of creating employment as strategic investment or training in the sectors of the future sectors. 
We must work at the same time two complementarity levels at the same time, at two compleme, at two complementarity levels. 
It can not allow someone who has been killed and has used all possible ways to avoid justice and the victims ' victims ' victims, to take up the victims ' victims ' victims ' persecution and create dangerous precedents in the detriment of the law and society. 
This is important if we want to break the complex links between the political and economic power between the political and economic power between the political and economic power between Belarus and the economic power in Belarus. 
I will propose recommendations to the Council on the end of a excessive deficit situation, and will offer recommendations to the Council recommendations on the end of a excessive deficit situation. 
I would also repeat this point, too, the importance of the European Union 's cohesion policy, the funds to which will be extremely useful to this end. 
I believe that, in the interests of our citizens, the Council must bear in mind that Russia is and will continue to be necessary, useful and equal partners in our geopolitical area. 
Clear action by the Spanish Government in response to this major human Government to all Spanish people for all Spanish people, in response to this great human Government. 
We are a broad programme for energy savings and also an ambitious and long-term approach to the area of renewable energy. 
Finally, it is useful because the sustainable fisheries in the region includes a mechanism for objective analysis of fishing resources and creating a mechanism for scientific cooperation to be developed in the region, because it includes a mechanism for scientific cooperation to be carried out. 
It is very often happening to have an opportunity to discuss with you personally such important issues on the European Union 's foreign policy, so thank you very much for coming to a very often, so you have come to a discussion with you personally, so that you have come to a great deal of thanks that you have come to come to a very often. 
Ch142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 142 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article 142 Article 142 Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 Article 142 Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article Article 142 142 142 142 Article 142 Article 142 142 142 
Europe can, in turn, be able to launch a similar programme for Haiti for Haiti. 
This is the creation of a proper unity in the European External Action Service can resolve a large majority of the uniforms of uniformity in the current Black Sea Synergy '. 
The action plan to implement the Stockholm Programme, the Commission made a commitment in 2011-2011-2011-2011-2012 to present a strategy for combating violence against women, domestic violence and genital mutilation. 
A multistate can be supported united - as the Southern Federation, and also the Olympics, Hague and the Soviet Union - but, as soon as the people are given the right to a voice, they choose the democratic self-determination. 
Security of food supplies at affordable prices, the EU must be able to acquire with a strong common agricultural policy ( CAP ), which compensates speculation on food goods and helps young people to enter the agricultural sector. 
Should new monopolies on the Internet, but monopoly monopoly, on the Internet, be new monopolies in the Internet ? 
The vote shows that this concept goes beyond all the political differences of political differences beyond all the political differences. 
There is something failing, my 15experience, undermines me that in the back of the failure, governments, rather than parliaments, and not parliaments. 
We should allow the death of the Santa to remain in history as unambiguous, it must mark the end of the current human rights situation in Cuba. 
The data protection legislation must be respected, but there must be a border : we can not hide behind data protection in the event of terrorism. 
In view of all these objectives, we must support the calls for these reports : for shared scientific and scientific development, for example, for the development of common standards and common procurement systems, for example - all of this in order to interoperate interoperability. 
The legislative proposals that have yet been tabled, which have not yet been examined on 1 December 2009 - the date of entering into force of the Treaty of Lisbon - the President of the Commission has asked the parliamentary committees, to which the provisions of the Treaty are already tabled in the current legislative framework, as in the protocol on the protocol to the protocol to the legislative sessions and procedural amendments that have already been adopted, the Commission, along with all other amendments to make under the other amendments to the Treaty of Lisbon, decided, to de on whether or first decided on the procedure as the procedure for the legislative procedure have already been adopted in place. 
However, one of the most dangerous sectors remain one of the most dangerous sectors for work, one of the most dangerous sectors of work. 
The protection against discrimination against these grounds, our aspirations to a social Europe will be unambiguous, particularly in the current economic situation, in particular, in the current economic situation. 
I also confirm, here in Parliament, that we will provide Parliament with maximum information, that we will provide the maximum information to us. 
We must not allow Serbia 's treatment as a European country of Europe, and bombing it at all occasion. 
It is adopted in its present form, the text will give patients suffering from rare diseases, the opportunity to travel abroad and receive all treatment that their country of origin must finance. 
You should also deal with another institutional issue, namely how the next Commission will be appointed. 
We condemn the cruel repression against the opposition and false the results of the presidential elections. 
in writing. - ( RO ) I believe that producers must also actively participate at EU level in the process of using waste electrical and electronic equipment ( EC ). 
You have stopped the issue of pensioners ' pensioners ' retirement, that you have stopped the issue of the pension issue. 
I am convinced that the Commissioner has highlighted the fact that the European Union budget is not the same as the national budgets as national budgets. 
Clear definition of the composition of combined feed in the Community register of feed addiction will facilitate farmers in making reasonable solutions concerning the choice of the correct form of feed. 
I would like to stress this at a time when I would like to stress this as far as reforms are concerned with reforms are concerned, with reforms being made. 
To introduce a blackmail, it is a cross to brain, in other words, the national budget used to finance the scheme to stabilise the car industry. 
In the Horn of Africa, the Horn of Africa is horrific in the Horn of Africa is horrific. 
You can be able to provide us at the close time to this information to us in the near time to provide us with this information. 
Among the next sitting : see Minutes 
It is a way we must act, but we must be supported by adequate resources, so we must work to build our capacity and capabilities, both in the civilian and in the military field and we will at least try to play our part in our role as far as we can. 
However, we do not sit down, however, but we do not despair ourselves, of course. 
You were on 23 October 2006 when four people were called upon to be shifted in the eyes of tyre business ? 
A successful system has proved to be a successful system of success. 
It is true that the number of asylum seekers is in line with the total asylum of the number of asylum seekers ; they were about a tenth of the total number of total numbers. 
We must develop a new concept of European solidarity for European solidarity, we must develop a new concept of European solidarity for European solidarity, and we must develop a new concept of European solidarity. 
The European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ) and European Democrats are opposed to discrimination and will always work to overcome it, but it must be allowed to dispute in Parliament on how to achieve it. 
The communication on the media mode of December 2007, the Commission called on the Member States to engage in more effectively the spread of media modelisation and research in this area. 
It was carefully prepared by the External Action Service with the Commission and both Presidents, on the basis of the discussions in the European Council and the Council on Russia as a strategic partner at the end of 2010 and in January 2011, the outcome of the previous EU-Russia Summit and the visit of the Russian Government in the Commission in February. 
I am only in favour of this report because we will not make sense to prevent Denmark from concluding the agreements that wish to conclude, but the opportunities to act in another way, in the same way as the current circumstances are a little bit of time. 
We expect to expect a standard that would include minimum size of chain for warning texts, warning texts ? 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
From the perspective of climate change, the fight against deforestation is an important priority of the fight against deforestation is an important priority. 
600 police experts for civil crisis management at the level of UN training standards, so improvements in health, flexibility and interoperability of police elements in the EU. 
We believe that many of the views we have heard on this issue, including in this Chamber, are wrong. 
We therefore supported the original draft draft resolution tabled on the table for a joint resolution tabled on the table for discussion. 
It is that this is a compromise that is linked to victims both Parliament and the Council, it is prevented the introduction of the budget system ', which would have serious consequences for the financing of the European Union programmes. 
A major issue is being raised - whether the proposal submitted to the development of a number of EU countries or is also a serious step towards building a separate military bloc as NATO competition as NATO competition competition ? 
Universities are faced with a drop of 6 %, and Britain does not make an exception, because in England the Committee on the Development, it recognises that the possible reduction in higher education could have reached up to EUR 500 million. 
Are the aim of the European Union and the Treaty of Lisbon not to protect the small countries of Lisbon to protect the small countries of the European Union and the Lisbon Treaty ? 
I therefore voted in favour of the report on the application of patients ' rights in cross-border healthcare, for example, in favour of the report on the exercise of the rights of patients in cross-border healthcare. 
This is what citizens must be of at least one quarter of the Member States - the number of citizens from each Member State must be at least equal to the number of Members of this Member State, which is murdered by the codification and the citizens must be an age that gives them the right to vote in parliamentary elections. 
The falsified medicines have no treatment in intellectual property falsified in falsified medicines, there is no treatment of intellectual property to intellectual property, and falsified medicines. 
Other countries, we are deging other countries of the resolution of the conflicts of the African Union conflict resolution of the African Union, we are designing to the conflict of the African Union. 
It is now crucial to support our farmers and to promote European products that meet high standards and health and safe standards and safe. 
At EU level, it should not be at the expense of the quality of healthcare or of the principle ethical choice made by Member States. 
The item is time for Question Time ( B) It is a time for issues ( BBBRI ). 
I also hoped that everything was a mere bad court, but today you are here, Mr Barroso, Mr Barroso. 
The night of 24 March 19, it began a wave of deportation by the Soviet authorities, which is the result of tens of thousands of Enan, Latvian and Lithuanians, are violent in their homeland countries. 
Our view is not just the subject of services provided by health workers or the subject of financial interests by the pharmaceutical industry. 
It does not address the causes of deep deepain, nor does it seek solutions, or seek solutions. 
It is also linked to the role of Eurocontrol, which we believe must be overall organisation to ensure that it is good governance and the control of the provision of services. 
future, we will have to review the effectiveness of the EU budget framework in order to acquire common resources for action, in fact, in the context of reforms in the line of reform. 
So, we are developing our relations with Iraq, we are developing our relations with Iraq, with Iraq. 
I therefore tabled an amendment which calls on the Commission to specifically recognise these remote communities in particular, to recognise these remote communities in particular. 
The Member States which have entered the euro area without being prepared to give us a serious look at the time and we must give us a serious look at us to defining realistic deadlines. 
We can, on the one hand, be proud of the idea that the European Union is taking place by achieving such excellent results, but, on the other hand, we must be aware that this project will not actually end up, because the world is continuing to develop, Europe, and also to make the citizens of the European Union more use of them, the opportunities offering them the market. 
foreign and common economic policy are the necessary objectives of the European integration process, and the common economic policy, are the necessary objectives of European integration process. 
Unfortunately, because intervention from this kind means quite difficult situation is in favour of this kind. 
documents : see Minutes 
December, 17 years will also be returned, since I arrived in Sweden itself as a refugee, which were blame of the war, which were the former of my home parents and has become painful, fraudules and Serbs who have benefited before this together as a neighbour in the peaceful door. 
A day of girls, for example, to encourage young women to take professions in technical professions, because it is in these technical professions that are unaware of opportunities, while at the same time, modern society, people are not fully aware of the full spectrum of professions accessible to women. 
It is to find the best possible solution to the treaty treaty agreement at international level and, at the same time, to provide more information in situations of this kind. 
It is important how we will vote on how we are going to know that savings will be made, and that savings will be done. 
It is being seen that, as a result of the crisis of the budget reduction, the budget will not even more so, because then we will be even weaker and more aid and more aid without any help. 
It must be at the heart of our bilateral relations, at the heart of our bilateral relations, at the heart of our bilateral relations. 
This must be done, the same conditions must be imposed on third countries with which the European Union has trade agreements, and they must be similar to the standards imposed on the producers of the European internal market. 
On the other hand, not for the first time, we are discussing the unshameful and intolerable behaviour of the regime in Burma in Burma. 
This Parliament has promised that consultations will be conducted in the philosophy for the future financing of the Union and the ways of doing so. 
If you wish, during the Hungarian Presidency to discuss the policies and policies of Hungary and the EU, we are ready and that will not cause any reasons for at least inconfused. 
The last two years, over 170 000 people have only died because they have been Christians, however, as they do not believe to us to be faith. 
The situation in Caucasus must be given a serious focus on the next EU-Russia Summit. 
Nor disagree with the association with regard to association of association, the association agreement is in relation to association. 
In Haiti, it is extremely serious, when all efforts by the international community did not help to improve the situation in the country devastated by civil war and natural disasters, and now also are being hit by the epidemic of cholera epidemic. 
The crisis was caused by a behaviour based on short-term profits, time and no responsibility and a lack of responsibility. 
I am grateful to the Commission and the Hungarian Government and I am grateful for the Hungarian Government and I am grateful for the Hungarian Government. 
( HU ) Madam President, for my part, I, too, would like to congratulate the rapporteur on my part, and I would also like to congratulate the rapporteur on my part. 
This rule read the way the five to speak and we gave the floor to 10. 
We have clearly insisted on a coherent approach to the protection of the fragile Arctic environment - on the protection of this kind, finally to your own, which is now an increasing environmental issue. 
You, too, know you, of you. 
However, the worst consequences have been felt by older women, women in rural areas and their own mothers, however, by the worst consequences, were felt by women, women in rural areas and their mothers. 
This is precisely because we still do not have any complete trust in the Cais Government in terms of compliance with the rule of law, we must insist on an objective investigation in the case of the case objective. 
The sanctions have had a weak impact in Belarus and other places in Belarus and in other places, and in other places. 
I would still like to believe that it is possible to believe that a radical change of European policy is possible to change European policy, and I would like to believe that it is possible to change European policy radically. 
companies will happy with companies to send patients beyond a border beyond if there is a cheaper opportunity for treatment there. 
We regret the results of Copenhagen, or in order to be more precise, for the lack of results. 
During our previous discussions with Mr Van Rompuy, we found that the action taken by the European Council in this regard was not the best proposed by Europe can offer. 
Over the last five years, it is too small for the last five years that is too small in the last five years. 
I agree that we must adopt solutions at European level on problems where Member States have different aspects, according to their Christian traditions, to their Christian traditions. 
It proposes something that we expect to expect, in the hope that people will, in the hope that the people to believe that, that the situation will be better and hope is what is missing in Belarus, in huge numbers of 19 December, from Belarus. 
It is one of the most important movement of freedoms based on which the European Union is based on is based on. 
Development 1 billion to the USD 1 billion, which has taken into account Africa for Africa for 60 years, has only served to be a continent even more in the land, even more in the land, in the land. 
It is a perfect and not all we would like, but we believe it is a good step in the right direction in the right direction. 
Promoting and guarantees that are proposed by the Committee on Legal Affairs are very similar to the relevant points in the directive. 
It has become common values such as information and culture in real goods, which have become profits, by creating media employed by several television and radio channels and channels, issued channels, publishers, public and banks. 
You will give you great support to this report tomorrow tomorrow, tomorrow, to give you a great deal of support to the report tomorrow tomorrow, tomorrow, tomorrow, to give you a great deal of support to the report. 
The Commission success in the next year 's next year 's success to the next year 's next year, next year, next year 's success. 
Many things are already happening at EU level, in particular, in terms of increasing awareness, the collection of information and the exchange of good practice. 
The European Union wishes to achieve its political objectives and intentions, it needs to be stronger political awareness, more strongly, more civil dialogue and broadly publicative public debate. 
However, all these issues are actually affecting the alliance of gender and degrading players - all the sports have been affected - all the sports have been affected. 
I understand, however, why the question of combating violence against women should be considered together with the issue of reproductive choice. 
We are fully examining the various opportunities of the European Union, including at the centre of Roxana Robert, in Finland ( Lapland ) and, above all, the role that could have this possible centre. 
The conclusions of the Committee on Transport and Tourism and in the submitted report and I can assure you that many of the issues are already being worked in the Commission through various activities on the implementation of the strategy, such as the proposal on formal for the formality of shipments, which is an important element of the common maritime transport area without borders. 
We must ensure that the cuts in basin battered cages should be fully banned by 1 January 2012, in 2012. 
The rapporteur of the European Parliament on this topic, I sincerely hope that, based on Parliament 's report and the forthcoming Commission communication, the Hungarian Presidency will succeed in drafting a strategy that is really in the spirit of the Community and which will define this target of economic, not on the basis of ethnic grounds, by encouraging the implementation of the directives on equal opportunities, taking into account the territorial nature of the segregation and clothing and relieving the unfailure of the citizens living in micro-regions. 
These penalties used in the event of Member States, which are already in a difficult financial situation, could have an opposite effect, adverse impact on the economies of these countries. 
The proportions are being provided, the international public will, of course, be necessary to act quickly, with a boost from the European Union. 
It is also to emphasise the leading position that the Spanish Health System has on this issue, which has the Spanish Health System in the Spanish health system. 
You are using urgent cases such as this for the protection of human rights protection to make a long list of problems, so that you can make a long list of problems. 
It is not the case today, but the European Commission does not find the necessary arguments, nor time nor time to influence the Latvian Government to put an end to linguistic discrimination. 
It must ensure that EU development aid is consistent with the objectives and with the objectives set at international level set out at international level, objectives and objectives set out at the level. 
The European Union is a firm supporter of the ICC, which promotes universality and is an expression of the integrity of the Robert Statute, in order to preserve and strengthen independence, legitimacy, legitimacy and the effectiveness of international trials and the effectiveness of international trials. 
It would help all and would allow the crisis to build a major new project for Europe and would allow us to build a major new project. 
The lessons of over 10 years of the existence of EMU and the recent impact of the crisis require updated, but at the same time, consistent evaluation has been taken. 
The EU and Member States must therefore increase energy efficiency, particularly in the buildings and transport sectors, in particular, in the sectors of buildings and transport and Member States. 
It will not be well developed with the current percentages of the objectives that are currently in place with the current percentages of objectives. 
Our group therefore lots a clear position on this issue, on this matter, on this matter, on this matter, on this issue. 
A solution, a solution, a solution that has been decided. 
Today 's modern world, where technical developments have such a short life, the facilitation of cooperation in scientific and technological areas will benefit both sides. 
There will be place on Thursday on Thursday on Thursday on Thursday, on Thursday, on Thursday. 
It has said that if you have 10 000 provisions, it is destroying every respect for the law, it has said that if there is 10 000 provisions, it is destroying every respect for the law. 
It is worrying that human rights defenders and journalists have been killed, not only in the North Caucasus, but also in Russia as a whole. 
The issue of minimum income should be approached by the principle of subsidiarity in the Member States and solutions should be sought by exchange of best practices. 
The concept of family members ' is very wideand is in danger of it being abuse to be abuse. 
We can find instruments to support the development of a democratic system in Cuba and to pass the Cuban people the universal values relating to the construction of democracy and democratic society. 
I would stress the importance of the approach to the place of the innovation approach in the field of innovation in the field of innovation. 
It is only about young people, but it is also about greater understanding, which includes issues relating to young people, as well as education and training in a more present perspective. 
The expectations of the Council in the coming days and we are awaiting effective action to address the problems in this critical period in the coming days and we await effective action to the Council in the coming days and we are looking forward to tackling the problems in this critical period. 
The commitment of the Commission in a short period of time to meet all the legislative initiatives for legislative initiatives should be welcomed, as it reflects the growing importance of the European Parliament as colegislator, particularly in regional policy areas such as regional policy areas. 
Here, Madam President, because it is difficult to speak in these circumstances, because it is difficult to speak about it in these circumstances. 
The free market must not stop us doing what is right for workers, which is right to do. 
It is the best way that this is the best way we can help Greece in the very difficult situation in which it is currently in the budget and debt budget and debt. 
At the Council and the European Commission would be a good thing to protect religious faith in all talks with third countries, at the Council and the European Commission would be a good thing to include in all the talks with third countries. 
It is important in a responsible way that the differentiation between ordinary and biodiversity is reduced in a responsible way as a result of reducing the difference between ordinary and biodiversity. 
agreements by the Council : see Minutes 
The defence with the best discipline and the greatest commitment to win the World Tehran World Creative in the World Crip. 
There is also a huge effort to make the budget in line with the Lisbon Strategy to provide even more resources than the Commission 's draft budget for the Erasmus programme, for learning throughout the whole life, as there is a question that we must ask ourselves honourable, namely whether this budget is a useful one point, but, above all, a starting point : whether this budget is one point : whether it is the case for the European citizens. 
standards and the unwillingness to change, which are often supported most often under pretext of pretext and tradition can not be adopted, but, on the contrary, it must be rejected as barriers to the development of the Mediterranean region. 
The problem of shipyards in Poland, but the problem is greater, than the two Polish shipyards are the case. 
There are many years to ask the closure of Guantánamo, so we have heard the President Obama 's communication and we understand the difficulties in justing the Labour, left by George Bush. 
The authorities must carry out further stricter checks of all forms of self-control of self-control, and the authorities must carry out further monitoring of all forms of self-control. 
There is no reason that we can not expect the good of this agreement, it is a step in the right direction and I therefore supported this report. 
Member States have realised the challenge of patient safety, which they are facing, and measures have been taken to address the problem of the problem. 
It was widein many relations in many respects, in many respects, a wide relationship, in many respects. 
Our task is to decide whether we have come to another step, or we are in the same situation. 
Mr President, the Soviet Communism was the most bloody ideology that was set up by our kind of kind. 
In the case of Greece, we have the capacity to assess and monitor our fiscal regulation programme, and we have an fiscal regulation programme that is in place. 
The sitting suspended in 1915, a speech is resumed at the meeting at 19, at ). 
A unimmediate restructuring would have led to great losses for the company and its workers, as well as to disseminate the negative consequences of the sector and the transfer of taxpayers ' money. 
It is a serious ethical issue, a serious ethical issue, a serious ethical issue. 
Many things are very much happening. 
Election plan for the Bay of Biscay in the Bay of Bay of Biscay and for fishing aimed at this stock - Maftogarine plan for the West of Atlantic factories and the UfM - Uransang of the West - Cambodia for the purposes of increasing the quality and limitation for fishing letters and carcinoged in the Baltic Sea, the Belarusian, the Belarusian and Uighusban - Uyghurism - Uyghurs - Uyghurs in the Gulf of aquaculture areas in the area ( debate ) in the area of aquaculture areas in the area of aquaculture areas in the area and the Gulf ( debate to be able species in the area. 
We clearly see how Islam is on a state of religion is on a religion of religion. 
In this regard, there were significant shortcomings : a 20energy crisis in Europe during the gas dispute between Russia and Ukraine could have been overcome in one way ; or another way ; the management of the crisis in the Middle East, in my opinion, was more than a hesitation. 
Mugabe was, which was in the past, a political assembly for the rights of the blackmail population, today is a brutal dictator responsible for the end of the economy, hunger and political Roma in the country. 
It was well known as a journalist and blown and shooot and shoooot, and it was well known. 
It must build up the EU 's regional partnership for peace, security and development in the African Roma, which the Development Committee launched with the adoption of its report in April 2007. 
However, this case, we must store the tradition of sending this sign of values of values that are actually in the EU. 
The Spanish and Spanish Presidency will also take part in the Spanish Presidency to participate in the Spanish Presidency, too, participating. 
- ( NL ) Madam President, since decades, the European Union follows the protectionist trade policy, and this is true for banana, among other things. 
I think the ICCAT should establish additional control systems to its programmes : it should not be possible to admire the tone without dening it in the Mediterranean ; no unused to authorise the unusual catches in the Mediterranean, motivated by the trade trade trade in bluefin tuna. 
One of the first measures we should adopt is to increase the penalties imposed on these criminals, because it is clearly not a matter of missile mediation - it is a crime organised by the Cubans who want to achieve maximum profits. 
In my opinion, we will thus ensure that the future CAP, which is a sectoral policy that will provide solutions which cover many sectors, and that in this way through the budgetary means to be allocated to the CAP, will be demonstrated and provided real European added value. 
A general link between the two databases would be sufficient between the two databases of the data and the two databases would be sufficient. 
It is that we will always have to make a choice to make choices, that we will have to make choices, always to make choices. 
The Pacific Group of the Pacific Group form a unique area mainly composed by island countries, which are largely ethnic diversity and culture differ significantly from Europe 's. 
It is even longer for a long time to convince in this truth societies that are compromising the pages of aggressive propaganda in terms of the environment. 
I know whether this is true and whether representatives of large companies will also take part in the Russian negotiations by the Russian side. 
9 December 2009, the draft agreement with Jordan, with Jordan 2009, was parallel, in fact, draft agreement with Jordan. 
It is crucial that these money is made to small and medium-sized enterprises ( this was mentioned by one of the speakers before me ) and as soon as they are only surviving, because they are not only making a lot of them waiting for. 
There is a new President and this new President should be faced with friendship in the European Union and the European Parliament and the European Parliament. 
A real economy are not two autonomous systems, but are not two autonomous systems, but they are not two autonomous systems. 
The Council and the Commission, to emerge from this situation, in order to emerge from this unfortunate situation, and to emerge from this situation ? 
These ambitious strategies can be implemented, when the Commission is not deliberately playing a deliberation role ? 
The release of Farai Maguwu Maguwu is actually in the interests of Zimbabwe, and I hope that the authorities will listen to our call on this issue. 
The Energy Efficiency Fund ( HRA ) has been operating since 1991 and then it is then then also in favour of investment in the energy efficiency of citizens ' energy efficiency. 
Following the decision of the European Court of Justice of 4 March 2010, the Commission addressed a written question to the Italian authorities on what measures they have provided or taken to comply with the decision to comply with the decision. 
The last enlargement of the Black Sea is already the EU 's sea and sea of the EU, and the Black Sea is already already a sea sea. 
However, this report also draws attention to Russia 's unprofound response to the armed intervention of Georgia in South Ossetia and to the massive and unprovoked actions of Russian armed forces in Abkhazia. 
At the same time, some elements of the already taken, the planned or prompted measures to improve aviation safety are going beyond strict air requirements and requirements for aviation safety. 
Even the time, even the word ' is not even the word ' itself, but does not comply with reality of reality of reality of the reality of these conditions, even if it is not even a real word. 
To conclude, I would like to say that I hope that all of this can be achieved by the end of this parliamentary term by the end of this parliamentary term. 
The European Commission 's proposal to create a European strategy, a solidarity response, in view of prevention and treatment of people living with dementia ( proliberalising the deterioration of sympathy ), and the people of their coup. 
This report is a absurd virus in southern, a report is an absurd virus and a desperate vicious virus. 
( PL ) Mr President, I am convinced that our deep humanitarian resolution will contribute to reducing equality between Europe and the Islamic world, I am convinced that our deep humanitarian resolution will contribute to reducing equality between Europe and the Islamic world. 
The military action in South Ossetia proved that there is no such thing as a frozen conflict as a frozen conflict in South Ossetia, to show that there is no such thing as a frozen conflict. 
After all, it was not difficult to agree on some simple principles : it was not difficult to agree on certain simple principles : in the end, it was not difficult to agree on certain simple principles : it was not difficult to reach agreement on certain simple principles : it was not difficult to reach a lot of principle : 
Madam President, we all support directives that help to save lives and I would like to congratulate the rapporteur on his work on his report, which seems in principle, in fact complicated, in the context of the details. 
I regret to me that a little of our innovative SMEs are growing and becoming larger companies in the EU, and that there are less new, innovative companies with intense research and development ( IDS ), than in the United States. 
We are that we need to put an end to the uncompetitive coal mining that requires continuous use of state subsidies within a period of established period. 
There is a clear difference in a clear difference that there is a clear difference in a clear way as a clear difference. 
The Presidency has presented a detailed list of priorities of priorities of the Presidency and presented a detailed list of priorities of the Presidency. 
It also underlines the need to define and define the national status of a national minority status. 
Madam President, the opinion of the UK Government, in terms of both the European Arrest Warrant and the European Anti-Fraud Office, is that they firmly believe that they have a duty - and rightly so - to do what is best for the United Kingdom, as far as cross-border crime is concerned. 
( IT ) Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the membership of Croatia in the European Union underlines the formation of a European identity capable capable of expressing the common values of our new Europe, which includes instead of taking a delay, instead of taking a stand, the individual of its many inhabitants ' inhabitants ' inhabitants. 
What citizens are showing to all waste projects, can be explained to the fact that many promises were given at political level, but, in fact, no one of these promises has been met. 
It is that, after the epidemic of Dominister, we can not afford to act hard in Europe, in decision which will be his candidate. 
It means that we must be on the table itself on the table itself of the negotiations. 
Ladies and gentlemen, our determination to comply with both the letter and the spirit of the Treaty of Lisbon was a choice for the future of the Union, investment in ever closer European cooperation. 
Specifically, women, who are affected by this hard disease twice, are particularly affected by this severe disease, two times more than men. 
A sufficient approach implies enough to manoeuvre in the introduction of individual requirements for individual requirements. 
I would actually like to stress that one of the previous agreements - that with Australia - was called an agreement at the very high level of protection of data, which is the most in the most part to defend data. 
We must therefore strengthen our cooperation in order to combat terrorism more effectively. 
However, considerations must not threaten the sustainability of the budget and precise accounting for the budget and precise accounting accounting for each institution. 
They are very much, they are very much, they are, of course, very much, very much,. 
I think that registration is a solution, because in my opinion, the Member States will not have the means to press for the adoption of specific measures in the outermost regions without the existence of the common agricultural policy and the Community approach to the common agricultural policy and the Community approach. 
It is also high unemployment rate and will be affected by the forthcoming cuts in the public sector by the UK Government 's government, too, and will be seriously affected by the high unemployment rate and will be affected by the forthcoming cuts in the public sector. 
It is to tackle the fact that at a global level of competition policy, it is a need for the shipyards of the Middle East, and indeed today, precisely because of this competition policy, we are closing the shipyards in Europe, because we are forced to compete with subsidies industry and industries. 
There is a lot to do this - without necessarily necessary financial resources - and I will be pleased to examine this issue in this matter. 
The exchange of data on effective strategies, policies and actions will help to gain support from the government and the various sectors, and to say, to the various sectors. 
What is happening in Cuba is disgraceful to everyone who form part of the policy guided under such left-wing knowledge. 
Are they agreed with them, which make them easier for them to remain too much and encourage them to remain outside the European Union, while, at the same time, encouraged the countries within the European Union to leave it to conclude such agreement ? 
It is not wish to understand - but if these amendments are adopted, the result of the proposal will be precisely opposite. 
I voted in favour of this report in favour of this report. 
The interests of all interests of all interest must have the same rights throughout Europe for the charges of infringements and there must be mandatory information on these rights. 
There is closed is closed conclusion. 
In particular, in a financial and energy crisis, it is our duty to look at this area more closely and respond to the wishes and needs of the population in this regard, because, at the end of the day, humanity and nature are not opposed to the similar. 
Mr Trichet said to English, French and German, the euro is much more than a currency : it is our common fate : it is our common fate. 
( IT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, 200 000 dead, 10000 dead, 250 000 severe injured, 3 million people affected directly by the earthquake, other 2 million people who need food aid : these are the full consequences of the terrible disaster that has been said in Haiti. 
Lastly, Iceland 's accession can lead to a consistent and effective European policy in the region 's region. 
I have said that the idea of cooperating with the use of consular sites is being examined. 
In some EU Member States, there has been a mass visit of qualified qualified, well-trained workers, where these Member States have put into place significant investment. 
online gambling offers greater opportunities for corrupt practices such as fraud, covering results from sports meetings and cartels for illegal delays, because Internet care can be created and very quickly. 
The vote, which was said in plenary, in my opinion, on the reverse amendments to paragraphs 7, 31, 31 and. 
I look at two elements of the media law 's faith in the media law. 
The wording of Article 15, which must ensure that the violence for the control of tobacco is particularly protected against the commercial interests of the tobacco industry, is particularly protected against the commercial interests of the tobacco industry industry. 
Resplit ) decideliberalisrate ) ( decideliholistralisratodollissssssssdedededelissszzzzzzzzzzzand ) 
Copenhagen should be achieved more than a declaration of just more than just a declaration of intentions, for intentions. 
Mr President, Commissioner, we are focusing on the time of forest motivation in the light of today 's new new new new new news related to the euro, for which we are recognised. 
The most comprehensive agreement on the protection of wilderness trade in the fauna and fauna ( CITES ) is the most comprehensive global agreement on the protection of wilderness. 
in writing. - ( PT ) The first report on the first five years of this Parliament 's term of office, let me say how we, as Parliament, should deal with the issue of Turkey, should be considered to Turkey. 
Many good experience in this dialogue and we believe that we believe that it is working well and we believe that it is working well. 
However, I would like to point out that the European Securities and Markets Authority should be provided with such staff, which would enable it to really carry out its tasks, which is difficult to happen with a relatively small number of CMA staff, which are expected to fulfil almost human tasks. 
It is right to believe that simply the revision of transitional communities with different memory can create a country that can simply create a country. 
Resplit ) decideliberalisrate ) ( decideliholistralisratodollissssssssdedededelissszzzzzzzzzzzand ) 
They are quite weak to see human rights and democracy, including - to mention just a few of them - Cuba, China, Pakistan, Saudi Arabia, Nice, Nice and Iran as a potential candidate. 
It is that the EU must be clearer and demand that the countries that it is insisting on the countries that they support should respect fundamental human rights as freedom of expression and freedom of the press. 
Goldstone, probably in this context, you can perhaps give some impetus to the trade agreement, together with this view to create a programme for study of tariffs sands. 
- under the treaty - will take decisions on sanctions based on the basis of the basin of the treaty, and the majority ', under the Treaty - be taking decisions on sanctions on the basis of the basin the basin. 
Member States do not achieve results in this programme, the competitiveness of the EU as a whole will generally suffer from the EU 's competitiveness. 
Corrections to votes and voting intentions : see Minutes 
Other, for example, in Germany, the payment is going through health insurance companies, and companies take the main part of expenditure. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, the model of the opposition leader in Burma, Mrs Sandam Suu Kyi, from the cornerstones of his release, after her disgraceful arrest, is still released in our conscience. 
I am convinced that the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union ( TFEU ) and, in particular, its members and its members, reinforces the democratic nature of the Union and ratify its legal regime. 
Is it to work with a compulsory figure and whether we should not think about something else about something else ? 
These principles and rules should be established to provide assistance to provide assistance to the provision of aid to be established to provide assistance to the aid ? 
This is why we can expect the accident of a reaction to every 25 years of every year, every year, we can expect the accident of a response to every year, in the case. 
I would like to stress that terrorism has no kind of religion in all of religion. 
It must be reviewed and quickly, and it must be quickly reviewed. 
What we MEPs can do in such situations is to address the European Commission and then wait for a few weeks to answer to a expertise. 
It is to use innovative measures and the appropriate financial instruments for increasing their competitiveness, improving access to information and participation in research programmes. 
in writing. - ( LT ) We abstained from the Group of the Greens/European Free Alliance in the vote on the vote in favour of the Group of the Greens/European Free Alliance. 
2050, our planet will probably be to the billion, people, more than two million people than today - a figure which indicates that agricultural producers will have to produce 70 % more food. 
However, much more remains to be done in the field of energy efficiency and I therefore welcome this report, and I therefore welcome this report. 
It proposes revising the regulatory framework for the regulatory framework, the regulatory framework, which proposes to revise the regulatory framework. 
This report does not show any competence in terms of the concept of danger and risk ; it is not able to distinguish them to distinguish them. 
A UN conference on the least developed countries ( LDCs ) should be devoted to the coordination of development policies, as it is an important factor in reducing poverty. 
documents : see Minutes 
The European Commission is not appropriate, particularly in terms of the question of why this additional funding is needed. 
Portugal, banking profits have increased by 18 % during the first quarter of this year. 
The US, which has already been actively conducted in the Committee on the CIA two years ago, came back to the destiny question on the flights of the CIA in Europe. 
The Council has first of all been present for years on the debate on discharge in respect of the implementation of the budget. 
( HU ) Colleagues, food safety is a fundamental objective of the European Union, but this is a bad compromise, but it is a bad compromise, but it is a bad compromise. 
Member States must enjoy the most appropriate means of dealing with situations that are limited to business and have social consequences. 
I was faweweand I of soof certain blocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocblocbloc) block) blocsuwas a. 
Madam President, Commissioner, ladies and gentlemen, the regulation on European private companies, which is to adopt, complements the framework for the species to be regulated at European level, should be regulated. 
In the European Union, we can not act alone if we adopt rules that are not shared by other countries, they will put the European economy in an unequal situation in the globalised world in which we live. 
It is possible to find a way to live with a neighbour that does not necessarily mean that it is in agreement with its way of action. 
We are never forced to take any measures to take any measures to any measures to take any measures to any measure. 
The annual growth survey of growth has also been considered the need to deepen the reform of the internal market reform. 
We will take place today at 1200 today at 1200, at 1200, at 12.00.. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this report on the progress made by Iceland in 2010 as I believe that we must support the accession of one of the oldest democracies to the EU, given that the necessary conditions for this - for example, the end of cyclones and trade in Pakistani products - have been met. 
The social economy is an integral part of the Commission 's policy in the area of businesses ' businesses policy. 
Thank you, Prime Minister, Prime Minister, thank you, Prime Minister,,,,, Prime Minister, for a Prime Minister, for your thanks, to you, Prime Minister. 
We are on the way to achieve the objectives of our communication with our communication 's communication objectives. 
I am not happy with the number of points of the agenda that have been public, nor from the way in which documents are available to them. 
These steps have been made as essential elements of Parliament 's role as important elements of Parliament 's role as Parliament 's role, consideration has been made. 
I would finally like to make a brief personal point of view a short, personal remark, to me. 
I would like to say a few words on the economic partnership and the Transatlantic Economic Council ( TEC ), for the Economic Partnership and the Transatlantic Economic Council ( TEC ). 
The law on the ground and Muslim is becoming increasingly obvious, and the blasphemy law is being correct in many acts that violate fundamental freedoms. 
I support the monitoring and remarks of the author on the introduction and implementation of Community law in Member States. 
consumer consumers ( vote ) 
The proposal concerns the mobilisation of a total amount of EUR 1 to support Lithuania in order to provide assistance to workers made redundant in 128 companies working in the civil construction sector. 
Reducation has already led to cold bulls, coach trains, and has already led to cold business storms. 
In order to encourage South Korea to open its market prices to the European Union 's expenditure prices, apart from the three most sensitive products : domestic, portals, portals and Korean triumppelations. 
Iran may perhaps deny this veterinary culture and history in Iran, perhaps denied this veterinary culture and history. 
It concerns justice, and the requests for compensation for the detriment of the law in question complements the law in question. 
It was not even intended to make public officials a shift, including his ambassadors, including his ambassadors. 
A very well-structured dialogue organised by the European Economic and Social Committee and I held a very long debate with them just two weeks ago. 
The death rate for bees caused by attacks on your shareholders and unresolved problem with the asymmercing of bees families, unfortunately, will not disappear. 
A balance between economic and social interests is not only very important, but also very difficult, but also very difficult to balance between economic and social interests, but also very difficult. 
We stress the increased violence in particular against Christians, which is a cause of deep concern for deep concern. 
If we do not adapt it to the new challenges in the strategy, we all take a great deal of risk in the strategy. 
It will probably also affect the last voters and the last voters, and you will probably affect it and the last voters, and you will probably have been putting forward. 
It has decided to put an end to the isolation of the community and facilitate the integration of Cyprus by encouraging the economic development of the Cypriot Turkish Cypriot community, to end the isolation of Cyprus 's integration. 
In Cancún, it has shown that the UN can indeed achieve results in Cancún, indeed the United Nations can achieve results. 
( FR ) Mr President, during this period of economic recession for the European Union, it was important for the European Union to continue to demonstrate solidarity towards developing countries, it is important that, during this period of economic recession, it is important for the European Union to continue to demonstrate solidarity towards developing countries. 
France 's military structures in the military structures of NATO, as well as the efforts dedicated to the European Security and Defence Policy, offer an excellent opportunity to harmonise European security strategies and the potential new strategies for NATO, and the potential NATO strategies. 
There is also concern this year, which has been the control of the third pillar of the European Development Fund, namely joint governance with organisations. 
In recent weeks, it has shown that the security of airports is a very important task for the Member States and that we must take all the necessary definitive measures to take over all the necessary measures. 
6 and 7 of the Treaty on the Functioning of the European Union are obliged to the European Union authorities and all Member States to fight discrimination on the basis of sexual orientation. 
In particular, in particular, the shared lines, the volcanic grids, electricity networks, the telecoms networks and the whole system of small and medium-sized enterprises, particularly in the maritime sector, in the aquaculture and in the agricultural sector, with 45 000 hectares of water, as the source of the nuclear power was the sea. 
( RO ) Mr President, I would like to start by expressing my deep sympathy to the Japanese people. 
Unfortunately, the Commission is not yet able to adopt this proposal in a position to adopt this proposal in the Commission, but is still unable to adopt this proposal in the Commission. 
Madam President, I voted in favour of the resolution on the Economic Partnership Agreement ( EPAs ) because only through equal legal partnership we can only help other countries to take advantage of the benefits of economic progress. 
You will act and that is to act quickly and to act quickly and to act. 
It was therefore necessary, first of all, to make the current legislative framework has built through Amendment to the directive of 1991 on the launch of certain products in the market and, secondly, to fill the shortcomings at Community level in the use of these products. 
The relations with the International Criminal Tribunal, the rule of law of law are leading to the rule of law. 
It is a form of intolerable violence against women and joint action should be taken to prevent such trafficking in order to protect victims of trafficking and to the persecution of this violence 's perpetrators. 
I have mentioned that hundreds of people were subjected to brutal police brutal brutal brutal attacks and have received serious injured, with several hundred people being arrested and several hundred people have been overseas over the course of the long criminal trials in which innocent. 
We are in the opinion that we do not need a new legislation at the UN level to address the concept of linking lines, because we already have international standards, namely, the proposal to prevent discrimination against religious minorities. 
Orbán Orbán, aggressive and unreasonable protection of your allies is not convinced of us, but not convicted me. 
I welcome the section in the new agreement that the President of the Commission would require to carry out a thorough discussion in the case that Parliament withdrawn its credibility to a separate Commissioner. 
: see Minutes 
We are dealing with providing the new economic strategy called European Union 2020, not to become a further complicated familitary to the new economic strategy. 
I would like to comment on whether Britain would be in a better situation outside the European Union outside the European Union. 
The patient registered, but are limited to the amount of treatment, which would be paid to the amount that would be paid to such cuts. 
countries which are isolated by the rest of Europe are left behind the military of gas suppliers from Eastern Europe. 
We in the European Union must be much more pragmatic and understand what responsibility our national governments are responsible for our national governments. 
in writing. - ( RO ) I voted in favour of the report on the proposal for a Council directive on the management of spent fuel and radioactive waste management, as nuclear security in the EU depends on the management of spent fuel and radioactive waste. 
It means that they are also more in a position to deal with real competition, not just dependent on special assistance. 
Our history shows that, in the interest conflict, as in the Democratic Republic of the Democratic Republic of Congo, the political decision is the only hope for peace. 
I would like to say that it is personally clear to me, personally, that it is quite clear to myself that, as far as we can help the poorest among the poor. 
However, last week in Ireland, we saw that the banks still rely on saving taxpayers ' money last week in Ireland. 
I voted in favour of this report as, in the 2011 Community budget presented by the parliamentary Committee on Budgets during the part, a increase in funding for the priorities set by the European Parliament, such as education, innovation, the newly introduced process in the Middle East and Palestine, the programme for lifelong learning, the programme for learning, the programme for research, the programme and the programme for competitiveness, the programme and the programme for competitiveness, the innovation and the innovation and the innovation programme for innovation in the new innovation and innovation. 
It is a diplomatic issue between two countries which are not even a member of the European Union, but it has a serious impact on the citizens of the European Union, who are interested in travelling in Libya to make a living in their food. 
( FR ) Madam President, Commissioner, we must undoubtedly emphasise the importance of implementing the ILO conventions, but I am unfortunately concerned that the ruling system, namely that of free competition, becomes a job market itself and, therefore, in the commodity of the ILO conventions. 
It is a change in which implementation will improve the quality of the atmosphere and significantly restrict greenhouse gases which cause climate change. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the Review Conference of the International Criminal Court ( ICC ) is long-awaited and significant event for the development of the Court of Justice itself and, in broader sense, international criminal justice. 
The role that everyone fishing method is in the worrying situation on bluefin tuna, but it is fairer, fairer distribution of quotas and stricter measures and stricter measures. 
We want to do things in our way, but we want to engage with you, and we need help with you, and we need help. 
Is this event where the protection of this situation means inhumane unification in terms of the own ideological ideology of man ? 
It is also a climate change title that climate change is becoming a simple day, a daily issue, a daily issue. 
! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! 
Poland 's case is mainly linked to the huge potential created at the first place of the mass of the mass improvement in new and old buildings in terms of maritime efficiency and second of widespread spread spread repression of olutions and marine in housing areas with modern marine electric power plants. 
In my opinion, the changes made in the agreement are not entirely convincing, in my opinion, that the changes made in the agreement are not entirely convincing. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
gender equality in all our countries everyday lives in all our countries, in all our countries, for equality between gender equality in everyday life in all our countries. 
It is possible to reach a balanced compromise by creating a tool that can be dealt with more effectively by dealing with this type of criminal activity and are created by strict policies and stricter sanctions, including a deadline of five to 10 years and the elimination of the benefits acquired by crimes. 
I am in your statement that we need to provide different levels of distribution to countries and in geographical areas and in geographical areas. 
Europe is partly due to the fact that we ourselves ourselves are losing our abandonment of our open values here. 
Product technical assistance provided to the Office of Kosovo for Gender Equality between Gender Equality provides technical assistance. 
It is based on the concept of solidarity, it is based on the concept of solidarity, on the concept of solidarity. 
All of my thanks to the great thanks of the deepening work of the Court of Auditors ' work, I would like to express my great thanks to the growing work of the Court of Auditors ' work. 
All of this has had positive, both positive and negative events and negative events, as well as negative events, and negative events. 
cross-border links on the progress of the European transport network is obvious, which gives us reason to support the renewal of interconnections between all modes of transport, particularly those where transformation and development have proved more difficult, as is the case with rail and sea transport. 
We, and the Member States, have a lot to do in this area, we, too, have a lot to do. 
We had contradictions, we had contradictions, we had contradictions, and we had contrary to the contradiction. 
It is about genuine equality of opportunities, because it must be just as easy to build a Christian Church in Alexander or Ankara as it is possible to build the shoulder in Brussels as possible. 
These circumstances, the timelimitation of the Nagoya Summit could not be at the more appropriate time. 
It is a widedebate that this broadly debated the fact that we face a huge problem with great deal of concern that we face with a huge challenge that faces us with a huge challenge. 
To the end of poverty, it will send a strong signal that the EU is present to provide opportunities to all the public, even to the most marginalised and most vulnerable people. 
I would like to thank the rapporteur and I hope that we have the strength to find a response to this question : what is the Internet, can it be regulated and if, how will this happen ? 
I look forward to your proposals on corporate governance, natural in the Green Paper, as this is another package of documents that we will certainly continue to work in the coming months and years and years to work. 
The agreement will pave the way for new economic benefits, whether for consumers or the airlines, and will strengthen cooperation between the countries of both the countries of the African Question, thereby bringing benefits to the European Union. 
We can forget that an increase in oil prices directly affects the revenue sales of fishermen ' incomes directly affecting the income of fishermen. 
It is now really time, because it is now in fact for the implementation and 14 guidelines to be taken by our communication on the Internet of things, I am happy to announce that, on some of them, some of them are already working. 
We are building safe nuclear power plants and, at the same time, using Structural Funds, to promote agricultural communities ' strategic emphasis on the link between energy, water and biological frones, thereby strengthening the diversification of energy base. 
We continue to continue to continue to continue to continue. 
I would like to stress the request for the Commission to conclude agreements containing clauses of democracy, human rights and respect for social, health and environmental standards, while at the same time ensuring effective monitoring for compliance with and implementing these standards in practice. 
I think that seems to me as the start of a successful partnership, as the start of a successful partnership, to me, as the start of a successful partnership, to a successful partnership. 
Mr President, in 2000, in the terrorist attacks throughout the world died 1 200 people in 2000. 
However, I would like to ask the House a few questions and to try to give some answers to why the Commission proposed a directive to support the submission of the IPA and, secondly, whether, whether the initiatives at local and national level in this area are inadequate. 
It is to find a dream of getting out of the situation where the Union shows its disagreement through specific measures such as sanctions or visa restrictions, but at the same time we must not isolate Belarus from the rest of Europe, because the whole Belarusian society will suffer, not just the EU authorities. 
It must be counterproductive, but it must not be used as a cover for the elimination of rights and guarantees of citizens ' citizens. 
The European Commission needs a new direction of the European Commission, a new direction, a new direction is needed. 
It is crucial that Article 3 of the joint motion for a resolution, which expresses the will to increase the aid for fishermen, is of key importance. 
It is necessary to increase public funding and develop more instruments and programmes to promote energy efficiency and programmes to promote energy efficiency. 
This type of measures would help to provide an action to provide a plan for the development of Greece 's development, and the development plan for Greece. 
on behalf of the ECR Group. - Madam President, in the discussion that is currently taking place, I would like to ask the impact of the crisis on the implementation of the directive in the countries of the European Union. 
More countries are turning to nuclear energy for civil and, unfortunately, for military purposes, for military purposes and military purposes. 
The government continues to consider as terrorist forces protesting against the violations of Kurds 's rights violations. 
We have now received and we have been responsible for some 400 opinions, and also since the Commission came up significantly when the Commission has taken office, we have increased significantly the number of direct contacts with over 500 meetings between the Commissioners and the structures of national parliaments. 
It should be stressed that these Voluntary Partnership Agreements in the trade in timber trade should not go against the EU 's overall objective of combating climate change and must ensure the sustainable use of forests, lead to the deforestation and deterioration in the situation of forests and the associated health and biodiversity globally. 
I not henot henot menot henot menot ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! ! !. 
However, it is not in isolation, however, but it is not in isolation. 
We need regulation, Mr Border, from such a, of us, as you, of which we need to regulate, Mr Border, and we need regulation, Mr Border, of which you like you. 
We should be surprised, because the problems are starting above above above, because these problems are being raised above, because they should be surprised. 
However, I do not think, however, that is not enough enough, however, but it is not enough enough. 
protocol has been signed on 13 May 2011 and on the same date, the Council submitted to Parliament the request for approval of Parliament. 
Commissioner Kallas seems quite clear, but I would like to remind the Commission that transport is falling from 25 % of CO2 emissions, and therefore there is an urgent action that has been required for urgent action. 
You are the reason for the injuries of someone who is causing in the way that you are in the way that you are in the case of the person. 
in writing. - ( NL ) Food security is, above all, a defence policy of defence policy. 
It will contribute to reducing volume of volume of the number of additional documents that need to be provided without violating the principles of good financial management. 
We must concentrate on the essential focus on the substantive focus on the essential importance of focus. 
However, I was to hear some more clear response, but I would have heard to somewhere a clearer response. 
These are a sacrifice or improved life of millions of people, or a result of them, a sacrifice or improved life of millions of people. 
The Commission has raised a different round of issues as part of the debate on possible reform of the common fisheries policy by 2012. 
We need a policy that ends the borders of the current crisis, and we also expect the Commission to decide long-term decisions. 
Commissioner, that the Commission is already interfering and doing so, too, through numerous projects and money, too, and it is also done by numerous projects and money. 
It is that industrial and consumer associations support Directive on energy labelling can not be said that it is in a short of the technological achievements and innovation of the energy market, because, first of all, it is necessary to emerge from this situation of engineering throughout Europe so that a new dimension in the lives of consumers can be discovered. 
We are pleased that greening will be a binding part of the first pillar, and direct payments will be allocated more in a more equal way between the various Member States and the various agricultural sectors, and the various agricultural sectors. 
The data without agreement was carried out for many years now, for many years, in agreement, for many years, without agreement, for many years, for many years. 
I am convinced that in this regard, I can stress the progress made by Romania in this area in recent years, as the European Union Agency for Fundamental Rights said. 
There is a great risk that there is a major risk that stabilise effects that we hope to have a financial transaction tax on the financial market, not to be implemented if the EU fully introduces this tax. 
We are also once again and again dealing with this subject again and again with the subject of dealing with the subject. 
It has to be a strict budget of limits limits, it is necessary to be a strict budget of limits. 
As these practices are also gathering the most incidence of installations, and this leads to the inability of society. 
These requirements have been successfully successfully successfully implemented and successfully implemented, these requirements have been successfully implemented successfully and successfully implemented. 
For results and other details of the vote : see Minutes ) 
More efforts to improve administrative cooperation between Member States is to make efforts to improve administrative cooperation between Member States, and to improve administrative cooperation between Member States. 
in writing. - ( DE ) Thank the rapporteur. - ( DE ) Thank you very much to thank the rapporteur for the rapporteur. 
Those who reject them - and I would like to say this quite clearly - and everyone who has adopted the text of this resolution unchanged voted in favour of allowing MONUC to carry out its policy of oppression in the camp, which controls. 
The report is a direct consequence of the existing time, the model of green ideological ideology, which we must put in the first place and plan and that we can not look after the people, their needs and interests. 
A new directive establishing new challenges stipulated to modernise national health systems of the 27 Member States of the European Union and clearly the need for cohesion and cooperation between all medical systems in the 27 Member States of the European Union, in order to exchange best practices, promote e-health care, and achieving permanent improvements in the standard of cross-border healthcare. 
The fact that the financial crisis has become the financial groups that survived, in greater and stronger terms, in the middle of the financial crisis, which have become the financial groups that survived, in greater and stronger terms. 
They are still not there at the moment of my speech, and I would therefore like to express my strong protest, and I would therefore like to express my strong protest. 
cooperation will enable the macro-generic scenarios to be avoided and to increase confidence in the forecasts that are used in the planning process. 
In Parliament, we must welcome it in Parliament, we must welcome it and we must welcome it. 
We continue to point out and oppose all forms of government censorship and protectionist policies and against all forms of government censorship and against protectionist policies. 
It is firmly convinced that the deepening of economic relations between the EU and the jurisdictions of partners should always be accompanied by a commitment to respect the principles of good governance. 
I can cloning myself, I can be cloned, and I can be cloned. 
The Presidency has fulfilled the expected Presidency 's most important institutional issues that are expected in terms of the most important institutional issues. 
A very time, when I helped to vote in favour of 'yes ' in Ireland on the Treaty of Lisbon, I quoted Spain and the Spanish people in the Spanish people. 
in writing. - It is imperative that the CAP is properly equipped to tackle the challenges in the future in the future. 
This directive is an important result, but at the same time, it is transposed into national legislations is actually the key stage in the process of ensuring the correct implementation of legislation by the Member States and that no barriers to the single market will be put in place. 
It is for open trade and therefore it was not easy to reach agreement and it was therefore not easy to reach agreement. 
It is not an example of the case that is more important, as it is the United States that, of course, are all EU ally in many areas - it is, in fact, perhaps, perhaps, more important, since in the fight against the death penalty, there is no place for double standards. 
In the context of the subsequent Doha Round, the Doha World Trade Organisation Conference ( WTO ) negotiations can also examine the issues relating to Syria as well. 
We are aware that the Eastern Partnership requires commitment from both partners and the European Union to be aware that the Eastern Partnership requires commitment both to both partners and partners. 
We are seeking to integrate the Baltic Sea region more closely with the priorities of the TEN, including the railway eight railway eight, including Berlin 's burden to the Baltic Sea ( TEN) and maritime strategies ( TEN). 
The fight against terrorism, Mr Kerryo, has spoken of the management of information and the protection of personal data in its interest and proportional report during the debate on this subject in Parliament on 26 November. 
It is that the changes contain provision that traders should provide certain information before the imports or exports of goods or exports to goods. 
It must be shown to show respect for the principle of regression, and technical solutions for final decision should be provided to ensure that the potential access and use of waste is made for technical reasons or if the progress in research has led to the emergence of new technological solutions such as transmunicipal. 
However, the compulsory indication of the minimum trivial triviality of all products, including those with a minimum triviality of more than 30 months ( Article 15 ) was not adopted. 
In this connection, some difficult debates are still ahead of us in the coming days as regards how this will be done in detail in the various sectors - industry, the energy sector, energy, transport and housing - and in the Member States. 
The decisions during the Spanish Presidency are very important because they will define political ways of working together, as well as the effectiveness of the European Union. 
( FR ) Mr President, Commissioner, thank you, but I generally hope that the Commission believes that it is right time to revise guidelines for the bluefin tuna limits that you have just mentioned, because they are actually already in fact more than ten years now. 
Indeed, Parliament must play an important role in the way in which research is to be conducted in which research is carried out. 
We are that as much information, communication and dialogue are better, the greater majority is the greater, the greater the majority is, as the majority is, that is more common. 
This is happening again, we are once again in the blame because of pressure from the United States. 
That is what we face great challenges we face with great challenges, we are facing major challenges. 
world knows and acknowledges the key role played by the EU in the field of humanitarian aid, and recognises the key role played by the EU in the field of humanitarian aid. 
Mr President, colleagues, the gas crisis that Europe has proved at the start of 2009 has quickly reached the size of a disaster for Bulgaria, for which there is no alternative to aid for gas supplies. 
The Polish case has become necessary for reforms to be introduced because of the growing inefficiency of the old system, which was a source of even greater expenditure, which was a source of even greater costs. 
Europe 2020 strategy is prioritising, first and foremost, investment in work. 
149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 149 149 Rule 149 149 Rule Rule 149 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule 149 Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule Rule 
I ask for the rich and influential and influential, to the rich and influential and influential, to the rich and influential. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I am grateful for the opportunity to discuss the current situation of the accession process of the Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia 's accession process. 
We would express disagree with the great omissions of the Commission in the implementation of the programmes for competitiveness and innovation, in particular during the economic crisis, which is logically logical to increase the need for such support. 
in writing. - I support this report, which requires responsibility and clear rules for subcontractors in Europe. 
The elements of information have provided, mainly on the costs of providing legal assistance and fair interpreters, provided certain elements of information, mainly on the costs of providing legal assistance and legal assistance and legal translation. 
This is something good to good, good thing is good enough. 
The technical opportunities of banks are being cited in this sense, as the main reason why these are, first and foremost, technical solutions, I would like to say that the technical modernisation of banks is in the interests of the banking sector and of banks themselves, because they therefore modernise the banking market, their payment systems and increase their profits. 
Jean Afiuni is a sad reminder of the negative attitude of Venezuela to human rights. 
I would like to thank all the speakers for their comments for their comments and my contributions to all the speakers for their comments. 
It will be a very strong signal, both to the authorities in Belarus and to civil society, the media and all those who are fighting for the democratic development of the country. 
We have concrete opportunities as the European Union, in order to provide more support to us, as a European Union, to provide more support to us ? 
Secondly, I would like to refer to the question of the Gaza Strip in question. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I, too, would like to start by saying that, in my opinion, it is now time to submit a proposal for a review of the Energy Efficiency and, if there are any doubts, I believe that the debate we are going to have here today will clarify things here today will clarify things clarifications. 
border to humanitarian disaster and requires immediate action and requires immediate action and requires immediate action to be taken immediately and demanded to take action. 
In particular, more efforts have been required in the fight against crime against crime, more efforts have been made to the fight against crime, among other things, Bulgaria, more efforts have been required to combat crime. 
Unfortunately, it is obvious that industrialisation and modern life have made it more difficult to survive the survival of these useful bees. 
I answer some of your questions, which have already been raised, in my final remarks, my final remarks. 
To achieve the target of 2050, the temperature not to increase by more than 2 degrees of the Objective, developing countries will have to limit the level of an increase in their emissions by 15 % by 30 % under the level that would have reached by 2020 if they did not make efforts to limit emissions. 
Health is supported by the clean environment and a climate and a climate of the clean environment and a atmosphere of atmosphere and a atmosphere. 
It will also increase the effectiveness of the procedures for cooperation and the control of customs administrations thanks to the general automatic information system, which will help prevent prevention, investigation and judicial prosecutions of serious violations of national law. 
( FR ) Mr President, I just want to point out that, in the vote on paragraph 8 of the original text, the French translation shown paragraph 19. 
Cohesion policy plays a significant role in efforts to tackle the economic crisis and climate change, the Council has proposed a significant reduction in payment appropriations laid down to this policy in 2010. 
It can help a solution, but it does not claim to be the mediation for the solution nor should it be blocked by these confederations. 
Thirtydifferent numbers, which indicate a paragraphs that we must vote now on. 
It is also crucial that progress in the direction of a more successful and sustainable achievement of the Millennium Development Goals is made to make progress in the direction of a more successful and sustainable way. 
Commissioner, in our recommendations, we ask the Commission to detailed information on which budget lines have been used and planned for cooperation with Libya. 
I would like to ask and call on the European Commission to carry out long-term and comprehensive research into health related health impact in Chernobyl. 
A decision on the exploitation of workers in the vulnerable situation and gradually makes them believe that there is a need for the only rules in criminal law in all sectors and in all sectors and in all areas and in all of all. 
It is a matter of concern the actions to be taken by local authorities, which must be taken by local authorities, which must be taken by local authorities. 
The agreement between Papua Negotiations Guinea, Fiji and the European Community was signed on 14 December 2007, and was signed on 14 December 2007. 
The public statements made by Members belonging, and above all to the people who are doing them, to the public statements that they are doing. 
It is a clear expression of shared responsibility of the Member States and the EU in terms of the ODA and the European Union, in terms of shared responsibility. 
In other words, the Commission must use this method to offer us ways of specifying the new horizontal social clause in Article 9 of the Treaty of Lisbon. 
We also need to bear in mind the progress made by the authorities in Tripoli, who have successfully courageous course from isolation and embargo towards open and open economic and diplomatic contacts. 
It is a European European week of SMEs ' European week, of European week, of SMEs, to SMEs ' European week, to SMEs. 
It is essential if we are to overcome certain shortcomings in the legislative instruments of this first phase - even during their adoption immediately after the consultation with Parliament has been consulted. 
These cases are simply being put in place, and the guarantee quickly becomes a position is becoming a position. 
The expansion of the EU in the broader sense, and that is why I can identify the various forms of totalitarianism that have been mentioned, the various forms of the EU in different countries. 
Lastly, on tax havens, a number of simple measures can be taken on a number of simple measures, on the tax havens, a number of simple measures can be taken. 
I am convinced that the failure of the negotiations are due to disagreement with the figures, and to refuse to carry out a discussion in practice the common future of the Member States ' future, in other words, of the future of Europe. 
The regulations include amendments to the regulations include, particularly during the current economic crisis, provisions for simplifying the rules for the use of funds. 
They can be covered by the global demand for food goods to be set up for a month and a half months and a half. 
This draft European Constitution Treaty was rejected in France and the Netherlands and the Netherlands, the draft Treaty on European Constitution, was rejected in France and the Netherlands. 
It has had to make it possible to define the subsequent savings that the final savings have been set out. 
It was not only a consultation with Parliament, with its Members and the committees responsible for matters relating to car, competition between the proportions and consumers, but also a consultation with Member States and with all the stakeholders and all those who wished to express their opinion. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, I would like to thank many colleagues for all of their opinions, I would like to thank all of my fellow Members for their opinions, for all of them, for their opinions, for all of the points of view. 
The preparations for the next G20 meeting in these recent months have been monitoring intensity of the institution that had to carry out the follow-up to follow up. 
Perhaps it is not only used to find farms, but not used to restore the good names of innocent, and that is very expensive - and that is why I am not only used to find the specific chain of supply, but the whole country has been outlined. 
We are ready to discuss our own challenges in the Human Rights Council, share trying to share experience and offer support to those who work to better respect human rights throughout the world. 
The Paris Convention on International Security Policy is to regulate the frequency, quality and procedures of international explanations that fall within its scope. 
Agreement between the EU and that country, which have not been changed in the course of 20 years, has had to be updated, particularly at a time of great global financial risk. 
It is not a positive vote for the Americans : Parliament will remain its vigilant in the coming months, particularly as regards the procedure for changing Europol 's powers, the definition of an independent authority which will be in Washington, and the creation of a European Terrorist Finance Programme for Tracking Tracking Tracking Transparency ( FTFTP ). 
Mr President, I think that the European Union has become too big and includes itself very culturally culture, I am simply not trust the system as a whole, and things are deteriorating. 
partnership with Russia, which some talk, must be built on shared values ; otherwise there will be no point in the same kind of sense. 
In the United States, Japan and North Korea have the right to adopt such laws that they consider to be appropriate. 
The fifth objectives of a rigorous definition of a particular target is specifically devoted to the fight against poverty and social exclusion. 
instruments and coordination procedures and supervision procedures have enabled the EU to overcome the crisis, which no Member State can overcome itself. 
It is that in a year, in the year, the so-called economic and social tension, as it is 2009, the Council has not shown incline to resolve one of the key issues of the regulation at work times at EU level. 
Fisheries and financial participation provided for in the Fisheries Partnership Agreement between the EC and Carder ( EC ) ( 
My annual report is described the progress made in examining complaints, promoting good governance and providing information about the role of the Ombudsman. 
Our conciliation and united presentation, we have in fact increased our burden in the G20, in fact increased our burden in the G20. 
There must be resettlements of the following individuals, regardless of the geographical priorities that the EU can be set for a period : children and women, exposed to a risk of violence or mental exploitation, the physical or sexual exploitation, unaccompanied minors, individuals, with special medical needs, individuals, victims, violence and torture and torture, and which need immediate or immediate resettling for legal reasons, for reasons related reasons or for protection. 
In order to prevent and combat extremism and radicalisation, we must support the countries and legitimate non-governmental representatives in the design and implementation of strategies and activities to combat Islamic radicalisation and promote democratic, tolerance and peaceful society. 
Member States must eliminate all forms of violence against women and children, particularly in order to sexual exploitation, sexual motivation and domestic violence. 
We can offer Belarus concrete incentives within the Eastern Partnership, but not only in the Eastern Partnership, but not only in the framework of the Eastern Partnership, but not only. 
The facts are the facts, the facts are the facts, are the facts. 
I particularly worry about the fact that the Joint Undertaking has not yet fully implemented its internal control systems and financial reporting systems, which jeopardises transparency in the spending of money coming from European taxpayers ' taxpayers. 
We can be able to prevent a crisis of overproduction, among other things, to preserve agricultural activity in all European regions. 
The Lisbon Treaty provided the Union with a new exclusive competence in terms of foreign direct investment direct, foreign direct investment. 
However, where the Council is supposed to be, there is only empty places, where the Council is supposed to be, there are only empty places, where it is supposed to be. 
We are faced with natural disasters and face ever more disaster than this type of type of type, it is imperative that the European Union will provide assistance to the Member States and regions which are covered by the tragedy effects of such tragedies. 
A good start could we condemn any or every country trying to take advantage of the disaster by returning around analyalism. 
We need more skilled people in better skilled people. 
on behalf of the INDGroup. - Madam President, Mr Almunia, in particular, in the current transitional period, I thank you for your commitment shown during your previous term of office, and I wish you the blame of the new post for the new post. 
However, it is to ensure that the intervention strategies in the European Union do not make a gender distinction, racial or ethnic sign. 
Four years we have not been prepared for the next energy crisis if there is such a thing if there is. 
You were a great supporter of the unity of Germany and this was very important to all of us, and this was very important to all of us. 
minutes of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the previous sitting of the minutes 
Beijing and informal care are indeed high and informal care for direct and informal care. 
It will also confirm that the existence of parallel criminal proceedings is in parallel ; 
It is harmonisation, but it is not ideological, but mainly a cultural problem, but mainly a cultural problem. 
The call for the sector to be able to be assumed to use the end consumer, that it must be assumed to use the end consumer. 
The communication on the press of the European Office for the fight against fraud refers to a decisive bloody disruption of cigarette disruptions of cigarettes in the US cities. 
Finally, Ecofin must receive the right to declare the right to declare the existence of an economic crisis. 
Parliament endorParliament endorParliament endorapproval the request request ) Parliament approved Parliament approval Parliament approval the request request ) Parliament approval Parliament approval approval approval the request request request ) 
It is a task force that the proposal is being reduced to ordinary codification of the existing texts, without change in substance, without substantially changing the existing texts. 
The fact that, with the adoption of this act by Parliament, our main message to SMEs must be said that Parliament and the European institutions are behind them and want to strengthen the will and opportunities that small and medium-sized enterprises in Europe are currently showing at the moment, before the cornerstone. 
among young young people, it is one of Europe 's most urgent problems with Europe 's most urgent problems. 
A union can not disseminate the bloody of nor refugee or a person who is seeking asylum seekers. 
27 February 2006, the Council authority of authorised the Commission to start negotiations with Liechtenstein and Switzerland began with negotiation with Liechtenstein and Switzerland. 
We look forward to awaiting the new Commission 's new plan on equality for the period 2011-2011-2015, and we look forward to the new plan for equality for the period 2015. 
The reform of party activities, the European Union could use this opportunity to promote the recovery of European political parties, in order to promote the recovery of European political parties. 
Similarly, it is 40 of the regional support guidelines that the aid must be dependent on whether or not a investment will be maintained in the region at least for five years after the date of its conclusion. 
I and LGarrido, too, were in Eurocontrol at the Eurocontrol of Sunday, and I was associated with all the ministers of transport to the larger Member States ' larger Member States. 
Would the Commission draw up a redistribution programme between the parties and how does it plan to extend and implement the clause in question and apply to the clause in question ? 
The recent serious events in Germany, national food safety authorities must be created today by all Member States, from all Member States, show that the latest serious events in Germany, national food safety authorities must be created today by all Member States. 
In practice, the European Court of Justice, the present directive provides the European public with greater security by allowing them to take advantage of health care that is needed, in other Member State and their differences to be reimbursed to the size set out by their national system. 
That is that this lesson was learnt from Parliament, namely that the greater power and greater responsibility has been made available to Parliament, namely that the greater power of power and greater responsibility. 
It is obvious that the payments based on the two pillars of the CAP are not just public resources but actually purchase public money, but actually purchases public good that can not be sufficiently rewarded by the market. 
Mr President, it is truly the case, indeed, that is the case. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of this motion for a resolution based on the need to confirm that Europe and the European Parliament as a democratic elected body was always elected by the country of its citizens. 
I need to mention that the results of these measures will become clear in the long term, in the long term. 
It is being seen that in future, we will also see such positive development and the post-marketing market in future. 
It is particularly bearing in mind the fact that, in these situations, the regions have not even been involved and have no direct responsibilities, but also given that it is precisely that they will be affected most affected by restrictions on the use of structural funds. 
The Council will be involved in the next partof the Human Rights Council on behalf of the Council of the European Union Council. 
It sasasasa: : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : : no: : : no: : : no: : : no: : : no: : Stno: : : : : Stno: : : Stno: : Stsa: Stsa: Stsa: : Stsa: : : :. 
It is that, as a form of political governance, this may be one of the reasons for the moral crisis that we all speak for at the heart of the economic crisis. 
In Europe, it is wise to be able to share part of our sovereign debt, even though Mrs Merkel does not approve this. 
( RO ) Mr President, Commissioner, the secrecy that returned Taiwan, affected the lives of hundreds of thousands of people and destruction tens of thousands of people and destroyed over tens of thousands of houses. 
The approach that the approach we have developed on this issue is completely logical. 
We also ensure that there are no gaps between the old directives that are cancelled and the 2004 directive on measurable corresponds. 
It is being said that the number of patients with Alzheimer 's disease is doubling every 20 years of growing growing in every year. 
For this reason, the European Union must take advantage of any opportunity to make clear unanimously the importance of common values of common values through the European External Action Service. 
services are in constant contact with the German authorities and they have now spread information among Member States through the Risk Sancky Risk Air Aviation and Food and Food and Afe. 
The people were closed to the people of the people who were closed, under deportation and executions. 
It is to have a leading role in Nagoya in the protection of biodiversity, but even the European Union is not able to stop the loss of biodiversity loss. 
They are less represented in politics and in the management board of companies or, in other words, they are excluded from the decision-making process in politics and the economy. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, energy security is an area where the EU must actively act with the greatest degree of unity and coordination, as is not the case with many other European initiatives, and we, European Conservatives and Reformists, support the creation of a common energy market, as this will strengthen the position of the Member States in terms of the main suppliers of the main suppliers, while limiting the opportunities for certain strategic suppliers to abuse their dominations with their domination, but also play a political situation. 
progress has been noted in terms of energy security with the ratification of the intergovernmental agreement on Nabucco, as well as in the field of aviation cooperation - with the parallel of the horizontal Air Agreement between the EU and Turkey. 
The official passports, others are willing to accept any kind of documents, and the third countries do not accept passport as proof of of vaccinations made vaccinations. 
Climate Change will not be suspended with the delay in the economy and - despite the last recent - the poorest countries will suffer from our carbon consumption. 
We are eligible to the European Union 's funds aimed at the public budget in order to spend through national systems under the exclusive accountability of the Minister of finance, and verified by the high audit audit institutions of the Member States. 
Among external relations, in all cases, it will be renewed on the basis of the current events, namely the meeting of the General Affairs Council meeting in May and June, on which questions are going to be dealt with, on defence and development, among other things in the ordinary agenda. 
However, most countries need to be taken due to the country 's own interests, because of its citizens, to protect its own future. 
Basically, Mr Rehn, my only desire is that the negotiations there be held there in the close to the people, and not to dictate outside the outside. 
My fellow Members will remember that in my previous quality, I have raised the issue of the CAP ' ( General System of Preferences ) and Sri Lanka. 
It is to remember that some of the six affected countries - such as Belarus, Ukraine, Ukraine and Georgia - are important transit countries. 
The harmonisation of policies will be put in place in terms of resources for supporting this process and I hope that the special EU representative and the head of the EU delegation will be compatible in one position. 
We have forgotten the people, who sacrificed their health and even their lives in the fight against the accident, as well as the hundreds of thousands of thousands of thousands who had to leave their homes. 
As this was a particular event for us, would you have made a number of common remarks for this first session of questions and answers and answers to this first session ? 
I welcome this fact if I did not notice that the Icelandic Members who are mainly in the interests of human rights and who, for this reason, often, often, often, often, often,. 
To a question relating to the budget that was asked by someone who have been asked, let us try, first of all, to reach consensus on the fundamental principles. 
( EL ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, it was precisely a year ago that the copper colour of the Greek economy and Greece was entered into the catastrophic Morana and a mechanism for support. 
This situation is the reason why it is beautiful that the quality of their life remains at the level of developing a developing country, which is, in turn, increasing the trend of exclusion and the race of hatred radiological action. 
It also does not include the existence of other types of unions, such as the one-stop couples recognised in some Member States. 
We agree with reports like this, we are taking away from the power to vote in favour or against, and we give it the primary guilty of the jurisdictions. 
We must concentrate ourselves and think carefully and think about thinking and carefully. 
operators for which approval will be required for are clearly regulated and clearly regulated. 
agricultural production, which can make a significant contribution to food security and trade in third countries, and to reduce the trade deficit of the Member States, is a major aspect of this policy. 
cross-border infrastructure and, in particular,, it is the place where we are lagging behind very much where we are lagging behind in a very border infrastructure and, in particular, where we are lagging behind very much. 
I expect particular interest in the response by the European Parliament on the part of its proposals in its communication on its communication on its proposals in its communication on its approach. 
I would like to say very clearly that, until we give freedom to information about our allowances and expenditure, the citizens will look at Parliament as an institution that preaches transparency, but does not apply it to themselves. 
The need to recover our economy is the need to recover our economy 's economy ? 
Critism or of political religious terrorism is it about religious terrorism ? 
As regards some of the points that you wanted to respond in detail, I believe that it is better to provide you with an information cope at an expert level. 
This context must be made all efforts to ensure economic, social and territorial cohesion and gender equality and gender equality. 
The only way to stop the loss of biodiversity is through radical change in our behaviour. 
Equality and solidarity are not a privilege of the minority, but the right of everyone, because human rights and civil rights are urgently in the eyes of the day. 
I am rightly seeing an opportunity to return to America back on the global stage, on the right track, to reverse America. 
The most important objectives of the programme are the modernisation of vocational education and training ( PH) and higher education objectives. 
Could you move them on Wednesday, 5 May, instead of Thursday, 6 May, 6 May, instead of Thursday, 6 May 6 May, 6 May, be you could make them transfers back to Wednesday, 5 May ? 
regional policy now and in future represents the European integration framework for the implementation of these objectives are now in the future and in the European integration framework for the implementation of these objectives. 
Members, are provided for very explanations of vote, so we need to be extremely strict in terms of time, too. 
We do not want the Poles to be the second EU citizens ' quality of EU citizens, the Charter of Fundamental Rights must be adopted in its entirety. 
At least, we owe this, as well as the condemnation of perpetrators, to the victims and their families, to the victims and their families. 
Finally, on the issue of climate change - once again - we can always be more ambitious, once again, as we can always be more ambitious. 
I am convinced that the amendment tabled by my group explains these issues, I am sure that the amendment tabled by my group, explains these issues. 
So, Mrs Ashton, here is also Mr Tony Blair, your former Ben Wales, who is designed to dictator dictators. 
I would like to say that, in the course of the considering the multiannual financial framework and the new instruments, in the course of the budget review and vision, we also need to look at the functioning and added value of the European Globalisation Adjustment Fund, as well as all other instruments, and, in particular, with regard to the impact on governance and interaction at national and European level. 
However, countries, even before the recession, have had high levels of sovereign debt, which was in breach of the Stability and Growth Pact, even before the recession, and were high. 
This report, therefore, is why I believe that Europe must defend its own nature and contribute to maintaining its national parks. 
I would like to ask you all to support this position - we need to win this vote in favour of win this vote. 
but probably not least important is what has been said about the extraordinary judicial agreements, but perhaps not least, it is important that what is said about the extraordinary agreements. 
As far as solidarity is concerned, we have never fully prepared or have plans available with excellent plans. 
in writing. - ( LT ) The report on the proposal for a regulation of the European Parliament and of the Council amending Regulation ( EC ) No 10on the definition of general provisions for the European Regional Development Fund, the European Social Fund and the Cohesion Fund, in terms of simplifying certain requirements and in terms of the simplification of financial management provisions relating to financial management provisions. 
Mr President, I would first of all like to express my satisfaction at the point of the unanimity that is being shocked by the views expressed in this House today, I hope that the Council will also impress it. 
I followed with great concern that the corrupt scandals in Ukraine and the judicial processes of politicians accused of us in ways that I have comments in common. 
We should also encourage local authorities to do the same thing and do the same to do the same, the same thing as local authorities. 
2002, around 200 women have participated in the Norway Governments and this figure is almost five times more times more. 
I would like to mention one question that is not directly linked to the agreements, but it is certainly related to the subject, in other words, the debate in the Council, whether and we need to develop a European PNR system for PNR. 
It is not so clear what technologies would be appropriate to replace the capacity of nuclear power plants ' nuclear power plants ' capacity. 
I would like to take this opportunity to join other colleagues in order to reach the request to Commissioner Diamandouros to ban technology using cyanide technology using cyanide. 
Member of the Commission. - Madam President, first of all, I would say that, compared with this morning, there is finally a little peace and a calm in this Chamber : there is a little peace and a calm in this morning : in this House ! 
President cut off the speaker ) the speaker of the speaker ) 
The agreements concluded - on the readmission of persons residing and facilitating the issuance of visa issuing - will be fully in favour of achieving these objectives. 
This report is about the future of this report in terms of its integration in European politics, in terms of its integration into European policy, in European policy, in Europe 's future. 
It is being seen that its inclusion will not be in question the effectiveness of good legislation we adopted in Parliament, in other words, the Transatlantic Translation Directive or an action plan that was adopted recently at the latest unanimously. 
A new mission within the framework of the ESDP in Somalia will once again reach the substance of the problem, but will only be combated with symptoms. 
National schemes, as well as the possibility of release, will, to a certain extent, delay the modernisation process, but at the same time, national economies which depend on coal in electricity production will be given the opportunity to introduce innovation and in reasonable times. 
Now that we must now, more than ever, invest in education, research, energy efficiency and, above all, in the people, in the people. 
I voted for a large number of amendments aimed at imposing greater responsibilities for transport companies in the event of loss or damage of lugage, particularly in the event of a telephone damaging or death of passengers. 
Lastly, I consider it positive that the amendment stresses the responsibility of Member States to ensure safe, high quality, effective and affordable healthcare in their territory. 
Thirtyareas : firstly, firstly, the dissemination in the academic world : firstly, the dissemination in the academic world, is a first troubled world : first, the dissension in the academic world. 
I agree with this objective of the rapporteur 's conviction that it will be crucial that the full involvement of the European Parliament will be fully involved in the implementation of the obligations by the Treaty of Lisbon and its general interpretation by Parliament and the Commission in the new Framework Agreement. 
When Member States are envisaged for protection reasons for victims, the operation of measures stopped the limit of the issuing state issuing state. 
They must share their experience and include both scientifically and health professionals, as well as health professionals, and health professionals. 
I think that I think that SMEs should remain a priority of our sustainability actions, including sustainable employment, including sustainable employment. 
The people to leave this decision without any further influence on the part of the EU, and leave the people to decide without further influence on the part of the EU. 
I say, on behalf of the Commission, that we are expecting constructive cooperation with you, including, of course, on some of the most pressing international challenges that we face, and the subject of today 's debate is undoubtedly undoubtedly as much. 
The Union must promote reforms aimed at modernising public, political and legislator structures that will ensure the opening of the country to the world will provide freedom of information to the public, promote the independence of the media and invest in the building of the institutional capacity of corporate organisations and civil society organisations. 
These cases may be justified to provide a public public public funding to projects with the means of a Member State or the EU, perhaps, or the public funding. 
At the moment, air transport between EU Member States and Canada has only been regulated by bilateral agreements between the EU and Canada. 
We know that in bank in Cariera, which has gone bankrupt or was art from the country, there was a movement of EU funds and money. 
We can create radio fronts, even though trading in the EU is a educational example of how to do so ! 
We have a coalition of hypocrites of hypocrites, we have a coalition of hypocritical hypocritics. 
A Europe strategy, which prioritises the social and environmental needs of the interests of competition, is a Europe that prioritises social and environmental needs to be given to the interests of competition. 
In the context of what we have said, we seem more words than in the context of what we are saying, than in the context of what we are seeing in the context of what we are saying. 
I would like to point out that the 2002 directive provided for self-employed drivers to be covered by 23 March 2009. 
I therefore believe that we must combat protectionism and support free trade and support free trade in the world and free trade. 
In practical terms, the strategy will also be influenced by the designated plan for action to achieve a low carbon economy by 2050, which is to be published at the start of next year. 
also voting intentions : see Minutes 
President of the Council. - ( HU ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, Commissioner, I am very pleased to be able to speak with you before the next European Council meeting, although the role of the Presidents is defined in the Lisbon Treaty in such a way that way that the preparation of the European Council meetings is, above all, the responsibility of the permanent President of the permanent President. 
There are damage to whose consequences will be felt for a long time, as part of the agricultural land will be in the year for processing. 
The micro-credits are based on the clear wording that today 's financial system does not provide sufficient resources for small and especially small businesses, in other words that the system does not make use of the human capital of so-called vulnerable groups ' capital. 
It is important that fraud is one of the main reasons for injustice in the EU, as they are the reason for unfair competition and unbalanced market. 
Thank you very, Mr President, Mr President, Mr President,, Mr President,,,, Mr President, for you, Mr President,, to do so. 
This dramatic point for Europe is constantly emerging in a recommendation to reduce greenhouse gas emissions by 30 %, for example - something that will be detrimental to the economies of Central and Eastern Europe countries, including Poland, including Poland. 
We are clarifying this : the European institutions and Member States must cooperate in order to achieve this objective. 
It is a motion for a resolution, in conclusion of the debate, in the conclusion of the debate, in conclusion of the debate, in the conclusion of a debate. 
agriculture must remain a priority area for the EU, the EU must remain a priority area for the EU. 
It has been closely linked to the promise of EUR million in 2010, in 2010, of EUR million. 
( NL ) Madam President, sometimes, it is sometimes an opportunity to go on new roads, including in European politics, including in European policy, sometimes emerging from new roads. 
Latvia 's contribution to Eastern enlargement is mutual trust demonstrated by our bilateral relations, whose roots are leading to a shared period in history and the valuable experience of this trust. 
We have a duty to focus on the energy crisis 's energy crisis, we have to focus on the energy crisis, with a duty to address. 
It is an integral part of the EU 's energy strategy, so this new strategy is a application of the higher energy strategy and will create synergies and consistency in our work at European level. 
It is in the future, in our work with Yemen, to take into account not only external affairs, but also internal needs, but also internal needs. 
We are trying to work together to put these objectives together, then we will really do something important in cooperation with our partners in the benefit of the region and in favour of us ourselves. 
Those who openly state their Bulgarian ethnic ethnic origin are sometimes subject to discrimination sometimes sometimes being subjected to discrimination. 
It is that most Member States, including my own and many others, practise forms of tax competition, which are very harmful to the common European interests. 
It is not a question of whether we are willing to reduce unemployment or increase in innovation funds. 
We have shown mixed small aid and we need to change this and we need to change this. 
The sitting was closed at a.m. at ) 
It must do everything necessary to ensure that the perpetrators of these crimes are not punished and unpunished. 
The Council received a draft Commission draft conclusion of the UN Convention on the Rights of Persons with Disabilities with disabilities was granted by the Commission. 
For both any other instrument, it is very important to think about how to use it to use it to use it as well as to all other instruments, as for each other, it is very important to think about how to use it. 
Mr President, during our debate here today, it seems that Alexander Lukashenko is borne to his insult in Friday without international sings, precisely because it is precisely because the international community does not recognise Belarusian elections as free, honest or transparent. 
A high level in Seoul has given new impetus to the conclusion of the Doha Round and highlighted the commitment of the G20 to combat all forms of protectionism. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of the motion for a resolution by the European Parliament on the fight against the genital mutilation of female genital mutilation in the European Union. 
In accordance with the policies I advocate, I believe that it is important to adopt a zero budget based at the start of every parliamentary term. 
An discrimination based on sexual orientation ( or any other basis ) in the European Union can be tolerated. 
It is oriented to children 's approach, which recognises that early child age is crucial for cognitive, seasonal and physical development, for emotional and personal development and for learning and learning of languages, and also represents the basis for lifelong learning. 
We are struggling with criminal groups through transnational cooperation between the EU - the ultimate goal of transnational cooperation, and the countries, as a starting point for illegal criminal groups. 
When one of the fundamental principles of European democracy is at risk, the meetings and nothing is done and does nothing. 
peace is a better peace than a better conflict of bloody conflict, a better conflict is a better than a bargaining conflict. 
audit 2008 auditors show only 10 % of the budget budget, which is showing a light on 10 % of the 2008 budget. 
The concentration of death is taking place after seconds or minutes, or in a few seconds or minutes. 
The microfinance facility was set up in March 2010 with the funding provided by the Commission and Banglade and, on the basis of a common value and of EUR 200 million. 
It has many elements that show us where to focus on it. 
The financial and financial crisis has affected European companies, not to mention the budget of the Member States ' budget of the Member States, but a financial crisis has affected hard on the European companies, not to mention the budget of the Member States ' budget. 
It believes that, in cases where the provisions of the directive are clear enough, accurate and comprehensive, the same could be transformed directly into direct scope to the regulation through a recast through a recast. 
A area that I believe in my opinion must be a particular priority for us is the development of intercultural relations. 
It is a reason that the crises are being made to overcome and help us build a solid basis for the future today, and today, on 9 May, and we are reminding the past, we are working on the present and looking to hope for the future. 
This conclusion to conclude that the need to be made to moratorium that a moratorium must be imposed, represents a successful attempt to focus on Europe as the centre of industry. 
However, if nothing else, we can at least say that there is a small positive element in all, because they will be able to think about things and understand that they really do now need help outside. 
We must take a political decision to allow the euro exception to be put in place in the Baltic States ' exclusion to the euro in the Baltic States. 
It is denounced, intolerable and scandalous, intolerable and scandal. 
I am thinking of this, for example, that I am convinced that, for example, some aspects of regional policy and cohesion policy aspects must be reviewed. 
We must now ensure that the conditions of the European market for third-country investors are the same and not better investors from the Member States, and that our energy concentration can be compete on a common basis and invested freely outside the European Union. 
There is a minimum wage in Europe, not necessarily at one level, but simply to introduce a minimum wage. 
Europeans, we can make symbolic gestures and express our reservations to the poor Nepal Government. 
You said that if we adopted this directive, it is a little patients who will take advantage of it and that this will be the very small number of good information patients well. 
A significant contribution to specific issues, but we must look at the broader European context in order to understand how important it is to what we are talking about. 
You allowed the implementation of provisions when necessary, when necessary, when necessary, there was a need for them. 
The situation of the honourable Member, this does not apply only to individual states, but not only to individual states. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
Honourable Members, it is essential to emphasise the fact that the conclusions of the Court of Auditors are being made, which is made by the Committee on the Control of the absorption of European funds, but I hope, at the same time, the recommendations and proposals of the European Parliament in the discharge reports, revolving years, in particular in areas where we still have high renovation rate. 
You are addressing the financial engineering, which is today one of the main instruments to support the credit for SMEs through the ERDF and also through JEREMIE, and also through JAMR, that we have started the process for a long time before the start of the crisis, so that the policy was also well-prepared for the difficult situation. 
Europeans are trying to ensure that all of us in Europe can freely face religion, which allows them to follow their heart and conscience and conscience. 
I tell you which the three main reasons for which I believe we did not achieve positive DAS, even though this was the goal set out at the beginning of the current mandate of the Commission. 
The people of Pakistan are currently suffering from the religious minority, and even more religious minorities have been oppressed between the institutional fanating of the Pakistani State and some religious religious, extremely reactionary and corporate coral forces of the Taliban. 
In other words, if people want a different foreign policy, there is absolutely no chance of changing politics, because they are able to courage the Council, they are only able to change the governments that people have the opportunity to change but not the Commission. 
The programme applied by 2009 to strengthen Georgia 's economy is still essential to further develop positive political and economic relations, and also in connection with national security. 
I am concerned that I am in the United Nations Social Party, which is a visit ' Party of the Socialist Party of Ireland, and which is the Ossetia of the Polo, with the rights of military and Sinti and the right to the minimum ethnic self-determination. 
In this regard, the Nabucco gas pipeline is the Nabucco gas pipeline, in this regard. 
Commissioner, please stop being cast behind last year 's decisions and taking into account what is actually happening now in fact ! 
We can achieve the impossible and avoid the burner ', which is preceded by the UK 's main UK scientific advisor, the Serbian Border, who, in 2009, said that in 2030, we expect a persistent stent storm because all these things move along the same town. 
In order to adopt free competition, our citizens want and they must be sure that the rules are the same for all the same rules. 
This easy Abert Manukov - who was time called by Mr Ronan Chancellor - who shares the highest fire in my country - I share the highest firstplace in my country. 
Other methods of achieving influence, which are probably more effective than the arms embargo, and other methods of the arms embargo. 
I hope that the important issues of coordinating financial services particularly now, when some countries show signs of the first signs of this period of negative growth, be the main subject of talks, not the open subject of the bankruptcies. 
In the regulatory field that makes the country a partner partner, is encouraged by trade, by trade, in the regulatory field. 
The European Union has the biggest experience in the field of joint work and in the entry into unresearchers, which should play an important role in the region. 
The diplomacy of the critics, which the Members of the Pakistani Parliament, which I met two weeks ago, does not give the desired results so far. 
( PT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, it is not the case, often one topic to combine, at the same time ( and in a positive manner ) the three most important issues of health, culture and the economy. 
Today, we see that there are too many cases of premature death, which are caused by poor quality of air, in Europe today. 
It has increased because the regime fear of the spread of the revolution from the Middle East and North Africa revolution. 
To promote good intentions, I abstained from you to encourage good intentions, I abstained from the point of view of the good intentions. 
We report shows us the very sad fact that, even the crisis will not even help us to do this role better. 
The information provided by the Court of Auditors of Auditors of the annual accounts for the financial year 2009 are reliable and the underlying transactions are legal and regular. 
It has also played a role in the evernumber of accidents, and it has also played a part in the increasingly increasing number of accidents. 
This can also add to the national interests of the individual Member States, too, the national interests of the individual Member States, and we can also add to the national interests of the individual Member States, too. 
I know that Russia and China are against sanctions, but the European Union must make every effort to convince these forces to agree with sanctions that are an alternative to sending the army 's army. 
From this point of view, it is essential to ensure genuine coherence of policies directly affecting the least developed countries, such as in the following areas : development aid, trade, fisheries, the environment, agriculture, climate change, energy, investment and finance, in order to reduce poverty and guarantee decent incomes and in the Georgian people. 
It is that you are trying to get the risk of trying to get the fact that the draft is not working on the table. 
Member States have already taken this step, and I hope that they will be followed by other Member States and also by the other European Union as an institution as an institution. 
A directive that only concerns women, because they can only give lives and they can only delay and later, and these can only be revised. 
The status quo no longer is a realistic option of option as NATO 's powers announcements announcing one after another of Afghanistan, and we do not yet know whether the country can guarantee its own security. 
It is that the Belarusian political activists and independent experts say that the regime has not changed fundamentally, and only has cosmetics change. 
I would stress that I support the fact that I support transparency and access to documents and access to documents, and public access to documents, and access to documents. 
This report will certainly make an important contribution to our internal discussions and I can assure you that we will be able to look at many of the proposals that it contains. 
In the same way, if the donation of living donors in the European Union is to achieve the level in the dynamic countries in the American countries, the United Kingdom and the Netherlands, it will release even 2 000 people from the need to subject dialogues every day. 
These EUR 100 million certainly must not be taken by the Progress programme, because it has the same objectives, the new mechanism must be fully separate, have a different budget and ensure that more money is allocated. 
We urgently send coordinated aid, but this should be done, without asking ourselves to the temptation of neo-along the temptation of neo-along the net line. 
We should stop wasting taxpayers ' money for speculative banks and countries that have failed to manage our economy. 
We are now experiencing difficulties as a result of the implementation of European legislation, because the European Union will not allow us to release the NGOs from VAT payment organisations. 
It is clear : at the moment, the situation is not a good one and I agree with previous speakers that there seems to be a serious political battle for who is exactly what is exactly the answer to the creation of a situation. 
( NL ) Mr President, I would like to draw attention to the colleagues invited to Mr Van Rompuy 's invitation to the next Council meeting of the Council 's invitation to the invitation of the invitation by Mr Van Rompuy for the next Council meeting. 
It will include sharing the resources and information available between the countries of the region and coordinating their actions. 
The European Investment Bank 's activities are even more transparent to the European Parliament and financial instruments it provides, to make use of the European Investment Bank 's activities more targeted. 
Mr President, I welcome the opportunity to speak on a subject that is close to my heart, to my heart, to my heart. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
Sudan should become the primary objective of the European Union in the field of humanitarian development in the area of humanitarian development. 
You are used missed instruments, because you are taking the money from taxpayers ' money to help the banks and those who speculate with banks and other financial products with other financial products. 
Many other issues that will continue to be discussed and I expect to look forward to discussing and I look forward to these debates with a lot of offences. 
in writing. - ( PT ) The work on the collection and systematic data collection, which has been possible through this report, should be assessed by dignity, as this enables us to build a realistic idea to the situation at the moment, which is very worrying in many relations, as the report rightly recognises. 
My hope that parliamentary cooperation will continue to play an important role in this process in this process. 
We would be more self-confident if we want to fulfil this against the backdrop of opposition to third countries. 
Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, Mexico has a major problem with drug trafficking and violence against drugs. 
I take advantage of my position to the chair of the EU-Iceland Joint Parliamentary Committee to convince the ambassadors not to be insulted in a position before this year, to understand exactly what the two parties are negotiated. 
( Applause ) ) ) ? 
It is very important that a more simplified legislative environment without undisproportionate bureaucratic burdens. 
Effective efficiency is undoubtedly one of the main issues in our struggle to protect our environment, in our struggle for environmental protection. 
The regulation of ratings of agencies will impose regulation on the ratings of ratings agencies will require regulation. 
We are sure that there are mechanisms for exile and that the more we will be back to the usual market conditions as soon as possible to be returned to the normal market conditions. 
In this background, I would like to say that many of the problems in Europe could be resolved by effectively mandatory compulsory education for all those residing in a country. 
It is a step behind itself, but it is hardly understood that someone after and after, she is attacked and raped. 
in writing. - ( EL ) Climate change is the result of irresponsible exploitation of natural resources by capital, because of profit profits. 
I would like to make sure that the Commission will be forced to submit a proposal to improve the situation in terms of violence against women in terms of violence against women. 
A fundamental treaty must include a real division of the authorities, indeed an independent European Court of Justice, which will address issues relating to subsidiarity, full transparency and savings, and, most importantly, the, the binding reference, is required. 
The votes, and this chapter you are ! you are ! you ! you are basically, and you are hunger ! You are basically sing the votes and that is the head of you are blame. 
It is that the serious pollution of ships must be classified and punished as criminal offence, and the maladministration of ships could be considered as a administrative distortion so that a distinction between the burden of the two types of activity can be distributed. 
( ET ) Ladies and gentlemen, democracy is based on transparency and openness, democracy is based on transparency and open openness. 
It is clear and when we can expect or when we can expect a proposal from the Commission to be in line with the Commission, or when we can expect a proposal to be proposed by the Commission. 
The group abstained because our most important amendments were rejected, namely Amendment 8 requiring the transfer of data to be subject to authorisation by the court and Amendment 9 required for the objectives of the Terrorist Finance Tracking Programme ( FP7 ) to use the Agreement on mutual legal assistance ( CPA ). 
I believe that the time is right, because only one case of unused funds is used to change the European citizens ' attitude to help rebuilding Haiti is needed. 
The Green Paper on consumer collective protection offers different ways of dealing with the problem of consumer collective protection is proposing different ways to deal with this problem. 
It is clearly obvious, obviously, obviously. 
The work of its work and reports in the relevant committees, in particular, the committees relating to the economic crisis, Parliament is already making a valuable contribution to the discussions organised by the operational group. 
( FR ) Mr President, the President of the Conference of Presidents has now come to a debate on Wednesday afternoon on the proposal by the Italian and French Government for a temporary refusal from the Schengen agreements. 
It is that two years after the protests, we do not know exactly how many people have been involved in the actions and have been punished by the Communist Party. 
It is a positive thing that further taps may be imposed in mountain areas, and it is positive that further taps can be imposed in mountain areas. 
The professionals are well aware that cynicism is one of the most toxic toxic substances of all chemicals of all chemical substances. 
An attempt shows that the trafficking in human beings and, in particular, the trafficking of children has reached endangered proportions both within the European Union and outside it. 
The Agency for the significant progress made in this regard in this regard, the Agency for the significant progress made in this respect has made in this regard. 
As evidence shows, this is not enough, it is not enough enough, as they are showing. 
The country has already had for two times now, and has had to have been imposed on such proposals. 
cooperate directly to find swift and pragmatic solutions to the problems presented by citizens and businesses directly to find swift and pragmatic solutions to the problems of the problems submitted by citizens and businesses. 
Not least because they are aware of the risks or because they are afraid of the consequences - not least - in terms of their future appointment - to report such injuries. 
It calls on the Commission to adopt clearly legislation on social responsibility in delaying the work of subcontractors throughout the whole productive process. 
It is leading to a better profile of the economy based on the knowledge that we are developing and to deepening specialisation. 
A part of all of this has been achieved in recent years, for example, in the field of medicines for children, a question that the public does not even realise that is a problem, but for which a solution is to be found on a European scale, because Member States can not solve it alone. 
However, the High North is comparative and therefore it is extremely sensitive and it is therefore extremely sensitive. 
The principle should constantly present new requests to the principle of present new requests, and I should constantly present new demands, to the new demands, to be continually present. 
As I said, I will be present to the Council of the Agriculture Ministers Council, I will attend the Council of Agriculture Ministers, as I said, to be present at the Council of Agriculture Ministers. 
The aim of this proposal can not be limited to harmonisation of European legislation, but should also promote health awareness of health awareness of health issues. 
It is a true that we have not managed to renew the mandate of an independent expert on the Democratic Republic of Congo ( DRC ), in fact. 
The intensity is being neglected for financial reasons and the interasions of supporters of supportive are being extended. 
We should create a status for these children, under which they do not receive education and are isolated in the geopolitical, simply because their parents are residing illegally. 
There are problems relating to the current financial collapse, but to claim that the crisis in air is due to the aircraft crisis is completely to it would be wrong. 
It will make a significant contribution to achieving minimum standards that guarantee better working conditions, more safety and less safety and less death in the world in this dangerous, but strategic sector, but an important strategic sector. 
As a fellow Member, would you like to clarify the clarifications to be made ? 
However, it must be supported by clear regulations, of course, to be supported by clear regulations. 
On behalf of the Confederal Group of the European United Left - Nordic Green Left - I would like to make it clear once again that we will not support this. 
Economic growth in the Asian countries has been showing serious violations of fundamental rights and human rights and human rights violations. 
I would like to highlight the Commission 's request to submit a report on an evaluation of the level of pollution and the biodiversity of the Gulf of Mexico, and to revise the capacity of the European Union to respond immediately to the emergency maritime oil facilities and to prepare a European action plan in cooperation with the Member States. 
The visit of the Lithuanian President, Mrs Gbassador, did not serve as a defeat of trust to the regime ? 
In this connection, the extension of the scope of the European Globalisation Adjustment Fund ( EGF ) and the optimisation of the ESF is aimed at responding to many emotions in the social and economic field, where necessary aid is needed. 
It is also a Treaty on the non-proliferation of nuclear weapons that the Treaty also contains civil elements, but today we are not talking about the renewal of nuclear energy for citizens ' purposes, we are talking about nuclear disarmament. 
dialogue with them and with the Czech authorities, in order to ensure that this dialogue is maintained, its constructive spirit and the opportunity to reach a solution. 
The EU 's actions are aimed at finding solutions to the problems relating to the crisis and in innovative times to restore stability in the Member States. 
in writing. - Although I strongly support the idea of extending copyright, this proposal has been made in the year for the purpose of the purpose of extending the copyright. 
Here, this law has to be implemented correctly, and I seriously support the proposal to conduct a accountability for sanctions imposed by the Member States. 
I am dependent on me to say, but let us say in a completely unlawful way that what has been said this evening is not necessarily linked to what was said before. 
That is how the Cohesion Funds can be described and how the Cohesion Funds can be used to support business partnerships in the creation of innovative ICT applications to promote and support cities and communities and use the ICT to reduce emissions. 
The renewable energy targets require a network of greater combining smart, smart, smart and, more interconnectivity, in order to manage the flaws properly managed. 
The conflict, of course, took many victims and caused the emergence of internal refugees in the country, causing problems for the economy and the rule of law. 
It is vital that our governments play a leading political role in encouraging the rest of states, such as the United States and China, come to an agreement. 
You, too, know you, of you. 
( FR ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, many women in Europe and throughout the world are fighting every day to end violence against them, but they can not and must not lead to this fight itself, because the acts of violence against women committed mainly by men are also acts of violence against all humanity. 
It is also that this ceremony is taking place here in the European Parliament - the guidance of democracy for all European citizens. 
I should not interfere in the personal issues of people whose judicial proceedings are still in the course of the person who have been in place. 
Structural Funds that have been mentioned by many of my fellow Members are another cause of concern. 
It is not even any person to keep to religious conviction or even if they should be protected and respected by everyone. 
Moldova is essential to continue with the implementation of the action plan for the European Neighbourhood Policy ( ENP ) and reforms that we have outlined in the document ' to Moldova. 
30 % of the third % of education is finished, but yet they do not do work because the qualifications that they have acquired are not meeting the needs of the market. 
( NL ) Madam President, today we are today making an important basis for the development of the European Neighbourhood and Partnership Instrument ( EAPA ) development in the European Neighbourhood and Partnership Instrument ( ENPI ). 
They allow them to receive and provide funding in relative circumstances, and to provide funding in relative circumstances. 
Today, we can now talk about improvement in the economic and financial crisis in some EU Member States, we must take into account that the crisis with all its silent consequences is still in its dissemination. 
Culture is attack on the fall of culture is attack on the attack. 
committees and delegations : see Minutes 
We are beginning to launch the partnership for energy and transport, along with the partnership on the environment, with the environmental partnership, with the environment partnership. 
Modern and minor are exploited and machines are being exploited and minors are being exploited. 
I have made a cloning in Adam Assange and my children and believe me very well, I am very well aware of what I am talking about. 
It is a major and dynamic economy with a total of EUR 1 300 billion and with a expected GDP of around 5 % in 2010 and 4 % in 2011. 
The World Health Organisation ( WHO ) is quite clear : the general generation of women is widespread practice in 28 African countries, in the Middle East and in some countries in Asia. 
There are very concrete examples of the fact that the Belarusian authorities are able to show good will and wish to carry out a true dialogue. 
We must compare with our obligation to achieve maximum sustainable catches by 2015 by 2015. 
The CAP should be reviewed in terms of the economic crisis and the fight against climate change, and the fight against climate change, and the preservation of its competitiveness in the global plan. 
We should not delude ourselves that, as we formulate some kind of policy, we will be able to resolve problems that other policies can not solve. 
( IT ) Mr President, ladies and gentlemen, after the disclosure of New York, an investigation in the United States of the secret banks - one of whom is a European - whose executive directors meet each Wednesday to agree on the derivatives. 
Health care, of course, has long been possible for everyone who can pay for them, but something must be done to those who can not pay for it. 
On values, on values, on values, on values, on values, on values, on values, on values of values,. 
More particular interest is mainly being made of the reduction in the size of the fleet, and at the same time it is not focusing on the fact that the European market is making dangerous products from the Falkov East, such as the recent fishing fish stocks. 
The Lisbon Treaty provides the EU with new prerogatives, confirms the development of its international capacities and introduces new instruments, and introduces new instruments. 
investment is definitely not the despaircraft medicine, for what was announced in Central and Eastern Europe, for example during the time of economic transition. 
It is important for the preparation of health and safe working conditions in the Union and for the best practices of Europe in this area at the moment, in order to assess health and safe working conditions in the Union and the best practices of Europe. 
The position expressed in paragraph 31 on the readmission agreements with third countries does not reflect the view of the Group of the European People 's Party ( Christian Democrats ) on this issue. 
( EL ) Madam President, Commissioner, it is simply a formality in today 's time to emphasise that the Black Sea is a region of strategic importance to the European Union. 
However, your account for the last five years and what you have presented to us so far - I am not talking about what could happen tomorrow, but what we have before us - I can tell you something that you certainly have one thing : you have not given the support of my group. 
In this connection, I would like to emphasise that the main objective of cohesion policy is to bring regional economies closer to regional economies by promoting productive capacity. 
Unfortunately, the negotiations that will now be held with the Council will hardly change this goal in a EU where the good of the Union as a whole is in a position to put pressure on national egoism. 
Basel Basel must think about creating networks for small banks to be supported by each other, and it is doing so. 
growth and prosperity have been achieved with oil, coal and gas, and therefore the transition to other sources will not be made for one day. 
agreements are therefore a small, but positive step in the right direction, but a positive step in the right direction in the right direction is a small, but positive step in the right direction. 
We must make use of the moment that we must make use of the agreement that we need to come to a rapid agreement quickly to an agreement. 
The increase in individual years, the demand for new ways of individual expression, or even the changes of demographic trends, civil participation has made significant changes in recent years. 
It is to be more strict to be more strict to be more stringent than just as it is. 
We therefore believe that the credit facilitation and Eurobonds must be made available, huge resources must be invested in terms of innovation, in the greening of buildings, in the energy sector, and to work on the protection of the plan for the affected restructuring and unemployment, to point out the way to help unemployment, such as the scope of the European Globalisation Adjustment Fund. 
ETP 's choice procedure provides independence from the influence of large companies, both during the choice process and in terms of the forms of the selection of a high guide ; 
Parliament and again we are listening to the exchange of best practices between the Member States, and we are once again listening to the exchange of best practices between Member States, and we are once again listening to the exchange of best practices between Member States. 
It is urging the Orange to change this situation and to inform the Court of Auditors of Auditors of the measures taken, for measures taken, and it calls on the measures taken by the Court of Auditors for measures taken. 
A year of financial contribution will be made in each programme and will attend the committee meetings as a observer on the issues relating to Switzerland. 
This hypocritical approach can not continue in mind the fact that, on the one hand, we need limits to our farmers on the traceability of health and safety, by justifying consumer protection and, on the other hand, we allow products that fail to cover these requirements, freely to be imported to our continent. 
This seems to be that budget support is almost used in the health sector in the countries of subAfrica in subAfrica by subAfrica. 
That said recently, a number of reports that we have reached to us have learnt that some companies are working on how to ' more than animals. 
Are we having an international investigation of these cases in an international investigation of these cases ? 
The improvement must be made during the next summit that will take place on 18 May in Madrid and during which the High Representative of the Union for Foreign Affairs and Security Policy and Educt Security Policy must actively participate. 
Devision must automatically be purchased on a telephone, and this often leads to a very grave distinction among consumers. 
He meeting of October 2010, he was meeting of October 2010 at October 2010 meeting at October 2010 on October 2010, of October 2010. 
............................................................................................................................................................ ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? 
The Union must insist on compliance with consumer protection provisions so that European citizens are not faced with the risk of purchasing products that are dangerous to health, goods or risk defects or counterfeit products. 
As I said, it is a temporary agreement ; it may and will be improved and will be improved. 
There is a now a zone in force for a long time long time, an area has been in place for a long time long time now. 
We in this Chamber play a role in what we can call the confidence of the citizen ' confidence '. 
It will all see what the Eldoctrine of the wrong conscience ' - they do not understand the real interests, and we must impose them a better system. 
Do we now continue to continue with the adoption of stricter measures or, rather, that the approach that the approach is the best way to negotiate with the Iranian regime ? 
The fact that the achievement of this transatlantic market, for example, is one of the best answers that we can give. 
We all welcome this horizontal directive, but there are differences between us in terms of tone, and sometimes on the specific content. 
I am obliged to regret the recent attacks in the holding of the Catholic Tuberculosis in Barcelona and I call on the Spanish Government and the European institutions to condemn and fight against the Christian atmosphere that, which, as if it is hopeful. 
committees and delegations : see Minutes 
A system of names of measurable media and registration of good work and registration work in good marriage. 
These conditions, women will undoubtedly be in their position to stay in their position, in the same conditions, in the future, in their position will be relevant. 
The resolution by the Group of the Alliance of Liberals and Democrats for Europe has highlighted that we want the proposed stress tests to become binding for Member States and to allow independent experts to manage the implementation of the tests, and that the tests must be transparent. 
I would like to make two general remarks to make two general remarks, two general remarks, and to make two general remarks, common remarks, as a matter of principle. 
It is also important to give the report on the eligibility of investment in energy efficiency and energy efficiency and renewable energy from renewable sources in housing. 
( ES ) Mr President, as you know, in Nigeria, one of the major countries in the Sahel region - the end of this month, presidential and parliamentary elections are taking place. 
Iceland can get the same, but it is very difficult to define timetable for other countries that are not so well prepared. 
However, I would like to remind the President-in-Office of the Council that in early 2008, the Doha Round was on the road, but it has failed to conclude an agreement, because some countries from the RRURONI Group ( Brazil, Russia, India, India and China ) did not want to make any concessions. 
I wish to continue the discussion with Parliament and the Committee on International Trade, and all the more so that we are already moving towards the end of these talks. 
I therefore voted in favour of this resolution, therefore, of this resolution, of this resolution voted in favour of this resolution. 
The Arctic Council itself represents an organisation of an optional legal nature without a fixed budget or staff. 
Some communications : in relation to the signing of legislation adopted under the ordinary legislative procedure, in the context of the signing of legislation adopted under the ordinary legislative procedure. 
The denial of I come from, Donald Austria, was able to save it to save a kind threatened by disappearance that is now spreading in a widespread area - somewhere in the light of the spread of farmers and forest workers, whose sense of conscience are very different. 
Let us not fail to enter into the teachers as a bad example of Eurointegration as a bad example of Eurointegration, but let us not enter the current situation as a bad example of Eurointegration. 
It is a huge infrastructure to provide a huge infrastructure whether it is a marginal energy system in the North Sea, or in a smaller scale, in the slightest, to claim electric cars. 
Indeed, safe nuclear energy is the one that does not exist, which does not exist, which does not exist, which does not exist, is truly safe. 
It is being seen that these reactions that are in line with the tragedy will put a precedent and that, in other cases, there would be a grave violation of human rights violations, the European Union will have a courage to act as quickly as possible. 
committees : see Minutes 
It means that not only everyone will have to respect the brain of the law, but will also have to respect the European Union 's opinion. 
It seems not worth implementing the requirement for maintaining sexual and reproductive health in its projects, in its projects, in its projects. 
In the area of media media in Hungary ( motions for resolutions tabled ) : see Minutes 
It is clearly unacceptable that unacceptable is clearly unacceptable and unacceptable. 
The House judged that the Agency 's annual accounts for the financial year 2009 are reliable and that the underlying transactions are legal and regular. 
Your comments on the European Research Area, your comments on the European Research Area. 
I would like to ask doctors to exert pressure and to turn them into the traders of the pharmaceutical industry traders. 
A negative element of the report is perhaps the fact that it only provides for the three working languages - English, French and German, such as the languages to be submitted, as the languages to which the request should be submitted, except to the original language. 
The increase in this cooperation, including a budget of EUR 15 million for the DCI programme, will increase the choice of consumers and increase consumers ' choice and put more variety of and diverse cultural products in the European and international market. 
It is important, as the honourable Members have said, that we continue to consider how we are concluding agreements and the tools that we have to do so and ensure that the tests are put in place in place when necessary. 
However, it must not simply mean aid to these European regions, which are already achieving results more than the average level of average. 
In practice of discriminating against these women and girls, in practice, against these women and girls, in practice, in practice, against these women and girls. 
The Hungarian Government plans to improve the energy efficiency of the largest consumers in the public sector by 60 % by modernising public institutions ( including the installation of the cellation of cellaries and modernisation systems and systems for heating ) based on the draft programme for the energy efficiency of buildings and climate protection. 
This year, Brazil will mark a further phase in its em as an economic and political gigigigiant, when the presidential elections are held in the country and President Kurdish has been held in a position since he was a maximum of two mandate. 
On these issues, we believe that it is a priority in the light of the economic crisis in which the Member States are, at a time when the stringent budgetary measures are still having a growing burden on the small-scale countries. 
The CAP must propose immediate solutions to the impact that the economic crisis is has on agricultural businesses, such as the lack of access to credit for farmers, the limits on agricultural incomes and increasing unemployment in rural areas. 
However, the true face of a policy is declining, aimed at the pace of a policy aimed at the pace of Europe 's pace. 
We must appreciate them high, appreciate them, high on assessing them. 
The fact that Parliament has made every effort to make the legislative initiative procedure possible and easy for use for EU citizens, because it is in fact that they will actually use it. 
It can not control the other body, but can not control the other way. 
As for Pakistan, it is our main concern and our fundamental interests for us to be stable democracy, a free democracy, a free of terror and capable of participating with their neighbours in defence of common threats to the defence of common threats. 
We must express our concern about the increasingly often imposed presence for a ban on the leave of Iran, which could lead to the logical conclusion that the authorities of power considers the remaining in Iran for punishment. 
There is social diversity of this social one thing, there is social in social terms, of this ? 
It has been included in the election campaign that is there and there is a precampaign that is there there to be there. 
It is necessary for the legitimate demands of the social groups in disadvantaged situations to be recognised by all parties involved in the country 's government of the country. 
The common system for preferences ( GSP ) is one of the tools that enables developing countries to compete on international markets by supply or reducing duties, or of zero charges, to access their exports to the EU market. 
Not particularly progressive forces have tried to use the economic decline as an excuse for withdrawing the necessary climate commitments on climate change. 
The local authorities and citizens are extremely useful, stressing that internal dialogue is working and effective at all levels, so the Danube Strategy is a strategy for European citizens. 
The car sector obviously has good countries ; the car sector is a very strong economic sector in Europe. 
The crisis has also had an impact on the crisis, too, has had an impact on the crisis, too. 
I would be very clear : there is no alternative, but we have to continue to help strengthen the democratic forces in the civil society of Pakistan. 
With regard to commitments, this is even a reduction in the budget in real terms of the budget in real terms. 
Moreover, the European Commission programmes for humanitarian aid provide assistance in the areas of providing water and food security and food security. 
In the area of measurement, the scope of a widerange of areas of diamonds to technology or coastlines, and will be important for the overall definition of standards in connection with carbon dioxide in future. 
In the European Parliament, we must support this in the European Parliament, we must support this in the European Parliament. 
It is truly failed to really eliminate the weaknesses of the existing measures that have led to a lack of transparency and coordination between the parties and to unjustifiable delays in the process of collecting the recovering of the commitments made. 
As a result, I think we need to make more effort to reduce the risk of disasters and provide support for Community capacity in connection with the preparation of disasters. 
On the other hand, we must fight more effectively with illegal immigration, we must combat illegal immigration more effectively with illegal immigration and we must combat. 
The attacks behind attacks are trying to trigger a clash between the East and West, taking the Muslim world against the Christian world against the Christian world. 
industry and industries are an important part of economic policy economic policy, and are an important part of economic policy, of economic policy, which is important. 
However, the principle of not being paid to organs will not hinder the living donors even if this compensation is only being made up of costs and the omital revenues as a result of donation. 
It is to show them clearly the horrific and to both regimes and to the two regimes, and to show them clearly, both regimes. 
It is not logical to oppose the aid we are discussing. 
The G20 summit in Seoul 's G20 Summit in Seoul. 
It will enable the free movement of patients and will enable patients to have access to services with better quality and, at the precise time, to be able to have access to services and to the quality and to be able to access patients. 
Moreover, the report recommends that the coordination of financial provisions should impose greater responsibility on the issue at global level in terms of the global level. 
The annual report on 2009 on human rights, which has recently adopted, has highlighted the need for the Union to play an active role in efforts to improve human rights and democracy worldwide. 
All of you best, all of you best, is best best of all best for all of you. 
The objective of the new protocol is to define the fishing opportunities offered by EU vessels, with regard to access and support for the sector and continue cooperation between the EU and the Comoros, strengthening the framework for Partnership, in which to develop sustainable fisheries policy and respond to the use of fisheries resources in the fisheries area of the marine island in the interests of both parties. 
This is because it is also important in the context of our debate today, too, in the context of our debate today, today 's debate is today also in the context of our debate. 
response to the crisis in the real economy, the crisis in businesses and industry focus on jobs. 
I am also said to those who say that in this sector, in particular, very unlikely things are taking place, and there are many injustice and there are many injustice. 
Many Members, but as has been said, you are definitely a one-off number as far as work with us. 
It is an excuse for the crime, regardless of the place where it has been carried out in the real or in the virtual world, but, of course, it is much easier to combat crime in the real world, because we have tools that allow us to intervene directly. 
Firstly, I would like to take my condolences today and to express my sympathy to the people of Haiti, particularly to the people of Haiti affected so hard by this catastrophe. 
It is a matter of people with disabilities, our political differences are taking place in terms of the end objective, namely to ensure higher quality of life and work. 
There should be problems that are resolved through national democratic mechanisms and procedures of the Italian Republic, through national democratic mechanisms and procedures, through the Italian Republic. 
In future, I support what has been said today by Catherine Ashton and my group that it is necessary to maintain open multilateral approach and to focus on civil society and on him support for him. 
It is absolutely necessary to support dialogue between the two leaders and the two communities that they currently need to make use of the chance in 2009 to make full agreement - and of course we expect Turkey to contribute to a favourable political climate to this agreement. 
The Intergroup on urban Research, which I have the honour of being President, we have highlighted urban development over the last few years : for ten years, urban development has been covered three times, and the honourable hole of Luxembourg. 
However, in general, I consider the work of the agencies for positive work of the agencies for positive positive work of the agencies for positive work on the agencies for positive terms. 
Before the vote vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote before the vote 
I will also mention the protection of international recognised transport corridor in the Gulf of Adam Gulf 's Gulf. 
I, and I have met many of the people affected by the opposition movement, civil society, the families of the free of freedom and the general public. 
I agree with you, Commissioner Barnier, that, compared to the United States, we can speak positively about what we have done in our back to the Structural reforms, which they could not even achieve in its last financial law, particularly in the area of insurance, and that we can also show this in Washington when we are imposing. 
A country must be assessed on the basis of its capability, and the topic of the process must be regulated according to them must be regulated. 
The figure is hedge figure on a daily basis is hedge scourge. 
2010 sessions : see Minutes 
The European Community and the Republic of Mauritania provides for visatravel to the territory of the other contracting party to the maximum period of three months for a sixperiod for a sixperiod for a sixperiod. 
Otherwise, it will continue to be selected by national actors, each of which persecutes its own national interests, and it will be vulnerable in terms of the charges of controlling the party of the past and the train of unscrupulous external suppliers. 
Several times, it has been ineffective to call for the financing of security charges to be regulated, but without success without success. 
The framework agreement can be an opportunity to deepen the political dialogue between Libya and the European Union, that the framework agreement can be an opportunity to deepen the political dialogue between Libya and the European Union. 
It is huge and we can see that the money that was available on you is not enough to see that the money that was available on you is not enough. 
Mr President, there is a Irish show that says : as many people as the people as they are as claiming as much opinions as possible. 
It is also important that the governments, not only in Europe, but also in our partners around the world, understand how very important they are also to engage in their priorities in the position of the things we are discussing today in Parliament. 
For this reason, we are trying to raise in today 's debate the pain and somewhat ignored a question of Roma isolation. 
On the euro area, some Members have raised questions concerning the euro area and some current problems that we are facing in the euro area Member States. 
It is critical and not how it will not be quickly stabilised and stabilised. 
It is essential that agriculture and the CAP be considered as part of the decision to achieve these objectives, not as part of the issue as part of the CAP. 
You are expected to speak on this subject in the catchprocedure with the catchprocedure of hand in hand. 
It is aimed at establishing a European Area for the global interregional Partnership in the political, economic, trade, social and cultural field, in order to ensure sustainable development and for both regions. 
It is to understand the position of the German Liberal Liberal, who, with this resolution, are calling for the regulation of the media five at European level, while the German and European representatives of the media believe that this proposal, in particular, is a restriction of the freedom of the media and infringement of subsidiarity. 
At the same time, the best available techniques and the referendums will play a more important role, and industry will have greater flexibility to make the necessary investment necessary. 
I would like to emphasise this clearly that this should not be considered as a acceptance of our part of the results of the elections, of the arrests and repression against people with different thinking. 
............................................................................................................................................................ ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? ? 
Something of the cotland 's shooots, slow printed by deceived five days ! 
It is : is it the European perspective that Mr Barroso has spoken at the start, but he is not here to explain to explain. 
Are you to make a public deal with your discussions and talks not in writing on the question of Opel before the Federal Federal elections in Germany on 27 September ? 
The Commission must increase the budgetary resources for the ESF in order to provide adequate resources for measures to improve education and training, to improve access to the labour market and to the measures and to the social inclusion and activities under the EU 2020 strategy, in order to combat poverty and social exclusion in the benefit of disadvantaged and vulnerable persons, particularly women, including those facing risks of security contracts. 
We want to achieve these objectives, we must now make use of opportunities available now to us now, we must make use of opportunities. 
The current emergency situation is convinced that all of these must be encouraged and supported and supported to invest in innovative innovative ideas, in new and innovation technologies. 
To make use of this opportunity of this opportunity to make use of this opportunity to make use of this opportunity to make use of this opportunity to make use of this opportunity. 
Security - I am coming to you - we have not just interest in a temporary cease-fire. 
This sense, the contribution of the contributions of the Member States must be the most 1 % of gross national product, which is to be the most of the gross national product, in this sense. 
Also, the adoption of the March 2010 fivestrategy is progress in terms of its actions and improving future work. 
It is the reason for the long debate that has been the reason for the long debate long debate, for the long debate, for the long term. 
As regards the energy and climate crisis crisis, what is the response of the Council to what is the response of the Council 's Council 's response to the energy crisis ? 
Commissioner, we will give you our support to the creation of this fund, and we will give you our support to the creation of this fund. 
This is why it is so important that the education activities in education is operating so important. 
The fact that Parliament has voted against the amendments tabled by our delegation, which provides for the eligible standards for the eligible CO2 emissions of new power plants, has shown that it is not seriously about issues relating to reducing greenhouse gas emissions. 
The rule of law is essential for relations between Brazil and the EU, and the rule of law, is vital to relations between Brazil and the EU. 
It is that the European Union will go to a common, realistic and sustainable proposal in Cancún, because an agreement that gives tangible results always, and in all cases is preferable to the expectations that are inevitable to fail to fail to fail and makes the efforts of the governments on important environmental and even less deserving public opinion, which would be particularly difficult to correct. 
In short, culture, since it has been mentioned as an important element we are well aware - as I see in my journeys - that both regions and cities play a key role in cultural culture in Europe. 
Parliament has presented a strong resolution which proposes targeted visas and economic sanctions against the criminal regime of Lukashenko, which is proposing a strong resolution that proposes targeted visas of the criminal regime of Lukashenko. 
We are dealing with the fight against homophobia here in the European Parliament, and in its national parliaments, and also in its national parliaments. 
I can imagine what will involve it will involve, and I can imagine what will involve, will involve. 
This new procedure in the context of the Borders Procells was a new attempt for all of us, and, above all, for me, if it should be frank, if it should be frank. 
My vote in almost seven million Italian women, who are subject to violence by men every year, every year, in the seven million Italian women. 
Ladies and gentlemen, I would like to say a few words about the importance of the third maritime safety package, which is a new and equally important result of cooperation between the Council and the European Parliament. 
It is very closely linked to the ageing of Europe 's population and increasing it in Europe to start to undergo a neurologistics. 
strategies allow the regions concerned regions and countries to jointly respond to the problems that exist and jointly to take advantage of the existing problems and jointly take advantage of the existing opportunities that exist. 
I would therefore like to make it clear that I had to draft this report in a very sensitive area, with the evergender risks of health in these areas with low frequency and inability of the scientific community to agree on this issue. 
It is so important to take account of demographic changes in the demographic changes to be taken into consideration. 
It is the southern end of the torbusiness that is simply transparent in the rights direction by England to Scotland. 
It is a mechanism that will move towards changing a change that everyone recognises, which everyone recognises. 
The European Parliament, which is decisively implementing its new powers, managed to make significant progress and obtain additional guarantees : the approach that our Group of the Group of the European Free Alliance ', regularly review of the agreement, initially assessed after six months, a report on progress after three years, on access and corrections, the possibility of blocking certain data, by European data and data transfer authority, and data transfer authority. 
I adopted the compromise we have adopted, although it lacked the island and the determination I would like to see. 
After all, true democracy means this exactly that, it means exactly that this is exactly what it means. 
Yemen can not be considered separately by security issues relating to Yemen. 
Many call for the interests of social services and the vulnerable groups to be taken into account, and call for the interests of social services and the vulnerable groups to be taken into consideration. 
fishermen are set up to flee less fish, but demand is increasing and with it, and together with the import from third countries. 
As the representatives of the European Investment Bank have arrived later and have not been able to hear my first speech, I would like to draw attention to the fact that we are already applying codecision procedure and that the European Parliament does not play now, as has just now, not only considerable role in terms of the issues relating to the European Investment Bank issues. 
Mr President, Commissioner, you have just supported us in the initiative that we - Members - are planning to take on this issue. 
Europe is in its efforts, whether we are talking about a humanitarian or intergovernmental method, is in its efforts, whether we are talking about a humanitarian or intergovernmental method. 
We are going back to the firm democratic policy that has only recently been reduced recently, has only recently been mitigated. 
We are preparing a programme of visits, meetings and even material support for victims, but the victims themselves are the victims of this terrible persecution, who will be much better protected than we could have done. 
The ratification rationalisation of three issues this week should clarify three issues this week. 
The Community for the free movement of capital is also under doubt as much as the more important countries are pursuing the return of capital to their citizens ' capital. 
It also helps cooperation between Spain and Colombia to develop the Roxo Minister Development Cooperation Cooperation Cooperation and Colombia. 
It can also contribute to the use of personal qualities and training in successful business, and can also contribute to the use of personal qualities and training in successful business. 
This is hopeful that the European public and we hope that the results will make it aware of the challenges that we all have to face up to. 
The draft agreement with the Principality of Liechtenstein and the draft submission to the Council, because some Member States have political reservations and relating to these documents with the review of the EU savings Directive. 
It is a game or a friend, you can say not, but as always, it is a matter of fact that you are usually played. 

It is very difficult for the Commission and the Council to collect these data, because there are Member States who are not prepared to provide them, perhaps because they have not been a study on the consequences of improving the quality of the decision-making procedures on refugee status and the status of the beneficiaries of international protection. 
This must be negotiated with the country and the agreement must be signed and negotiations must be signed. 
We will be decisively to end the absurd situations that are so often faced with the holders of long-stay visas of long-stay visas of long-stay visas of type of visa type of disasters from the ECD. 
I am also in the idea that a European strategy for these diseases must protect services that support universal and broad scope in geographical terms of access to the system. 
It can also help to resolve the distributive between budgetary discipline and policy aimed at promoting growth. 
This sense, the creation of a common foreign policy of the European Union has particularly important, so the challenge faced by Baroness Ashton in this area is even greater even more so. 
Vice-President of the Commission. - I have the right to decide whether to hold a roll-call vote or not. 
I believe that the Commission has done a good job and presented ambitious proposals and presented ambitious proposals, I believe that the Commission has done a good job and presented ambitious proposals. 
Madam President, ladies and gentlemen, under the report, the Commission should follow a successful policy of competition as a successful policy of competition, and the Commission should be a successful policy of competition, under the report, a successful competition policy. 
We also in the Committee on Foreign Affairs and in the Chamber today supported the amendments that our opinion meets with our opinion. 
There is something that happened in Austria until 1818, and then the situation has ever improved to a certain extent. 
The EU for 2010 provides significant amounts of commitments to the economic recovery pledges made in the Economic Recovery Plan, such as EUR 1 million ( 1 million energy networks ), the European network of Olympics Translation ( EUR 208 million ) and stimulation of CO2 in geological areas ( EUR million ). 
Our own responsibility, Europe has made its contribution to increasing this funding to increase this funding, finance. 
No, it is not right, it is not right, it is not right, but it is not right. 
Member States have different opinions on the question of whether nuclear energy can play a part in reducing CO2 emissions. 
Climate Change is an important objective, but the all of the panic before the Copenhagen Climate Summit is outrageous and does not reflect scientific facts. 
I have a letter of a local regime, as a requirement for the profession to exercise discharge in 10 years without interruption. 
It is very important to develop targeted and intelligent sanctions, including against individuals, including against individuals, individuals, of particular importance, of developing targeted and intelligent sanctions. 
It is to insist on more immigration and migration laws, we must make the legislation that we already have, to work better and more strongly for all the citizens of the Union. 
The G20 declarations expect the results and a credible European Union and a credible European Union declaration. 
There are hundreds of offshore platforms for oil and natural gas extraction and natural gas extraction. 
Draghts since the end of June 2008 and reveals serious cases of corruption with the involvement of EU funds. 
The framework of the preparation of the review conference, which will take place in 2010, the Council intends to submit a revised and updated common position. 
These are initiatives for which many people are calling for in Europe, which call for many people to be called for. 
However, although these speeches were true by my political opponents, the statement in question does not contrary to the provisions of the law in the law, it is a very rare decision, because the High Legal Red Constitutional judge has been issued, and at the same time, it has been very much done in what happened in this case in France, in particular. 
A balance between freedom, protection of privacy protection and the need for security in the Internet is a real challenge for all of us. 
It is decided whether young citizens of aged 16 years can participate in the initiative, this depends on the national electoral law, whether it is dependent on the national electoral law. 
It is closed, finished, finishing, finished, closed. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, first of all, I would like to apologise to apologise that I did not attend at the start of the debate, but I have just come from Brussels with a pleasant, and how to say, how I say, you would be more advanced on the agenda of the day that is very praiseworthy, but therefore I have delayed a little bit more so. 
What thanks have they received instead of thanking me, instead of what thanks have given rather than thank you, instead of what have been given instead of being very grateful to you ? 
Finally, oil companies operate on ever increasing deep depth, which makes the intervention of a very difficult accident in the event of an accident and put the maritime environment at risk. 
What I would like to know is : what has happened with your public protest ? 
To get the word ' before the government ', so that you read the original decision by the government does not fail to present the Nobel Peace Prize on 10 December in Ossetia ; welcomes the Ombudsman 's initiative to attend the ceremony as responsible and prudential '. 
However, I would like to mention two aspects of the two aspects, I would like to mention two aspects of this, however. 
Many cases, it is going further further further, it is going on, and it is going on further, all the more than ever. 
I would also like to say a few words about the EURONURONUC initiative, which is only one example of finding a concrete solution to the implementation of the EPAs in countries like Armenia, Azerbaijan, Azerbaijan, Azerbaijan, Azerbaijan, Georgia, Georgia, Moldova, Ukraine, Ukraine or Belarus. 
The vote vote : : : : : : : vote vote vote vote : : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote : : : : vote vote vote vote vote vote vote 
The freedom of religion show that the majority of acts of religious violence are against Christians and Christians on religious freedom. 
It is not only an attempt to defend the principle of non-discrimination throughout the procedure for processing data, but also to create a European body that will have the capacity to receive and supervise the requests from the US. 
Is there freedom to have freedom without rights without rights without rights without freedom, without rights ? 
I would like to thank you, I would like to thank you, thank you, for your thanks. 
The Union must encourage Libya to adopt legal and social solutions which improve the inhumane lives of approximately two million immigrants - almost quarter of the population - who work in Libya. 
The sustainable economic development is possible only with the employers - with people, with people, with people, with people, with people, with people, with the people of Europe. 
The political imagination offers such a little hope of change, inevitably, the feeling of the popular popular police - as we are seeing now the lesson of the change is being put into the region. 
It is important to continue the necessary preparations in the stricter need to continue to be tightened up with the necessary preparations that the necessary preparations are necessary for the tightening up to be rigorous and rigorous. 
The issue of counterfeiting for purely protectionist purposes has already made its results available to the issue of purely protectionist objectives and already made their results. 
Unless we want to in any way to threaten the programme for housing blocks, which is important for all of us, we finally agreed not to table amendments to us. 
The result of intense consultations between the members of the Convention and the NGOs involved in democratic policy are the result of integral consultations between the members of the Convention and the NGOs. 
Some Member States should be excluded from the euro area to be brought to an end to the withdrawal of the attempt to create a strong Europe, and some Member States would be excluded from the euro area to create a strong Europe. 
It is that the policy of Israel is being examined by many of us as a fraud, as a fraud one, is considered by many of us as a fraud. 
In December, the newspapers and the news TV television reports report that Europe is slowly learned by the Luxembourg Time. 
Conful in Tunisia over the last few days, the last few days are clearly proof of this as a matter of principle. 
However, the other side is increasingly ever more ever increasing competition from third countries and, in particular, from the so-called flag '. 
It is the same of the two letters that I sent the Commission from 1 March as a elected representative for the region of the West France and which I had the opportunity to discuss last Thursday in Lukashenko with Commissioner Hahn, whom I sincerely thank for the resilience on the contraception. 
( ES ) Mr President, attacks recently in Iraq and Egypt are proof of of two tragedies for two tragedies for Europe, albeit different substance, but of different nature, in principle, of different terms of principle. 
More companies are moving to take advantage of low labour costs in some countries, particularly China and India, often in the detriment of countries that respect workers ' rights. 
It is a humane and financial point that, in terms of the problems of mental health, often affect both private, family, professional and social life of individual people and their families, and their families, and also on society in general. 
It is also noted that these agreements also provide benefits for passengers, as they can lead to the simplification of control measures without them being neglected without being ignored. 
The adoption and achievement of an agreement on the negotiating framework for Croatia and Slovenia agreed to resolve any border dispute in accordance with the principle of peaceful settlement of disputes enshrined in the United Nations Wall of the United Nations. 
In the light of the above, I can only express my hope that it will be provided with greater legal certainty as regards the resolution of a comprehensive justice in the context of family law, particularly in relation to the spread of corps or law, as an important step in order to establish an area of freedom and justice in which the freedom of movement of people is a reality. 
It is, of course, safety, and safety certification of safety must be a prerequisite for obtaining a licence for operation. 
This is a matter of focusing on the importance of child facilities in the importance of child facilities. 
Energy and research funds, as well as the decommissioning of the nuclear power plant Kozloduy plant in Bulgaria are positive aspects, but what I do not agree with, are the broad lines of the EU budget lines. 
It is actually particularly important, because it is aimed at this, for European and other consumers to understand that our production is not competed with a productive produce of other countries, but rather that it proposes an alternative to quality and productive methods of the environmental and social standards and to those relating to animal welfare that, for their part, is in favour of the health of people. 
I am not right to be wrong to be not to be on the basis of I am not right. 
There are already more than 3 million victims and have forced more than 3 million people, millions of people in the region to leave their homes. 
In addition, efforts are being made to establish relations and partnerships with neighbouring countries, the former enemy of Serbia, a step I welcome, because it is significant in humanitarian terms. 
They are the potential of the Arctic region, the rich natural resources in the region, raw materials and energy resources, as well as new transport and tourism, but also the sensitive sensitivity of the sensitive environment in the Arctic, as well as the rights of the coach population. 
We must send the wrong message to the wrong message, we must send out the wrong message. 
As regards the role of the private sector, the solutions will be taken for each individual case, so that the commitment of the private sector will not be a fundamental requirement for support under the future stability mechanism. 
The stable and lasting democracy is a prerequisite for possible membership of the EU in the EU, and it is a prerequisite for possible membership of the EU in the EU. 
cross-border cooperation and the European instrument for democracy and human rights programmes provide support to the people of the Northwest West Russia and to other coach peoples in the region of Baroness Church. 
We are trying to ensure that the rest of the EUR 24 billion, EUR billion, through compensation for the coherence of the 2010 budget procedure and 2011, with the help of all - I quote - I quote it is important - the budget resources provided for in its legal framework and without affecting the financial package 's package of codecision and the annual budget '. 
It is through the very broad agreement that my shadow rapporteurs and with all of you, we are making a very clear message to the Council and to the Commission, which has the task of negotiating, but also to the negotiators of the Libyan side, of which conditions are in our opinion, in order to achieve what we want to strengthen our bilateral ties, and also in the vital issue of respect for the observance of human rights in Libya. 
It will indeed not really be a citizens ' initiative, but it will not really be a citizens ' initiative. 
On 9 December, the Eurotrade ministers meeting on 9 December to discuss the recovery of our economic and trade cooperation, in the euro area, in order to discuss the recovery of our economic and trade cooperation. 
The water is the most important challenge facing the world and the world and Europe of Europe, and the world of water is the most important challenge of the world and the European world. 
It is the European strategy on this matter, and there is a European strategy on this matter, on this matter, on this matter ? 
I call on the Agency to improve by the end of the year, the proof of the information provided by the operational separate separate allocations on the evaluation of the quantitative expenditure of operational expenditure. 
It is not to close borders but rather to seek concrete ways to facilitate the integration of citizens in the diversity of European societies. 
It also concerns defines their everyday lives everyday life. 
We must avoid any misunderstanding sense, I must say that this report is indirectly relevant to genetically modified food, which is genetically modified. 
It is pensioned, it is retired, it is retired, and it is being red. 
I am convinced that this new proposal will give a new impetus to the debate in the Council by ensuring that the new proposal reflects also the opinions of the Council and Parliament 's Parliament 's Council and Parliament. 
- ( ES ) Madam President, I would like to briefly point out two points in short detail. - ( ES ) Madam President, I would like to make two points very briefly, in short detail. 
Loook at a despair Member State like Germany, Austria, Austria or Italy : how will we do Austria or Germany, for example, accept a 30 % reduction in their economic development so that Poland regulate its economic development, the number of the population 's cars and so on ? 
A majority of patients with mental health infringements in mental hospitals and other social institutions are in mine and absolute degrading living conditions, and there are extremely large shortcomings at the level of primary primary and secondary aid. 
The trade regime allows for 176 developing countries and regions to take advantage of preferential access to the European market in exchange for the ratification of the ILO conventions ( ILO ) for social rights and the United Nations Convention on Human Rights. 
It will be united and this unity will be provided by strong regions that, protecting their own interests, will work closely together with others, thereby creating a network of prosperity and development throughout Europe. 
Indeed, it is actually a export of Europe 's money to these third countries to these third countries to these third countries. 
It must be saved from the temptation of a solution that implies war and armed force, which is supposed to be saved by the temptation of a solution that presupposes war and armed force. 
We are in the view of speed when short-term speculators have a advantage on the international financial market ( because of wrong rules ) to those who want to make long-term investment in jobs, in the transition products and the long-term success of their enterprise. 
I am also aware that Commissioner Fis also present and Commissioner F, who is responsible for our neighbourhood policy. 
An everrange of growing parts of maritime fathers in areas which are increasingly getting more acute in sea. 
There is a different time of time for India and for Europe, so to say, the passing of the journeys to the left-wing paves, and that is understandable, as both sides are different to the different levels of development. 
It is aimed at providing greater protection in terms of the CE mark, the hazardous substances, national contact points in construction, independence and transparency, health and safety, as well as e-communications e-communications. 
Unfortunately, this has not yet been a promise that has yet been promised. 
The past shows that fair and strong implementation of rules in itself has a positive effect on competition within the single sector. 
On behalf of my group, I would like to say that you have served your place with great dignity and I would like to say that you have served with great dignity. 
The Black Sea is fully devoted to the development of the Nabucco gas pipeline and the creation of a free trade area guaranteeing its energy security and cereal in the region. 
cities have a need for intelligent communication, transport, transport and energy infrastructure, for transport and energy infrastructure. 
We are not talking about new minorities, we are talking about new minorities, but about new minorities, but about new minorities. 
I believe that labelling will not be enough or if used, this type of purchase of rape should not be called '. 
I would like to report that, unfortunately, a few hours ago in Belarus, the recent violation of human rights had been carried out in place in the past hours ago in Belarus. 
Finally, I would like to mention the progress made on the prosperity contained the main information for investors, which provides protection by pointing out that we would like this prosperity to be divided - on paper due to its small amount - and not only in request. 
I would have the support of the main propolitical families, but some are excluded from this, but some are excluded from it. 
On the Environment, public health and food safety and the Committee on Industry, Research and Energy have been involved together in the meetings and both of the debates with the Commissioner where we were able to look at the facts in more detail. 
I know Mr Samecki and therefore I am interested to hear here in order to answer a question that Mr McCreevy and his team. 
For the sake of a few thoughts of thousands of people now, I say 'yes ' to the European Protection Order of the European Protection Order. 
It is the only way that Europol 's work is to receive sufficient legitimacy in the way that Europol 's work is obtained sufficiently legitimacy. 
Do you not want to be forced to fight against the equal business of health care, for which health policy is being reduced to electronic tables with figures and statistics in their computer computer ? 
The Arctic has an important contribution to energy supply, raw materials, and also to European fish for Europe. 
In view of the fact that this is a regime that this is a regime, we must be considered with the opportunity to present a threat to other countries, particularly for the neighbouring countries. 
Responsibility is given to the merits of the Black Sea Synergy, which we approved three years ago, a new EU strategy for the Black Sea should be used to make stronger policy and specific instruments more effective. 
The resources of the Office for the Combating corruption and organised crime have been strengthened and strengthened and the resources of the Office for the fight against corruption and organised crime, and the resources of the Office for the fight against corruption and organised crime have been strengthened. 
Parliament must play a greater role in creating competition policies and, in this connection, I call on the Commission to follow up recommendations in particular, on 3 recommendations and 4 and 4 and to really take a serious report to the European Parliament on its recommendations. 
These are very good plans, but their implementation is seriously threatened by the financial and economic crisis, which is continuing to do so so so far, but their implementation is seriously threatened by the financial and economic crisis. 
We are fighting in Belarus to have free elections and Belarus to be a free partner partner in Europe, and we are fighting for free elections and Belarus to be a free partner partner in Europe. 
We support the development of relations with Libya by establishing a framework agreement covering various areas of cooperation with a view to promoting true political dialogue. 
We are caring in the environment not to harm it, but we do not harm it, but we do not harm it. 
in writing. - I voted in favour of the resolution on the creation of credit rating agencies : prospects of prospects for the creation of credit rating agencies : prospects. 
I call on the European Commission and Member States to develop an effective counterstrategy for counteraction to achieve greater freedom of the media. 
( EL ) Madam President, we are at the turning point at the turning point at the turning stage. 
It means that water must remain under public scrutiny, which is in the interests of everyone. 
Unfortunately, positive elements are too little and rare, regrettable, very little and rare, positive elements are too little and rare. 
However, as the Agency has rejected five objectives of 18recommendations, it seems that there is not even the necessary desire for this to be a desire. 
What I would like to say to you, and to point out, is that a strong treasury is just as dangerous as hypocritical and human embassies and in the economy. 
It is going on. 
What is happening now what is going on ? What is the case now about what is going on ? 
The EU strategy for the Black Sea should therefore create a stronger political framework and give a strong impetus to the involvement of the EU in the Black Sea region. 
: MeMeMeMeMeMeMeasures for reducing the administrative expenditure for SMEs for SMEs reducing the administrative costs for SMEs for SMEs in reducing the costs of reducing the administrative costs for SMEs ' spending. 
I understand the reading of this matter, the surprising in this case is the lack of information about what has happened in order to achieve the contamination of popular meat. 
At the same time, I share the rapporteur 's position that Member States should have more time to investigate whether the repealing of the directives will result in legal uncertainty that makes the necessary European harmonisation of rules necessary. 
In particular, the hundreds of hundreds of or even thousands of Belarusian students who are currently unable to continue their training and I would like to make a very concrete proposal, namely, to draft a special programme for Erasmus, within the framework of the already functioning Eradication, designed exclusively for students from Belarus. 
However, there is a risk that the Kimberley System is used to legalise another practice, namely the violation of human rights by the regime. 
on behalf of the ALDE Group. - Madam President, the scenario is the same scenario is the same scenario. 
Do we think that it would be better to create a new administrative bureaucracy in the hands of the same generations that created the common agricultural policy, the common fisheries policy, the unvisa budgets and all the other EU systems adopted ? 
Finally - thank you, Mr President - and we believe that the chapter on sustainable development must include binding commitments in terms of compliance with social and environmental standards, and particularly on the social standards of the ILO. 
It will also be in the interests of the Commission to include the European Parliament in legislative initiatives at an early stage to ensure an effective process that is in the interests and for the benefit of the people of Europe, as well as for active democracy. 
A person can be discriminated on the basis of discrimination on the basis of any of the voters separately and if nothing happens in one of them is without useful and everything that has been done in relation to others. 
Many the criteria and, if possible, we want to cover all the areas of relations between the EU and Russia, if possible, we want to cover all the areas of relations between the EU and Russia. 
The PT must learn from the spread of oil in the Gulf of Mexico and the subsequent environmental disaster that has been followed. 
They must be able to adapt to the circumstances of circumstances, and they must be able to adapt to circumstances. 
A common system is based on the adoption of asylum seekers, as well as the examination of applications and decisions concerning the future of these citizens. 
God must recognise its objection to its objection to its objection to. 
Indeed, there is no financial impact assessment that there is no study that sets the cost of expenditure, and I fear I have to express disagree with you, Commissioner : I do not think that the study carried out by the European Parliament on the sharing of the burden on the costs relating to these proposals. 
In relation to recently decisions recently taken on the table for the sanitation equipment for banana or steeeep for a large amount of residual reserves, we have applied reductions in scope of 25 to 75 %. 
We call for a legislative role, as well as Parliament, to be regularly informed of any initiatives in this area, in this area. 
This can not be done with decentralised measures and changes and changes are being made and that can not be changed. 
With the countries of the Sahel, we must extend and coordinate our efforts through a common regional strategy, just as you mentioned, as you mentioned. 
For me, the long negotiations on the Mediterranean island are not a matter for celebration, as the last proposal from Cypriots is contrary to the existing consensus on some issues in some issues, which means that in fact represents a step backwards. 
SMEs must, first and foremost, be supported, above all, to support SMEs. 
Finally, this response to the crisis must be understood to the citizens, it must reaffirm the priorities in the field of the environment and energy and confirming the position of an energy independent European Union, however, leaving all the ways open to all the roads, all the opportunities, so that we can achieve exactly what we want. 
This is what we voted in favour of the resolution as a whole as a whole, we voted in favour of the resolution as a whole in general, we voted in favour of the resolution as a whole. 
investment is a kind of compensation thanks to savings during the appeal phases, as well as to a total of expenditure in relation to the adoption of asylum seekers. 
The framework agreement with Libya can only be helpful to Parliament 's consent if certain conditions are met if some conditions are met. 
I can regret the fact that the European right has been adopted by the European right to stricter accelerated procedures on the basis of understanding that all asylum seekers are mainly of potential potential fraudsters, thereby limiting their rights. 
This is going on in Delta, it is in Delta ? 
This will help to support and promote SMEs, because they employ the highest percentage of the citizens of the European Union. 
It would be appropriate to launch the process of establishing a kind of non-legal course of non-legal corridor in the territory of the EU to describe the soil and understand what the most relevant topic are the six most relevant issues concerning which citizens would welcome the initiative of citizens would welcome. 
However, this is a good result, which is fully in tone with Parliament 's objectives, the Council and the Commission 's Council and, namely, to fight against human trafficking, this terrible modern form of slavery, this terrible crime, which is a terrible crime that Europe in 2010 does not deserve and which is a serious violation of the fundamental rights of so many citizens. 
I believe that the same will happen later this year, but I do not want to allow for a situation where we receive no document for 2008, but for 2007, for 2007. 
In the euro area today, there are clearly evidence of the failure of the unresolved approach that we have followed in the last 10 years with the so-called open method of coordination. 
The British Cameroon study of the municipal indicators shows exactly this statement : a system allowing a rapid response to asylum seekers is much cheaper and the delay in and the violent expulsion of the targets of families is also much more expensive. 
It will ensure that any person who claims to be victims of the violation of the Convention on the part of the Union 's institution or structure may give a complaints against the Court of Justice in Strasbourg under the same conditions, such as complaints against Member States. 
future, we must make the food aid scheme in a tragic manner in force. 
Investment that will enable this goal to achieve is the Nabucco gas pipeline, which will enable the Nabucco gas pipeline to achieve this goal is the gas pipeline. 
On the subject of the subject, it is related to the authorisation of pharmaceutical products for pharmaceutical products, relating to the authorisation of pharmaceutical products. 
structural changes can the European Union offer the world of the world 's European Union to the world of the world, and the European Union can propose structural changes ? 
I have in favour of the need for an urgent review of the provisions on crime against regimes in the so-called blasphemy laws '. 
